{u'tt0245712': [u"\nThere is a character in 'Amores perros' who looks like Karl Marx.  He is a tramp and an assassin, a good bourgeois who one day, Reggie Perrin-like, abandoned his family, and, un-Reggie Perrin-like, joined the Sandanistas in an effort to create a better world, earning 20 years in prison for his troubles.  Walking the streets with a creaky cart and a gaggle of mangy dogs, he was found by the policeman who jailed him, who gave him a dingy place to live, food, and the odd, non-official contract.\n\nEl Chivo is the soul of the film, the missing link, both in appearance (a man called 'The Goat', who has rejected the civilities of society and lives a beast-like existence with his dogs, amongst the ruins of civilisation), and narrative function.  With intricate structure, 'Amores perros' tells three stories, one of underclass Mexican life, where survival depends on what New Labour calls 'illegal economies' (dog-fighting, bank-robbing etc.), where bright young women are stifled and degraded by thoughtless pregnancies and brutal marriages, where single mothers depend (and usually can't depend) on shiftless sons for subsistence; and this world's mirror opposite, the world of the media, of celebrity, of models and magazine editors, of daytime TV, perfume advertising campaigns and bright apartments.  Family life is central here too, although in this case it is torn apart by more pleasanntly bourgeois ailments like ennui and dissatisfaction.\n\nThese two stories are mediated by the narrative of El Chivo, the man who left one of these worlds for the other, but who still negotiates the two, through his search for the daughter he left as a toddler, and in his 'job', wiping out businessman.  If Mexico is emerging as part of the super-confident globalism of high-capitalism, than El Chivo is the grizzly sore thumb, the ex-Sandinista, the Marx lookalike, the man who said no, the drop-out, the forgotten, the depleted spirit of the Left,  happily killing and torturing the servants of the new economic regime.\n\nThere is something Biblical about his hirsute ascetism too, presuming to judge the 'Cain and Abel' half-brothers, one an adulterer, the other with a contract out on his sibling, another example of family gone badly wrong. This, the bleak funeral and grave scenes, and Octavia's functional crossing himself every time he passes an icon on the landing, are the sole residual elements of religion in a society once ostentatiously religious.\n\nExcept for the director.  Like Paul Thomas Anderson in 'Magnolia', although to a less self-conscious degree, Gonzales Inarritu is the God of his film, intricately creating the structure that links his characters and their different environments.  These are negative connections, however, which work against the idea of coherent meaning in life - contact usually results in destruction (physical, material, spiritual), or diminishing.\n\nHe is also an Old Testament god, punishing those who would get too confident with their future plans or their seemingly inviolable present success - the gains of capitalism are prey to the violent whims of chance: Gonzalez Inarritu doesn't need frogs to shake a rigid society or mindset.\n\nMoral change is linked to physical change - being beaten up, losing a leg, cutting hair.  The punning title, with its reference to the dog-eat/fight-dog nature of modern life, and its general unsatisfactoriness, also gives the film its Biblical feel, the idea of Mexico as an asphalt desert, or a rubbish heap, with all these scrawny mutts scavenging the remains.\n\n'Amores perros' shares  the sickly, bleached near-monochrome look of many recent crime films, like 'Chopper' or 'Bleeder'.  But where the heightened mise-en-scene in those works were expressionistic projections of their protagonists' psychosis, here it's part of a controlling world-view, the universal consciousness that creates, connects and destroys.\n\n\nThe three stories, though connected narratively and symbolically, are mutually distinct - the first is an exhilirating mix of violent gangster film and frustrated romance; the second is like a short story (the screenwriter is a novelist), a figurative plot where movement is through image, symbol and idea, rather than film narrative; the third is a kind of spiritual journey, with an appropriately Biblical (or Wim Wenders-like) openness.\n\n'Amores perros' is not quite as amazing as its admirers claim - it says more about contemporary cinema that a film only has to hold your interest for it to be a masterpiece - but it is consistently enthralling, and, despite all the stylistic tics and brutal violence, bracingly humanist.", u'-0.319777', u"\nTrue to the structure, I\xf1\xe1rritu attacks the subject of love with a multi-pronged approach, addressing three different stages, or complications, common in `love.'  All three storylines represent the `struggling' aspect of love.  It would be fair to say that Amores Perros, roughly translated to be `Love's a Bitch,' makes the ultimate statement, `Love is a struggle.' More specifically, however, Octavio's narrative can be most suitably seen as the `hunt for love' and acquisition or fight for it.  To be with his love, Susana, he must overcome both the fact that his brother is married to her and the fact that his dreams of leaving the city are hamstrung by his less than admirable socio-economic state.  Daniel and Valeria, who are about fifteen to twenty years Octavio and Susana's elders, represent love's most frustrating peak - when one is already in it and wants or needs to get out, for better of for worse.  Daniel is trying to get out of a marriage in which he has kids to be with the supermodel, Valeria, a woman whose meaning to him is ultimately superficial.  El Chivo, whose story is a perfect compliment to Daniel's, represents distance and alienation from love, inwardly looking at it from the outside.  He has abandoned his family twenty years prior to become a guerilla terrorist and now operates as a vagabond hit man.  It would be difficult to look at these three different `stages' of love in a classically structured film.  The episodic structure eases us between each stage, at no point forcing us to tolerate the unrealistic concept of one couple going through all of these stages.  Breaking it up into three different narratives, each revolving around different characters, presents the audience with the ability to view each story as independent the others, a more pervasive perspective.\n\nHowever, this film is not a simple three-part love story.  In Amores Perros, violence is akin to love.  Each character displays this brutally: El Chivo leaves his love to be a terrorist; Octavio engages his dog in violence and even attempts murder to provide money for his love; Daniel and Valeria's relationship is verbally and nearly physically volatile to the point where they hate each other.  Each character's love for another character is manifested in their violent acts.  This is an interesting theme considering the paradoxical relationship between love and violence, one of which is the induction of harm, the other which is the polar opposite.  This juxtaposition of love and violence, if for no other reason, is meant to show the impulsive nature of love.  We take it for granted as a compassionate, helping characteristic of life but I\xf1\xe1rritu reveals his characters through this juxtaposition, allowing the audience to consider the consequences of love that are otherwise unforeseen.\n\nI\xf1\xe1rritu does a lot of things right in this film.  Mainly, he keeps us in constant suspense through the causality of the plot, forcing us to anticipate the results of the characters' actions.  This causality can be as brazen as Octavio's decision to stab Jarocho, inevitably leading one into apprehension over what will happen to Octavio.  Less obviously, however, is the way he creates suspense around Daniel and Valeria.  Their whole relationship is characterized by conflict.  While this makes for good dialogue, it insists upon a boiling point - one that is anticipated throughout the entire length of their chapter.  Likewise, there is delicate suspense over what Valeria's disfigurement will mean for their relationship. Not only is Daniel forced to confront whether or not Valeria's beauty is the only thing keeping them together, but Valeria must adjust to living without her beauty.  Suspense revolves around El Chivo from the moment he first comes onto screen.  We see him.  He murders someone.  We're back to the story of Octavio.  The entire first two hours of the movie beg of an answer as to who this man is and what he has to do with the subject of the film.  We later find out, not only does he have everything to do with it; he makes the film, seeking redemption on behalf of every other love-torn character.  The type of monologue Emilio Echevarria's character, El Chivo, delivers at the end of the film would have a completely different meaning in a film without an episodic structure, in which case he would only be seeking redemption for himself.  However, the way I\xf1\xe1rritu cross cuts between El Chivo and the other characters, in all their woe - the consequences of their actions, applies greater meaning to El Chivo's words and actions in the final scene.\n\nPerhaps where we get some of the most important information about the characters, and Amores Perros as a whole, is through what is representative. I\xf1\xe1rritu makes steady use of symbols and motifs throughout the film, some of which work well, lending themselves nicely to the dramatic structure of the film, others failing to enhance the story.  For example, the massive Enchant billboard looming above Valeria's apartment like the eyes of Dr. T.J. Eckleburg is one of the more lackluster motifs in the film.  First, we are unavoidably asking, `Why they would want to live under that thing in the first place?  Second, the removal of the billboard coinciding with the fall of Valeria's career, Daniel's self-assurance, their relationship, whatever you want to intuit, is much to explicit for this film.  The more understated motifs such as the recurring telephone ring, `Bueno?.Bueno?' someone always answers, come off better.  This repetition is telling of the deception and unfaithfulness rampant in this world.  It works.  Another representative device that supplements the story is how the dogs act as metaphors for their respective owners.  El Chivo's dogs are the very embodiment of him.  They are all strays much the same way he is a vagrant.  Cofi, Octavio's rottweiler is equivalent to Octavio in his impulsive and aggressive behavior.  This is displayed in Cofi most notably during the fight scenes, but we see it particularly in Octavio when he head-butts his brother, Ramiro, and when he stabs Jarocho in the stomach and thereby provoking the car chase.  Valeria's dog, Richie, is lost under the floorboards, confined for most of this narrative.  Valeria is physically much the same way, confined to her wheelchair.  More implicitly, she is confined to a life that has been propped up around her by people who idolize, envy, or lust after her.  Valeria's death is also parallel to her dog's death in that they both die from their respective internment, Valeria being trapped in a room and too immobile to save herself, Richie trapped in the floor and too exhausted to fend off armies hungry rats.  The motifs and metaphors within each narrative help structure them as self-contained bodies.\n\nThe episodic structure of Amores Perros could have been damaging to the film had it not been for the inspired way the stories overlap only so much as to not exasperate the audience.  In the three stories, rarely does a character from one interact with a character from another, outside the unifying car crash scene.  There are truly only two occurrences: when El Chivo, sword in hand, scares off a frustrated Jarocho who plans to sic his dog on one of El Chivo's, and when Valeria appears on a Mexican morning show broadcast into Octavio's home the morning of the accident.  This interaction was all that was needed for Amores Perros to be successful as an episodic film.  Its structure lends itself well to subject matter and storyline.  I\xf1\xe1rritu tells it to us this way; the literary devices at use bring it to life and its structure gives it legs to move.  Throughout it, so well crafted, one can mentally fuse all three stories together and see one single character going through the process of fighting for love, realizing what a trivial pursuit it is, abandoning it, and then spending the rest of his life trying to touch it from behind the bars self-guilt.\n", u'-0.100853', u'\nMaybe for most of you, people outside third-world countries like Mexico or Colombia, my home, movies like ths one are only representations of another world... something away from you. My city, medellin, is one of the most dangerous cities on the world. Mexico city can be as dangerous as medellin. I`m not talking about politics. maybe you haven`t lived violence as near as i have, but im gonna tell you something, that is the main reason i voted 9 this movie: Amores perros is not fiction. Its a perfect peep to what life is here. We have expensive models that go to stupid tv shows, we have dog fighting, we have mercedes, we have old trucks, we have killers, businessmen, we feel love, we have houses... our life, as you can see in the movie, isn`t as different as you think. Amores perros can show you that life is not easy here. but that`s it. What you saw is thousand`s of people life. that`s why it`s so magic to you. Your\xe8 seeing what you will never live there, in london, new york, seattle, paris, berlin... reality is weirder than fiction... see it on amores perros, and you`ll believe me... live it here, and no movie will surprise you', u'0.00266608', u'\n\'Amores Perros\' impressed the hell out of me. Three interrelated tales of the darker side of life in contemporary Mexico City, each one as fresh and as fascinating as the last. Each of the three stories are dark, disturbing and filled with humanity. Superbly acted all round, but especially noteworthy is the standout performance by Emilio Echevarria as El Chivo, a political dissident turned hitman, and if the charismatic Gael Garcia Bernal (Octavia, the lovesick dog fighter) isn\'t an international star in the making I\'ll eat my words. This brilliant movie shows up the mediocrity of most current Hollywood "product", and to my mind ranks with a small handful of movies made this decade (\'Chopper\', \'The Pledge\', \'The Way Of The Gun\') that are truly memorable and with genuine substance. This one is a winner and essential viewing for all movie lovers. A future classic.', u'0.714811', u"I think we're talking about one of the best Mexican films ever (i say so, knowing there's been excellent Luis Bu\xf1uel films as well as Arturo Ripstein ones, like 'Principio y Fin' -Begining and End- that is this director's highest peak (based on the book by Naguib Mafusz)and Emilio 'El Indio' Fernandez ones that i don't personally like that much (even though he received the Golden Bear in the 'Berlinale').\n\nBeing surrounded by terrible Mexican movies, 'Amores Perros' was so refreshing and remarkably above every expectation that everybody could have about a first-time director (even though he was well-known for his wonderful work at advertising (changing the way ads were made in Mexico) and as a radio DJ in a WFM radio station that contributed to change radio in Mexico, too, along with Rock 101. Gonzalez I\xf1arritu (in cooperation with his almost personal screenwriter, Guillermo Arriaga) creates such a complex yet flawless history based on three individual ones that converge not only in the dantesque (reference to Dante Alighieri's style, The Divine Comedy) car accident, but in their perception and description of how love can be harsh, as well as life itself, of how love can get to be a bitch, a struggle.\n\nFirst Story ('Octavio y Susana') is about Octavio's (Garcia Bernal) obsession with his sister-in-law, Susana (Vanessa Bauche), but it's also about the violence, about an illusion, about betrayal, about loss. This is also reflected in the character of Octavio's dog, Cofi in a parallel relationship with his owner while he seeks his own destiny, having lost everything, he'll have to redefine his life. This parallelism also occurs in the second story('Daniel y Valeria'), an almost surreal one, where Ritchie being trapped underneath the condo's floor represents how it's owner Valeria (Goya Toledo) is trapped in a relation with Daniel that grows sicker as her injury (caused by the car accident) gets worse. The removal of the gigantic advertising of 'Enchant', the scent campaign that she used to be the image for, from the view of her balcony represents their decline: Daniel (Avaro Guerrero) left behind his marriage for this superficial mirage kind of dream, and she will have to make a whole redefinition of her life after losing everything. The dog-character parallelism with the main characters of this film can also be noticed in the third story ('El Chivo y Maru'), where 'El Chivo' (Emilio Echevaria), a former College teacher that left it all, family included, to become some guerrilla terrorist (is there a symbolism for Subcommander Marcos, from EZLN?), and now finds, by losing it all (all of his dogs being killed), but finding a new reason, new company just before a hit-man-type mission where he sets a confrontation between two brothers in such a biblical style the chance that none of the characters from the rest of the stories had: redemption. That's when he decides to retrieve some of the things he has lost, like Maru (Lourdes Echevarria -Emilio's actual daughter in real life), by at least apologizing to her, and redeeming himself finding a new life. It's clear that he'll stop being a homeless, because by the end of the movie he's got plenty of money. This story is one step ahead of the other two, cause after the loss they are all victims of, 'El Chivo' is the only one who gets that chance to start from scratch once again. Huge merit to Emilio Echevarria's performance for making believable the only character that was in risk of not being plausible of the film. Because of the relation within the characters, their dogs and their own love personal story, the title is, too a big success (both in Spanish and in English). \n\nOf the episodic narrative structure of the movie (a few critics in the Cannes Film Festival compared it with Tarantino's Pulp Fiction), it can be said that besides making it more beautiful and complex, it's also necessary. One can't figure a way to resolve the situation other than this one. The thrill, the shock would never be the same. For example, if each one was a short film instead, it wouldn't work the same way as the whole movie.\n\nIn the film, Gonzalez I\xf1arritu allows himself to appear a few times: in the editorial where Daniel works, for example, verifying a magazine cover; having some of the TV spots he made in the 90's when he was a publicist shown in the movie; and in the last scene, 'El Chivo' names the dog he rescued (formerly known as Cofi) as 'El Negro', I\xf1arritu's nickname.", u'-0.257185', u'Some people just won\'t want to sit through this film because of the overtly graphic and disturbing dog fighting scenes, which is ironic, because most people don\'t seem to mind the graphic violence involving the people in this film. Others simply won\'t watch it because of the subtitles. This is a shame, since this is by far the best film I have ever seen come out of Mexico (far better and more complex than the comparably immature "Y Tu Mama Tambien"). Here we get an intertwining tale involving dog fights, petty gangsters, a tragically injured model, a cheating husband, an abused teenage wife, and a homeless hit man. As you might expect the homeless hit man becomes the soul of the film, and the dogs serve as a link, reminding us of the violence we inflict upon each other and nature, and the fractured relationships we think beyond repair, but are actually more resilient than we could ever imagine. Brilliantly directed with a great soundtrack and a bigger heart than you might initially perceive, "Amores Perros" is a deep, thought-provoking and utterly enthralling film that you will not soon forget.', u'-0.0766159', u"\nThis Mexican movie was surprisingly good. I confess the sin of prejudice concerning Mexican cinema, this being maybe the second Mexican film I have ever seen, but here my sins are punished. This is the work of a director of big talent. Hopefully, he will not be spoiled by the success.\n\n\nThree different stories in today's Mexico mix with very few common elements. The characters belong to different social categories, and nothing connects them at first sight, excepting the feeling of un-happiness, and - yes - dogs. Dogs play an important role in all three stories. One more warning - there is a lot of cruelty including dog fights - this film is certainly not for sensitive animal lovers. \n\nDirecting is excellent, the stories are human and complex and despite their melodramatic or sometimes tragic outcome, they still leave you with a shade of hope - maybe because the humanity that the author uses to create his characters. There are so many memorable scenes, that I would commit another sin to pick any and describe it here - just rent, or go to watch this movie in the theater - it is worth all 150 or so minutes you will spend. 9/10 on my personal scale.  ", u'-0.0114227', u'Thanks to contributors, plot synopsis has been very well written. Amores Perros is included in the most important movies for the beginning of the 21st century. It marked a new epoch with its thoroughly life-like vision on a twist of fate. Then in a 5 years\' of time within more recognized movies, we started seeing similar plot schemes telling different stories over accidents that binds each person\'s fate. One of them was Crash, and it won the best picture Oscar in 2005.\n\nThe more you see this film over and over again you\'ll get to a deeper point where the lives and choices of the characters won\'t matter any more. It\'s still affecting in the first-time watch, but with an examining view the next time you see it; you\'re driven into a vision, a cast of mind.There were 3 main characters and 3 main stories from each one, which are nested altogether. If we look at these stories over the characters\' relationships with their dogs, it\'s intriguing. As if the dogs exemplify their owners: \n\n1\' Young loafer Octavio commits crime in order to earn money to make a living. He fights his dog Cofi in dog-fighting tournaments. How Cofi needs to fight for his life, so does need Octavio to commit crime for his life.\n\n2\' In the second story, beautiful model Valeria receives a surprise gift from her fianc\xe9 to choose a puppy from a pet store. By time, the puppy gets used to live a super-luxury pet life; which is the same life style of her owner. Valeria and her fianc\xe9\'s apartment unit is under a hardwood flooring construction. One day while alone at home the puppy falls into a gap between the hardwood and the concrete; thus stays stuck there and began to squawk, since she is not used to live without comfort. At the same day her owner Valeria gets involved in a car accident while driving alone, having no one to help her just as happened to her puppy. She loses her leg in this accident and her luxury life comes to an end, as same as the life of her puppy. She begins complaining like her puppy squawking.\n\n3\' In the last story, the grim hit-man El Chivo saves the life of Octavio\'s dog Cofi, after Octavio gets killed in the traffic accident in which Valeria lost her leg. Saving him changes Cofi\'s life, he no longer needs to fight for Octavio\'s bets on dog-fighting. His life becomes safe and peaceful. El Chivo starts looking after Cofi beside his other dogs. Among the other dogs Cofi looks very ugly and dirty. One day when El Chivo leaves the dogs together at home, Cofi kills every one of them. His reason of killing all the dogs explains why his owner is a hit-man. As Cofi killed innocent dogs; El Chivo kills innocent people for El Chivo seeing himself ugly,dirty and strange among the people; like his dog feeling himself ugly,dirty and strange among the dogs. El Chivo feels bad about his dogs, when he finds out Cofi has killed them. Yet, he feels worse about himself when he actually realizes that Cofi\'s attitude gave him a lesson of life. Then El Chivo shaves, cuts his beard and hair, gets cleaned up and turns out looking like a gentleman. Cofi\'s attitude changes his life; his life becomes safe and peaceful just as when El Chivo saved Cofi\'s life.\n\nThe vision we\'re getting when we compare these 3 stories is about the public loneliness of an individual. The only person, who can guide and who can help us, is ourselves. This loneliness brings our freedom of choices. With making our own choices, we build the essence of our character: Our quintessences. Life is sum of all our choices. In order to build our quintessences; we always face the risk, fear and pressure of the chance of making a wrong choice. Life makes it obligatory to make choices. This obligatory builds our inner crisis and develops our personality. To find the secrets of our own personality, we try to find someone or something else to lay a burden on the responsibility of self-search. Here in Amores Perros, the 3 main characters are used by their self-search reflection on their dogs.\n\nDoesn\'t this vision form the idea of Jean Paul Sartre\'s "Being and Nothingness"? Since Amores Perros hides the character views through the situations created by dogs; it is a movie that has no characters, but only situations. This is the systematic of Existentialism. If there was no situation or happening, there wouldn\'t have been any characters. Existence precedes essence. A person is nothing without his actions. So, a person doesn\'t have a soul(or a character) if he is not alive. Then there wasn\'t and won\'t be anything before and after our lives. \n\nIf we don\'t believe in this vision, certainly the signs of fate that we come across in our lives must be delusion.', u'-0.0283971', u"\nA young man gets into the world of illegal dog fighting in order to get enough money together to be able to run away with his brother's wife, but in the meantime he starts tension with another dog owner. A beautiful young model signs a lucrative contract with a perfume company and moves into her new flat with her lover \x96 only for her tragedy to strike and her dog to go missing. Finally an ex-convict and guerrilla mourns the wife he left decades ago and longs to meet the daughter who thinks he is dead \x96 but is also contracted to kill a businessman. These three lives come together in a car crash that acts as a catalyst in changing their lives.\n\nAfter seeing 21 Grams I knew that I had to get round to seeing this film. With it's appearance on TV (BBC4 showing itself to really be a 'place to think' and a wonderful channel to have) I took the opportunity to watch it, expecting a film that would match the good things I had heard about it. >From the opening car chase that results in the crash that the film spirals outwards from like debris, through for most of the first hour, I was hooked \x96 the pace was great and the story gripping. It was violent, exciting and yet had a human element to it as well. However the second story knocked the wind out of it for a moment, and seemed to lack the emotion of the first. It was based around an urban myth of sorts and wasn't as good \x96 even if it did pick up towards the end.\n\nThe third story saw it return to a much more involving story of pain and the grinding out of life (as in 'getting by'). Maybe it was the rich lifestyles of the characters in story two that stopped me caring as much \x96 I don't know but I know that the contrast between one & two made it more obvious how much the pace had dropped \x96 especially when we are left wanted to know what happened to the characters we had spent an hour getting to care about. Anyway, the third story is a satisfying ending to the film and drew me back in emotionally where the second story had cut me off by it's abrupt start. Story two finishes before story three begins, and therefore it was easier to move on.\n\nI think the problem with this film for me was not the fact that three stories were intermingled but that I didn't think they were actually mixed well \x96 the way the film moves away from characters before concluding their section (eg Octavia), the way the stories are actually quite separate from one another, these things and other I felt weakened the films \x96 although each story was strong on it's own I just felt that story 2 was such a change to the film that it hurt it.\n\nHowever, as a film debut this is an amazing piece of work and is relentlessly impressive. From the opening car chase to the dog fights to the silent pain of the model looking out where her image once hung \x96 in all these different moments I thought he did a great job and visually the film was never dull once no matter if it was set in a penthouse flat or a basement of an old building with the blood of dead dogs. And while we're on the subject, at the time of release I heard critics say they walked out of the film, refusing to watch cruelty to animals even being simulated. I can see their point but also think that they missed the fact that the animals in the film are mostly loved (even if they mostly die!) \x96 however it is love and compassion for other humans that the film shows the characters having difficulty with, and this is where the emotional impact of the film is \x96 not in simulated dogfights, albeit very well simulated dogfights that are hard to hear even if they are mostly unseen.\n\nThe cast were all natural but I always find it hard to judge performances when they are not in English. Having said that, there were no bad performances in the whole thing \x96 even if some have better material to work with than others. Of course I still think this is a director's film and the cast often take second place to the style and the feel of the film.\n\nOverall I really enjoyed this film but don't believe it deserves to be considered one of the 'best films ever made\x99'! The opening hour is superb and it's pace is relentless (even in more sensitive moments) but the sudden stop the film makes when it changes to story two is too much to stand and really caused the film to stutter for me. It gets better and is fully back on track for story three but there are problems running all through the narrative. Even though it has a lower rating on IMDb at time of writing, I'd still say that 21 Grams offer this same fragmented style but with a much more satisfying narrative. Regardless of my nit picking I still think this is a powerful film that makes 150 minutes fly by with a huge amount of style from the first-time director, even if it does not live up to the endlessly gushing praise lavished upon it by many viewers.\n", u'-0.115794', u"\nThis movie is a must-to-see if you can get over the 'subtitles' fact. (I didn't have no problems with it because I understand Spanish). Personally I was really impressed by the quality, perfection, and superb acting of this Mexican movie. The movie consists of three different stories connected by one sole incident. Sometimes you will see the same scene from a different point of view. Or you'll see an out of place scene that will make sense later on. The script was exquisite, very loyal to the culture. The direction was brilliant keeping us interested from beginning to end. And the performances were excellent, so natural and real that you felt as if they were people you knew. Be aware there's extreme violence in this movie, and even though there were kids in the theater I went to, this is not a family movie. I don't recommend it for children if you are a responsible parent. This movie deserves an award. ", u'0.225416', u"\nA masterpiece. Plain and simple. This picture transcends any language and culture, making us all be able to relate to each of its characters. I don't buy the comparison to Pulp Fiction or any other work. The disregard of chronological scene order and intertwining storylines have been occuring in films for years. Its done for effect here, is all.\n\nAlejandro Inarritu simply lets his actors take over and finishes off a puzzle that is almost complete as a result of the writing and acting. Not to denigrate his work, of course. After all, the ability to trust your actors and let them work is key to being a great director. BTY, more films need to be made in Mexico City, the largest in the world. ", u'0.200923', u'"To make God laugh, tell him your plans."\n\nI usually love these kinds of sprawling dramas about interconnected people, but I suppose there\'s an exception to every rule. Amores Perros is that exception, for me. It felt more like a 2 1/2 hour soap opera, than a riveting drama.\xa0\n\nThe only story of the three presented here that somewhat interested me was that of Daniel and Valeria. The rest of my time with Amores Perros was spent wondering why none of these people have caller ID, wondering whether this movie set some kind of record for most fake dead dogs in a film, wondering who El Chivo reminded me of (Il Duce from Boondock Saints), wondering why they just didn\'t cover the darn hole (who leaves gaping holes in the middle of their apartment floor?), and trying to think up a name for the dog (never came up with anything I liked more than Lost Dog). Mostly, I was just bored.\xa0\n\nI\'ve read other people describe this as a powerful movie. Unfortunately, it just didn\'t do much for me. I give it credit for breaking my heart over those gorgeous legs (a true tragedy, my friends), but that\'s about it.\xa0', u'-0.137703', u'\nWill someone please tell me what all the fuss is about? If the presence of gore is the gauge of cinematic skill, then yes, AMORES PERROS is a masterpiece. But surely one first-time director\'s fascination with maimed dogs and Mexicanismo does not a 21st-century film template make. Granted, it\'s a somewhat cleverly crafted story, but this blood-guts-passion trip through Mexico City fails to make any real point or leave the audience with much to ponder. (Though I did find myself contemplating how they managed to locate all those dead-dog body doubles for the live dogs...)\n\nAMORES PERROS, which the film translates as "Love is a Bitch," might be better rendered "Love is Like a Dog," or "Some of These People Actually LOVE Dogs," or "If You Love Your Dog, Don\'t See This Movie." It opens with a truly gruesome car crash in which blood and guts swirl around liberally. If you happen to walk in late, never fear: the scene will replay twice more. With this event as the anchor, the film flashes back and forward on the lives directly and tangentially involved--what led up to this bloody wreck and how it affects all concerned.\n\nDriving the offending vehicle is Octavio (Gael Garc\xeda Bernal), brother of the abusive Ramiro (Marco P\xe9rez) and lover-in-waiting of his wife, Susana (Vanessa Bauche). Octavio\'s role is basically to hang around the house panting at his sister-in-law, until he decides to make money by entering Ramiro\'s vicious mastiff in dog fights. The car he\'s slammed into conveys supermodel Valeria (Goya Toledo), whose successful career ends on impact. She is mistress to Daniel (\xc1lvaro Guerrero), who\'s gone middle-age crazy and separated from his wife to live with Valeria 24/7. The supermodel\'s true love, however, is her moplike Lhasa apso, Richie.\n\nThe triptych\'s third panel focuses on El Chivo (Emilio Echevarr\xeda), a former revolutionary. Imprisoned while his daughter was born, he has never met her, though he\'s remained obsessed with images of her for more than 20 years. He moons over her while alternately practicing his assassination skills and living with his own pack of canines.\n\nAMORES PERROS is the debut film of director Alejandro Gonz\xe1lez In\xe1rritu, a Mexican DJ who\'s apparently seen PULP FICTION a few times. While it doesn\'t slavishly imitate Tarantino, it noticeably cops a few of his moves. Like a bad case of coffee nerves, the film functions best at high velocity and on razor\'s edge. There\'s plenty of speeded-up action, trick cuts, and always the threat of imminent gore. With many scenes rife with tension, AMORES often strays into telenovela territory, though it\'s tough to tell if the melodrama is intentional.\n\nYet, strangely enough, after all this adrenaline puts us on red alert, we are thrust into an extremely tedious middle portion, in which Valeria\'s dog gets trapped beneath floorboards and the hapless couple can\'t reckon how to retrieve him. Richie whines night after night, Valeria whines night after night, fights ensue, she stages a minirevolt from her wheelchair--and we\'re left with a yawning, "And your point is...."\n\nIs love a bitch? Sure. Do people treat their loves like dogs?  Sometimes. Is this a rich metaphor that bears 2 1/2 hours of graphically violent exploration? Not really. Does this represent, as raves the NEW YORK TIMES, "the first classic of the new decade"? I\'d hate to think so.\n\n', u'-0.152883', u"\nThis movie should have won the Cannes Festival, it's one of the greatest Mexican movies ever made, and one of the better films of all time. It's about the sadness of love and of the human life, it shows like no other movie how hard life can be in big cities, like Mexico City", u'0.687777', u'A dense, overtly sophisticated, but never really wise, script by Mr. Arriaga gets the famed "Inarritu treatment" \x96 otherwise known as "fanciful free fall in the arms of obsessive despair and educated repulsion". The "problem" with Amores Perros (also with 21 Grams and Babel) is you just can\'t ignore it. Or, to put it better, you\'d feel some kind of terminal guilt (appropriately\x85) if you did. The three intertwining stories revolve ambitiously and high-poweredly around the theme of fatalism, on "love\'s a bitch" (more or less the title), on "brother against brother" religious motifs, on Kieslowski, Poe, a bit of Mexican-period Bunuel, and on a to-the-point requiem on Viva La Revolucion. In short however, this is a salute to the idea of "God laughing when people make plans". (To be honest, God laughs when people make movies about God). In any case, the only one laughing in Inarritu\'s humorless universe could be God, though I don\'t really see why He\'d be so pleased in seeing his creatures miserable as hell (\x85). Obviously this is a vengeful divine presence overlooking the production of Amores Perros, a production stately (while recalling Mr. Babenko\'s 1981 Pixote) and, occasionally, inspiringly unpleasant. Undoubtedly a masterpiece for those who get their ideological kicks in non-American speaking filmmaking, an intriguing torture for the rest.', u'0.210806'], u'tt0053198': [u'\n     So here it is, the landmark film which ushered in the Nouvelle Vague, introduced Francois Truffaut and his screen persona Antoine Doinel to the world, and changed the direction of cinema for ever.  And an impressive piece of work it is, too.\n\n     By 1959 the process of film-making had atrophied (artistically, at any rate).  Stale and stagey artifice was the norm, and for the upcoming generation of film-makers and critics (Truffaut was both) a new way of conceiving cinematic art had to be found.  In this, his feature film debut, Truffaut found it.\n\n     This is cinema verite at its freshest and best.  The film looks like a documentary and absolutely drips with kitchen-sink candour.  A handheld camera follows Antoine around his parents\' flat and we get to peer in on the grimy, cramped and oh-so-ordinary minutiae of a humble little life.  "Don\'t forget the garbage," Antoine is repeatedly told, and Truffaut certainly doesn\'t.  He pulls off with resounding success the seemingly impossible feat of making the mundane seem entirely absorbing.\n\n     "C\'est peut-etre un question de glandes," suggests a teacher as we see the adolescent Antoine go quietly off the rails.  Paris (or more accurately, that part of Paris bounded by Montmartre and the Gare du Nord) is wintry and stark, the unlovely and prosaic environment in which Antoine functions - or fails to function.  Truffaut wants, inter alia, to deflate the "April In Paris" myth so virulent in the 1950\'s.  He succeeds mightily.  Antoine is disaffected.  Parents, home and school are all inhospitable and the sleety, foggy streets south of Pigalle convey Antoine\'s alienation admirably.\n\n     Deadpan humour is a powerful weapon in Truffaut\'s armoury.  Antoine\'s inept note-forging, the outlandish excuse which he gives for his absence and his long-suffering look during his mother\'s reminiscences are all nicely done and raise a chuckle.  The bird\'s-eye view of the P.T. class, shot with a rooftop camera, conveys wordlessly the comedy of the rapidly diminishing line of pupils.\n\n     A punch and judy show is filmed from inside the performance canopy, looking out onto the audience of small children.  Their total lack of artifice is delightful to see, and underscores Truffaut\'s point - candour is beautiful, staginess is unacceptable.  As Antoine\'s father frogmarches him along the street after the typewriter debacle, bemused passers-by stop to stare at the camera.  Not only is this disarmingly honest, it is also profound.  Cinema should exist, as it were, inside the camera, not in elaborate sets.  Antoine rides in the spinning drum at the fairground, the camera fixed rigidly on him, allowing the onlookers to dissolve into an undistinguished blur.  The camera IS Antoine\'s subjective self.\n\n     The performance of 15-year-old Jean-Pierre Leaud as Antoine is astonishingly good.  He is natural and engaging, and his soliloquy (delivered to the psychologist) seems an incredible piece of work for so young an actor.\n\n     A long, long tracking shot accompanies Antoine as he runs away from it all, and is intended to convey, by the very rhythm of his breathing, the internal subjectivity of a child who has been let down by his parents and his society.  The final freeze-frame, with no histrionic fireworks, no resounding words and no tidy denouement, closes the film on a note of immense emotional power.  Antoine is alone.   ', u'0.235107', u"\nEvery day life, however 'real' and gritty it may be, is rarely portrayed on film and was certainly a rarity in the 1950's. In Europe however, there was a movement in film-making that embraced this realism and searched for the deeper meaning in the 'here and now'. This is about the most basic and miniscule portion of the meaning behind the French New Wave of the 1950's \x96 films that explored the filmmaker's surroundings, and eventually became an inspiration for filmmakers around the world. Francois Truffaut's 'The 400 Blows' is one of the most well-known films of this movement, and has been embraced and hailed as one of the greatest films of all time.\n\nAfter viewing Truffaut's 'The 400 Blows', I have been ruminating over the deeper meaning behind his story of Antoine Doinel, a 14 year old boy in Paris who is having trouble in school and trouble at home. In school, he is marginalized as a trouble-maker, yet it is obvious that it is more a matter of him causing trouble by expressing himself creatively rather than following along with mundane assignments. At home, Doinel has to deal with an adulterous mother who only pays attention to him when it suits her needs, and a father who is barely present. Doinel responds by doing the only thing he feels he can do, and that is by acting up; eventually earning an expulsion from school and being sent to a juvenile prison camp by his parents. \n\nNothing is cut and dry in 'The 400 Blows'. If one were to take the film at face value, there would be a 'so what' feeling. What the film subtly explores is the disenfranchisement of youth. There is no joy in Doinel's life \x96 anytime he tries to express himself creatively or acts up in a playful way he is shot down and metaphorically forced back into line. This is not a typical Paris street kid either, this is one who reads Balzac for pleasure and conveys intense emotion. The problem is that no one is there to notice or care. Another aspect of the French New Wave was that the films were not merely a product of a Hollywood factory; these were intensely personal films to the writers and directors. In the case of 'The 400 Blows', it is certain that Doinel is based on Truffaut, himself only 28 when he made the film. Truffaut's cinematography in 'The 400 Blows' is exquisite. We see a Paris that is not in Technicolor with colorful fountains like 'An American in Paris'. This is Paris from a Parisian's perspective \x96 and the difference is breathtaking and intense. These are not Louis XVI style houses, they are tiny flats where people have to sleep in closets and walk up and down six flights of stairs. The city views are those of a native Parisian \x96 the kind of tour one would get if they asked the average Parisian for non-tourist attractions.\n\nThere is still a lot that I have to learn and think about 'The 400 Blows' and French New Wave in general, but with the minute amount of understanding I have of it, I found it to be an intense film, one that left me emotional and craving enlightenment. Rarely is there a film that leaves that kind of impact on me, but Truffaut managed to leave me speechless and deep in thought with 'The Four Hundred Blows'.\n\n--Shel\n", u'0.184146', u"\n\n\n\nLes quatre-cents coups is the film that opens up the New Wave movement. I think many of the characteristics of the New Wave -as pointed out in class- can be inferred form the differences between the last film we saw in class, Carn\xe9's Les enfants du paradis, and this work by Truffaut: real life situations, no sets, everyday people. I have found in Les quatre-cents coups a brand new, refreshing and overwhelming cinema. But Les quatre-cents coups is also a dense, complicated film. Its autobiographical character makes it an encyclopedia of personal feelings, opinions and nuances of an introspection by Truffaut.\n\nTechnically, the main differences between Truffaut and the previous cinema is the use of camera movements and angles. Although Renoir had made a witty and fresh use of traveling and long takes, Truffaut masters this technique as anyone else does. The camera moves smoothly, it nearly swings or floats from angle to angle following an action, as if the spectator was a ghost amid real life. Truffaut enjoys playing around with the camera: extremely long takes as we have never seen in any of the previous films: some of them in the classroom, other in Antoine's friend house, or a magnificent take at the end of the film in which we see Antoine, then a panoramic view and then Antoine again, running towards the sea. He also shoots from impossible angles, like those at the beginning from below the Tour Eiffel, or the nearly zenithal take following the jogging students in the streets. Or he teases us with the fake black out, when Antoine goes down the stairs to throw away garbage. Or shows us inner feelings through close-ups: the scene in which Antoine lies to his father telling him he did not take his map.\n\nHowever, I think that the most important difference between previous films and this one is the treatment of action. Truffaut is an observer, a photographer of soul. He takes a fiendish delight in shooting casual, long scenes: the boy tearing away his notebook pages; the whole sequence of Antoine's arrival at his empty home is excellent: the three reflexes in his mother's mirror -in which she will look afterwards, or Antoine combing his hair, laying the table. Also the spinning ride, or the long traveling following the escape of Antoine. They are long, but not slow. They keep tension up, as if everyday acts and decisions could be heroic and transmit the greatest interest and attraction. It looks like a documentary on human life! Some comments could be made about Antoine Doinel, alter ego of Truffaut. He is a very complicated character. The most curious thing about him is that he behaves like an adult: he acts, walks and talks like a man -especially if we compare him to his teachers or his father! However, at some times I think Truffaut describes himself as being not too witty: remember the candle in the hole on the wall, or how his friend convinces him to steal the typewriter and then makes him give it back, or how he innocently copies a whole paragraph from Balzac. He wants to be an artist, but he is not -not yet. This lack of wit and fatality -he is caught but everyone around him cheats as he does- leads him to a rebellion that grows stronger and stronger. This explain why he is such a rebel and not his friend, or the other children in the class, who live in the same social group.\n\nThe main topic in Les quatre-cents coups is the quest for freedom, but not in the way Renoir  looked at it, in fact is closer to L'Atalante by Vigo than to Renoir's La grande illusion, for example. Renoir is more concerned by social struggle and the liberty of the people. But Truffaut is more introspective, more intimate: indeed this film is the description of life attitude of an independent spirit through the autobiographical look of the author -this is cin\xe9ma d'auteur. We can find many elements from Truffaut's life in the film: a difficult family situation, problems at school, the Army, etc. These elements will appear throughout the film. Antoine, alter ego of Truffaut lives in the school, in his house, in the streets and finally in the juvenile detention center. In each one of these places he will find adverse situations he will have to overcome.\n\nThe school The school is the first oppressing environment for Antoine. At the very beginning he is caught, by chance, with a pin-up calendar. This fatality will be recalled in Antoine's life later or -when he is caught by the porter giving the typewriter back, having been his friend's idea to steal it. He is a rebel, and nothing will refrain him from being so. He is punished, and he misbehaves again, writing in the wall an inspired poem. The school is the only place in which Truffaut makes a little bit of criticism, in this case against the education system: the three teachers are either cruel (the French teacher) or stupid (the English and Physical Education teachers).\n\nThe house The house situation might be similar to that lived by Truffaut in real life. Her mother, a beautiful, egocentric and unscrupulous woman -sometimes sad, and old looking- who hates him. At the end of the film we discover that she did not want that child. This hatred and the attitude of his father -a smiley and cheerful but weak man- will add to the necessity of Antoine to flee. Truffaut gives us a Freudian wink: when his teacher asks him why he missed school, Antoine will sharply answer: 'My mom died!'\n\nThe streets In the streets Antoine will find freedom, challenge, adulthood but also perversion: he becomes a man in a 13-year old boy body, little by little. But he will also become a criminal; together with his friend they will climb up in the scale of crime. He first skips classes. He and his friend stroll around the city, innocently. Then they begin an adult, abnormally rebel behavior: they make cars stop in the middle of the street, for example. The spinning ride is one of the few symbolic images in the film -that is another difference with Vigo and Renoir filmmaking. The scene of Antoine trying without success to fight against centrifuge force in a mad spinning trip really shocked me: he fights against reality and he is suffering, but he also has fun in it. Afterwards, he leaves home. . He will learn about solitude and indeed not a\nsingle word is heard in a long sequence. I really enjoyed the long, silent scene of the milk robbery. Antoine runs outlaw like an animal, we can feel loneliness, cold, hunger, sleepiness. It is another of those long, slow but at the same time agile scenes about casual acts: drinking a bottle of milk. At the end, the streets will make him a criminal. From the moment he is caught on, he is not treated as a child anymore. He wants to be an adult, and a spell will sort of be cast on him: he will be treated as such. It is significant when he is caught by the porter. He is told not to take off the hat, which made him look like an adult. From then on, he is treated roughly as if he was a man, especially in the police station.\n\nThe prison And finally he arrives at the prison, which I think is the climax of oppression -we must remember the comparisons to the Army Truffaut detests. It is maybe the simplest of the scenarios, he find himself facing what he hates with no other possibility. The ending is a sublime anticlimax. After being punished for eating the bread, Antoine goes on 'normal' life within the detention center: he visits the psychologist -an ultimate introspection by Truffaut-, receives his mother and talk to his new friends and plays soccer. And suddenly, when we least expect it, he flees. He runs, runs, runs, the longest run I have ever seen, and the most exciting. He reaches the sea: his dream, and a symbol for eternity and absolute in poetry. He splashes into the water, he stops and looks back; the first time he looks right into the camera. This has got undoubtedly a deep and very personal meaning that maybe only the author knows. It is a pessimistic or an optimistic ending? I think it is above all an out-of-this-world ending. If the simple presence of the sea, Antoine's object of liberty, is overwhelming for the spectator, how should the character feel? I really liked the final traveling: we follow Antoine's run over the sand, but the camera is facing the inland, we are waiting to see the sea as much as Antoine is waiting to wet his feet. I do not really think that he is deceived, although his look into the camera is ambiguous. I think he stares at the spectator because he has realized what the truth is: the character is now out of the film. And the truth for him, I think, is this: I can reach freedom whenever I want, but absolute freedom is impossible to achieve. He is staring at us, but he is also looking back with a grave look: he might have seen his pursuer in the distance.\n\n\n", u'-0.0621377', u"Truffaut has worked wonders here, creating a masterful tale of a boy confused, troubled, and unloved. Antoine Doinel (played superbly by Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud in the lead role) has strict, unfaithful parents, and a harsh, oppressive teacher, and falls into delinquency because of his unhappiness. He lies, steals, skips school and runs away from home, and soon ends up in a juvenile delinquency centre.\n\nTruffaut's inspiration for this film came from his own depressed childhood, so he bases Antoine on himself, including in terms of appearance. Being a 'New Wave' (a cinematographic movement of the sixties, involving directors who believed Hollywood films were too lavish and unreal) director, Truffaut always used a real location for the film, including breathtaking shots of Truffaut's native Paris. He also made a cameo in the film in the style of Hitchcock.\n\nDelinquance is the key theme here. Antoine, who is a character who believes in liberty and freedom, and the way he is always locked up is repressive for him, and this provokes a constant need for him to be out.\n\nTrying to make a realistic and moving film was Truffaut's aim, which, by watching this film, I realised that he had done amazingly well. Also, by combining humour and drama too, we have the defining French film of the 20th century. A black and white film that is full of colour. Bien sur, Fran\xe7ois Truffaut.", u'0.256118', u'\nThe Four Hundred Blows is the semi-autobiographical story of Antoine Doinel, a boy trapped in a life of contemtptuous authority who turns to outward rebellion.  Truffaut shows his mastery of the cinema in this, his freshman attempt.\n\nThe film is perfectly cast with Dionel relaying neutral facial expressions for the majority of the film.  The boy, although not necessarily evoking sympathy from the audience, definitely evokes empathy.  He is a pathetic character forced into his position by his teacher and his almost uncaring mother.\n\nThroughout the film, Truffaut hints at the possibility of a happy life for the protagonist, but just as soon as the ideal is given to us, it is taken away.  The mood shifts in the film are fabulously orchestrated through contrasting scenes, music, and  even acting.  From the opening sequence through the final,  enigmatic still shot, the movie is a masterpiece of both French and world cinema.  It is a must see.', u'0.577288', u'THE FOUR HUNDRED BLOWS (Fran\xe7ois Truffaut - France 1959).\n\nTwelve-year-old Antoine Doinel (Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud) has troubles at home and at school. Ignored and neglected by his parents, his relationship with his mother is further strained when he discovers that she has taken a secret lover. Added to this, his school teachers have written him off as a trouble maker and, with luck seemingly never on his side, it is Antoine who ends up getting the blame for bad behaviour. Finding refuge only in his love of cinema, Antoine soon finds it necessary to break free and discover what the world can offer outside the confines of everyday life. \n\nI have always struggled with the labeling of this film as one of the pivotal entrances in the "Nouvelle Vague". Since Jean-Luc Godard\'s "Au Bout de Souffl\xe9", who uses a completely different approach to film-making, with his restless jump-cutting and endless references to pop culture, Truffaut presents his case clear cut, as realistic as possible. But this was something completely different from the way American films portrayed juvenile delinquency so far. No iconic trouble makers like James Dean or Marlon Brando, just a realistic portrait of a twelve-year old boy sliding into isolation. The very idea alone was something novel, seldom depicted in a way like this. \n\nMuch of the praise must go to Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud, who never even seems to be acting. His every movement, thought, expression come across as completely natural. Truly, one of the most remarkable performances of such a young actor I\'ve ever seen. Watching this over 40 years after it was made, it all looks deceptively simple, with Truffaut\'s perfect integration of music and image, location shooting on the streets of Paris and the naturalistic performances. Truffaut used many innovations but they are not easily noticeable as in Godard\'s work. This was for instance the first French film to be shot in widescreen (aspect ratio 2.35:1), which required much planning on Truffaut\'s part, with some surprising results. In many scenes we don\'t see the other person Antoine is talking to, which gives the viewer the illusion as if Antoine is almost talking directly to the camera. Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud would continue his role as Antoine in four more films by Truffaut, "Love at Twenty" (1962), "Stolen Kisses" (1968), "Bed and Board" (1970) and "Love on the Run" (1979).\n\nCamera Obscura --- 9/10', u'0.195852', u"In viewing Fran\xe7ois Truffaut's The 400 Blows for perhaps the fifth time, I finally began to realize its true greatness. Inspired by the director's childhood, The 400 Blows (Truffaut's first film) is primarily about a young boy growing up with his mother and stepfather in Paris and apparently heading into a life of crime. Most adults see the boy as a troublemaker, but in the film, he is meant to be the protagonist.\n\nAntoine Doinel (Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud) is the boy's name. He is resourceful, quiet, and does what he can to get by. At home, he has a struggling relationship with his parents, especially his mother. She is a woman of curious interests, always distracted by her incommodious son and a secret affair with a man from her job. Antoine's stepfather appears nice enough while treating his son as an equal in a good manner, although he is not really attached to him. However, both parents share common traits: they are away from home quite a bit and do not pay close enough attention to their son. Sadly enough, they only judge him by his behavior and by reports they get from other people.\n\nAt school, Antoine's teacher classifies him as a menacing troublemaker. Not that it is entirely Antoine's fault, he just has terrible luck. In the opening scene of the film, we see a poster with a half-naked woman on the front being passed around quietly by the students. The teacher is sitting at his desk with his head down, grading papers, until the poster comes to Antoine and he finds it. He sends Antoine to the corner of the room, where he writes a note of resentment on the wall. As punishment for that, he is to diagram the exact words that he wrote. At home that night, Antoine's homework is interrupted. Because he did not complete it, his good friend Ren\xe9 convinces him to skip school the next day, although Antoine is reluctant at first. They walk around France and notice Antoine's mother kissing a man that is not her husband. She and her son make eye contact, but Ren\xe9 assures his friend that everything will be alright. The next morning, as the boys return to school, Antoine lies to his teacher and says the reason he missed school was that his mother died. Everything is alright until his mother, furious, arrives at school and her son is immediately identified as a liar.\n\nAnd yet, we see Antoine alone at home in some private, subtle, and hopeful moments. One of them being, his love for Balzac. He adores him, and we see him reading his biography and lighting a candle in a shrine in his honor at home. One day, at school, the students are proposed to write an essay on an important event in their life, and Antoine chooses the topic of his grandfather's death, in which he incorporates a phrase from his Balzac book. Alas, the teacher identifies this as plagiarism, and sends Antoine out of the classroom, along with Ren\xe9. The two boys stay at Ren\xe9's house for quite some time, living up to the expectations of a life of crime, until they steal a typewriter leaving Antoine caught trying to return it. He is later sent to a juvenile delinquent detention home.\n\nThe 400 Blows is not meant to be a tragedy. Rather, it is a character study following Antoine Doinel's life and decisions he makes as a direct result of the many things going on in it. Even The 400 Blows captures a few moments of happiness joy. One of these is a priceless sequence in which a gym teacher is leading Antoine's class for a jog through Paris, not realizing that the boys are peeling off and running away two by two. There is another scene after Antoine's shrine for Balzac catches on fire and his parents are stressing and yelling at him. His mother suggests an outing to a movie theater, where they end up going. After the film, we see the trio in the car, laughing and reflecting on what they had seen. We see this as a moment of hope for Antoine and his family, for this being the only time they are all happy together.\n\nThere are many poignant moments however, emerging late in the film after Antoine is caught for stealing the typewriter. His father is fed up with his behavior and escorts him to a police station where he is sent to a jail cell and later in a police wagon full of prostitutes and thieves, with his face peering through the bars, full of tears. His parents discuss with the authorities that they cannot not take him back because they believe he will only run away again. So, in turn, their son is taken to the juvenile delinquent school. These sequences express a reality of Antoine's life, in tune with the outcome of himself. He remains quiet and reserved towards the end of the film, as if he has nothing to say. \n\nThe story of Antoine Doinel and his many experiences allow a life to be filled with curiosity and exploration. Every second of the ninety-nine minutes of the film is not wasted. Truffaut allows every minute to be overflowing with creativity while still maintaining the central story of the protagonist. It is not a film that can be taken lightly as a family movie to be watched every Saturday night. It is a film to be given plenty of thought, carefully examined, and given a conclusion. The genius of the film does not rely on that, moreover, it relies on how much is put into the film. Down to the smallest detail, the film is able to maneuver and progress. The story contains elements of sadness, regret, family, warmth, happiness, humor, values, and choices. Just like life itself.", u'0.0806354', u"The memorable story of young, troubled Antoine is worth seeing for a good number of reasons, probably most of all for the thoughtful direction by Fran\xe7ois Truffaut. It stands out from most other movies about troubled youths, both in the way that it portrays the main character and in making such good use of seemingly minor events in showing how they shape Antoine's life.\n\nAs Antoine, Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud (in the role with which he would always be identified) strikes a nice balance in making his character come to life without making any of his actions seem forced or over-dramatic. Truffaut sets things up for him perfectly, by presenting a great variety of situations in his life that allow Antoine's character to come out naturally. Many of the settings are in themselves interesting and creative, despite being located in familiar types of places.\n\nThe story is written carefully so as to allow the viewer to identify with and sympathize with Antoine, while still seeing his faults clearly. What is often the most affecting thing about it is the way that Truffaut shows how even the most commonplace kinds of events can have such an effect on a maturing person, if they are a source of disappointed expectations or misunderstood intentions. To make this kind of movie so effectively without relying on violent or shocking material is an admirable achievement, and it repays careful thought and attention while watching it.", u'0.581172', u"This film is one of the greatest I have ever seen. It depicts some events in the life of Antoine Doinel, a young French boy who gets into a lot of trouble no matter what he does. This was the first film by Francois Truffaut, and I believe that it is filmed with such an innocence that you can really feel some of the emotions that Antoine feels. I love the simple style of this film, and I think it adds to its charm. The story is can even be painful to watch as one sees all of the things that happen to Antoine. I think that the reason for the strong emotions embedded in this film is that it is semi-autobiographical. I think the cinema is what rescued Truffaut from a life like his protagonist.In short, an inspiration to all filmmakers-they DEFINITELY don't make them like this anymore!", u'0.372875', u'As the seminal work of the French New Wave, the 1959 directorial debut of 27-year old Francois Truffaut has such a vaunted reputation that the final film is bound to disappoint. However, the pristine print that comes with the new Criterion Collection DVD really makes me realize what a brave and emotionally resonant film he made ostensibly about his own troubled adolescence. It\'s worth seeing twice - once for the film itself and a second time to listen to the newly recorded commentary by Truffaut\'s childhood friend Robert Lachenay (the true-life inspiration for Rene in the film). Speaking in French but subtitled in English, he provides insights into the story and context of the film that no film scholar or even production associate could possibly provide. As a point of comparison, listen to the by-the-numbers commentary by film scholar Brian Stonehill (recorded back in 1992), which is thoughtful and well researched but devoid of the human factor.\n\nThe film\'s title comes from a French colloquialism that translates into "raising hell", an appropriate reference since the story focuses on a thirteen-year old hellion named Antoine, living in a poor section of Paris and neglected by parents downright arrogant in their dysfunctional nature. Antoine consequently lives a street urchin\'s life as he lies to people in authority - his parents, his teachers, and the police - since he admits rather sadly that the truth doesn\'t make any difference. Truffaut tracks Antoine\'s life through a series of dispiriting episodes that ultimately lead him to be sent away to a reformatory after he gets caught returning a stolen typewriter and his mother and stepfather tire of their responsibility over him. To Truffaut\'s immense credit, the film feels stark and naturalistic without resorting to dramatic manipulation, and he finds the ideal Antoine in Jean-Pierre Leaud, who brings out the confusion, angst and wandering attention of his character in realistic terms. He is especially impressive in an apparently improvised scene where he is interviewed by the school authorities about why his life has come to this. It is heartbreaking to see how bleak his life becomes, yet Leaud imbues the incorrigible, often intolerable side of Antoine with fervor.\n\nThere are several interesting extras included with the 2006 DVD package starting with two separate interviews with Truffaut, the first a year after the film\'s release discussing he film\'s impact and the second five years later when we see the filmmaker in a more reflective mood about his cinematic influences. Leaud is featured in 16mm screen test footage where his naturally ebullient personality emerges and then after the 1959 Cannes Film Festival where puberty has apparently kicked in and then in 1965 as a comparatively reserved twenty-year old. The screen test of Richard Kanayan (who has a minor role as a schoolmate) is amusing for his Satchmo-inspired rendition of "When the Saints Go Marching In" and his eerie resemblance to Fantasy Island\'s Tattoo, Herve Villechaize. Be forewarned that the film is relentlessly downbeat, but Truffaut\'s emotional investment and consummate abilities as a filmmaker, even at this stage of his career, make this essential viewing.', u'0.176085', u'Fran\xe7ois Truffaut was one of the best French critics past director and his letter is "Les 400 coups", a good example of this. The start of the "Antoine Doinel" (Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud), series is dedicated to a movie fresh, dynamic, without a second to rest or boredom. A perfect example That cinema should be culture and at the same time, entertain, serve as escape. And that Truffaut has succeeded in most of his films, something that few directors have achieved.\n\nFran\xe7ois Truffaut is responsible for this dark urban tale, the film summit "novelle vague" French, one of the best debuts in film history. This debut feature tells the vicissitudes of "Antoine Doinel" a child whose life does not smile, your teacher will not tolerate it, hates his mother and his father ends up feeling the same after "Antoine" and best friend begin to make mischief.\n\nIt is a beautiful but very sad story, drawn with great skill and with a screenplay by Marcel Moussy with Truffaut. It is a deeply self-biographical film, and dedicated to his mentor Andr\xe9 Bazin.\n\nThe film is well made, has a good photography, with a melancholy and nostalgic soundtrack, excellent performances for both children and adults, and an argument that many will shed tears for its crudeness. This works and this film take place among the great films of the good cinema.', u'0.290669', u'\n"The Four Hundred Blows (Quatre cents coups, Les )"  ***.  (1959, French, R, 94 min Directed and co-written by Fran\xe7ois Truffaut with Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud, Claire Maurier, Albert R\xe9my). `The Four Hundred Blows\' is idiomatic French for raising hell.  Which I found to be a strange title after someone explained the meaning.  No one in this movie is really raising hell nor forcing hell on others.  Antoine Doinel (L\xe9aud) is a 14 year-old Parisian boy and a superficial view of his life is not idyllic but hardly hellish.  His mom (Maurier) isn\'t the most attentive person in the world.  She is busy with a lot of things besides being a mom.  She has a lover, a fact about his mom that isn\'t a point of pride with Antoine.  Antoine has a stepfather (R\xe9my).  Again, not the most attentive of parents.  Antoine isn\'t a good student.  All in all it\'s not the easiest of lives but nothing worth raising hell about.  And the hell he raises, isn\'t that big a deal.  He skips school.  He gets caught stealing a typewriter.  (Actually he gets caught returning the typewriter when he finds out he can\'t fence it.)  Antoine ends up in a reformatory and escapes, ending up on the shores of the North Sea.  In what has become a relatively famous scene from French cinema, Antoine turns back from the sea and looks straight into the camera. \n\n\nWhat\'s intriguing and very good about `The Four Hundred Blows\' is Truffaut\'s story telling techniques.  It is a very straightforward telling of a few events.  The camera often holds on a subject for a very long time.  In one scene, a police or school psychiatrist is questioning Antoine and the camera never moves from his face. Truffaut is very matter of fact about the events of Antoine life.  There are no really bad people in Antoine\'s life.  It doesn\'t seem overly traumatic that he skips school, sees his mother with her lover, or that his parents agree to send him to a reform school.  In the final scene on the shores of the North Sea, we see a confused and sad young kid.  Is he going to lead a life of raising hell, a life of stifling boredom, or will he accomplish greatness?  Truffaut doesn\'t tell us and it made me want to see the sequel.  Luckily Truffaut didn\'t stop with `The Four Hundred Blows.\' `Love at Twenty\', `Stolen Kisses\', `Bed and Board\' and `Love on the Run\' continue this semi-autobiographical story of the young Parisian.\n\n`The Four Hundred Blows\' is available on video.  I recommend you rent it.\n', u'-0.13422', u'To start off, I would like to point out that I am not a hater of foreign or B&W films, and I also have respect for different artistic styles in cinema. But this film was simply terrible.\n\nThe protagonist fails to develop or evolve in any way. So many people have described the boy as being "misunderstood", and authority is considered the villain...but this is NOT a film about a misunderstood child being victimised for no reason. He is given plenty of fair opportunities to improve and redeem himself from his selfish, reckless actions, but he shoots them all down and continues to do wrong until his parents are forced to go to extreme measures to control him...and even then, he does not change. There is absolutely no character journey.\n\nWe are also shown a great amount of long, pointless shots that do nothing to advance the plot, nor carry any discernible symbolism.\n\nThe whole experience is a slow, dull observation of a dislikable boy reaping what he has sewn time and time again, without learning from his mistakes. Painfully pointless, and unrecommended if you value good characters and plot.', u'-0.598707', u'Francois Truffaut\'s first feature, and like many first features it\'s semi-autobiographical. Well, there\'s nothing wrong with that. As Joyce advised, "Wipe your glosses with what you know." There are only two cautions to be observed. One is that your first story, about yourself, doesn\'t turn you into a moral paragon. The second is that, having gotten that initial material out of your system, you have the industry and talent to go on to other things -- not necessarily less personal, but less heavily invested. Truffaut managed to rise well above his beginnings.\n\nJean-Pierre Leaud is the boy of about twelve who lives in a shabby and cramped apartment in Paris with a mother who, though she sometimes tries her best to act otherwise, doesn\'t really want him and never has. Leaud\'s father doesn\'t mind the kid, but things are tough. Both parents work. The mother is being unfaithful and the father is distant.\n\nSo Leaud begins to get into trouble at school. (And what a run-down, working-class school it is.) He writes graffiti, gets caught, gets punished, but seems to learn nothing from it, nor from forging a note excusing his absence by claiming that his mother has died. He winds up running away from home, stealing a typewriter, getting caught, and sent to an "observation camp" where he\'s subject to tough love and interviews by a social worker. He runs away from the camp too and the last scene is of Leaud chugging along a wide strand, splashing through the tiny waves of icy sea water.\n\nTruffaut doesn\'t give Leaud easy excuses. He\'s gone through tribulations, certainly, but so have many of the other kids in his class. And at least Leaud wasn\'t sexually abused as a child -- the kiss of death in movies these days. But his story isn\'t one of a born delinquent either. He takes no pleasure in destroying things or in hurting or disappointing others. He exploits nobody.\n\nAnd the parents themselves aren\'t evil or weak. Their foibles are recognizably human. His parents only rarely indulge him but they never beat him. The boy may live in a bare apartment with cracked walls and not enough furniture or heat, but so do his mother and father, so they\'re subject to the same physical stressors.\n\nIn fact, there\'s nobody in the whole movie who is entirely evil or entirely good, despite the fact that the film is in black and white.\n\nThere is a vein of comedy in it too. Their language teacher is trying to get them to pronounce English correctly. "Where is the girl?", he asks one student in clear and precise tones. "At the bitch," replies the student, and the teacher explodes in a volcano of insults in French -- and he stutters! Overall, what you\'re most likely to get out of this film is a sense of Truffaut\'s abiding pity for the human condition. Take the Punch and Judy show that we see a couple of dozen young kids watching. The camera pans slowly across their faces, and we see them laughing and yelling -- and we see their misshapen heads, their diminutive chins, their crossed eyes, and those ears that kids of that age tend to have, like African elephants sticking out from their skulls, all ready to flap with excitement. You have to love kids to love that kind of ugliness.\n\nThe style is grainy and documentary with only occasional touches of art that are noticeable enough to call attention to themselves. Two kids sit on a bench in a wintry garden and talk about their hated parents while the camera deliberately lifts itself to a syrupy statue above them in which a loving mother is kissing a cherub.\n\nAnd that last shot -- a freeze frame of Leaud on the beach at the end of his tether, unable to go forward into the sea, unable to retreat to the camp he\'s just escaped from. The image is still and Leaud is captured staring into the camera lens, waiting, as it were, for the audience to judge him. We, the jury.\n\nTruffaut was one of the New Wave of French directors, most of them formerly critics for a French magazine. (They gave us the term "film noir.") Jean-Luc Goddard was another. But I think Truffaut leaves Goddard in the dust. Goddard is far more fashionable because of his on-screen pyrotechnics. He up-ended the grammar of film, as if to say, "Look at me, Ma!" What he did to editing alone was what Sinead O\'Connor did to the Pope\'s photo. And he was political in the right way for the time. But he lacks Truffaut\'s essential humanity or, let\'s be honest, his humility. Maybe it\'s just me but compassion seems a more evolved emotion than aggression. I wonder if Truffaut ever read Rousseau.', u'-0.093263', u'Fran\xe7ois Truffaut\'s "The 400 Blows" is routinely listed as one of the greatest films in all of foreign cinema. At the time of its release it was hailed as an important film and subsequently proved to be immensely influential in the context of the French New Wave.\n\nThe semi-autobiographical story concerns a Parisian adolescent (Jean-Pierre L\xe9aud) who attempts to escape problems at home and at school by delving into a life of petty crime. Unfortunately, he never receives more than a temporary respite from his predicament and frequently ends up deeper in trouble. The script is fairly loose and strives for realism above all else.\n\nEnforcing Truffaut\'s aim of realism is the group of actors that he assembled. L\xe9aud indisputably carries the film, at once delivering an authentic performance while also showing a maturity beyond his years. While not quite as impressive, the supporting cast is nevertheless uniformly solid, perhaps none moreso than Guy Decomble as Antoine\'s antagonist at school.\n\nTruffaut\'s direction is exceedingly well-handled, not to mention impressive for a debut feature. The film also sports attractive cinematography and a lively score by Jean Constantin.\n\nIndeed, the film can scarcely be faulted for any flaw in its construction or execution. Instead, my tempered enthusiasm is the result of feeling a certain amount of detachment from the main character. Naturally, this sort of objection is largely personal so your mileage may vary.', u'-0.0286376'], u'tt0091763': [u"\nIts hard to know where to start with such a breathtaking film. Oliver Stone's Platoon is quite simply the best Vietnam war film ever made in my opinion. Everything about it is as close to perfection as we are likely to see. Charlie Sheen plays the lead, and Willem Defoe and Tom Berenger play the two sergeants that form a key part of the plot.\n\nChris Taylor (Sheen) is torn between the sergeants. Barnes (Berenger) is the battle hardened, brutal murderer, who uses the war as an excuse to tender to his sadistic pleasures. Elias (Defoe) is the other side of the spectrum. We get the sense that he has wrestled with his inner demons, but he has successfully come through to the other side. He has compassion for his fellow man, and he uses drugs as a form of escapism from this brutal war. The two symbolise the struggle that Taylor must face if he is to survive out in Vietnam.\n\nOliver Stone perfectly captures war. The shooting is frantic and impossible to follow. It perfectly disorientates us, just as the soldiers were. We have no idea who is being shot at, and neither do they. We follow the war at ground level, and see the brutalities first hand. Having served in Vietnam, the film is loosely based on Stone's time out there, and Taylor loosely based on himself.\n\nFull Metal Jacket showcases how inhumane the war was, Apocalypse Now turns it into a story about life in general, and hopelessness, but Platoon has everything. Trying hard to avoid the old clich\xe9, but if you only watch one war film, make sure it is this one. Nothing else can come close.\n\n", u'0.0956988', u'\nPlatoon is generally regarded as one of the strongest anti-war films of all time. While this is certainly true, what\'s often overlooked -- at least after only one run through the film -- is that it\'s chiefly a tale of God vs. Satan, and the war is there to set a perilous backdrop. No doubt, Platoon shows the Vietnam War was a big mistake, but being a fictional documentary on Vietnam is far from its purpose.\n\nThe story is told from the point of view of Chris Taylor (solidly played by Charlie Sheen), a middle class kid who goes to Vietnam to do what he thinks is his patriotic duty. In the first ten minutes, Chris is shown in the uncomfortable jungle, struggling just to survive in the natural environment, let alone do any actual damage to the enemy. Quickly we\'re introduced to the well-known facets of the Vietnam War: The lack of sense of purpose, the wraith-like enemies, the obvious prevalence of the uneducated and poor among the fighting grunts -- and, soon, we see how these factors combine to cause widespread low morale and some actions of more than questionable ethical value.\n\nChris sees his platoon fragmented into two halves, each aligned with one of two men -- Sgt. Elias (Willem Dafoe) and Sgt. Barnes (Tom Berenger). These two really are the driving force behind the film. They both have nominally the same enemy (the Viet Cong), but, really, it doesn\'t take long to realize that Elias is Good, and Barnes is Evil (the "enemy" does not enter into the moral equation of this film, at all -- it\'s an outside threat, same as malaria-carrying mosquitoes or even friendly fire). I won\'t deny it is a very black-vesus-white relationship, but this polarity does not feel contrived. Elias feels the futility of the war and has respect for life; Barnes fights the war doggedly and has no compassion, period. Both are efficient soldiers fighting the same enemy, but really -- as is at one point aptly put by Chris Taylor himself -- they are fighting for the souls of the platoon members, as the outcome of the war is never really in doubt.\n\nElias/Barnes\' hold on the platoon, and the viewer, is developed through several war sequences. A chilling scene takes place in a village, where our soldiers find no VC, but they do find a cache of VC weapons. The inhumanity of certain soldiers, including of Sgt. Barnes, is unflinchingly shown here. It leaves the viewer with an empty feeling that is hard to shake, reminding of the similarly empty look on a woman\'s face after she sees her son killed in front her.\n\nElias doesn\'t take kindly to this kind of behavior. Elias and Barnes come closer and closer to open conflict, as Taylor becomes a veteran, obviously siding with Elias. Meanwhile, the fate of the platoon comes closer and closer to them, culminating in an explosively shot action conclusion. The end is dark, but morally satisfying.\n\nDon\'t watch this movie for the action. That\'s not to say it\'s not well shot, or unrealistic. On the contrary. It\'s quite convincing. But it doesn\'t show war as a fun sport, and it\'s never a question of good guys versus bad guys. There will be no cheering for the "good guys" or anyone else in this one. Stone succeeds brilliantly at putting the viewer into the middle of it all, and it\'s not a pretty sigh (and definitely not for the squeamish, either).\n\nOn the other hand, if you want great acting, it\'s here. Dafoe and Berenger do incredibly well, with the incredibly good (and seemingly authentically sounding) script. Barnes is horrific as he challenges three men to kill him, drinking hard liquor out of the bottle. They don\'t make a move, and neither will you, though you\'ll hate him just as much as them. Dafoe is a ray of light in the dark as Elias. The cast is rounded out with many characters, all well played, and adding another dimension to the film.\n\nThe technical aspects of the film are superb, though one never thinks about them much, as the movie is completely engrossing. The production values seem quite good, as well. The most stunning peripheral aspect of this film, however, is the music. It\'s emotional and draining, and used to great effect -- listen for the main theme as you watch the village burn.\n\nWatch this one a few times, and you\'ll likely be quite moved each time. I\'ll be surprised if you give it less than what I gave it: 9/10', u'0.0199104', u'The 1980s in general and the mid 1980s in particular aren\'t highly regarded where pop culture is concerned , this is most especially true in cinema where films seemed to be written around their soundtrack in much the same way as Hollywood movies nowadays seem to be written around their special effects . PLATOON is one of the very few films from that period that has an emotional impact , an impact that it still retains while watching it in 2003. \n\nEveryone else seems to have mentioned what makes PLATOON a classic anti-war ( Note it\'s anti-war , not anti American or anti soldier ) movie along with being a classic movie , so I won\'t go over old ground except to say THAT death scene is up there with all the other tear jerking scenes from 20th century cinema , don\'t be ashamed to say you cried \n\nIf PLATOON has a flaw it\'s in its duality , there\'s the good Sarge/bad Sarge , good officer/bad officer , good white guy/bad white guy , good black guy/bad black boy etc which is maybe a bit clich\xe9d and possibly leads me to believe Stone is making an excuse/reason that the Americans lost in Vietnam because that spent so much fighting each other rather than the VC ( Though I do concede I\'m possibly misinterpreting that as an excuse or even a reason since no one will confuse the politics of Stone with the politics of John Wayne ) while Taylor\'s character comes across as being more of a literary device rather than a real human being , but these are minor flaws\n\nIt\'s a shame to see war films from the last few years devoid of scathing anti-war sentiments like the ones seen here . PLATOON screams at you " War is hell and whatever the rights and wrongs of conflict you need a bloody good reason to wage war . Vietnam wasn\'t a good enough reason to sacrifice human lives "', u'-0.24873', u"\n\nAt the height of the Vietnam War, America's teens are drafted into the war effort to find themselves in the middle of hell.  One such young man is Chris Taylor.  He is placed in a squadron where two sergeants have different approaches to the war \x96 Elias is more about surviving without being brutal or cruel, whereas Barnes is crueller, more ruthless and more violent.  During the course of his term, Taylor's very soul is torn between the two men as he deals with what he must do.\n\nThe first film in Oliver Stone's unofficial trilogy is arguably the best of the three.  The basic story not only shows us what the war was like for those serving but also how the different personalities come out of those involved in it.  As we follow Taylor we see him change as he is influenced by those around him and by his situation.  It makes for an uncomfortable film but one that's worth watching.  It's certainly a better war movie than things like Wild Geese or The Dirty Dozen, simply because it's a little more real to what happens than those ones.\n\nCharlie Sheen has never been better than when he's acting for Stone.  Here he gives one of his best ever performances as the innocent who is changed.  Willem Dafoe is a great actor and here is no different \x96 he also gives us one of the film's most enduring images so I'm a little biased.  Berenger is another one for whom it's hard to think of a higher point reached than when he did this film.  He is brutal and ruthless but he makes us support him in a strange way.  The support cast are all good and contains a few famous faces (John C McGinley, Whitaker, Depp) however this is really a three man show.\n\nOverall this is brutal and violent with no happy ending.  At the end of the day isn't that what a war film should be?", u'-0.0982025', u'Platoon is a must see for any fan of war movies. The film that put Stone on the map, Platoon is considered by Vietnam Vets as the most realistic (my father having been one of them). But in keeping the maxim of giving credit where credit is due, much of the success of Platoon belongs to military adviser Captain Dale Dye, who has been linked to pretty much every great war movie in the last twenty years. Much accolades to Tom Berenger as well, whose performance as Sgt. Barnes is the tour de force of his career (the scene in the village towards the end of the movie is brutal, befitting the character). With a great script, great performances, and awesome cinematography, Platoon is a surefire classic.', u'0.677742', u'\nEvery once in a while I will watch this film again and see if maybe I have grown tired of it.  Surely after "Saving Private Ryan," "Titanic," "Crimes and Misdemeanors," or "Schindler\'s List" I have seen a better film.  Well, after every viewing there is something about Oliver Stone\'s masterpiece that keeps me saying that I have never seen anything better.\n\nI am a sucker for Vietnam pictures.  "Apocalypse Now" and "The Deer Hunter" also rank in my top ten of all time.  Stories about Vietnam can run the entire gambit of human emotions.  "Platoon" is not only a documentation of America\'s sordid involvement in a foreign civil war, it is also a dramatic story of human response.  A life developing in the most horrible of places.\n\nThere have been films put together better.  There have been films with more detailed and interesting plots.  But none have ever told a more touching story of human development set in the backdrop of bloody violence and inhuman suffering.\n\nRating: 10 out of 10.', u'-0.0467982', u'Why I think Platoon is probably the best war movie Hollywood ever made? Because it\'s very humane. I mean it. The director sees all his characters as victims of war rather than heroes or villains. Have a closer look at \'em.\n\nTaylor has no power inside himself and is torn between the two fathers; he ends up with a physical act of revenge. This is not what one father taught him - and the other father is actually murdered by him. \n\nSgt. Barnes would never fit the postwar life and knew it damn too well himself; after all, he is not a fool although might seem a senseless killing machine at first sight. Vietnamese bullets could not kill him, his talent for survival being his enemy. So, he attempts kinda suicide twice (at least) begging others to kill him and thus end the pain tearing him from inside: first, in the potheads\' bunker scene after Taylor\'s accusations; then, when Taylor finds him in the final scene.\n\nSgt. Elias was far too good to survive the Nam and maybe even challenged and annoyed lifers on purpose, waiting for some bob barnes to hit back :) It\'s a pity Stone excluded the stars\' scene monologue which explains pretty much about Elias\' ways and view of the future. In fact, for himself he sees no future. Not in this world that is all about betrayal and killing.\n\nBunny and Junior, one the embodiment of somewhat sadistic bravery and the other of cowardice. Their deaths are partly a morality, partly to show that it does not matter if you\'re black or white, brave or cowardly, war makes no difference wiping off everyone it can. \n\nKing, Big Harold, Francis are survivors yet victims, too. What is awaiting them in the "real" world where nobody understands and nobody respects anything? They are dreaming of a comeback to music, girlfriends, fun time - but reality bites, and who knows, will they find their spot under the sun or will be forced to use the skills obtained in the Nam and get engaged in crime and drug abuse?\n\nRed O\'Neill talking about his ability to predict if a guy is gonna make it or not. A reflection of his own fears: shall I stay alive and get out of here or not. The odds are that he is not, and Stone nails him to the place with Captain\'s order to take over what was once the Platoon... Bye Patsy.\n\nThe idea that Stone has been trying to bring forward to us is NOT (to my mind) a story of struggle between the good and the bad for the possession of Taylor\'s soul (remember, the boy became a murderer in the end), but: where is war there can be no escape. Leave hope everyone who enters.\n\nHighest rate ever for that.', u'-0.364595', u"I watched Platoon when I was 17 at 1987. I was on the edge of questioning everything and ready to uprise with a small move. Of course I was fascinated after watching the movie and I remember I was that close to cry. I can definitely say Platoon is one of the best war movies of the history. It has many incredible scenes and it reserves a great story of brotherhood inside also vandalism and senseless of war. Charlie Sheen , William Dafoe and the great Tom Berenger can easily be considered as one the best combination of actors to tell a story of faith and betrayal in a movie. Oliver Stone did a great job as writer and director. I remember that I was really touched with the letters that Taylor ( Charlie Sheen ) writes to his grandma. Also with the amazing music of the film you feel many different things. I believe that on the last scene the picture of William Dafoe with his hands open on his knees with hundreds Viet Congs coming after him is a masterpiece work and unforgettable.I watched this movie at Osmanbey Gazi movie theater at Osmanbey-Istanbul and \u0131 believe 70's and 80's are the best time in Istanbul for watching a movie with big saloons and with great atmosphere. With 90's big movie theaters started to turn to couple of small saloons and with shopping malls movie theaters started to locate at malls. I really miss a lot of 80's and the taste I get from the legend movie theaters like Osmanbey Site-Sisli Kent-Osmanbey Gazi- Pangalt\u0131 Inci-Harbiye Konak and Harbiye As.", u'0.269579', u"\nThis certainly rates as one of  the best Vietnam films of all time.  What I especially enjoyed was the  realistic atmosphere of the film,  entrenching the viewer into a world  which seems surreal yet believable.  Oliver Stone's real-life experience  in Vietnam brought a gifted outlook  to this film, one drawn by experience,  not common Hollywood conventions.  While this proved be a lesser film  to the equally amazing Full Metal  Jacket, it was not by much. The  performances by Tom Berenger,  Willem Dafoe, Charlie Sheen and  John C. McGinley were exceptional,  capturing the plight of the tortured soldiers.", u'0.677309', u"\nPlatoon left me absolutely numb after watching it. Oliver Stone,(Who in fact did serve in Vietnam) did a fantastic job telling this story of the horrors and the insanity of the Vietnam war. What's to be admired about this film, is that Stone doesn't sweet-talk the story, with the good old American boys fighting for their country and facing brutality, instead he brings up a strong morality and humanity issue. It's wasn't all black and white, it wasn't one person was wrong, one was right, there was all shades of gray in between. He uses the characters of Sergeant Barnes and Sergeant Elias (both played brilliantly) as symbols of good and evil clashing into one another. Charlie Sheen (Chris, the narrator of the story) is in a sense torn between both, they are both a part of him as he tries to deal with things falling apart all around him. Vietnam was a senseless war, and Platoon tries to understand why we went through it and how we ever got through it.\n", u'-0.170929', u'A+ Undoubtedly one of the best war films ever made, if not one of the THE best films of all time. Where to begin with such a film? A lot of this goes to Oliver Stone, who actually served in the God-forsaken jungles of Vietnam. The film really brings to light the atrocities and pointlessness of the Vietnam War full force, all cleverly represented by the soldiers who fought these not so courageous and valor-filled battles.\n\nThe conflict is simple at a glance; Chris Taylor, played superbly by Charlie Sheen, is a young recruit who in a similar trait to the Civil War novel "The Red Bade of Courage" is naively eager to be a proud and loyal soldier fighting against Communism, as he believes, nobly. However, he soon finds that "the \'Nam" is nothing like he thought it would be. The Vietnam is portrayed as realistically as it will ever be here: as a chaotic, dark, and all to real nightmare. It is within this hell he realizes that there are only two ways to truly endure the war: Give into near animal instincts, discarding all morals and perspectives of decency or find ways to escape the war at least for short bursts. Taylor decides to choose the latter, but regardless the platoon is divided by these two choices, on one side being Barnes, who will let the war consume them completely. The other is Elias, who represents Taylor\'s last grasp to his humanity. Many choose one path and never turn away from it, despite the fact that many of these men will die regardless. The underlying conflict is how you spend those last remaining days, minutes, instances of life. And all along the Vietcong are just an outside force who the soldiers have no real chance of understanding or negotiating with , just one of the many hazards they will have to survive.\n\nTom Berenger is endlessly great as Barnes, and Willem Dafoe is no less stunning. Every performance is stunning and captures the very real fear of war. Among the many other stand out performances in this picture are Kevin Dillon as the sadistic Bunny, John C. McGinley as Sgt. O\'Neill, Francesco Quinn as Rhah, Johnny Depp as Lerner, Forest Whitaker as Big Harold and Keith David as the unforgettable King. And the coup de grace, an unforgettable and heartbreaking score by the late Georges Delerue and Samuel Barber, such beautiful and yet clearly pained music. "Platoon" will never cease to be my favorite war flick ever.', u'0.0653653', u"The Vietnam War has been one of the controversial wars in history and was an unpleasant experience for everyone involved. Oliver Stone harnessed these experiences to make Platoon; a film where he could illustrate to everyone what Vietnam was like from his perspective.\n\nIn my opinion, this is the best war movie ever made. The sheer horror of war is captured so well in everyway. The fear of death, compatriots dying, divisions in the platoon, guilt of killing; it's all there and Stone doesn't try to disguise it. Platoon is very honestly written and it is this honesty that makes the film so great. Platoon isn't an anti war movie and it certainly does not glorify war in anyway, it is simply how war is in its entirety. There are some shocking scenes such as the one in the Vietnamese village but there are also more light hearted moments such as where the troops on Dafoe's side are partying and having a good time. On base camp, there is great contrast with the mood but on the forest, it is just fear, aggression and blood, nothing else.\n\nTaylor's (Charlie Sheen) story is very good as he experiencing war at the same time of the audience. Before the war, he was a rich kid who loved his grandma and it is how war changes him that is truly fascinating. The character story that always receives most praise however is that between Barnes (Tom Berenger) and Elias (Willem Dafoe) is very compelling and leads to some great scenes with them and carves an interesting divide within the camp. This film is big on character and explores many relationships but (take note Jarhead) doesn't sacrifice any action time for these scenes. Stone struck a perfect balance between action and story.\n\nActing from everyone involved is very good. Sheen as the na\xefve newcomer is very good and after this, should have done much better for himself than he did. Dafoe and Berenger, once again steal the attention off the lead. Their extreme contrasting personalities is brilliantly done and raises the standard of the film. Berenger is truly terrifying, he didn't hold back in this one. Dafoe is much more sympathetic and will speak his mind to anyone. Johnny Depp makes one of his early film appearances with a small, yet memorable role. The way Sheen is wearing Depp's bandana after Lerner (Depp) gets taken by the chopper is discretely done but touching.\n\nPlatoon is the best war movie there's ever been. Stone wrote and directed this film with such passion that it couldn't be anything but good. A great mix of characters, a great cast and such well crafted action scenes are all what you need for an exceptional war movie and they're all here. The film ends perfectly as we are given a chance to reflect and take it in before the credits start rolling. Stone, who often misses the point with his films, hit the nail on the head with this one.", u'0.321528', u'"Platoon" was my first introduction to wartime reality.I was just a kid when first viewing it and the film left a powerful impression in me.Before that,I had only seen a couple of Rambo films and thats what I expected to get here,pretty much.It turned out to be something quite different from that,although it would take me a few years to realize just how different.\n\n"Platoon" is Oliver Stone\'s breakthrough picture and a landmark in Hollywood history of the 80\'s.It features almost every well known actor on the rise from that era,most notable ones being Forest Whitaker,Johnny Depp,Willem Dafoe,Francesco Quinn and Charlie Sheen.\n\nWhy is it a landmark film?It helped to bring more understanding into the hot issue of Vietnam war,although "Apocalypse Now!" had already worked out that subject in the most stunning way.Yet there was still something left to say for Stone.It was pretty much the same as Coppola said,but in another,more harrowing and less complex way.We got a closer glimpse of how it is to die,for one.Dafoe\'s heroic end is one of the most dramatic scenes in history of war films.\n\nA strong issue here is the abuse of military codes and discipline.Tom Berenger\'s sadistic,disturbed sgt. Barnes is the perfect example of a warrior playing god,or angel of death, and fighting a war by his own rules.Berenger plays Barnes so well that it really gives you the chills watching him and you want him dead.Sgt. Elias is his counterpart in every way,as he really cares for his men and is in touch with the human in him always.\n\nHe is not popular among the lowlifes like the redneck psychopath Bunny (great early role by Kevin Dillon) and the spineless racist O\'Neill in John McGinley\'s incarnation.\n\nAnother spineless character is the young lieutenant,who on one hand is a greater sinner than Barnes.He has no control over the men under his command whatsoever and refuses to take responsibility or even feel the guilt for not doing anything to prevent the massacre of the village committed by Barnes and his butchers.Here we see the effect that the horrors are having on private Chris,as he in a fit of frustration and anger over the situation he is in tortures a sick and frail creature of a man and ends up in tears.Its a powerful and riveting scene which highlights the film\'s message against war,showing its inhumanity and absurdity in the most shocking way.\n\nThe final battle is very brutal and well shot.It sums up the whole Vietnam war and the strategy of the American army.The napalm kills not just the Vietcongs but also Americans.Ironically,it saves Chris\' life as he is about to be killed by Barnes during their confrontation.Bunny gets what he deserves and Junior,who is the most despicable of the black characters here,also dies.This may be seen as director\'s own judgment.The only other sympathetic character still alive by this time,the underground lord Rah, is left alive.Francesco Quinn shows here that he is capable of taking over his father\'s legacy.\n\nIn the end,this film is not flawless,but it is a perfect document of the madness that occurred in Vietnam 1964-73.And its consistent to its very end,which by the way is very touching and almost made me cry the second time I watched it.It is funny how one can feel both happy and sad about leaving a war torn place.Such are the feelings that a war conjures up in a man.It is almost like Chris was sad he was leaving,or maybe the emotions that were bubbling under surface just came out for real.\n\nAny which way,this film will always be remembered as the one that gave a true and unpolished picture of mankind at war at a time when Hollywood producers made an attempt to glorify the US army and cast an eclipse on its disgraceful stain,transforming the killing into culture.Ironically they succeeded.8/10', u'-0.069008', u"\nI may be over analyzing the film.  It certainly appears at first glance that other than the deer appearing after the battle, and the talk of soul in Chris's/Charlie Sheen's final narration there is very little symbolism in the film\x85 basically every thing is what it is.\n\nHowever, I believe that even if Mr. Stone didn't intend it, the fact that Chris picks up an AK-47 to kill SSGT Barnes is important.  There are weapons (and bodies) all over the battlefield but he picks up the AK-47.  It must be noted that the Armalite Rifle or M-16 as it became known had become the weapon of the ARVN forces and the US troops (and is still the primary issue for US forces today.)  This weapon then, represents the `establishment' or the status quo power.  The silhouette of an AK-47 on the other hand, had come to represent revolution the whole world over.  Chris's use of the AK-47 was not to hide the fact that Barnes was killed by an M-16, as Bergerud's book points out, \x91friendly fire' casualties were a fact of life in Vietnam.\n\nWhen I combine the integrated `potheads' dancing to \x91tracks of my tears,' I wonder if the tears are related to the civil rights struggle back home. Taylor's `I volunteered' speech when he gives his reasons that it shouldn't just be black kids and poor kids doing the \x91s**t jobs' also add to my belief that the AK-47 is relevant as a taking up the opposition to fight the establishment.  Barnes also represented the `lifer' or career military and from there one can extrapolate that to include the Pentagon establishment who tenaciously clung to the belief in some kind of victory in spite of evidence that the population rejected the Saigon government could be had. By killing Barnes, it seems Oliver Stone might shed a different light on the comments Chris Taylor/Charlie Sheen makes at after the rampage at the village and the divisiveness it brought the platoon: `\x85I can't believe we're fighting each other when we should be fighting them!'  In this view the \x91Them' could be the establishment that created a world in which a Vietnam could take place.    His platitudes at the end don't dissuade me from seeing Chris Taylor (as Oliver Stone) having undergone a personal sea change. `We didn't fight the enemy we fought ourselves\x85'\n\nStone could very well express these sentiments, `The war is over for me now\x85 but it will always be there the rest of my days\x85 as I am sure Elias will be fighting with Barnes for what Rhah called the possession of my soul... Those of us who did make it have an obligation to build again and try with what's left of our lives to find a goodness and meaning to this life.' `\x85To teach others what we know\x85'\n\nThis obligation statement is almost a verbatim reprise of the defeated Japanese soldiers in the movie `The Burmese Harp' (1956.)  They say the same thing about a duty to go home and rebuild after the war, though there isn't a statement accepting or even acknowledging any wrongdoing. Thirty years separate these films.  I would not exactly say they claim \x91war is senseless,' though they both overwhelm the viewer with the senseless waste of lives caused by war.\n\nOther points of note: when we see the APC (armored personnel carrier) roll up behind the patrol looking for survivors after the battle, there is a Nazi flag on the top of it (it is very close to the top of the screen and hard to make out, and is not the typical hakenkruz on the white circle in a red field, but the one that was meant to express a \x91pan-Aryanism' with the Scandinavian people by having a red field with a black cross outlined by a white cross and the swastika in the crux.)  Is Stone implying a fascist nature to this war?\n\nSecondly, we briefly see the men who are the despicable `ear collectors' I had read about in a 1981 book called `Nam.'  They would string the ears on their dog-tag necklace as a show of bravado of how many \x91confirmed kills' they had.  (Though there are some interesting perspectives brought out by \x91Nam' much of that book reads like war crimes\x85)\n\nThe shot of the lynched soldier was a strange inclusion, considering the Blacks marching against the war at home carrying a banner that stated, `The VC never called me a nigger'.  I wondered why Stone did that.  Furthermore, except for a glimpse at a suspected VC in the tunnel shot by Elias, we never actually see a VC in the film.  The person shot by Elias is not attacking. We see their tunnels, the arms caches, their posts, campsites and bunkers. It's always only hints of them.  The only Vietnamese we see attacking are NVA regulars.  Is this saying Stone does not blame the popular Front forces for attacks on US troops?\n\n`Gook' is also used through out the film, as it was in Vietnam.  This word entered the GI lexicon through the Korean War.  \x91Han Gook' is Korean for Korea/Korean.  The Korean's would see the American's and say `Mi Gook' which is Korean for America/American.  The GI's thought the Koreans were saying they were \x91gooks' Me Gook.  The carrying of the word from Korea to Vietnam shows the tendency of latent dehumanizing racism \x91they all look alike'\x85\n\n\nSpeaking of Human, David Lynch, the director of The Elephant Man (1980) was furious that Stone used Samuel Barber's Adagio for Strings since he had used it in his film and hoped when people heard it they would reflect on it.  He must have sensed that people are now more likely to associate Adagio with the \x91Elias crucified' scene.  However, there is another connection to the Elephant Man.  Think of Taylor stopping the gang rape.  The GI's respond, `she's an animal!' to which Chris shouts back, `She's a HUMAN BEING, man\x85 a human being!  This is an echo of John Hurt's line in Elephant Man, `I am not an animal! I am a human being! I...am...a man!'\n\nThere are a few more interesting points worth comment, but I will close by mentioning the suicide attack.  Stone himself was the actor playing the Battalion Commander in the bunker that suffered the suicide attack.  It is interesting that In response to the suicide attack, Captain Harris, the Company Commander calls in an air strike right on his own position.  In other words it is as though he answered the suicide attack with a suicide attack.  This seems analogous to the continuing inflow of US troops to Vietnam as a suicide.  I will leave it off here in hope that someone else discusses the intentional inflicting of wounds on oneself as a means to be sent home.\n", u'-0.374254', u"Platoon is the film that not only put director Oliver Stone well and truly on the Hollywood map, its huge critical and commercial success also would set the Vietnam War film cycle into hyper-drive. It centres on a platoon on a tour of duty in Vietnam through the eyes of a young recruit who quit college to volunteer for active service. It is in essence a combat film where the view is at ground level. In this sense it mixes traditional gun battles with the smaller more personal details that show the discomfort of life in the jungle. Its approach was very realistic for its time and in some ways it did reinvent what a war film could be.\n\nWhile it does have many scenes of combat action, they are pretty messy and unglorified and the film has a pretty clear anti-war message. This is conveyed in quite a major way by how the platoon itself is portrayed. It's divided into two camps led by two diametrically opposite sergeants Barnes and Elias (Tom Berenger and Willem Dafoe, respectively). The former is a facially scarred, violent man, while the latter is a morally sensitive borderline hippy. They show both sides of the American thinking about the war, with Barnes and his alcohol drinking followers the ugly brutal side of the coin and Elias and his marijuana smoking buddies the ones who question the participation of their country. This dramatic tension is brought fully to the fore in the pivotal moment of the film where the platoon commit mass murder and rape in a village, in a nod to arguably the most infamous real event in the war, a massacre at the village of Mai Lai in 1968.\n\nThe dramatic conflict, while being the real meat of the film, does look quite overly simplistically done to my eyes now, with the evil Barnes and his bevvy merchant bad boys set against the hippy-like Elias and his chilled-out troops. It comes across as too black and white. It gets the message across but it does so with little subtlety or grey areas. I think Platoon overall, has aged a little worse than some of its contemporaries like Apocalypse Now (1979), Full Metal Jacket (1987) or Casualties of War (1989). This is probably a lot to do with Stone's overly politicised message, while the classical music which soundtracks the grimmest moments probably felt original at the time but now almost comes across as, dare I say it, a little cheesy. The film benefits somewhat from having quite a good cast, some of whom are actors who would go onto big careers, although in truth future mega star Johnny Depp makes absolutely no impression whatsoever in his minor role as a translator.\n\nAll-in-all, Platoon is still an impressive combat film but it's one which for me has not aged too great in other ways. It still has historical importance as a key entry in the sub-genre though.", u'0.0438002'], u'tt0167404': [u"The Sixth Sense enjoys being playful with our imagination. What your eyes see is not exactly what it is. What your mind paints is not exactly what there is. In the world of The Sixth Sense logic is your worst enemy.\n\nThere are obvious (and sometimes less obvious) hints right in front of you but you don't grasp them because of your preconceptions and premises. I once read a novel called 'Somewhere carnal over 40 winks' which used similar techniques found in this movie, but in writing. I'm sure you will enjoy this book as much as I did, if you like to be intellectually surprised.\n\nIf you haven't seen this movie, don't read reviews and don't talk to your friends who have already seen it. The movie is very much susceptible to spoilers. It is suffice to say that the ending is just shockingly delightful.\n\nI don't consider this movie heavily philosophical or thought-provoking. Having said that, it is one of the movies I love to watch again and again.", u'0.0302949', u"\nWhen I first saw The Sixth Sense, I didn't know what to expect. I guess I was looking forward to a good scary horror flick.  I was very surprised. I found that the purpose for this movie was far greater than just trying to scare the audience.  I found this movie was showing not only the emotions of fear, but also faith, commitment, sadness of loss, and love.  The end was so surprising, I had to see it again.  The second time I watched it, I did it from a totally different perspective (this is a very rare quality for any movie), and I enjoyed it just as much, or maybe even more. I also, as many viewers have, tried to detect fallacies in the story.  I couldn't find one. In addition, for those that appreciate great soundtracks, the music only helps to heighten the experience of the movie.\n\n\nI believe that a great movie is one that helps the viewer perceive life and the world differently.  The Sixth Sense is one of those extraordinary movies that does that to me.  This movie reflects on some difficult subjects that will make the viewer walk away asking eternal questions.  Questions about death, about letting go, about eternal love and commitment, about the love between parent and child, and between husband and wife.  Maybe I read too much into this very wonderful film, but I believe it will be difficult to find a movie that has touched on these subjects so poignantly and so well for years to come.", u'0.465022', u"\nThe Sixth Sense is a brilliant film, plain and simple. It is unique in that it relies on imagination and psychology to scare you and make you think twice about the world around you. The director did a fabulous job constructing the imagery of the film, and I genuinely did not know about the ending until it was revealed. Quite a shock! The Sixth Sense goes in my book as the single greatest psychological horror film I have ever seen. Anyone who bashes it are simply not giving it a chance or don't fully realize the complex dialog and imagery around them. Brilliant", u'0.372111', u"\nThis is an incredibly powerful film. Awash with emotion but never stooping to sentimentality this is the story of one frightened little boy you will never forget. All your worst childhood nightmares: the noises in the attic, the intruder in your house, that cold breath that makes your hair stand on end are here and then some.\n\nBruce Willis gives one of the best performances of his career as the child psychologist trying to get himself back on track after a violent encounter with a former patient and it would be a crime if Haley Joel Osment were overlooked at coming awards ceremonies for his powerful performance here. It has been a long time since a child actor displayed such maturity in a role. Cole's innocent little face hidden behind his absent father's large-framed spectacles betrays a child coming to terms with a terrifying secret in the only way he can.\n\nYou don't need to go and see this film again to realise why the end is such a surprise but you will rush out to watch it again purely because it's an almost perfect example of it's genre.\n\nLaugh, cry, jump a mile out of your seat, sigh with relief - but not too early... We did!", u'0.0255729', u'The surprise ending to "The Sixth Sense" has gotten so much attention that it threatens to overshadow the film. I occasionally hear people say things like the following: "The \'twist\' was so obvious that I figured it out in the first five minutes!" Some of those people may even be telling the truth. There\'s no way to know. But there\'s a lot of condescension in such remarks, an implication that anyone who didn\'t figure it out must be a really dumb sucker. At least in my case I have an excuse. When I first saw this film back in early 2000, I knew nothing about it other than that it was about the relationship between a psychiatrist played by Bruce Willis and a child with some sort of psychic power. I didn\'t even know what that psychic power was, and an early scene led me to think it was telepathy. In short, I had no idea even what the movie\'s subject was until about the middle of the film, so I was completely adrift as to solving the movie\'s mystery.\n\nStill, to anyone who did figure the secret out quickly, I have this to say: you may be smarter than I am, but that does not make this a bad movie. Hitchcock went to great lengths to keep the ending to "Psycho" from leaking out. Many people who watch that film today figure the twist out (probably because it has been imitated in countless thrillers since then), but the film is still a classic that holds up well today. Surprise endings are, ultimately, just clever contrivances, extra layerings on the cake. They do not constitute the difference between a good movie and a bad movie. A movie must work on its own terms before springing a surprise.\n\nNevertheless, there can be no denying that the twist in "The Sixth Sense" is particularly clever. It\'s no virtue if a twist is impossible to predict. It is just as important that the twist be logical as that it be surprising. Plenty of thrillers feature twists that are arbitrary, where the plot fails to provide enough hints. Even a clever thriller like "Fight Club" requires a bit of a stretch to accept the ending. What makes "The Sixth Sense" impressive is that it never cheats by suggesting that earlier scenes were imaginary. Everything we see is real, and only our assumptions fool us. If, however, you weren\'t fooled, all the better: just because you figure out the magician\'s trick does not make it a bad trick.\n\nConsider what appears to be happening in the film. Willis plays a psychiatrist who has received accolades for helping children with problems. We see a romantic evening with him and his wife at home. Then he gets into an ugly, violent confrontation with a former patient. Willis believes he has failed, and he wants to make amends by helping a new child (Haley Joel Osment) who appears to be having the same problems (and perhaps the same abilities) that his former patient once displayed. But just as he thinks he\'s making progress with Osment, his marriage seems to be falling apart. His wife isn\'t talking to him, and is beginning to see another man.\n\nHowever these events may be reinterpreted by what is revealed later, the movie is effective because it works on this basic level. In a key scene, Willis asks Osment what he wants most, and Osment answers, "I don\'t want to be scared anymore." It is not always clear that Osment is really facing a mortal threat. But because the movie establishes that he is undergoing a scary experience, by the time the movie reveals what it is that is frightening him, we have our emotions invested in the character, and the terror is very real to us. This is a step that most horror films neglect, the recognition that the most powerful fear may be the fear of fear itself.\n\nWhen I was a teenager, I assumed that all good horror films had to have an R rating. Even as an adult, I was surprised that a movie as frightening as "The Sixth Sense" received only a PG-13. In hindsight, however, most of my favorite horror films, whatever their rating, have relatively little violence. Like all good horror films, "The Sixth Sense" allows the suspense to build and does not rely on either excessive violence or cheap scares. The ending adds an additional level of intrigue, but it is not necessary to one\'s enjoyment during the first viewing. Still, if you have not seen the film by now and remain woefully ignorant of the surprise lurking in its plot, I urge you, before someone ruins it for you, go and watch the movie!', u'-0.2627', u"\nThe Sixth Sense is one of those films that rarely happens these days.  In other words, I knew so little about it before sitting in the cinema that it wasn't ruined before it started.\n\nI don't want to ramble on about it so I'll just say... absolute perfection. An incredible story that had me and my friends gripped from start to finish. The twist in the tale was totally unexpected as well.\n\nAfter it finished we sat through the whole of the credits and talked about how fabulous it was.  If only more films were like this.  I can't remember the last time we did that!\n\nCongratulations to all involved in this masterpiece.", u'0.40035', u"\nWhat makes this film so wonderful to watch is not simply the acting, or the terror it instills, or even the plot itself.  It is the way in which the writer/director M. Night Shyamalan takes his vision from the page, and carefully crafts a tale that completely absorbs the viewer.  As a result, we are treated to a wealth of emotion: fear, sadness, joy, confusion, and humor, each one a compliment to the other.\n\nHaley Joel Osment delivers, plain and simple.  By now, so much has been said about the young actor that any more would be repetition.  Needless to say, his portrayal of Cole Sear is remarkable.  His ability to communicate, through a simple look or gesture, the depths to which his character's soul has been thrust is what truly carries the film.  He succeeds at this task beautifully, convincing us while never going over the top; indeed, by the time Cole utters his now-famous line, you not only believe him, you are chilled by the fact that Osment the actor may actually believe it himself.\n\nBruce Willis turns in a stellar performance, complimenting his young co-star while never overshadowing him.  It is a tribute to his respect of the material in so much as he fine tunes his delivery to seem reserved, yet not too toned down.\n\nThe Sixth Sense is more than simply a wondrous two hours.  It has, in effect, created a new genre of filmmaking... the film is neither drama, nor horror, nor action.  Rather, it is a seamless blending of all three, a film that encompasses the best aspects of each genre, without being limited by the worst.  Hollywood has taken notice of this, and one can only expect a series of poor imitations to follow.  But at least they'll always have The Sixth Sense to guide the way.", u'0.354894', u"\nThis is perhaps my film of the decade so far. The reasons are too numerous to go into in such a short critique. Surely there have not been too many films that can take you through the range of emotions that the Sixth Sense does. The prime emotion; fear, is a difficult emotion to generate in a modern audience that has seen it all before, but this film succeeds where others fail, praying on your imagination and generating suspense from subtle devices rather than blatant horror.\n\nIt is such a relief that the performances of Willis and the excellent Osment live up to an excellently directed quality storyline. I will be disappointed if the youngster doesn't receive at least an academy nomination.\n\nI seldom go to the cinema twice to watch a film, in fact I cannot remember when I have done it before. Tonight I am taking an old friend to see this film as it will be a tragedy if he doesn't see it on the big screen. He has heard so much about it that he is reluctant to go, as I am when something is over-hyped. Just for a change though, here is a film that lives up to its billing and has you thinking about it for weeks to come. As for the twist at the end? Well it totally disorientated me, my mind spinning back throughout the whole film. A fantastic punchline to my film of the year.", u'0.0522324', u'\nReview: The Sixth Sense, Director: M. Night Shyamalam\n\nAs a film which has undoubtedly caught the eye of the film going world, it was difficult to avoid the surrounding hype and publicity. Luckily most of the people I had spoken to who had seen the film did not spoil the \'twist\' at the end, which, although is rather a laboured point by now in reviews, certainly adds to the "Oh, I see now" factor.\n\nThe story revolves around a child psychologist played characteristically by Bruce Willis. I say characteristically, because although his portrayal is quite real, and at times touching, there always seems to be an unnerving \'Die Hard\'-ness to his speech, lending the dialogue some comical qualities. Having said that, his overall attempts at revealing the vulnerable and disturbed psyche of his character achieve good results. As the psychologist, he is plagued by a particular event in his professional life which he perceives as his personal failure, and sets out to redeem himself by righting the wrong and wiping his failure from his conscience. This opportunity presents itself to him in the form of Cole Sear, played devastatingly well by Hayley Joel Osment. Cole has a problem, he sees dead people. To the outside world he is seen as a loner, a problem child, and has become increasingly isolated. Hence the need for a child psychologist. Once we have been introduced to these two central players, we are taken on a journey of discovery, as both of these characters in the space of the film will learn a great deal about each other, themselves and human nature.\n\nIt is this particular point which the film attempts to address so strongly - human communication. That when this breaks down, an inevitable cycle of interpersonal destruction takes course, sometimes irreversible. This is framed within the context of a superbly told ghost story. The sheer truthfulness and honesty with which the concept of fear is expressed by all the characters, is breathtaking. Cole\'s\' experience of the walking dead, appearing out of nowhere, Malcolm\'s fear of a deteriorating marriage, and Cole\'s\' mother\'s fear relating to her own existential angst. All of these are played against the backdrop of the often difficult but finally warm relationship between Cole and Malcolm. Eventually, and against the odds, each character displays courage and bravery as they face up to their existential and supernatural fears.\n\nThere are one or two niggling problems plot wise, but in a film where the overall atmosphere created is one which encompasses death, fear, and finally hope, it is impossible not to overlook incongruencies. Superb direction, acting and ambience lead me to think that M. Night Shyamalan has really succeeded in telling a chillingly touching story about the triumph of the human spirit.\n\nFebruary 14, 2000 Harshad C. Keval\n', u'0.174177', u'\n"I see Dead People!"  Sixth Sense is well worth the ticket price.  It\'s a tight story and the acting is outstanding.  There are a couple of good scares, rendered more effective because I dropped my guard.  My sixth sense says such was the Writer/Director\'s express intention.  :-)\n\nIt\'s a ghost story yet doesn\'t rely on special effects and computerization to chill your bones as the Haunting tried to do.  The scares come from the sliver of possibility "what is happening may be true."  Well that, and the dropping your guard thing.\n\nEveryone in the cast is outstanding.  Bruce Willis is at his best since Die Hard and The Last Boy Scout.   His patient is 33 years junior to him ( played by Haley Joel Osment) is outstanding.  Truly.  I was mesmerized by his ability to get into this "sixth sense" possessed character.  Malcolm and Cole helping each other resolve their problems occurs with good chemistry, and is believable, despite the heights you have to take your mind to believe the story\'s premise. \n\nI am sooo tempted to give clues on when to grip the one you\'re with or arms rests a little more tightly; but alas, cannot in good conscience (or for fear of hate mail!)  And out of respect for M. Night Shyamalan for a very good script and story thesis.\n\nSumming: if you\'re "only" looking for the Chill Factor, take in Blair Witch over this one for those final 10 minutes.  The reality factor is stronger, both despite and because of the low budget factors.  But if you want to see one of the best Hollywood manufactured horror films in a long time, give Sixth Sense a chance.  I enjoyed it.\n', u'0.249057', u'\nSometime Bruce Willis can make some bad films, like HUDSON HAWK and MERCURY RISING.  And other times he can make some films that change the film industry and blow the audiences away (i.e. DIE HARD triology, 12 MONKEYS, and PULP FICTION).  Now Willis\' new film, THE 6th SENSE falls in the latter catageory, as a surprising masterpiece that will leave images stuck in your mind for quite sometime. Willis plays Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist, who is quite good at his job, he has a loving wife named Anna (played by the beautiful Olivia Williams), and he just got awarded by the mayor of Philadelpia for his excellent work.  Then one night, Malcolm gets a terrifying unexpected visit from one of his former patients.  The visit is so terrifying, that it haunts Malcolm later on. Months later, Malcolm\'s job is going downhill, and his marriage is falling apart.  Then his life is changed around when he meets Cole, a eight year old boy who is considered a "freak" by everybody but his mom.  Cole is usually alone, scared, and has cuts and bruses on his body.  The doctors and social workers think the injuries come from his mom, Lynn Sear (Toni Collette).  But Lynn loves Cole too much that she wouldn\'t even think of harming him.  The truth is that the injuries that Cole has are from other people,  people that Cole only sees, people that are dead.  Cole sees dead people walking around with the living, and only Cole sees these ghostly figures.  Malcolm tries to help Cole with his unique gift, and to also find out what these ghostly figures want with him.   When I saw the trailers for this movie,  it looked like a o.k. movie.  Acutally, the preview didn\'t have any effect on me at all, as for seeing this film.  But when I saw this film, I was blown away on how excellent this was!  This is a highly entertaining film that is scary, sad, funny, and even touching. The plot is brilliant, it has intellegence, and shows the personalities of the characters well enough that you feel like that you know them after the movie is over.  The acting is also great, Willis does a good job as the doctor trying to help poor Cole.  Toni Collette is also great as the suffering mom who\'s  very worried and protective over Cole. Oliva Williams is good as well as the suffering wife of the doctor who feels that she\'s losing her husband more and more everyday.  But the real surprise is Haley Joel Osment, who plays the little boy, Cole.  For a child actor he\'s excellent!  He shows potential to becomming a great actor in years to come.  He\'s the next promising child actor that will hopefully do well like Elija Wood and Anna Panquin.   Overall, THE 6th SENSE took me by surprised, and I ended up loving this film.  I would have to place this film as one of the best films of the year, as well as for the summer films.  And for a  PG13 rated film, it\'s quite scary!  This is one film that no one should miss!!!  ***** (out of five)', u'0.173446', u'This was hyped big-time when it came out and, if memory serves me, was a good conversation piece among those who saw it at the theater.\n\nI didn\'t see it for a few years afterward, on tape and now on DVD. It was very good but I didn\'t find it as "the greatest movie ever" as some did. It is an involving story, however, and I\'ve come to appreciate it more with multiple viewings. I\'ve seen it three times, the last one looking for mistakes to disprove the surprise ending....but couldn\'t find any. The filmmakers covered their tracks. However, a couple of scenes were misleading. Those who have seen this movie know what I\'m talking about. For those who haven\'t, I\'m not going to spoil it here.\n\nI enjoyed both Bruce Willis and Haley Joel Osment as the two leads. Willis has had many action-packed, profane macho roles in his career but I like him best when he\'s low key, as he is in here (and in "Unbreakable," to name another fairly-recent movie) The story is slow-paced but it sure is not boring. In a way, it\'s nice to see a slower-paced film be a big hit, as this was.\n\nOsment, meanwhile, is a terrific child actor, as he has proved in other films. He\'s simply one of the best of his young generation. He and Dakota Fanning are the two best child actors I\'ve seen in many years.\n\nThis isn\'t just some supernatural-horror movie. It\'s a nice human interest story. There is one scene late in the movie in which Osment\'s mom is having a talk with her young boy in the car. It is an extremely touching scene that brings tears - a great moment in the film.', u'0.212154', u'\nA child psychologist, played by Bruce Willis, tries to help a troubled boy, played by Haley Joel Osment, who says he sees ghosts.  This film could easily have been one of those dreadful fright night horror flicks played for cheap shocks, aimed at a juvenile mind.  Instead, the film maker chose to tell a story of fragile human feelings, and hidden assumptions.  "The Sixth Sense" thus appeals to a more mature audience.\n\nThis film is carefully constructed, and deliberately slow, so that we can absorb the excellent cinematography, and have a chance to find clues that will help us avoid preconceived ideas.  But our assumptions are hard to overcome, and most of us are headed for a surprise ending, an outcome which is made possible as a result of superb film editing.\n\nAnd the acting is well above average.  I would not have cast Willis in the role of the fatherly psychologist, but he is more convincing than I would have predicted.  Osment\'s performance is as good as I have ever seen for a child actor.  And Toni Collette is totally convincing as the boy\'s mother.  Both Osment and Collette deserved their Oscar nominations.\n\nThis film may, or may not, have a subtext.  I found what could be one, but then I may have been reading too much into the story.  Sensitive, thought provoking, and well crafted, "The Sixth Sense" is one of the better films of the last ten years.', u'0.4893', u'I don\'t really want to talk a lot about this movie because I could spoil the effect. Instead, I\'ll talk about this filmmaker\'s first movie. THE SIXTH SENSE, also by M. Night Shyamalan. I first saw it in December 1999, on a 20-hour flight from Chicago to Hong Kong. My only flight out of the USA. The film really pulled me in, which I suspect is particularly difficult on an airplane. Then, the ending. Based on the article you just read, we can say that some viewers weren\'t surprised. Me, I was blown the heck away and wanted to see it again. Years later I finally did. I taught movie classes, this is a film I chose, and I saw it about a dozen times, fully aware of the ending. It had a bit more going for it than that. My only complaint is with people who think Bruce Willis was the star. The star is Haley Joel Osment! I may have missed out on "the surprise ending" because I was watching the kid instead of the shrink. Bruce Willis could probably star in a few more movies after he died and we\'d never notice. But I digress. THE VILLAGE is about a pilgrim-style village. Some place quaint, rural, close knit and low tech. Nobody from the village goes into the surrounding woods lest they encounter Those We Do Not Speak Of. The acting was flawless and the scenery most certainly created a mood. Shyamalan is a masterful writer, director and producer. But I had trouble caring about what happened to his characters. That could\'ve been my fault. Saturday morning at 8, Jan was working, and my goal for the day was to pack for our impending move but I was too drained to begin. The neighbor had loaned us this DVD back in February, so I figured watching it and returning it to him was a good start. (The same bad attitude that I brought to THE SIXTH SENSE, right? One of these days I\'m going to watch a Shyamalan movie in the right frame of mind.) "The ending." How would you like to be a filmmaker judged solely on "the ending?" In the case of THE VILLAGE, it worked for me. I thought about this film for days after seeing it. Actually, I was trying to decide what to write in this review. How about this? "Shyamalan is a filmmaker of bold originality surviving in a commercialized medium." That\'s a good thing, no matter what your opinion of each individual film is. I believe some critics are panning him, but I\'m not panning this one. I\'m glad I saw it. I\'ve missed a few films between THE SIXTH SENSE and THE VILLAGE, and there will be more after THE VILLAGE. I\'ll watch them all.', u'-0.0957016', u'...but I had to watch this one again, right afterward, because I needed to go back and watch for clues. Honestly, and I won\'t give away the \'ah ha!\' moment, but I knew that he was... well, you know, what he was. What I didn\'t get was how that was possible, or how the interaction with the others that I saw... so I had to go back and watch the movie AGAIN, just to make sure there were no errors in the filming of it. Sure enough, I found none that I could call an error, and was totally blown away with how this was filmed. I am a writer, and I also adapt novels for scripts, and when something like this comes along, that something that just totally grabs me and says, "This is something special... this is not the ordinary..." well, I am impressed. I aspire to write something that can really AH HA! someone in this way. I recommend the movie, highly.', u'0.259153'], u'tt0052618': [u'When I first saw \'Ben Hur\' I was 8 years old and hadn\'t seen many films, since we were hardly ever allowed to watch television. Imagine what an impact this film had on me (my movie diet had so far consisted of Chaplin and Disney films \x96 which, of course, is not at all a bad thing). The experience was simply mesmerizing. Awe and wonder filled me as I watched this story of shocking betrayal, revenge and forgiveness unfold on screen \x96 and by the time the heart-stopping chariot race was over, my fate as a future movie addict was sealed.\n\nDespite its 212 minutes running time, this is storytelling at its finest that knows how to entertain; as we follow Judah Ben-Hur\'s dramatic journey from Jerusalem to Rome and back again, the film just never lets up and immerses you completely. It\'s hard to imagine anything more cinematic, especially at the time: if ever there was an epic that was meant to be seen on the big screen in all its bombastic glory, it\'s Ben Hur. And even now, after I\'ve seen the film many, many times, I feel like this story has a certain sense of greatness to it that is touching (and I don\'t mean that in a religious sense).\n\nMy verdict: this film was and is nothing like the many "sandal and sword" or bible films of that era; it is (at least to me) the ultimate film epic. With its touching story and fantastic action sequences - which I think hold up amazingly well - Ben Hur is among the milestones of its era and part of film history. Pure cinema and a must see \x96 10 stars out of 10.\n\nFavorite Films: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054200841/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/', u'0.262929', u'I own over 2,000 movies on DVD or VHS. I have gone to many many more movies that have not been worthy of my collection, thus my exposure to film has been extensive. I mention this because through every film I have seen; I still come back to a film from 1959 as the greatest achievement in cinematic history. I have seen great films like: Return of the King, Saving Private Ryan, Braveheart and many more. While the modern films are wonderful and have a fantastic richness to them, they still are a "small" notch below Ben-Hur. Today\'s films use a lot of computer effects for their battles scenes, their backgrounds, and even computer images for the stunts of their actors. Yet, Ben-Hur did it all without computers. I am still fascinated by the chariot race. Never, in film history, has anything matched the depth and excitement of the chariot race. Remember folks, this is 1959, nothing is computer generated. Some may say the naval battle scenes look a bit cheesy, but again it was 1959 and the scenes still work today. What can you say about the acting? Every single actor is wonderful. Heston is in top form as Ben-Hur. Steven Boyd is incredible playing the merciless Messala. Jack Hawkins, Haya Harareet, Martha Scott--all fantastic in their roles. Each performing the role of a life time. The actors are fantastic, but William Wyler brings more out of each actor than any director ever could in this day and age. Wyler had no computer animation to rely on, he had no high tech special effects crew, he had no computer program to fill in extras. Wyler had to find thousands of extras for many scenes and maintain control. Did you ever see Steven Boyd better? Probably not. Did you ever see any of the actors (except Heston, who is an acting marvel) better in any other role? Wyler just pulled the greatest performance out of each actor. The story: fantastic from beginning to end. While the film is over 3 hours long, you do not feel that it is that long. Every scene is lovingly crafted: the reunion between Messala and Judah, the trek to the gallows, the rowing scene, the naval battle, the chariot race, the Messala death scene, the reunion with Judah and his family, etc. After seeing thousands and thousands of movies, I always come back to Ben-Hur. This is the mark of fantastic movie making. Today\'s film makers could learn a lot by watching this film and "learning" about acting, directing, and screen writing.', u'0.171614', u'We are by nature a cynical and critical group.\n\nWith the attention span of a bumblebee, moreso the current generation than the earlier ones, because of exposure to mobile devices and other modern disposable non-repairable tech.\n\nIt is probably for that reason that epics like this one have become forgotten over time. Even the late CH has become more a societal joke and less of an icon over time. Michael Moore made Heston\'s participation in the NRA a joke. (If Heston\'s concerns over where society is headed prove to be true, the final joke may be on Moore.) Back to the film. It is almost perfect. Then, as now. The script continually builds. Modern writers could learn from that. No matter what is presently on screen as you watch, the inevitability of the final climax beckons.\n\nThe acting is perfect.\n\nThe mixture of myth and drama is perfect.\n\nTrue the Roman dialog did not benefit from the verbal tricks that Stephen McKnight used in Spartacus (bending the script to match the flow of actual Roman) but it is more than enough to entertain and entrance.\n\nFrom the "accident" early in the film which starts the flow of events, to the chariot race WHICH HAS NEVER BEEN EQUALLED IN THE HISTORY OF FILM, to the reunion with lost family at the end, this is one of the most powerful and entertaining films of all time', u'0.212979', u"\nThere's a reason Ben-Hur captured more academy awards than any other film (until Titanic).  A close to perfect production which exceeds expectations for a film of religious nature.  The only way to watch Ben-Hur is via the widescreen DVD - presented in 2:7.1 scope - most probably the widest movie filmed.   The only reason I didn't give it a '10' is because of Charlton Heston.  A much overrated actor who overacts at every opportunity and becomes quite tiresome.  Fortunately, there was so much more in Ben-Hur, that his overacting goes unnoticed.   The chariot race is still THE most exciting sequence I've ever seen in a film.  Get over the religious issue and give Ben-Hur its due.", u'-0.00265918', u"\nI first saw this film while in Catholic grade school.  It struck a chord then and it's stayed with me throughout my life.  I've wondered why because I've seen every epic, every historical, war, every biblical film film ever made but...Ben Hur still haunts me.  Now that I have many years behind me, I have a better feel for the answer.  It's because I have found my faith tested so many times over the years.  It does not have to be Christian, or Jewish or even Islamic, perhaps not even religion itself.  But, as you watch Ben Hur discover or rediscover his faith, it's reminds me that I too am on a life long mission of looking for answers.    ", u'0.181835', u'\nOne of the best epics, this is a story of the friendship between two young boys. Eventually they grow up to be enemies and end up hating each other, one being Jewish and the other one Roman.\n\nOne could easily assume "Ben-Hur" is a story from The Holy Bible, and although this is not the case it was the intention when writing it. It certainly is one of the greatest stories ever told. This is the third adaptation of the classic tale, and it\'s the only one really remembered today. Many elements were inspired and copied from the first two, filmed in 1907 and 1925, but with a vast improvement: special-effects. The set wasn\'t as dangerous in 1959 because of the technical revolution that had taken place since the last time around.\n\n"Ben-Hur" is full of drama, action and romance. There\'s also a tension between the two leads that could be interpreted as a love-affair gone horribly wrong, but this was toned down by the studio as homosexuality was a big taboo at the time.\n\nCharlton Heston and Stephen Boyd are great, with a wonderful supporting cast to back them up, making this a classic.\n\n8/10', u'0.374429', u'Along with Haya Harareet, I think Claude Heater is one of the last of the surviving main cast members from Ben-Hur (1959). Quite symbolic in a waygiven Mr Heater\'s moving performance as Jesus Christ in the movie. WhenI saw Ben-Hur at a church gathering night a few years ago, the Pastor(who was quite conservative) told us that even though Ben-Hur is a "Hollywood" movie, it\'s the one that probably came closest to honoring and glorifying the Son of God. \n\nIn Ben-Hur you never see the face of Jesus Christ, and that was a deliberate choice by the director. But Claude Heater gives the emotional gravitas required for the role.\n\nBen-Hur is a movie that stands the test of time. No wonder we say "It\'s bigger than Ben-Hur" to describe something spectacular. Ben-Hur is an epic, it\'s spectacular, and it\'s moving.', u'0.870369', u"\nAnyone want to know how to make a darned good EPIC remake? Then this is the film to see. \n\nWilliam Wyler made an epic, a film that is exciting, violent, heartfelt film. Make no mistake, it is the story of two childhood friends, one gets drunk with power and the other who was a Jewish Prince gets thrown into a life of hardship though his boyhood 'friend'. But he has faith and keeps on going. The ultimate battle to beat all battles, to settle the score...is at the Chariot race and that is a sight to behold.\n\nFilms like Ben-Hur will NEVER get greenlighted today and if it did, too much CGI and not enough of what Director Wyler and old Hollywood was good at. The actors, well, they are to die for. Excellent acting. And let me share with you my favorite part...(tee-hee) when Pilate holds up his hankerchief to start the chariot race, plays with the racers and audience - he's very smug ya know..then the WAY he finally drops it. Who couldn't tell how he'd eventually turn out, hmmmmmmm? \n\nThere is nothing more I can add that others have said. This film is near and dear to me and for my vote -- is one of the top five films of all time. I never tire of watching this film, I find something new in it every time, its done that well.\n\nThis is an epic remake, something else that Hollywood has trouble doing -- to remake a film on this scale that finds new audiences year after year, after year. Brilliant, wonderful, every bit of it. A must, must see. Just plain excellent!", u'0.0815388', u'It was finally time to see what all 11 of those Oscar\'s were for in 1959, 11 Oscars for a single film is certainly a feat; and I was excited to see what film earned so many statuettes. I could not have been any more pleased with Ben-Hur. It was a wonderful visual spectacle that still amazes nearly 60 years after its debut. William Wyler\'s epic starring Charleton Heston in the title role is a true treat for the audience that won\'t even mind the 3.5-hour commitment it will take to finish this classic. Strap into your chariot, Ben- Hur is a film that any true fan of cinema should see at least once. \n\nJudah Ben-Hur (Charlton Heston) is a wealthy Jewish prince living in Jerusalem. His old friend Messala (Stephen Boyd), who once saved his life, has just been named Commanding Officer of the Roman legion. Despite their religious and political differences, Judah and Messala have remained friends through their life. However, after Judah realizes his friend has become power hungry and arrogant, he seeks distance between them. Then, at the welcome parade for the Romans, Judah and his sister watch from the roof of the house of Hur. When a loose roof tile falls and injures the Governor, Judah is blamed for the incident. He tries to explain the misunderstanding, but it falls on deaf ears and Messala, even knowing that Judah and his family are innocent, sends Judah to the galleys as a slave and throws his mother and sister in prison. Through many instances of good fortune, Judah survives the galleys, holding onto his Jewish faith and the wish to reunite with his mother and sister. After managing to return to Jerusalem, Judah goes on a quest to find his family. Along the way, Judah decides to exact revenge on his one-time friend.\n\nThe colors, Duke, the colors! Maybe I\'m the only one left that remembers that commercial; nonetheless, the colors in Ben-Hur were the most stand-out part of the film. The sets were remarkable, as well, especially given their grand scale. The screenplay and the storytelling was simply perfect. The story was paced so well, at the movie\'s credits you will hardly believe you sat through a nearly 4- hour spectacle. The costuming was phenomenal; true to life without being over the top. William Wyler made an excellent decision in the way he filmed scenes depicting Jesus. He never showed Jesus\' face, which fit perfectly in the movie, as it was not about Jesus, but rather the plight of the Jews and the politics of the time. Wyler\'s decision was also a very reverent way to handle depicting a religious figure. The score and sound effects were exquisite and worked wonders to progress the film along. The special effects were divine, especially considering the film was made in 1959. What review of Ben-Hur could exist without mentioning that chariot scene? This scene alone cost $4 million dollars and lasted for 11 minutes. It was an incredible and well worth it scene for the movie. "The chariot race" is not only the scene most remembered from Ben- Hur, but it is a scene that has gone down in cinema history. Once you finish Ben-Hur, you will not wonder why it took home 11 Oscars, it\'s more than evident and wildly deserving of every statuette it took home. \n\nAn instant favorite, Ben-Hur is a visually pleasing work of art classic piece of cinema. Everything in this film comes together beautifully and will leave no one who invests their time in the picture disappointed. Even if you are not a fan of Charlton Heston\'s infamous overacting, give Ben-Hur a viewing and see for yourself how easy it is to overlook that one piece of this movie. It\'s easy to see why Ben-Hur has a place carved out in history that it will never be removed from.', u'0.260487', u'\n\n"Ben-Hur" is the kind of film which Hollywood will never produce again.  For one thing, in today\'s spectacles, so much of the scenery and even crowd scenes would be CGI and not real sets or people.  \n\nCompare the pod race from "The Phantom Menace" with the chariot race in this film.  The first one looked like a videogame, no real suspense or drama.  But Ben-Hur vs. Messala for all the marbles was one of the greatest scenes in movie history.\n\nI remember that for the 2000 Oscars, most of the pre-ceremony commentators were talking about how "Gladiator" might match "the record of \'Ben-Hur\' with 11 Oscars." Well, it didn\'t.  "Gladiator" was good, but "Ben-Hur" is one of the greatest films of all time.\n\nFunny though that no one mentioned that the record was no longer really held by "Ben-Hur" alone, but was JOINTLY HELD by 1997\'s "Titanic" and the 1959 classic.  It meant obviously that, while Hollywood people still thought so highly of Ben-Hur 40 years later so as to proudly state that it "held" the record for most Oscars, it seemed that by 2001, lots of folks were already cringing over how "Titanic" had actually been accorded so many awards as well in 1997.  \n\nThe drama and the power of the storytelling will enthrall you even as the film runs 3 and a half hours.    A great movie experience, one which should really be felt on the big screen or at least on widescreen TV.\n\n\n \n\n\n\n\n', u'0.116748', u"\nI thought that this movie was really excellent.  My mom watched it and she really liked it too, and she usually doesn't like the same movies as me. Charlton Heston did an excellent job of portraying Judah Ben-Hur and I would recommend that everybody see this movie!", u'0.48333', u'\nIn their determination to make the most spectacular movie ever made, and the blockbuster to top all previous blockbusters, MGM and company unintentionally created a work of popular art that could only be fully appreciated in its original, pristine print, 70mm, super widescreen glory. These are the screenings moviegoers who love this film remember. The astonishing depth of field. The saturated richness of the color. The almost demented attention to detail. The overpowering use of sound and motion, especially in the chariot race. Viewed in its original format, "Ben-Hur" was rightly hailed a masterpiece. The vast majority of moviegoers left theatres spellbound and drained. Unfortunately, all this shock and awe is diminished when experienced via faded prints in revival theatres or the miniaturizing trivialization of video or DVD. On TV, we might as well be watching ants; hence, in all but the most extreme closeups, the emotional connection with the actors is lost.\n\n Furthermore, contemporary audiences tend to find the quasi-Shakespearean acting stodgy and old-fashioned. Charlton Heston, the lead, has been especially lambasted of late for either woodenness or overacting (though how he can exemplify both is beyond be). Younger viewers should remember that he and the rest of the cast have stage backgrounds, where deep, resonant voices, trick accents, and clear diction are the standard. Considered in this light, the acting\'s great.\n\n Finally, the late \'50s was not a time for Slouching-Towards-Gomorrah hipness. Still, the 1959 "Ben-Hur" was as contemporary a treatment of the antique novel as one could hope for. It carefully negotiates potentially explosive theological minefields with greater respect and aplomb than Mel Gibson\'s recent and controversial "The Passion." And its literate script is astonishingly timeless in delineating the power struggles of Middle Eastern identity politics--"These people are drunk with religion." "How do you fight an idea?" "With another idea." Sounds like CNN or Fox News to me.\n\n There continues to be much to appreciate in this venerable classic, if people will give it a (four-hour) chance, and allow their mind\'s eye to imagine it as it once was, in 1959, on the big screen.\n\n', u'0.334944', u"\nThere's a reason Ben-Hur captured more academy awards than any other film (until Titanic).  A close to perfect production which exceeds expectations for a film of religious nature.  The only way to watch Ben-Hur is via the widescreen DVD - presented in 2:7.1 scope - most probably the widest movie filmed.   The only reason I didn't give it a '10' is because of Charlton Heston.  A much overrated actor who overacts at every opportunity and becomes quite tiresome.  Fortunately, there was so much more in Ben-Hur, that his overacting goes unnoticed.   The chariot race is still THE most exciting sequence I've ever seen in a film.  Get over the religious issue and give Ben-Hur its due.", u'-0.00265917', u"\nAnd then there was Ben Hur... Everybody must have seen the film tons of times (every Easter telly shows it) and there are some things I don't understand.... Overwhelmed with Oscars, being one of the most expensive productions ever (if it wasn't a success it would have meant the bankrupcy of MGM!) but is it so much different from all those other long big movies...? Is it so much better than Cleopatra, does it differ so much from The Ten Commandments or is it so much more original than Quo Vadis? You know it isn't... The sole thing that made this movie so outstanding is the use of a wide screen and the money that was set free to build up such an unique set. The chariots-scene is of course a classic but I am convinced that it has more to do with the developped technology rather than William Wyler's talent cos after all he was a frequent director but all of them are nothing but nice pictures. The acting isn't great either... Charlton Heston plays his role in a classic way, you can even say nothing bad about it but come on, it's not outstanding, not? The scenes with Jesus...well, we saw them all in those other Biblefilms and also the story of Ben Hur lasts 3 hours and a half but can be told in a few lines, not? But as said this movie is so classic, so important that everyone must have seen it and I even dare to give it an 8 (most of the movies I watch get a 7, mind you) but 42 years later it absolutely doesn't deserve to be titled as best movie ever as so many do.", u'-0.0954687', u'It is unfortunate that many viewers don\'t know the history of producing "Ben Hur".\n\nHeston, is without a doubt the focal point of the story of the family of Hur, under the rule of Rome. Heston is at the pinnacle of his career here and Heston becomes the heart and soul of the Hollywood Roman Spectacles here.\n\nThe story was written by a civil war hero, Lew Wallace. The basis of the story of the family of Hur, is of power, injustice, revenge and forgiveness; it mirrors the same \'four horseman\' of the American Civil War.\n\nThe Karl Tunberg\'s screen adaptation of classic, follows Wallace\'s novel rather well (In case you haven\'t read it) and Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer\'s spectacular investment in extras and scenery create an epic Hollywood masterpiece.\n\nBen Hur is Cinema 101. If you\'ve been stranded on a desert island, and need to catch up on life, then Ben Hur should be among the first ten films you watch.', u'-0.183214'], u'tt1130884': [u"Shutter Island. A film that will divide the film community. A film that will leave many upset, and hating it. A film that has already completely split the critics. A movie that messes with you. And no one likes to be messed with. And that is exactly where it exceeds. Think I'm contradicting myself? \n\nShutter Island is one of the most well crafted psychological thrillers to come by since Silence Of The Lambs. And it is no coincidence both were brilliantly written novels. Shutter Island is adapted by a book written by Dennis Lehane (wrote gone baby, gone and mystic river). It is a book filled with twists and turns, that will leave the reader dizzy. And, that is what it's film counterpart does to the fullest. Martin Scorsese helms the director chair, in a movie where he is more free than any before. This is Scorsese at his most unrestrained. \n\nMarty takes what he has learned from the great films of the past and puts it into his. The master of suspense Alfred Hitchcock's influence is everywhere you look in this film. And it is no wonder, considering Scorsese even showed one of his greatest works to the crew: Vertigo. And many of those ideas are present in Shutter Island; the cliff scenes scream Hitchcock. This is a film that creeps and crawls, and is filled with dark corners. And it is all heightened by the coming storm that looms over the island. This is classic film noir. \n\nThe story follows Teddy, a federal Marshall, and his partner Chuck (Played by DiCaprio and Ruffulo). They go to this mysterious island enveloped in fog to investigate an escape. From these opening scenes, Marty has set up a dark and creepy premise. \n\nAlmost the whole movie incorporates this story as Teddy desperately tries to find the truths he seeks. Teddy is shown as a scared man; a man of war and violence as portrayed in various flashbacks. These will go on to be increasingly important as the story progresses. We follow Teddy on his quest, through every dark corridor and perilous confrontations. Slowly, we are given pieces to the puzzle, but the audience does not even realize it. For we, like Teddy, are blind. For the moment at least. It is because of this that the thrilling conclusion will leave many blindsided. But, you see, that is where this thriller becomes something more. We as the audience are put in Teddy's shoes, and we feel all the things he feels. It is a complete assault on the senses, and it works beautifully. \n\nThis is a film you must watch carefully. That is another thing that sets this apart, it is a horror film that makes you actually think. In this day and age, I'm not surprised some found it terrible esp. after their brains have been turned to mush by these new gore filled horror films. Scorsese's ultimate goal here is to wake you up. And trust me, you probably wont like it. \n\nThis is also a film I would recommend seeing a second time. In fact, it is even better the second time. All those pieces of that puzzle you didn't catch the first time, you will the second. You see, we as the audience are first put in the shoes of Teddy. The second? Well, without giving too much away, lets just say you are put in someones else's shoes entirely during the second viewing. \n\nShutter Island. A film that will make you question your own sanity. A film that will leave you breathless. A film that has re-ignited the thriller genre. A film that will leave you, and the main character, searching for answers. \n\n10 out of 10 \n\n-CLS", u'0.100974', u'There is one line of dialogue, right at the end of Shutter Island before the credits roll, that elevates the emotion of the film and makes it much more powerful. For those of you, like me, who read and enjoyed the novel before seeing the film and felt that the trailers and advertisements for this film were leading you to believe there wouldn\'t be any narrative surprises in store, think again! Scorsese\'s film features that one brief piece of dialogue at the films conclusion that results in an entirely different perception of the final act. The rest of the film, however, is very faithful to Dennis Lehane\'s already great story.\n\nShutter Island represents exactly what one should hope for when seeing a novel being interpreted to film. While it certainly does the source material justice, it also adds small changes that make for a distinctive experience. Even if you\'ve read the novel multiple times, you\'ll feel like you\'re reading the book for the first time again while watching. Scorsese perfectly recreates the menacing atmosphere of the island on film. Every location is foreboding and drenched with hints of unseen danger in dark corners. The lighthouse, the caves, the civil war fort housing "the most dangerous patients," and the island itself--every locale seems large yet claustrophobic and isolated at the same time.\n\nI often experience claustrophobia myself and there are certain films that really capitalize on that personal fear and make it more relevant and eerie to me. Neil Marshall\'s The Descent was one such picture, and this is another. An confined island is a terrific horror location and it comes with its own type of fear. The utter desperation to escape from a persistent and confined nightmare is something Teddy (Dicaprio) is receiving in high doses, and so does the audience.\n\nAs with Scorsese and DiCaprio\'s previous collaborations, this is a movie that must be seen. Here they explore the horror/thriller genre with gravitas, with no small part played by Laeta Kalogridis in supplying the screenplay. While most modern pictures of its kind lack character or any real sense of suspense, Shutter Island doesn\'t go for cheap gags. I concur with Ebert when he says one of the key elements to this film is that it releases its tension through suspense instead of mindless action sequences. That\'s not to knock a well-deserved frenetic scene of violence every once in awhile--it works to the advantage of some films like Evil Dead II and Planet Terror--but had Teddy and Chuck gone running and gunning through the facility\'s faculty, the mood this movie keeps in check so well would have been lost.\n\nHowever, that mood isn\'t sacrificed and "spooky" is punched up to full force. A considerable amount of that spooky is generated by a "best of" collection of actors that have mastered the art of creepy: Ben Kingsley, Jackie Earle Haley, Ted Levine, and Max Von Sydow just to name a few. Had Tom Noonan been thrown in the cast as well, my "Top Five People I Would Not Want to Be Left in the Dark with, Especially in a Room with No Doors or Windows" list would have been completely exhausted. On that note, is it just me or has Sydow mysteriously not aged since The Exorcist? Was there a secret pact made between Lucifer and Father Merrin? Whether he sold his soul or not, he\'s quite ominous in every single scene he is present in. All of this great talent in front of the camera doesn\'t mean anything though if you don\'t have a faithful orchestrator behind it. Luckily you have Scorsese leading the lens and he points the movie in the right direction, even if this isn\'t among his very best works. His style works amazingly with suspense laden projects and at times he even seems to channel Hitchcock and Kubrick, though there\'s always something distinctively Scorsese about the presentation. I found the editing in the opening scene, with Chuck and Teddy approaching Shutter Island, to be very odd and frantic, though I think the audience will know why Scorsese displayed the scene the way he did after completing the film.\n\nWith a body of work so impressive, Shutter Island is among captivating company. The good news is that Shutter Island carves out a place of its own in his resume. While no Goodfellas or Raging Bull or Taxi Driver, I have no problem placing Shutter side by side The Last Temptation of Christ and Bringing Out the Dead. The cinematography is bright and gorgeous. Scorsese doesn\'t rely on the over-grainy, ugly presentation that most modern horror or suspense-riddled thrillers rely on. He uses lush, bright color during daytime and dream sequences to flush out a distinct feeling of terror.\n\nShutter Island isn\'t just a pretty face, its also got a great story to boot and this is why I\'ve been anticipating the film for so long. As mentioned earlier, I\'ve been exposed and digested the source material myself before seeing the movie. I was worried the trailers for the film were giving away too much through their spots on television and on the silver screen, but Scorsese has added enough to the film for the story to feel fresh even for those "in the know." You are transferred in the films paranoia and phobia once the camera pans through the mental facilities open doors. Lehane is one of the luckiest authors on the planet to have his work adapted to the big screen by talents such as Eastwood and Scorsese, but his work is brilliant and deserving of such treatment.\n\nAt the risk of spoiling plot points for potential viewers who have not read the book, I\'ll leave a Related Recommendations section concealed in "Spoiler" tags. Discussing this story at any length can be quite revealing.', u'0.209768', u'I just saw Shutter Island this evening, just prior to its American release. I have to say this film was full of intrigue. Prior to viewing this film I had built a preconceived notion of what this thriller was going to be like because I was fooled yet again by good marketing when watching the trailer. This is probably not the movie for your average film-goer who wants an easy plot line to follow and little thought required. This movie does challenge the viewer physchologically and definitely holds your attention all the way through. For someone who was never much of a Leonardo fan, his performance is brilliant, so much range to his character. In fact all of the acting in this film is excellent. The directing is probably the best quality to this film. I always enjoy watching a film that is as unpredicatable as this film and where the director has turned the plot line on to his viewer.', u'0.168354', u"Really, Scorsese should just give it away for anyone. The man is one of the most brilliant directors of our time. Anyway, let me get to the actual movie; I just saw it at a early screening and have to write this while I'm thinking about how stunning it was. Shutter Island is certainly not a typical film, not even for Scorsese. It is a different take for the director, and he does it, as he does every film, perfectly, so much as to be in his own league of film-making. I don't want to give anything away, but I will say this: Shutter Island was completely unexpected, and a great start to 2010. It had all the components of a great film, and then some. The acting is spot on from every character; none of it seems forged or out of place. The script is fantastic; it has one of the most intriguing plots I have seen in a while (exception being Tarantino's Basterds). Everything, down to the set's lighting, was perfectly executed. I will say that not everyone will like this; Shutter Island, again, isn't your typical movie. To those, though, who do choose to see this film, be ready for a compelling, gripping, thought-provoking experience, so much so that you might think to see it again for further clarity (I know I will; it was so entertaining and my mind was blown!). Don't be surprised if you see this at the next Oscars...", u'0.289863', u'From the look of the trailer, Martin Scorsese\'s "Shutter Island" looks more like a horror film\x85 This is a dangerous place where isolation rules under fascist control. A U.S Marshall is sent to an asylum to investigate a missing patient but discovers so much more. A demon? A ghost? Something more? Is this going to be as disappointing as I think it is?\n\nI was skeptical walking into the theater, wondering if this twist could hold water. The film starts with Teddy Daniels and his new partner, Chuck, standing on a ferry. They talk about their assignment. What\'s suspect here is that there is no additional development. We are bam, smack right into the story without so much as an opening montage. All that we see is the men smoking a couple cigarettes. Though this is what begins as momentous development. As our hero smokes we that this isn\'t the glorified top lit smoking of a beauty or that of a sophisticated and confident gangster. We see that this is a harsher character with poor posture, someone who doesn\'t sleep well, someone with a deep past\x85\n\nThey are greeted at the gate by guards whose attitudes\' seem immediately suspect. Soon we meet Dr Crawley, a seemingly complex and modern man who runs the asylum. However, he soon turns uncooperative with the investigation. Inmates and staff are hiding something but what? Everyone here seems off. Evidence and clues begin to appear but not before our hero seems riddled by psychosis himself. "You act like all this madness is contagious." Daniels says to the guard. Is it? Soon we begin to wonder, too, but not before he uncovers the tip of the iceberg and it\'s not only painfully intimate with his own past but also a mass conspiracy. The Nazis had concentration camps and the Americans have Shutter Island.\n\nThough, it doesn\'t stop here, but to say anything else would do the story injustice\x85 Kingsley is in his finest role in years. Similarly, DiCaprio reaches new levels. Amongst others Elias Koteas, Ted Levine, Michelle Williams, all play small but wonderful roles. Robert Richardson captures a world all of its own.\n\nWhile Scorsese is a master of film I\'d say that his specialty has been more character than story. This is a fresh balance of both. It\'s a mix of noir and thriller. It\'s only sort of a horror movie and could be compared to "The Shining" but it makes it look like it\'s a one trick pony. \n\nAll this praise being said it\'s not for everyone. The story is complex. It takes some attention. At times it\'s a bit bleak and dire. Of course it all makes a little less sense when you actually think about it but then again that\'s film. There are a couple of moments where the story gets lost within itself. Things become a bit too complicated. At this point you might begin to lose faith in its viscosity, but don\'t worry because the story has you right where its put you.', u'-0.119462', u"Finally, a horror/thriller that actually, genuinely scares the crap out of you. Not because it has fancy villains in masks or sadistic buckets of gore throughout. No, it scares you because it messes with your mind. Most will hate this movie, they don't like their brains being tampered with. I loved it. It's what we needed after all those gory R-rated and sometimes lame-duck PG-13 horror crap-fests.\n\nThe horror/thriller genre has been raped lately, with gore and scantily clad- women replacing the noir and terror that Alfred Hitchcock perfected in the '50s and '60's. Here director Martin Scorsese delivers in full blast, crafting a thriller in his own unique vision. The atmosphere throughout the movie is tense and unsettling. Slow as it may be, but it is crucial to the movie and it's genuinely gripping. Your attention WILL not be lost. The scenery is beautiful and finely done with no excessive lighting, grain or darkness. The editing by Thelma Schoonmaker is fluid and pitch-perfect, and never makes the film lose focus. The movie is based on a book by Dennis Lehane and is packed with twists and turns that will leave you breathless and uneasy. The movie cranks the breathlessness and uneasiness up to the power of 5. The music is also perfectly suited with the scenes. There is sometimes no music during suspenseful moments, and sometimes the music makes the scene even more disturbing and memorable. Alfred Hitchcock's noirish thriller style is back with a vengeance, here to teach today's moviegoers the REAL meaning of suspense and horror.\n\nAll the actors in the movie are in top-form. Once again, you can't go wrong with a Leonardo DiCaprio/Martin Scorsese collaboration. As the protagonist, we the audience are thrust into his shoes and we are about as confused and scared as his character is, we feel what he feels. It becomes a psychological trip that poses many, many questions about oneself, that to discuss them here would spoil the entire movie. There are some flashbacks in the movie, but all of them are important clues to DiCaprio's character. DiCaprio gives a stunning performance, once again tempting the Academy to give him another Best Actor nomination. DiCaprio gives a vivid portrayal of a vulnerable, haunted and ultimately terrified man. Apart from DiCaprio there's really not much I can say about the supporting cast, because they are all also terrific. Ben Kingsley; Mark Ruffalo; Michelle Williams; Max Von Sydow; Jackie Earle Haley; Emily Mortimer; Patricia Clarkson; Ted Levine; Elias Koteas; John Carroll Lynch. All of them.\n\nIn short, this is a psychological and frightening masterpiece that will make you scared, will make you think, and will make you seek psychological help. This is one of the best films of the year. See it, go in with an open mind and prepare to be blown away.\n\nOverall value: 9/10.", u'0.264632', u"I saw this and I knew what to expect going in to the film as I had already read about half of the book but never got the chance to finish it. But I was surprised at how faithful the film was to the original material.The directing was also masterfully done and pretty cool I saw some cool camera tricks I hadn't seen since Martin Scorsese directed Bringing Out The Dead, Martin Scorsese did one great job and everyone was top notch especially Ben Kingsley and DiCaprio and I never though I would jump out of fright especially in a Scorsese film but I did. All in all a solid thriller with a good story and some great performances and for me it's the best film I've seen in 2010 so far.", u'0.0303998', u'Martin Scorsese has done it again. He pays attention to every detail in this film, making "Shutter Island" one of the best suspense thrillers of all time.\n\nVisually intriguing, simplistic and absolutely phenomenal. The story is kept simplistic enough so it doesn\'t get absurd, but allows for an ending which you probably won\'t see coming. The film doesn\'t go for cheap thrills, so although you will be on the edge of your seat you won\'t get needlessly scared.\n\nThe film uses everything at its disposal from breathtaking scenery, to detailed laid-out shots, and to actors at their finest to completely engross you in the film. I loved every minute of it and highly recommend it to everyone. Even if you\'re not a usual fan of the genre, this film has so much more to it.', u'0.444319', u'Similar to my rating for this film, you can argue that 9 out of 10 people who watch this movie, it will not be their first Scorsese film. Most of us know the genius that he is and coming into this showing we should expect brilliance, and gladly he delivers a captivating storyline driven by great acting. Unfortunately with the release of Shutter Island was also a press release that Taxi Driver may be remade, so that news made me hesitant to care, but I\'m glad I was wrong.\n\nShutter Island is the story of Teddy Daniels, A U.S. federal marshall sent to the island with his partner Chuck Aule to search for the disappearance of a patient. Each scene provides a turn against their leads and compels them to look for more whilst searching in places we couldn\'t comprehend, including their minds. Leonardo DiCaprio and Mark Ruffalo feed off each other and supply great performances for their characters as expected, but some of the other characters whose names are riveted on the posters or marquees are sensational as well. The two that stuck out to me most were Ben Kingsley (Dr. Cawley) and Michelle Williams (Dolores, Teddy\'s wife), each of whom brought so much dramatics and new questions to the movie, developing plot twists and controversy. I don\'t think this film would be the same without them.\n\nEven to begin explaining details of the plot and how everything comes to fruition causes me to feel migraines alike the ones Teddy gets in the movie, therefore I won\'t ruin anything for you now. Take my honest word that if you enjoyed any Scorsese movie in the past or have enjoyed movies that include surrealism, Shutter Island combines the two into an intense thriller that boggles the mind and possibly even "corrode it, rusts it". Also, if you are hesitant to watch this film because the trailer perceives it as a horror film with a lot of "jumpy" scenes, ignore that. I had the same feeling entering it, and there was only one towards the very end, but it was worth the shock. You will miss so much detail trying to cover your eyes for a few minutes sporadically throughout that it\'s not worth it. Take the risk of jumping out of your seat for once, because it was the best scare I could ask for.\n\n9/10. Not Martin\'s best work, but come on, could you make a better movie than him?', u'-0.0753426', u"Martin Scorsese returns to film making after winning the academy award for The Departed with his fav star Leonardo DiCaprio.. This time he move to a completely different script which keeps the audience humored and thrilled from the first scene till the last! The movie( which i saw at the Berlin film festival!) blew away the minds of many people, the plot being so strong and thrilling which kept the audiences guessing! \n\nWhen it comes to acting Leonardo lets no stone unturned! The supremely talented actor has once again showed that why Martin casts him in his every movie as he is simply superb! He not only fits into the role smoothly but delivers a terrific performance every time! Sir Kingsley being the head psychiatrist of the asylum has also done a marvelous job!\n\nThe film is full of flashbacks and haunting dream sequences that range in location from the island itself to the concentration camp at Dachau. The audience is constantly trapped in a world where one questions what is reality and what is dream. Don't miss this one!", u'0.531446', u"First, I know many who read this will not take the time to research what I'm saying to see that it is true and further, many won't have the ability to see it even if they did. So, I know this review will be thumbed down by those who don't like the hard truths in life but this movie (or should I say novel by Dennis Lehane) was a nice piece of plagiarism based upon a 1920 silent film called The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari.\n\nThe same basic plot exists in both as well as the exact same twist ending. The lead character investigates an insane asylum and tries to put clues together to figure out the mystery surrounding the place but as we near the end, we learn that the lead character isn't there to investigate anything. He's an inmate there who has invented much of what he was investigating as part of his coping mechanism.\n\nShutter Island would have been a good movie if it hadn't ripped off The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari so blatantly. Lehane obviously knew that the old movie was in the public domain but instead of telling the viewers that it was based on that movie, they just pass it off as his (and/or Scorseesi's idea). That, my friends, is the definition of plagiarism.\n\nI don't recommend this whatsoever for this reason. It is a shame and Lehane should be called on it but who will do it? Too much $ to be made reheating the old dishes and calling them made from scratch.\n\nWatch The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari (it's on y o u t u b e if you want to compare the two and see that what I'm saying is 100% correct).\n\nI almost never write reviews but this time, I had to.", u'-0.21933', u'Last year, I lamented the fact that Martin Scorsese\'s long-await psychological thriller "Shutter Island" was relegated to the dead movie month of February, especially when it was receiving serious Oscar buzz at the time.\n\nRumors floated about that the studio and Scorsese had come to a rift, that Marty wanted too much money, that he was being punished for being the most arrogant yet most talented director in the biz. Yep, as these stories flew, I sided 100 percent with Scorsese and felt he was being persecuted - once again.\n\nThen I saw "Shutter Island." Now I know what the fuss wasn\'t all about.\n\nIf ever a motion picture needed to be seen in February this is it. As difficult to watch as it is to review, "Shutter Island" is a psychotropic mish-mash of "Shawshank Redemption" meets "Vertigo" meets "The Sixth Sense" meets "Inglourious Basterds" meets "One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest," all neatly wrapped up as an ode to Alfred Hitchcock but coming off as simply a nod to Brian DePalma.\n\nLittered with weird visions, wild hallucinations, back-breaking plot twists and - unfortunately - scene after scene of dead children, this movie laps itself in confusion and covers itself with a thick layer of obfuscation leaving one shaking one\'s head and wondering just what the point of the entire enterprise was.\n\nNow, no doubt, those who love this film will toss about accusations of the stupidity of this scribbler, that he has no clue about the nuances of the Dennis Lehane novel from which it came; or the depth of the emotional screenplay adaptation by Laeta Kalogridis (whose last major screenplay was the wonderful, historically-accurate "Pathfinder").\n\nThat being written, to me, this movie had so much potential - all of which was smashed to bits by heavy-handed direction, a punch-in-the-face musical score, dead-end plot lines and a mystery that Nancy Drew herself would have found far too easy to solve. Then, after the endless maze of twists and turns we\'re forced go through, the movie takes a lame swipe at McCarthyism - where was Charlie McCarthy when I needed him? \n\nIt\'s 1954 and U.S. Marshal Teddy Daniels and his new partner, Chuck Aule (Mark Ruffalo, "Where the Wild Things Are") arrive at a creepy federal asylum for the criminally insane off the coast of Massachuttes. Evidently, a young woman prisoner - who drowned her three children - escaped and they have been called in to investigate.\n\nI write "evidently" because nothing is as it seems in this picture, but one will get used to that. Treated as intruders by the bellowing guards and like idiots by the high-toned doctors (Ben Kingsley and Max Von Sydow), the two marshals carry on their investigation, even though a "Jurassic Park"-like hurricane is threatening to overwhelm the entire island.\n\nIn the meantime, Teddy is having bizarre hallucinogenic nightmares featuring his wife, Delores (Michelle Williams, Oscar nominee for "Brokeback Mountain"), who perished in a fire set by a guy who is housed in this very facility. In these dreams, Delores keeps trying to give Teddy clues about the film, but he refuses to listen.\n\nHe also relates how, as a U.S. soldier liberating one of the Nazi death camps, he and others lined up German soldiers against the wall and machine-gunned them. I\'m not sure why these scenes were in the movie, since they had nothing to do with the plot - then again, NOTHING in this movie had ANYTHING to do with the plot.\n\nTeddy even tracks down an old college friend, George Noy (Jackie Earle Haley, Jr., "Little Children"), now housed in the dreaded C Ward; and later meets a facility doctor hiding out in a cave raving about the Cold War, mind-control experiments and brainwashing techniques. But like everything else, these story-lines, too, come to dead ends.\n\nWe now not only begin to question Teddy\'s sanity, but our own as the film takes even more hairpin turns until arriving at the single most disappointing conclusion of any Scorsese film ever made, especially in the light of Teddy\'s last bold declaration, which I was hoping (against all hope) would rectify and redeem his character, as well as the film.\n\nFans of the director will no doubt appreciate this effort and I do, too, in some respects. The acting, especially DiCaprio, Williams and Kingsley, are without flaw. The newly-hot Haley, Jr. huff and puffs admirably during his two-minute screen time, Von Sydow is appropriately German and Ruffalo basically reacts to Teddy the entire time.\n\nThe cinematography of Robert Richardson ("Inglourious Basterds," "The Aviator," "Kill Bill, Volumes 1 and 2") is always amazing, as well. His gritty, creepy, atmospheric view of the daunting Gothic castle-like structure takes on a life of its own.\n\nIt\'s a shame that Scorsese had to litter it all with dead kids, half-hearted nowhere scenes and incidental characters which turn out to mean absolutely nothing. I\'m not an idiot and I don\'t want my films fed to me like a toddler in a high chair, but it doesn\'t hurt to walk away from a movie feeling one has gotten SOMETHING out of it.\n\nIs that too much to ask?', u'-0.349524', u"I hate to say this as much anyone else but for me this film had a horribly disappoint ending. First before I delve into that I'd like to say that the acting, the writing, the shooting, the film in general as far as quality goes was very good. But the ending was very disappointing. And no I am no idiot or newbie when it comes to film. But I thought the was very much a cop out. Now granted I know this is based off of a novel, hence there are certain restraints to adhering to this novel somewhat. That being said I found the idea of the medical experimentation, mental hospital, nazi experiments, and astray patients much more tantalizing, realistic, and more full of potential. The trick ending where its all in someone's head is done far too often sadly. I was hoping that while it dragged one there at the end it would ultimately reveal he was playing them or that he would stay true and not give in. But that didn't happen. I guess for me I was just expecting something not so clich\xe9 for an ending from the likes of Scorsese's genius mind. But all things said and done I definitely can't give this movie all negative remarks, wonderfully acted and scripted. Great atmosphere, shooting, photography, etc. But I feel the ending should have been less clich\xe9 or not as cheap I guess. Felt like it was just an easy way out and not fully developing the tension and intrigue that they had built throughout. But either way its each to their own, so maybe you will appreciate the ending more than I. FYI - I do understand the undertones of the ending and the ambiguity, but I don't think that saves the ending or does the film justice in it's entirety.", u'-0.209624', u'This review DOES contain spoilers.\n\nRight at the beginning of the film it becomes clear that this is supposed to be all spooky and scary. The movie tries too hard at creating an eerie mood, and fails miserably because it is so overdone, especially with the music. There are a few good scenes but most of it is repeated so many times it becomes tedious. The observant viewer will quickly understand (spoiler here) that the US Marshal actually is a patient there, and from there on in you just wait for him to "get it", and you no longer care about anyone or anything that happens. And the shocking twist at the end is no twist, its just a boring "yeah, yeah, we get it"-moment. Of course he\'s on his way to get the lobotomy, yeah so he\'s not cured, maybe he chose not to be cured, blah blah blah, "the ending leaves so many questions" yeah whatever.\n\nIt\'s too overdone, too obvious, too long and too boring. We are promised an exciting story but it does not deliver. This movie will probably be spoken highly of by all the know-it-all\'s, and if you didn\'t like it you\'ll be told that you "didn\'t get it". But yeah, we did get it, because it was way too obvious.\n\nSpend your money on something else, get a haircut for instance. It\'s less boring and quicker.', u'-0.500625', u'Sure everyone knows the typical Scorsese film. Normally there is a mob present, or in most cases, a tough brute who loves to flash the "F" bomb in almost every sentence. But what about a thriller? I mean sure, we have seen it in "Cape Fear", probably one of my personal favorite remakes. But what about a top notch mind bending thriller that really makes you think. Something the likes of which we have never seen Mr. Scorsese do. But given his previous works of art, its really hard to doubt that he cannot pull this off.\n\nGrasping the concept of this movie is a no brainer. There is a mystery on this island filled with crazy people, but you can tell that there is a lot more under the surface. Yeah, it doesn\'t sound that original........but my oh my, you just wait until Scorsese begins to pick at your brain. Not since "Taxi Driver" have i seen Scorsese really make a valiant attempt at a character study of someone going insane. In "Taxi Driver", its like your in the back seat......watching as Robert Deniro slowing progresses into his insanity. With Shutter Island, its like your inside the mind of Dicaprio, and everything is starting to crumble. Scorsese really does a fantastic job of toying with your mind. You cannot help but second guess everything your thinking, but then again, i think that was the ultimate goal.......and yes, that was hint towards the end, which i think will raise a lot of debate. Now i always hear the phrase "Twist and Turns" when someone describes a decent thriller. Then i see the movie, and i say to myself........"That was a Twist and Turn? It felt more like a road bump." But in this case, Scorsese really does re-define the term. Because in this film, you really have a hard time judging what is actually real, and what is not.......and what you think is happening, is actually not happening at all..........that is a twist and turn people. Not you finally figuring out who the masked killer is at the end.......okay, im sorry that all thriller movies are not like a Scooby Doo episode. \n\nAnd since we are on the subject of crappy thrillers......i am so glad that Scorsese chose not to use elevated music in some of scenes. For example, someone jump out of a dark corner......in most cases, the music is raised and the audience jumps.......but in this movie, Scorsese doesn\'t add any music at all......he just uses the fear of an eerie set to make your skin crawl. Much like an old Hitchcock movie. However, there is music in this, and let me tell you, it is so very fitting. You can tell Scorsese has been down this path before, so he sort of used the same style that he did in "Cape Fear", with Benard Herman\'s deep, dark, and haunting tones that just pull you in more and more. Honestly, there is not one bad aspect of this movie. The acting, the directing, the score, the cinematography.....all pieced together with one hell of a script.\n\nBottom Line........people, this is what a thriller is suppose to be. Especially a psychological thriller. I thank god for directors like Scorsese.....because this movie really isn\'t his type of film. My guess is he saw enough crap in this genre\' and had enough.......so he threw his hat into the ring and gave a rebirth to the classic Hithcock type thriller.......not only that, i really think that he redefined it in a way. Now i know that it is really early in the year, but i can easily see this movie staying in my top 10 of this year. Absolutely fantastic film, best i have seen so far.', u'0.1342'], u'tt0758758': [u'I\'ve never posted a comment regarding a movie but feel compelled to after attending a screening of Into The Wild at the Toronto Film Festival last night. I won\'t speak to story here as it\'s covered in the other comments.\n\nThis is a movie of real beauty. It made me cry. I felt moved in a way that happens very rarely. It was an inspiration.\n\nThe feelings it evoked were all based on the power of the acting and the writing. The words were real and human. The relationships seemed real and human. This may not seem like a great feat - but I consider it a true rarity. It didn\'t feel calculated and artificial, like so many movies (read: Crash - but I\'m not here to bash that...). It was very organic, natural and (I can\'t say it enough) just beautiful. Cripes, it\'s making me sound like a hippie, for heaven\'s sake. This for me was Penn\'s best work since Indian Runner.\n\nWhat it reminded me of...\n\n- Terence Malik - Herzog? - in a strange way Cassavettes? - Hal Ashby (more Coming Home than Harold & Maude...) - even a bit of Ken Loach\n\n- Ruby in Paradise - Alice Doesn\'t Live Here Anymore - Five Easy Pieces - Easy Rider\n\n... but when I list those it\'s not because of plot similarities (though there are some) or style (although I think you can definitely see the influence of some great films) - it\'s again because of the heart of it. I heard a few people at the screening comment that the film was "too long" but I don\'t agree. I think exploring a journey of this magnitude required visiting all of the people he touched and taking the time to see the land.\n\nHal Holbrook was just perfect, as was the cast as a whole, and I think Emile Hirsch is really going places - he was fantastic and he owned the role. Eddie Vedder\'s music worked perfectly as well - not distracting or quirky - just a part of the whole.\n\nThe film received a standing ovation and quite a few tears were shed. Magic.', u'0.179917', u"Sean Penn's new movie Into the Wild arrives on the wave of a well-regarded novel about a college graduate who decides that the anger and violence in civilized society is too much to handle and commences a journey through nature in order to truly live life as it was meant to be. This film is a wonderful glimpse into the life of a kid, wise beyond his years, and the bonds that he creates with people along the way. A victim of excess in wealth and a shortage of love, Christopher McCandless hid inside his mind behind knowledge and philosophy, building up his intellectual strength, as well as the physical, in order to complete his trek, ultimately leading him to Alaska. Penn never falls into the trap of showing too much heartbreak on the side of McCandless's parents, because he doesn't want the audience to second-guess the decision he made. There is no debate to be had here, our protagonist has no alternative but to get out and live off the land. Only being completely self-sufficient can he grasp a meaning for his life and one day perhaps go back with that knowledge fully learned.\n\nEmile Hirsch is absolutely brilliant with his good-natured attitude and affable charm. His character believes that human contact is not necessary for happiness and never seeks out relationships. However, his character is so likable that they find him and latch on, not to change his mind, but to experience his level of being and hopefully learn something from him and help enlarge his vocabulary on life. The people he meets help him to fully grasp the decision of life in the wild and be able to survive it. Never coming off condescendingly to those he crosses paths with, Hirsch always holds a smile on his face. One scene, where he meets up with a couple of people from Europe, proves how contagious a clear outlook on life without the troubles of societal restraints can be. These three kids have a blast, if only for a few minutes\x97with Hirsch being chased by the police for rafting with no license\x97and it makes one wonder if maybe we all should take a journey into nature and feel the freedom and full warmth of heart that a lack of stress to succeed in the business world can give.\n\nAll the supporting players are magnificent at helping show the side to McCandless that Penn needs on display to succeed. Hal Holbrook, Brian Dierker, and Catherine Keener are by far the best of these side characters with Vince Vaughn and Kirsten Stewart adding some charm too. Dierker, Keener, and Stewart play hippie, flower-child type roles and allow Hirsch to show off how modest and unselfish he is. This is the family he deserved to have from birth and he is the son they wished their lives had earned them. At their best, all four together give some of the most emotionally charged moments in the film. Holbrook, on-the-other-hand, helps give insight into the philosophy that Hirsch needs to live with in order to survive the loneliness, looking him in the face, to come in Alaska. It is truly fascinating to see how every person adds something to his overall experience and to the tools he needs.\n\nHirsch deserves a lot of credit because he truly outshines the film itself with his dedication and sacrifice to the role. The length of time needed to allow him the ability to lose the weight necessary for a main plot point in the movie is crazy. If the time wasn't that long and Hirsch did it all rapidly, I'm even more impressed. With all that, there are many instances free of dialogue that he needs to carry with body language and actions alone. True, much of this is enhanced by a wonderful soundtrack from Eddie Vedder, but evenso it is a remarkable performance. Kudos to Sean Penn for a gorgeous filming job also. He captures the countryside with grace, while infusing many moments of visual style by slow-motioning glimpses, knowing when to show the family left behind, utilizing informative and essential voice-over, and even breaking the fourth wall. When Hirsch first looks into the camera, at the audience, it does not seem unnatural in the slightest, but instead an amazing link for the viewers to take a look into his soul like those that crossed his path have. McCandless is so pure that it almost feels like glimpsing the calm protectiveness of God.", u'0.553076', u'I read the book in 1996. Like others, it moved me profoundly. I created a series of prints of my interpretation of Chris. I haven\'t read the book since.\n\nThis film transported me right back to the spirit that Krakauer brought to life in the book. I spent a few years traveling alone from 1994-1996. This film reminded my why I left and why I returned. Ten years later, all grown up with all the crap, I\'m haunted again by Chris. What a well done job.\n\nThank you Sean & John. You did it right.\n\nBy the way, try to catch Holly Figueroa\'s song "Dream in Red" inspired by Into The Wild.', u'0.169431', u"One of the best movies I've ever seen. Beautiful, deep, true, adventurous, sad, occasionally funny, real, at times very touching. Based on a real-life novel, it is written and directed by Sean Penn. I have always loved the movie work of Sean Penn. Congratulations and thank you to Mr. Penn on giving me a few hours of though-provoking delight. Can you say Oscar? This movie says it loud and clear! \n\nThe story; Christopher McCandless, just graduated from college in the early 1990s, goes off on an adventure. He is smitten with books he reads\x97Thoreau, London, Byron. He wants no money, so he gives his to needy causes or burns it. Chris is cocky, driven, industrious. \n\nHe is traumatized by his parents' bad marriage. He tries to work through his anguish. He seems determined to destroy himself just to prove that he has different values than his parents. He is inconsiderate of his family and keeps them worried about his whereabouts and safety, as if a single reassuring phone call would ruin his rebellion. He fancies himself a philosopher, but acts the petulant child. It is a great credit to the film that we see these character flaws in our hero. \n\nOff on the road, he makes a number of foolish choices \x96 and suffers from some of them. Other foolish choices, such as daring to kayak a rapid river, bring him joy. He meets a lot of people and almost all are kind to him. His interactions with people are intense, the kind you have when you are planning to run off and disappear while you are still a mysterious entity. He avoids getting too close to anyone.\n\nThe movie is gorgeous. Mountains, plains, sky, rivers, animals. The acting is fantastic, totally believable. The actors are incredible and perfectly cast \x96 Catherine Keener as an aging hippie vagabond, Vince Vaughn as a wacky farmer growing who knows what, William Hurt as Chris' potbellied suburbanite dad, Marcia Gay Harden as the type of mom who breeds children who wants to run off to the wilderness to escape from her. Emile Hirsch plays Chris, and does a great job of it. When an actual photo of the real Chris McCandless comes on screen, we see that Hirsch resembles him. Original songs by Eddie Vedder give the right feel \x96 that of a well-to-do young white man heading out on a chosen adventure, getting gritty by choice. His goal is to get to Alaska, but on the way there, he hits many other states and Mexico, too.\n\nChris is a clueless kid from the warm South. He plans to go to Alaska, yet only arrives with any needed equipment because kind folks force it upon him \x96 a machete, warm clothes, rubber boots. He's highly educated and gets good grades, yet, early on his trip, ignores a big sign that warns of flash floods. That prepares us that we are going to wince many times at his low level of common sense, while at the same time reveling in his physical strength and willingness to press on. \n\nAt one point, Chris passes through Los Angeles. He is dirty, hungry, tired, and goes to a downtown mission shelter. The other men there are also dirty, hungry, and tired, but not of their own choosing. It is not their adventure, it is their life. He realizes fast that he does not want to feel categorized with men who are in dire straits due to misfortune and not due to following their own adventure. \n\nThe movie shows Chris as an honorable young man. I do not want to give away any of the plot, so I'll just say \x96 the young man has principles and so does the movie.\n\nA few parts of the movie confused me. After Chris's college graduation, he meets h is parents at a restaurant. He brings with him a lovely young woman, obviously his date. Weirdly, it turns out that she is his sister! \n\nThere is more confusion when Chris picks up work on a farm run by Wayne, the Vince Vaughn character. What are they growing or doing? What's up? \n\nThere is an unintentionally funny scene where an old man tells Chris that he does not have time for adventures because he is too busy with leather. I thought the old guy was confessing being into whips and chaps. But no, he has a workshop where he tools leather. \n\nThere were a couple spots where the editing distracted from the movie. I saw a preview; maybe it was a rough cut. There's a scene on the farm where a triple screen is used \x96 like a cheesy commercial. \n\nAnother scene, where Chris is eating an apple, is a series of jump cuts, which I really liked. It seemed an homage to French auteur filmmakers. But it ends with Chris mugging at the camera. With it, Sean Penn breaks the believability and acknowledges that yes, this is just us making a movie. \n\nThere is another part where Chris is in a car with the older man who is dropping him off. As they pull up, there is an inexplicable cutaway shot of what looks to be the head of a cannon. \n\nMuch of the movie is like a travel montage or music video involving mountains and sky. The scenes are so beautiful. \n\nI know people that have elements of Chris in them. And I think I've met all the characters he runs into out on the road.", u'-0.00931518', u"The sensitivity with which Krakauer captured the essence of McCandless and his adventure is extended aptly to the movie format by Sean Penn. Even if one might not be able to appreciate the purpose for Alex's journey, I don't think anyone would be able to deny that Into the Wild is a sensitive and poignant cinematic experience. There are scenes in this movie that one will never be able to forget, particularly the ending sequence. This movie will easily pull its audience into a philosophical debate for the truth about who was right and wrong isn't easy to distinguish. Sean Penn certainly doesn't try to answer those questions, questions that McCandless' life left for his family and the rest of us. Penn does well to tread a delicate objective but not indifferent line. Certainly the best movie of this year and one of the best ever made. The story, the story itself is great.", u'0.488712', u"Christopher McCandless lived a silly life and died a silly death. Here was a guy who gave his savings to Oxfam, left home without uttering a word to his family and who thought salvation lay in the wilderness. Too bad, then, that he ate the wrong type of plant and carked it.\n\nAll the time we're told what complete bastards McCandless' parents are. They drove Christopher into the wild. But what was their crime? Apparently they argued some, even lied a little and their children were born out of wedlock. Okay, they're not the best parents in the world, but do they deserve the harsh treatment that their son dishes out \x96 no letters, no postcards, no phone calls? \n\nWell, if you're a massive jerk and you're somehow unable to comprehend that human relationships are more complicated than a simple 'they're good' or 'they're bad', then you may be able to build a case for young Christopher, but if you have any depth of feeling in your soul, you may well think that McCandless punished his parents beyond anything that is reasonable. And also remember that he never contacted his beloved sister. She got the silent treatment as well. However, we have a scene where Christopher goes to call her, but instead he gives his quarter to an old man who is running out of change. What a great guy, we're asked to think. See how he lends a helping hand to strangers. But what about his poor sister, the person who loves him most in the world? This apparently is his one feeble attempt to reach out and tell her that he's okay.\n\nBut no, Christopher is determined to live alone in the wilderness - to find himself. He wants to escape from a sick society where people treat each other poorly. Hell, his parents even have the nerve to offer to buy him a new car and pay for a Harvard education. Those phonies. Those shallow fakers who give him a home to live in and money to spend. How disgusting they are.\n\nOkay, so fair enough, the parents that we're presented with here are stiff, middle class dweebs who are more interested in appearances than anything of any substance, but what had me shaking my head was the assertion that Christopher's disappearance made them better people. Suddenly they're thoughtful and united and in tune with one another. Yes, that's what every strained marriage needs \x96 their children to put them through a couple of years of hell.\n\nBut what I find most objectionable is the romanticising of the wilderness. Is this the only way that anyone can find themselves, by opening their arms and standing on the edge of a mountain and by kayaking down a river? Isn't there any other way? Apparently not. We even get a scene where Christopher, briefly stranded in LA, looks into a restaurant populated by smarmy bastards and sees a yuppie version of himself. You see what he'd become if he stayed in the city? Hunting moose and talking to hippies is the only way to become a rounded individual.\n\nBut the disaffection with society in this film is incredibly adolescent. In one scene, Christopher and a buddy of his just start impotently shouting 'society!' Yeah, society sucks and the wilderness is great. The wilderness never starved anyone, ate anyone or froze their balls off. In the eyes of every bear and moose is truth and beauty, and on the cold streets of civilisation is a steady flow of lies and deceit.\n\nHowever, at the end, Christopher maybe finally begins to understand that his quest is full of crap. He writes something along the lines that happiness is meaningless if you don't have someone to share it with. It took you all that time to figure that out? That human connections are what make life bearable? You could have found that out back home, sitting on your couch in your underpants, stuffing Cheetos down your throat.\n\nBut of course, it's the journey that matters, isn't it? And what a tedious journey it is. Christopher meets hippies and quirky foreigners (who are good) and men with badges (who are bad). He helps people like a shaggy-haired Littlest Hobo and enjoys the milk of human kindness. Well, he enjoys the milk of human kindness as long as the people are poor. Everyone who has no money in this film is an insightful, kind-hearted, itinerant poet. Plus none of the hippies he meets are smelly, ugly, incoherent bastards who drown in their own drug-fuelled nonsense. No, they're inspiring people, who plaster their vehicles with outdated sentiments like 'freedom', 'peace' and 'love'.\n\nBut it's notable that there's a moment when even a bear won't eat Christopher. Supposedly the bear turns his nose up at him because the kid stays calm or perhaps because he's so sick he doesn't smell that good. But I'd like to think that the bear turns his nose up because it's BS he can smell, and lots of it.\n\nHowever, as we all know from Timothy Treadwell, bears don't mind a bit of BS, but alas the film can't even come close to the genius of Grizzly Man, a film that shows you're no closer to finding reality in the wilderness than you are on the city streets. The problem here is that Penn is celebrating McCandless' folly instead of investigating it. Not for one moment are we asked to consider that this kid is perhaps a bit of an idiot. We're meant to find his journey inspiring and his plight tragic. But instead it's neither of those things. And at the end his death is elevated to grandiose status (it's shot like he's ascending to heaven, that he's communing with god). But in reality his death is what happens when a deluded moron tries to live in the wilderness without a map or enough food.", u'-0.372134', u'I live in Alaska and have for over 20 years and I have hiked, fished and hunted all over this state for most all of it. I lived here when the events of this movie happened. Christopher McCandless was not a hero or anything of the sort and to portray him in this way in this movie and to gloss over the insanely irresponsible actions he took that led to his completely unnecessary death and only invites other misguided "wilderness advocates" to do the same.\n\nJust as in the case of the Timothy Treadwell, who died along with his girlfriend due to his own lack of respect and understanding for the Alaskan Brown bears he claimed to have a "relationship" with, and had a movie made about him (Grizzley Man , 2005) McCandless was just another in a long list of "outsiders" who read a few books or even less and feel they have the necessary tools to survive in the bush here.\n\nIt serves no one to have this movie completely stylize and glamorize the events that are only someone\'s sanitized version of what happened. In truth McCandless likely died a horrible and lonely death in a completely unnecessary manner and in a completely irresponsible way. If only the movie were stronger to make this point then the it would have served an important role. Instead it only will likely lead to more misguided outsiders, unprepared and irresponsibly doing the same or worse.', u'-0.72508', u"Honestly let me just say this 1st Sean Pean made this story come to life, true life in every moment in the film. This movie has nothing wrong with it, it is perfect in every way shape and form. He did something that brought me to something I never could understand of what either i have to do or what i need to do in my life. If you want a movie from the heart this is it, if you want a movie of love this is it, if you want a movie with real life emotions well this is all of them. Its long but you'll probably want more when you don't want to leave your seat and just live in the moment of they story. So from my heart to yours this movie will speak to you know matter what.", u'0.326652', u"INTO THE WILD definitely works as a film - I had read the book so I certainly knew the tragic story of this young man's life but I was blown away by the performances. In fact, to have this young talent Emile Hirsch working with the old, legendary Hal Holbrook makes the film a must see - in fact, their scene near the end in the truck is one of the best pieces of acting I have ever seen on film - Holbrook is amazing there. He deserves a Best Supporting Actor nomination (but probably won't get it). The film is by no means perfect - there are pacing problems but Penn does use the flashbacks incredibly well and the film builds power as it goes along. Hirsch is so real - I remember noticing how talented he was in the indie flick Dangerous Life Of Altar Boys and I also thought he was very good in the so-so Alpha Dog film. But Penn gets a terrific performance out of him as well as Catherine Keener, Vince Vaughn, Wm. Hurt, Kirsten Stewart, jena Malone and everyone else for that matter. I can see how this film might not be for every one, but I was very moved by it and days later - certain images and moments stayed with me. Penn is getting better as a filmmaker with each movie he makes.", u'0.35983', u'As a parent who\'s reasonably liberal and open-minded I was nevertheless repulsed by the incredibly self-serving main character and director Sean Penn\'s unsubtle and cloying anti-government/anti-commercialist bent. McCandless may have been a straight-a student but he didn\'t learn a bloody thing in college. The writings of Byron, London, Tolstoy, Thoreau i.e. are taught as a jumping off point toward self-determination and adulthood. They are not meant to be literally emulated as lifestyles.\n\nAnd the ridiculous conceit of a 24 year old lecturing an elderly man to open up and go live his life underscores the primary issue with this movie, a misanthropic and deluded main character. Acting was decent enough but I could not for a moment get into the story or the performance due to my disconnect. In scene after scene, I was constantly reminded of the agony McCandless put his poor parents and sister through. Sure they made some mistakes in bringing him up but who\'s perfect in this world? It would have cost him nothing to simply let them know he was still alive and on \'walk-about\' or whatever he thought his pointless odyssey signified. Or at least given them the chance to say good-bye.\n\nUltimately, I found "Into the Wild" irresponsible because McCandless is presented as the rebellious anti-hero rather than a fool who caused his own senseless death and the deepest sorrow of his loved ones. Sean Penn is a talented somehow but choosing the right sorts of role models to present on film is not one of his skills. Oh and I will definitely not be sending my kids to Emory College if this is the sort of minds they produce...', u'-0.327451', u"This is the true story of Christopher McCandless, a college graduate who becomes a bum and eventually bites off more than he can chew by taking on the Alaskan frontier.\n\nEarly on in the movie, I sort of liked the main character, and the premise behind his motives, but as time goes by, I came to regard him as selfish, silly and maybe a bit insane.\n\nHe leaves his mother, father and sister distraught for over 2 years, not knowing where he is or if he is even alive. The portrayal of his 'traumatizing' upbringing was laughable (omg, his parents actually argued loudly and threatened to divorce each other a few times!). So what? As these facts came up, you come to dislike Chris (Alexander Supertramp), more and more. It becomes obvious he is just another spoiled suburban kid running from adult responsibilities, refusing to grow up, yet in the end meeting his match by taking on the Alaskan wilderness, which by the way, doesn't give two figs about how well meaning you are in your quest for 'answers'. Nature has no pity for the dumb.\n\nWhy did they make a movie about this idiot in the first place??", u'-0.531294', u"What is wrong with you people? This is a Walt Disneyesque revision of a spoiled kid's misadventure into self-indulgence. It's a shame he died for being righteous and stupid...and that's about it. It's a shame. But not a particularly interesting story, and a ridiculous one for a film filled with swirling helicopter shots and endless musical montages that are supposed to make you think the smirking Mccandless is some kind of modern Siddhartha.\n\nSean Penn clearly identifies with his subject enough to direct his film with a similar self-indulgence. This should have been a very straight-forward account of one young idealist's cowardice: too afraid to help the society he thought was sick, too afraid too deal with his family with compassion, and ultimately too afraid to kill himself outright: instead he just put himself into a situation that he couldn't survive without rescue...and nobody rescued him.\n\nI wonder about the people who rave about this movie. I'll bet I could make the same kind of film about John Walker Lindh, and they'd eat it up...provided I could get Vedder for the soundtrack.", u'-0.592483', u'For a movie to be even better than a good book is no small feat. Yet, that\'s how I felt after watching this film. It really impressed me. One of the reasons is the fantastic cinematography. Man, this is a beautifully filmed and, at 142 minutes, there are a lot of great scenes to admire.\n\nSean Penn directed and Eddie Gautier was the Director Of Photography. I can\'t stand Penn as a person but fair-is-fair and I think he\'s great as a director, having seen his work in "The Pledge" and "The Crossing Guard." The main actor, Emile Hirsch, who plays "Chris McCandless" (a.k.a. "Alexander Supertramp" reminded me of Leonardo DiCaprio with his looks, build and voice inflection. He is very credible as the young guy who wants nothing to do with materialistic society and dreams of living in the wilds of Alaska. The problem was that he was unprepared and underestimated what he was up against.\n\nTwo people who fascinated me the most in here were two extremes, age-wise - Hal Holbrook and Kristen Stewart. It was really great to see the veteran Holbrook ("Ron France") again. He was about 82 when he made this film and hadn\'t acted in a film in a few years. He was terrific, too. He had some of the most memorable scenes in the story. Meanwhile, teenager Stewart was captivating as "Tracy Tatro," who had a crush on "Alex." This young woman is on her way to stardom.\n\nBrian Dierker and Catherine Keener also were really, really interesting as the aging hippie couple, "Rainey" and "Jan." I kept thinking, I know this guy when listening to Dierker\'s voice, finally guessing it was Jeff Bridges underneath all the beard....but it Dierker, a guy who rarely acts in films.\n\nKnowing the book, the only part of the film that caught be off-guard was the young Swedish couple. I don\'t remember them in the book but I\'ll never forget this in this film!! One could debate the pros and cons of Chris McCandless for hours, so no sense going into that here. I thought the film was pretty kind to him. You read more in the book about how he hurt a lot of people with his silence. Either way, it\'s a a fascinating story and a beautiful film.', u'0.359562', u"I watched this movie on the aeroplane after searching through the movie list and not finding anything else interesting to watch. I didn't even know what the film was called until the ending credits. However, what I saw was amazing - the acting and scenery was excellent and the plot was thought provoking. More people should watch this to appreciate the message to us all. I was also surprised to see it was was actually a true story which made it even more interesting (I love films that are based on true stories). It is one of the best movies i've seen that portrays the contrast between a materialistic world vs the natural world that is at the core of the universe. This is a film that can easily be overlooked but not forgotten.", u'0.40751', u'Who Is Chris McCandless? A true supertramp? An obsessive, emotionally damaged egomaniac? Suicidal thrill-seeker? A Kerouac-like drifter addicted to the search for an ever-evasive truth? A high-functioning schizophrenic? The 21st century youth culture reincarnation of John Gault? Or just a kid going through a difficult time and looking for some distance to sort it all out? \n\nSean Penn\'s pop-philosophical examination of this young man\'s voyage across America, to Alaska, and to the depths of his young soul will give you an interpretation at least. While it is not clear exactly whose interpretation we are seeing, it is very clear that Penn respects his subject and gave this film about as much thought and power as he could inject it with. And the film did remind me of something very true about the self-righteous naivet\xe9 of youth.\n\nI am not concerned at all with the accuracy of the film, and, while it is tempting to compare this film to Werner Herzog\'s excellent but less fictionalized "Grizzly Man", the subjects are really too widely disparate; Herzog and Penn\'s perspective on humanity is too different to produce a meaningful comparison. The targets of this comparison, too big and too easy. But I will make one comment about the two films - Penn\'s film is much more or a tribute to its protagonist than Herzog\'s.\n\nI found Into the Wild to be a gripping, thoughtful film. The script was good, but sometimes a bit pretentious - occasionally crossing the line between character development and character worship. Penn\'s direction and cinematography are masterful. The acting - every member of the cast included - is absolutely excellent.\n\nRecommended - but not for light cheerful entertainment.', u'0.348588'], u'tt0084787': [u'\n* * * * \xbd (4\xbd out of 5)\n\n\nThe Thing\n\n\nDirected by: John Carpenter, 1982\n\n\nLooking back on John Carpenter\'s The Thing \x96 today a highly treasured cult favourite \x96 one has to wonder why it was dismissed by both the audience and critics when it first came out in 1982.\n\n\nSteven Spielberg\'s extra terrestrial adventure about a sweet alien that phoned home (that stole the hearts of both children and adults world wide) had opened just two weeks before and was on its historic box office rampage. Bad scheduling may have had a greater impact than anything else on the fate of Carpenter\'s first big studio effort for Universal Pictures. Nobody was prepared \x96 moreover wanted anything so dark, gory and scary as this genuine remake of the famous 1951 original. This was the time of E.T.: The Extra-Terrestrial.\n\n\nIt then makes for great movie history trivia, that The Thing has gained such a remarkable afterlife on video, DVD and television. Both financially and critically. Carpenter\'s version is less a remake of the Howard Hawks\' version than a more faithful adaptation of John W. Campbell\'s short story "Who Goes There?\' (on which both were based), and critics today point out how well Carpenter plays his characters against each other. Kurt Russell will never top this one, and he gets a brilliant sparring from the entire cast.\n\n\nIt opens in Antarctica with a sled husky running from a pair of crazed and armed Norwegian men in a helicopter. The scene is long, slow and uneasy. It feels like the Apocalypse. It oozes doomsday.\n\n\nThis scene comprises one of the greatest opening sequences in film history.\n\n\nEnnio Morricone\'s moody synth score (heavy on naked thumping bass lines in classic Carpenter style), the windswept massive white of the desolate polar ice and the majestic husky running across the tundra chased by the chopper, compromises a completely mesmerizing piece of scenery.\n\n\nA satisfying example of a movie that today \x96 18 years after \x96 looks downright muscular in its simplicity.\n\n\nThe budget was big ($14 mill), yet it allowed Carpenter to visualize his ideas better than ever before. There\'s a brooding darkness to this film, making the whites and blues of the icy Antarctic claustrophobia seem poetic and almost angelic. Dean Cundey\'s extraordinary photography created a palpable chill to every shot. The careful preparation (the crew went into a record 11-month pre-production) paid off immensely.\n\n\nHorror specialist Rob Bottin was handpicked for the many gory and grotesque special effects. Be warned \x96 there\'s a lot of splatter and gore here. The Thing is actually notorious for its creature morphing scenes. Some find them disgusting, some mere cult.\n\nAn argument could be made against The Thing being an Alien rip-off; it has its origins in an old sci-fi story and it creates tension by popping a crowd of people (note: all-male) on an isolated outpost (an Antarctic research facility) terrorized by an alien life form.\n\n\nWhere Carpenter was clearly inspired by Ridley Scott\'s 1979 masterpiece, his own alien movie is original and intriguing in its own right. There\'s a rhythm and an environment that equals Scott\'s in every way.\n\n\nThe husky was in fact half-wolf and half-dog, and it was noted that it never barked or growled on or off the set (Horror Takes Shape, the making of - DVD version).\n\n\nWatch in awe at the scene where it walks through the hallway and stares at a\nhuman shadow, slightly tilting its head forward in stalking position like a wild wolf. This is a fine piece of animal training, sure, but that\'s not the point. This is as spooky as anything ever made in a horror movie.\n\n\nCarpenter had all the right tools here, and he utilized them to perfection, making The Thing his best movie alongside Halloween.\n\n', u'0.197229', u'\n"I know I\'m human. And if you were all these things, then you\'d just attack me right now, so some of you are still human. This thing doesn\'t want to show itself, it wants to hide inside an imitation. It\'ll fight if it has to, but it\'s vulnerable out in the open. If it takes us over, then it has no more enemies, nobody left to kill it. And then it\'s won."\n\nJohn Carpenter\'s "The Thing" is one of the most entertaining horror films ever made \x96 fast, clever and purely exciting from start to finish. This is how all movies of the genre should be made.\n\nTaking place in the Antarctic in 1982, the movie focuses specifically on a group of American scientists. We are given no introduction to their mission, but are thrust into their existence when a pair of seemingly crazy Norwegians appears at their base camp, chasing an escaped dog. The Norwegians are killed, and the dog finds its way into the colony, which is when things really start to get crazy.\n\nIt is soon made quite clear that the "dog" is actually a shape-shifting alien organism, which manifests itself upon the physical form of its victims \x96 in other words, it begins to eat the Americans, and imitate them so well that the remaining humans cannot discern the difference between their friends and enemies\n\nThe pack of scientists, led by MacReady (Kurt Russell), begin to fight for their own survival, using wits instead of brawn. If the Thing is indeed amongst them, then how are they to go about revealing it? How many Things are there? How can the Thing be killed? (Or can it be destroyed at all?)\n\nThe creature\'s origins in the film are explained easily: Thirty thousand years ago a spacecraft plummeted to Earth, and was frozen in the Antarctic ice. The Thing tried to escape, and was discovered in the ice by the Norwegians, who unknowingly released it from its natural prison.\n\n"The Thing," the movie itself, is similar to Ridley Scott\'s iconic "Alien" (1979). Many comparisons have been made \x96 the protagonists are stranded in a desolate area, stalked by a seldom seen foe that manages to kill them off one-by-one. However, "The Thing" \x96 for all practical purposes \x96 came first.\n\nBased on the famous short story "Who Goes There?" by John W. Campbell, Jr. (writing under pseudonym as Don A. Stuart), the film was originally adapted as a feature production in 1951 by Howard Hawks and Christian Nyby. The result was "The Thing From Another World," an unarguable classic. But to be fair, it bore little resemblance to the short story, and Carpenter\'s remake does it more justice.\n\nThe idea of the Thing being able to adapt the physicality of anyone is what essentially makes this movie so great, and is the most vital link to the short story. In 1951 the special effects were simply too poor to reasonably portray the shape-shifting organism, but thirty-one years brought many advances in SFX.\n\nCreature effects artist Rob Bottin does an excellent job of turning what could have easily become a cheesy gore-fest into a startlingly frightening (and realistic) mess of blood and fear. The Thing, although never actually taking one specific form, is constantly seen in a morphing stage, and the effects are simply superb. They still pack a punch twenty-two years later.\n\nEnnio Morricone\'s score (nominated for a Razzie Award at the time) is a bit too electronic and tinny, but nevertheless haunting when used correctly.\n\n\nFrom the fact that its cast consists entirely of males, to the fact that its ending is one of the most thought-provoking and untypical conclusions of all time, "The Thing" \x96 by any standards \x96 is unconventional Hollywood at its best. It comes as no surprise that, at the time of its release, "The Thing" performed poorly in theaters, and "E.T." \x96 released the same year and featuring a much kinder alien \x96 became the higher-grossing picture of the two (by far).\n\nIn the long run, however, "The Thing" is superior in almost every conceivable way. Spielberg\'s tale is outdated and flopped during its 20th Anniversary Re-Release. "The Thing," on the other hand, has gradually climbed a ladder of cult classics \x96 it is one of the most famous non-famous movies ever made.\n\nCarpenter is notorious for having a very uneven career \x96 from his amazing "Assault on Precinct 13" (1976) to the magnificent "Halloween" (1978) to the disappointing and silly "Escape from L.A." (1996), "The Thing" remains his very best motion picture. Although its reputation over the years has never been honorary enough to land it a spot on most "great movies" lists, "The Thing" is still one of my favorite horror films, and \x96 upon close inspection \x96 masterfully crafted. It is a daring and ingenious thrill-ride that is simultaneously unique and chilling \x96 a genuine relief for film buffs who are tired of the same old horror knock-offs. This one, at the very least, is genuinely unpredictable.', u'0.142407', u"\nJust to put things in perspective for you before I get into my thoughts on this film, I am only 20 years old and have grown up in the era of CGI, blue screen effects...and this movie was made around the same time i was born.\n\nWith that said, WOW, I only recently saw John Carpenter's version of 'The Thing', and what a masterpiece it truly is. I have long since been a fan of John Carpenter, in particular his works from the late 70's and 80's. In 'The Thing' John Carpenter has truly crafted a paranoia inducing, perhaps gut wrenching classic.\n\nThe movie is an update of the classic 'The Thing From Outer Space', but only like it's predecessor, this film is in full color, and the characters of this film have much more to worry about than an alien veggie\n\nThe film centers around a group of Arctic Researchers you encounter an alien lifeform capable of taking the form of anything it comes into contact with, and out of for that matter. Kurt Russell stars as R.J. MacReady, an alcoholic Vietnam Vet, thrust into the role of leader of a group of relatively cold and callous men all of whom are readily plunging into manic paranoia and somewhat madness once they realize that they are up against a creature that can take any form, be any one of them.\n\nJohn Carpenter, more than in any other of his films, manages to create a truly believable and incredible atmosphere. When watching this film you truly get the sense of the dark,sinister, desolate surroundings, you feel and realize that these characters have no where to go...never for one second do you not believe they are stuck on a polar ice cap. Also, this film has perhaps one of the greatest endings to any film of it's genre, or any genre for that matter. I'm not going to give it away here, but to say that it will leave you wondering would be an understatement.\n\nKurt Russell is superb as MacReady....truly conveying the emotions of a man thrust into a situation of unimaginable horror, forced to lead a group of men who cannot trust that the man next to them is not the creature that has driven them to the brink of paranoia and emotional meltdown.\n\nI don't care if this movie is 20 years old by now, the special effects in this movie are gut wrenching, mind blowing, and absolutely awesome. They blow away any CGI pixel based crap out there today. The 'Thing' itself is a\ntruly horrifying and disturbing creation...unlike any alien you have ever seen in a movie before. Those who have a low tolerance for gore and blood had best prepare themselves for watching this movie.\n\nThis movie does what any good horror/sci fi movie should do, it really thrusts you into it's character's world. It leaves you wondering, what would you do, who could you trust if anyone you knew could be the creature waiting to feed on you, and take you over as well.  The images, and ideals of this movie stayed with me long after i first saw it, and today as i write this review send a chill up my spine.\n\nIt is a true shame this movie is only now getting the proper recognition it deserves. A box office flop when released, now more then ever when movies are paper thin with plot, and one dimensional in effects, this film can be appreciated as a true masterpiece of sci/fi and horror.\n\n\nIf possible, get the Collector's Edition DVD, and enjoy it in anamorphic widescreen..the way it is truly meant to be seen. Marvel at the incredible scenery, the taught direction, the excellent atmosphere, the sweat inducing, gag reflex activating, and everything else that makes this movie great.\n\n\nWatch it with the lights out, with a group of close friends...maybe even with a dog around...if you don't what i'm talking about...you will afterwards.\n\nDon't let a classic pass you bye\n\n", u'0.247025', u'\nI am ashamed to say it, but I have to admit, the first time I saw this film was only about a year ago.  After seeing it, I immediately rushed out and bought the DVD collectors\' edition and have watched it many times since.\n\nThe film is terrific on many levels.  It works as your straight monster or action type film, as a horror/sci-fi and also as a very intriguing look into the human psyche.  The incredible sense of paranoia, mistrust and fear, lent not only by Carpenter\'s direction (which is stunning) but also by the incredible acting of the cast in general.  Kurt Russell (obviously) is spectacularly understated in the lead role of MacReady, and, as a direct result he "feels" like a real person, rather than a hollywood "all american hero".  The other cast members all carry off their roles with style, and the net result is an intensely believable atmosphere, and a truly fantastic film.', u'0.441328', u"This is another one of those films that I remember staying up late to watch on TV, scaring the crap out of myself at the impressionable age of 12 or so and dooming myself thereafter to a life of horror movie obsession. This is a GREAT movie, and stands as living proof that there were indeed realistic effects before CGI.\n\nSet on an isolated base in Antarctica, this version seems almost to pick up where the original version (The Thing From Another World) left off. The American scientists discover a decimated Norwegian base some miles distant. Everyone is dead, and only the half charred remains of some unidentifiable thing left to smolder outside the compound might offer any answers to what may have happened. The Thing is brought back to the American base and, too late, the scientists realize that it is alive and lethal. The Thing thaws out and is off, not only killing anyone and anything that crosses Its path, but also absorbing them, making Itself into whoever and whatever it wants. The film then turns into a brilliant paranoia piece. Everyone is suspect, anyone can be The Thing, and no one trusts anyone anymore. Gone is the strength and security found when human beings band together in spite of their differences to battle a monster. The group splinters and fear rules supreme. Who is the Thing?\n\nThe gore effects here are absolutely amazing and messily realistic. I could have done without the dogs head splitting open like a banana peel, but that's just the animal lover in me being picky: kill all the humans you want, but leave the kitties and puppies alone. Sanity and reason disintegrate rapidly as, one by one, the humans are taken over by the shapeshifting alien. The power of this film lies in its paranoia, and although I liked the original version, I prefer this one; the real threat lies within, and is scarier for the fact that it cannot be seen or easily detected. When it is forced out of hiding, it's wrath is huge and the results are horrific.\n\nThis is one of Carpenters best films, right up there with The Fog and Halloween. All of the actors give strong, realistic performances and the special effects are so powerful that they stand as their own main character. This film has something for any lover of the horror genre. Don't miss it.", u'-0.0525727', u"\nJohn Carpenter's The Thing is hands down the best horror film ever made.  Not only that, but it is also on of my personal favorite films of all time.  What makes the movie so great?  It's hard to put my finger on it.  Everything just seems to work in The Thing, it's one of the rare occasions where everything just seems to fall in place.  The film is even superior to Alien in creating a type of moody atmospheric hell.  The fact that it's not only about the gore (which is wonderful btw), but it is able to create a paranoia that is unmatched in films.  A truly wonderful film that is worshiped by all horror buffs, and anyone who has good taste in films.\n", u'0.256854', u"Antarctica, winter 1982. The team on an American research base get surprised by a couple of mad Norwegians who is chasing a dog with a helicopter, trying to kill it. All the Norwegians are killed and the Americans are left with nothing, but a dog, a couple of bodies and questions. That's the beginning of the greatest horror/thriller film I've ever seen.\n\nFrom the very beginning all to the end you feel the tense, paranoid mood. Helpless and alone out in no-mans land. Ennio Morricone was nominated for a Razzie Award for his score. Why I don't know 'cause as far as I can see his score is simple, creepy and very good. It really gets you in the right mood.\n\nThe acting is great! The best performance is probably given by the dog who's just amazing. As for Russell and the others on two legs I can say nothing less.\n\nYou may think 1982 and special effects are not the most impressive? Well, think again! You haven't seen it all until you've seen this. Bodyparts falling off and creatures changing forms... Rob Bottin has done a great job witch today stands as a milestone is special effects makeup.\n\nThe movie didn't get a big response when it first hit the big screen due to other alien films at the time and so it's not very well known. In fact you can almost consider it an unknown movie. Nobody I've asked have heard of it. However the movie has managed to survive for over twenty years as a cult film on video and DVD. Twenty years is a long time and except for the haircut the movie is still pretty much up to date. This movie is to be considered a classic.\n\nThe movie is without doubt one of my, if not my favorite. I've seen it several times, but it's just as good as the first time I saw it. As a Norwegian the only thing I don't like about this movie is that MacReady keeps calling the Norwegians swedes!", u'0.21226', u'\nMany people has got a film they think of as their favourite movie. My movie will always be John Carpenter\'s The Thing! The main reason why this movie is a cult-film is perhaps the splatter-effects created mainly by genius Rob Bottin and that this is the movie that made Kurt Russell what he is today (along with Escape from N.Y.) In my opinion, this is not a great film because of the effects, it has to do with the story, the atmosphere, and of course, the acting. I have watched thousands and thousands of movies (3-6 every day the last 10 years), but none has had the impact on me as this one, not even the great "Das Boot".\n\nHere\'s my suggestion to you who likes sci-fi and horror movies: Place yourself in the good chair of your home. Be sure you\'re not interupted by anyone. If you aint got a projector, sit close to your TV and watch this miracle of a film. Let it absorbe you, and you\'ll see it my way!\n\nBest View Time: Late February between 5 and 9 in the evening.\n', u'0.408324', u'Remake of the classic 1951 "The Thing From Another World". 12 men are in a completely isolated station in Antartica. They are invaded by a thing from outer space--it devours and completely duplicates anything it chooses to. It starts off as a dog but gets loose--and has a chance to duplicate any of the men. Soon, nobody trusts anyone else--they\'re isolated--the radio is destroyed--their helicopter likewise. What are they going to do?\n\nThe 1951 film had the thing just be a big, super human monster. That movie was scary. This one is too--but the story is different (and based more closely on the source material--the novelette "Who Goes There?") and it\'s scary in a different way. The movie starts right off with Ennio Morricone\'s extremely eerie score setting just the right tone and--when the Thing gets attacked--the amount of gore is astounding. There\'s blood and body parts flying all over--arms are bitten off, heads detach and--in the strongest one--one man is devoured face first by the Thing. The gore effects are STRONG and real nightmare material. I don\'t scare easy but I had to sleep with the lights on when I saw this originally back in 1982. Rob Bottin\'s effects are just incredible--how this picture got by with an R rating is beyond me!\n\nIt also has a very creepy feel--gore aside, it is very suspenseful. You\'re not sure who is what and Carpenter\'s direction and the score really build up the tension. One complaint--no one is given any distinctive personality traits. They actors just remain straight-faced and say their lines. That\'s annoying...but the movie still works.\n\nThis was a critical and commercial disaster in 1982--it competed with "E.T." and MANY critics complained about the amount of gore and there being no female characters in the movie. It\'s now considered one of John Carpenter\'s best. A must-see...for strong stomaches. NOT a date film!\n\nAn amusing note: When this was released Universal sent a note along with all prints of the film. They suggested to theatre owners that they play the film in an auditorium near the rest rooms. They were afraid that people would be so sickened by the violence that they\'d have to be close to a facility to throw up!', u'0.0587462', u'John Carpenter shows how much he loves the 1951 original by giving it the utmost respect that he possibly could, the only difference here is that Carpenter chooses to stick to the paranoiac core of John W Campbell Jr\'s short story.\n\nThe secret to this version\'s success is the unbearable tension that builds up as the group of men become suspicious of each other, the strain of literally waiting to be taken over takes a fearful hold. Carpenter then manages to deliver the shocks as well as the mystery that\'s needed to keep the film heading in the right direction.\n\nBe it an horrific scene or a "what is in the shadow" sequence, the film is the perfect fusion of horror and sci-fi. The dialogue is laced with potency and viability for a group of men trying to keep it together under such duress, while Ennio Morricone\'s score is a wonderful eerie pulse beat that further racks up the sense of doom and paranoia seaming throughout the film.\n\nThe cast are superb, a solid assembly line of actors led by Carpenter favourite Kurt Russell, whilst the effects used around the characters get the right amount of impact needed. But most of all it\'s the ending that is the crowning glory, an ending that doesn\'t pander to the norm and is incredibly fitting for what has gone on before it. Lets wait and see what happens indeed. 10/10', u'0.361219', u'\nHitting the video store late on a Saturday when all of the current films  were unavailable, we ran across The Thing in the "classic" racks. I\'ve seen  this film at least twice before and truly enjoyed seeing it again. If it  lacks plot or character development, the premise is frightening enough to  make it an engrossing film. The gross-out special effects don\'t hurt  either. For me, The Thing ranks with Alien as one of the best scary films I \'ve seen.', u'0.218648', u'The silly saying, "You can\'t touch this" surely applies here. With all the clone horror and sci-fi films coming out, along with all the inferior remakes, it\'s hard to find anything worthy of 2 hours of your time. That\'s why I always rely on the classics that scared the weewee out of me when I was a pre-teen.\n\nTHE THING is, without an ounce of doubt in my mind, the goriest, ickiest, screechiest sci-fi horror classic that John Carpenter, or any other director (sorry, even you Mr. Spielberg) ever made. What really gives it power, though, is not the gore (it OOOOOZES of slime and blood and God knows what other fluids), but rather the sense of dread, isolation, and distrust it fosters in the characters and the viewer.\n\nYou can\'t get more remote than Antarctica, and in this howling, freezing white setting is where the story takes place. Several Americans, researchers and military men, are stationed there. One day, they witness a Siberian Husky dog running for dear life from gun-wielding Norwegians. Before they know it, the American outpost is battling a mysterious creature that can imitate any creature it wants. It may morph into disgusting slimy bloody shapes before it\'s finished, but once it\'s finished, if you didn\'t see it in progress, you can\'t tell it among humans or other normal Earth animals.\n\nKurt Russell, Keith David, Wilford Brimley, Richard Masur, Donald Moffatt, TK Carter, Thomas Waites and Charles Hallahan are just a few of the fine cast. This film is the reason why horror CAN be a great genre. It actually STILL scares me. The alien blood "jumping" out of the petri dish when the hot wire touches it still makes ME jump!!!\n\nStill the scariest of them all.', u'-0.252144', u'The Thing has to be one of the all time great movies. Of course it was ground breaking special effects at the time of it\'s release that impressed me so much, back in 1982 it just blew my mind, I\'d never seen anything like that! However, although the effects themselves made the movie more horrific, it was the story itself, the music score , the claustrophobic atmosphere of the Anarctic as well as the interaction and tension between the members of the doomed research station that makes it a classic. \n\nMovies don\'t get any better than this! In the opening scene with the the chopper chasing this husky you just assume that it was some bored scientists from some station letting of some steam. Yet when you see them continue their chase at the US base you then think that the Norwegians are suffering from some form of advanced or extreme strain of cabin fever. Yet this is offset by the menacing opening music score that sets the tempo! You just know that something is not right! At this point it\'s a mystery until \'the thing\' reveals itself. \n\nHowever, the mystery returns because it becomes a sort of Agatha Christie "who dunnit" ( i.e. ten little Indians movie) sci-fi style as the members don\'t know which one of their team is really an alien. Suspicion continues to go back and forward between them all as one by one they eventually get knocked off or revealed as the alien. The mistrust between the station crew is absorbing as the movie progresses until the final showdown.\n\nAfter 20 years of advances in computer graphics and film making production the special effects in "the Thing" don\'t carry the same weight as it did in 1982, but other than that it holds up very well all round with some great performances by the cast.', u'-0.166671', u"In 1982, two films were released within weeks of each other that were both about aliens. Steven Spielberg's ET, and John Carpenter's The Thing. Of the two of them, ET was the one that won the hearts of people the world over, even though The Thing debuted first. Because people were so entranced with Spielberg's warm, fuzzy feelgood alien fable, they stayed away from The Thing in droves.\n\nIts not hard to see why. The two are diametrically opposed. One is an optimistic tale designed to warm the cockles of the still-beating heart. The other is a harsh, uncompromising film that paints alien life as something purely determined to destroy us. I guess audiences felt ET was a much cuter prospect than The Thing's tentacles and slime coated saliva!\n\nIt's taken some time, but The Thing has gone on to win over a substantial cult audience. As it should. Because The Thing is that rare example of a superior remake. It takes all the best qualities of the 1951 classic, and reinvents them in startling and imaginative ways. Indeed Carpenter does his job so well he actually succeeds in making a film that is in every inch the equal of the genre's showrunner, Alien. And that's even rarer!\n\nCarpenter's film follows its source material more faithfully than The Thing From Another World did. It keeps the frigid wastes of Antarctica as a setting, because its the perfect backdrop when you're trying to establish a heightened sense of isolation. But although a bit thin on characterisation, the remake gets right inside the mindset of the actors, and amplifies the uncertainty and fear that slowly surrounds them.\n\nFrequent Carpenter collaborator Kurt Russell returns, hot off the success of Escape From New York, cast once again as one of Carpenter's perpetual anti-heroes. He plays MacReady, the helicopter pilot at an Antarctic research station (what they're researching is anyone's guess). The trouble begins when a Norwegian chopper from a nearby station flies over MacReady's, trying to gun down a Siberian Husky from the air.\n\nThey end up dying for their troubles, and while the camp tries to solve the mystery of what happened, they take in the Husky and add it to their own. Except that this Husky, is not a Husky at all. But a shape-changing alien. The Norwegians discovered it frozen in the ice, and when they thawed it out, it massacred their crew. Capable of absorbing its victims at will, it can duplicate a living being right down to the smallest detail. Soon paranoia and suspicion works its way through the 12-man crew, until no-one is certain who is human and who is not.\n\nThe Thing is one of John Carpenter's finest films. In fact I'm tempted to say its the best film he's ever made. Even surpassing classics like Halloween and Dark Star. The reason why I place The Thing at the top of Carpenter's list is that it feels like the last film of his that could truly be called a classic. All the others thereafter have felt like Carpenter was slumming it. Films that didn't flow with the cool sophistication and ragged intensity so prevalent in his earlier works.\n\nBut The Thing had John Carpenter at the peak of his powers. Never has he generated suspense to such an unbearable degree. Not even in the ferocious Assault on Precinct 13. From the second the alien makes its presence known, Carpenter ratchets up the tension level relentlessly. And when he delivers his punches, they come with an agonising jolt.\n\nThe film is a blend of pure atmospherics and visceral horror. An approach that can often seem at odds with one another, but in Carpenter's hands melds together beautifully. Bringing in Rob Bottin of The Howling fame, he lays to bear some of the most astonishing transformation effects you'll ever see in a horror film. Amorphous shapes. Half-formed human features starkly contrasted with gaping jaws, spider legs and fully flexible tentacles. Indeed the film's effects are so amazing and squirm-inducing, The Thing came under fire for being too realistic!\n\nThat type of thinking misses the point entirely. It only shortchanges the film's values. And there are many. Carpenter only stages an effects setpiece when he needs to. Its in the film's quieter moments where he seems especially attuned to the story. The Thing is an often bewildering tale of shadows, whispers and implications. Characterisation has never been one of John Carpenter's strong suits, but it works to his advantage in The Thing. Because we hardly know anything about the cast, it only makes the present situation that much more confusing. We're never certain, from one moment to the next who is who. And because of this, The Thing holds up very well and maintains its mystery on subsequent viewings.\n\nA special mention should go to the excellent film score from Ennio Morricone. A pulsing thud thud every two seconds. It creates an eerie, spooky feeling that is very hard to shake. The whole film is a wonderful exercise in paranoid manipulation. The scene where they blood-test each other to see who's human is wound up with such dexterity by Carpenter, you may find yourself biting your nails without even realising.\n\nThe Thing is a pure unadulterated classic. Even the ending leaves you with the vague suspicion that not everything is resolved. An underrated film, well worth the reappraisal it received. And so much better than ET!", u'0.134416', u"This is one of the classic Guy films. Horror sci fi as it was meant to be - a real story with good acting. Giving us something missing from almost all horror movies - depth and character. Providing a much needed respite from the cardboard cut outs pasted and slashed throughout, that have been filling the genre for decades. Which has given this style of movie-making it's well deserved reputation and status - of being both Invalid and Not Art. Though John Carpenter himself has been one of the staunchest purveyors of such ilk, it is my humble opinion that he did well with this one, and maybe two others.\n\nOne of the best uses of curious as a tool, it lures you in a bit unexpectedly with a somewhat whimsical, almost playful beginning. Rich in atmosphere, while stark in landscape - you find yourself as intrigued by the people as you are the monster. The remoteness of the region gives a true sense of the isolation of the real life McMurdo Sound Naval Station (as it was called when I was in the Navy) which is on the very southern tip of Ross Island in the Antarctic, and is the portal for all things going to the South Pole. I think now it's simply known as McMurdo Station, with the story taking place at a small satellite station outside (probably fictional), as McMurdo is mentioned in the film.\n\nKurt Russell who started acting as a kid when I was a kid has never taken Hollywood too seriously, which I've always thought was pretty cool. He's done his share of trash films over the years, but there's been a handful of roles that have more than demonstrated his caliber as one of our great actors. His version of Wyatt Earp is by far the most recognized and almost as good as George C. Scott's Patton. I said almost. He's the center of a strong cast of seasoned actors with many recognizable faces and solid performances. I watched it last night with a good friend who had never seen it, and it was just as good as when I first saw it in the theater - almost 30 yeeeaaars ago. Add it to your library, you'll watch it many times . .", u'0.308358'], u'tt0107207': [u"\nGerry Conlon is a small time Belfast thief who gets excluded from Northern Ireland by the IRA for anti-social behaviour and goes to live in England with his old school friend Paul Hill. They are in London when the mainland bombing campaign becomes more intense and they are both picked up for the bombing despite their claims of innocence. After more than week of beatings, abuse and threats, the two men break and sign confessions, longing for the beatings to stop and hoping the courts would see through the lies. However they are found guilty and, along with other relatives, sentenced to time ranging from 14 years to life. As time goes on Gerry and his father campaign for their case to be reopened until, eventually, the lawyer Gareth Pierce takes up the case.\n\nI came to this film having not seen it since its release in the early 90's, at which time I was still living in Northern Ireland in a mostly Protestant area. Given the subject matter the film was well received in this area. I decided to rewatch the film last night so that I could review it for this site and, since first seeing it, I have actually more of an insight on the subject matter since I had been held without charge under the same legislation that held the Guildford Four and had been taken to court twice before the charges were entirely dropped. I say this not as some claim to having a more valid opinion than anyone else but simply as a counter to those who will accuse me of being biased on the basis of being a Protestant.\n\nWhile I can see myself that the majority of reviews here for this film are slanted and full of political bias I will attempt to keep my review as free of this as I can (either one way or another).\n\nDespite the fact that the film leaves out glaring facts, none of these facts actually affect the film's main thrust \x96 that these men were (for this crime) unjustly accused, tried and convicted. The facts that are ignored are those which would have made the film a bit more complex (eg Hill's membership of the IRA) and I can understand why the makers decided to just make the subject as clean cut as they could and not present the audience with anything that may cause them to be in any doubt about what they are meant to be feeling. I can understand why they did it \x96 but that does not make it right and I would have welcomed a more complex film because those of us from Northern Ireland know that nothing is ever as simply as right/wrong, black/white \x96 but Hollywood is not there to inform but to entertain and hence the facts get lost on the road to a good film. And it is a good film.\n\nIt is frustrating that people take what it tells them as fact but this doesn't take away from the fact that this is a well made, engaging and quite moving film. Regardless of political beliefs, the idea of a justice system that would do this is interesting and worrying to me, and the film does a good job (albeit it overegged) of letting us see the extent that the police went to to get, if not 'their man', then at least 'a man'. The film does well to deliver characters (although simplified) that are easy to get behind and they helped me get involved in a story that was already pretty involving in its own right. The direction feels professional and injects enough emotion and sense of anger into the film to give it a solid sense of pace without it ever really tipping over into sentimentality or out and out preaching/ranting. Of course the material also helps from a great cast that deliver well and do their bit to keep it edgy and not sentimental.\n\nDay-Lewis is a very good actor and he does well here making his Gerry go through the stages of being a cheeky young man, frightened, shell-shocked, defeated, angry and then driven without us ever thinking he is a different character. If anything it is a shame that the film did paint his character so clean because I think Day-Lewis could have easily handled the moral complexities that would have come with that territory. Postlewaite is the real emotional heart of the film in many ways and he does very well with a role that could easily have been cloying and sentimental \x96 but Postlewaite plays it straight till the end. Thompson is all too simple and upright and her performance is little more than a cameo; this is made worse by the fact that the vast majority of English people are biased and corrupt according to the film \x96 again, like leaving facts out, just an attempt by the film to simplify things to make the audiences' emotions clearer and stronger.\n\nOverall I like this film but it is not a perfect piece of cinema nor should it be taken as the whole story. The film has dropped facts and directed its presentation to ensure that we, the audience, are in no doubt over what we should be feeling and thinking throughout. This does not change the message of the film or the injustice of the things that happened but it doesn't do justice to the always-complicated situation that is my country. The film as a film is very good \x96 well acted, well paced, well directed and engaging from the early realistic shots of Belfast in the 1970's through to the 'I'm going out the front door' finale that is no less impacting for us knowing it is coming.\n", u'-0.0342681', u"\n   Words cannot accurately describe how affecting this movie is.\n\n   The story itself is harrowing, but the way in which Day Lewis portrays Gerry Conlon is heartbreaking at times.  Several scenes in the film may be hard to take for those with a sensitive nature.\n\n   Captures the mood and the time perfectly for someone like me, who is not Irish, lives nowhere near Guildford and wasn't even alive at the time of the pub bombings.\n\n   I really wasn't expecting anything special when I sat down to watch this.  I could not have been more wrong.\n\n   The soundtrack is great without exception too!\n\n   A total and utter classic.\n\n", u'0.150016', u'A film fully deserving to be in IMDb\'s top 250, Jim Sheridan\'s "In The Name of the Father" is an excellent piece of work. Based on a true and very touching story, the film recounts the story of Gerry Conlon (Day-Lewis) who is wrongly accused as an IRA terrorist. Not only are the police bending the facts to prove their case, but in the process they also implicate members of his friends and family, including his father Giuseppe (Postlethwaithe) whose health condition is rather frail. Gerry is a rebellious and mildly delinquent boy who does not seem to have grown up, and his attitude toward his father is not the appropriate one; however, as they start to go through the ordeal together, Gerry gradually matures, and starts feeling a deep affection and respect for Giuseppe.\n\nThe story is heart-breaking and shocking at the same time, all the more so when one realizes that these things actually DID happen. Although there have been some minor modifications for the purpose of the film, the backbone of the story is left completely intact.\n\nThe two protagonists, Daniel Day-Liewis and Pete Postlethwaithe are delivering powerful performances, and they both deserved the Oscar hands-down. However, it would be unfair not to mention that virtually everyone in the film is great in his/her role.\n\nJim Sheridan\'s direction is also very good, giving the plot a fair and balanced perspective; although the film might initially appear as pro-Irish / anti-English, in fact I consider it as quite objective. Granted, it vividly shows that some key figures in the London police were profoundly biased and manipulated maliciously the case against the Conlons; yet, it also shows that English public attitudes turned highly supportive for the Conlons\' freedom when it started to become clear that they were not the culprits for the atrocities they had been charged with. We have always to remember that the film depicts a period of big tensions, with emotions running high to levels of hysteria, so we have to understand the events within this context.\n\nOf course, what happened to the Conlons is totally deplorable and unjustifiable; and it is real shame that the people who conspired against them have not been punished yet for their crimes. Still, one should understand the hostile attitude shown by those who were not part of this conspiracy (such as the judge, for example), who were influenced by the climate of terror and the outrage of the public. The Conlons had the terribly bad luck to be at the wrong place, in the wrong time, and with the wrong nationality; the also have the great misfortune to be captured by people who in their quest to show results were shamelessly willing to risk indicting people who could possibly be innocent.\n\n"In the Name of the Father" is a fantastic film, which one should not miss. 10/10.', u'0.0625958', u'\nWhat a clever film this was. Quite modest yet remarkably entertaining. Instead of blaring political bias, viewers are treated to a compassionate human drama without the preachings and irritating banter of most other "social dramas" (Dog Day Afternoon, All the President\'s Men, Norma Rae). It\'s shameful that this film didn\'t receive at least two academy awards, despite it having been nominated for 7. Now considering that this was the same year that Schindler\'s List and The Piano, two outstanding dramas, were released, it isnt surprising nor unreasonable that they beat In the Name of the Father for many of the awards.\n\nThe acting in this film is terrific. Lewis is low key and quite effective as the petty Irish thief Gerry Conlon. Pete Postlethwaite is spectacular as Gerry\'s father Guiseppe (certainly better than oscar winner tommy lee jones was in the fugitive). Emma Thompson\'s portrayal of attorney Gareth Pierce received much acclaim, and properly so. Beatie Edney, who had a small part as a wrongfully accused British teenage hippie, was so enamoring that its a\nwonder we don\'t see more of her.\n\nOf course much of this film is exagerrated and perhaps fabricated for the purposes of entertainment (as all movies which are "based on a true story" tend to be) but it\'s so finely done that it doesn\'t seem to matter. Some terrific scenes include the beginning, when Gerry and his friends are chased by British soldiers after being mistaken for IRA snipers, the trial in London, the prison scenes (which expose the loneliness and honesty of the characters rather than the crude violence and gang rapes of so many other pathetic prison movies), and of course the powerful ending, where the marvelous dramatic talents of all the actors are evinced in a final crescendo. Be sure to see this film if you haven\'t, it will definitely stir your emotions and renew your faith in the human spirit. And for those who eschew political films, give it a try anyways, the acting and craftiness outweigh the civic themes.\n\n\n', u'0.20389', u'\nLike MIDNIGHT EXPRESS , IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER is a an extremely well made film , but like MIDNIGHT EXPRESS much of it is total invention . Reviewers on this page have already pointed out the numerous errors such as Guiseppe and Gerry Conlon never being imprisoned in the same jail or the " Guilford four " and " Mcguire seven " trials taking place in completely seperate court cases but no one seems to have pointed out the erroneous backgrounds this film paints of Gerry Conlon and Paul Hill. In their book THE PROVISIONAL IRA authors Patrick Bishop and Eamon Mallie state the facts quite clearly that Paul Hill was a member of the Belfast brigade of the provisonal IRA ( And Hill later did confess to being a member ) while Conlon had been a member of Na Fianna Eireann which is the youth section of the provisionals though Conlon was quickly kicked out ( Literally ) due to his heavy drinking and drug taking . They didn`t meet on the ferry as shown in the film but Conlon bumped into Hill in Southampton where Hill was staying . What was Hill doing in Southampton ? He was on the run from the IRA who wanted to question him about guns going missing and about the possibility of Hill being an informer , something that is always punishable in IRA ranks with death and prior torture . When Conlon returned to Belfast in December 1974 he did drunkenly mention to IRA acquaintances in pubs that he`d met Hill in England and in order to punish Hill for his suspected crimes against the organisation and to take the heat off their own cells active in Britain at the time it was the IRA themselves who deliberately leaked the false information to the intelligence services about Conlon and Hill being involved in the Guilford bombings , not as the film shows a jealous boyfriend . Hill was also later found guilty of the murder of a former soldier though is never shown in the film and it`s this playing hard and loose with the facts that almost threatens to destroy the film . It could have been worse though , there might have been the suggestion that the bombing could have been a mass suicide \n\nWell that`s the bad points out of the way . What`s IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER`s good points ? Well Jim Sheridan directs with a real kinetic force especially the early scene where Conlon is pursued by the Brits against a voodoo chile soundscape . Sheridan also gets the very best out of his cast . Emma Thompson is good as the crusading lawyer , Pete Postlethwaite is very good as Guiseppe Conlon , but the outstanding performance is by Daniel Day Lewis as Gerry Conlon . Has anyone noticed the bitter Irony of a film about injustice features one of the greatest injustices commited by the Oscar board voters where they gave that year`s best actor Oscar to a very average performance by Tom Hanks ? No wonder more and more people view the Oscars as a popularity contest . And despite my above criticisms about the facts - or lack of them - IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER can in no way be described as a pro IRA film in the way that THE DEVIL`S OWN  or SOME MOTHER`S SON are   \n', u'-0.09262', u"\nNot only is this a remarkable, incredible, horrifying story of a man who becomes victim of the British' witch-hunt. It is so well told, so realistic, that the viewer gets involved in the Northern Ireland conflict. The acting is superior, the directing is great - a truly astonishing movie. 10/10", u'0.378902', u"Even though this movie seems a bit too black and white from time to time I must say that it still is an impressive piece of cinema. Too black and white because I sometimes had the feeling that they had left out some parts to make it all a lot easier for the viewer. I can't help believing that Conlon and Hill weren't the nicest guys either, but the movie shows them almost as saints (except for the fact that they steal some lead from the roofs, they never really do anything wrong). Does that mean that this movie isn't any good? Certainly not! It still remains very impressive and the idea that injustice in the name of protecting the country should be allowed is awful and so it is good that at least some movie makers aren't afraid to protest against it.\n\nThe movie tells the story about Gerry Conlon and his old school friend Paul Hill. They both are small time criminals and because of their own safety they have to live in London for a while. Otherwise they might get shot by the IRA. In London they stay in a community of hippies, but aren't welcomed by everybody. As a bomb explodes in a pub, one of the members from the community goes to the police and accuses them of the crime. They are immediately apprehended, together with Conlon's father, his aunt and her family. What follows is a process full of corruption and false accusations, putting them in jail for many years even though they haven't done anything wrong.\n\nThe film is very good. It's well acted, well paced and well directed. The story is touching and I never got bored when watching it. Therefor I give it an 8/10.", u'-0.0603371', u"\nName of the Father came out one year before The Shawshank Redemption and is bar none the better film.   Shawshank is a great film but Name of the Father has more of human story to it.   Daniel Day Lewis is a great actor with more potential now than he did when he won his first Oscar for My Left Foot and since then he has never starred in a film which he has acted badly in.  Some of the stories have not been amazing but his acting makes up for it.   This was the second time That Daniel Day Lewis and Jim Sheridan have come together to make a film. In all they have done three but Name of the father is by far the best.   Pete Postlethwaite is another example of fine acting as he is the best actor in England since who ever was the last greatest actor.\n\nDaniel Day Lewis plays Gerry Conlon who is a seventies hippie who doesn't want to grow up.   He has had so many troubles at home his father\n\nGiuseppe  played by Postlethwaite decides to pack him off to London for his own safety and not become a lost soul amongst the troubles in Belfast. But when Gerry gets there he might as well wish he never went there in the first place as the trouble from Belfast follows him and before you know it a bomb goes off in a pub near to where he is staying and is not long arrested for the bomb along with his friends and family including his father.\n\nFrom there we are taken into this grieving story of strength, hope, tragedy and family. The story between father and son in jail is more touching and compelling than any love story you will ever see because these two men who have never really seen eye to eye are forced to confront each other's feeling and face up to where they stand in the world.   Also Pete Postlewaite reminds me of my own father and my grandfather and yours two.  He plays Giuseppe so well so would have thought he was the old guy living next door to you or the man you look up to as a father and spend time with as a granddad.   What you have to remind yourself is that the movie is a true story of the Guilford Bombing and the men who paid the price for it.  Whether or not you believe Gerry and Giuseppe were guilty of the Guilford Bomb is not the case in the film as it's more about the characters and there trials and tribulations.\n\nOne film that will always be remembered in my mind about making a difference with your life not matter where you are in the world.\n", u'0.15392', u'The movie is based on a true story. Belfast guy Gerry Conlon is suspected of being one of the IRA terrorists responsible for a bomb in Guilford, London, in 1974, which killed several people. He spends 15 years in jail, fighting for his innocence and for truth.\n\nAfter working with Daniel Day Lewis in "My left foot", director Jim Sheridan teams again with the actor for this drama. The strong cast is completed by Emma Thomson and Pete Postlewaite. The result is a brilliant, passionate feature which tells about injustice. It\'s a disquieting film.\n\nThis is doubtless the most achieved collaboration between the director and the main star. The other pictures as well are very good, but here we have a film of accusation -the story is more involving. Day Lewis performance in "My left foot" was awarded with an Oscar, but the actor could have been given the same prize for his play of Gerry Conlon.\n\nStrong screenplay, actors and soundtrack -with music of Gavin Friday and Maurice Seezer and songs of Irish stars Bono and Sinead O\'Connor.', u'0.368434', u"Jim Sheridan's astonishingly fantastic 'In the Name of the Father' tells the brutally direct story of a wrongfully accused family who are tortured into making a false confession and imprisoned by the British justice system. Sheridan has a way of telling his stories where he gets straight to the point and does not fear to show the reality of the situation while keeping us viewers at the edge of our seats. The film is based on Gerry Conlan's autobiography where Daniel Day-Lewis plays the central character. Sheridan effectively portrays Gerry and Giuseppe's struggle and fight against injustice and his portrayal of the corrupt British justice system is frightening. Just the idea that people could get away with such things in a country like the UK is chilling and Sheridan skillfully brings that across on screen. Terry George's brilliant screenplay with rich characters and solid dialogues forms a good backbone for the film. I also liked how the humour was infused in a modest dose as not to interfere with the intensity of the story. There are some excellent performances. Daniel Day-Lewis delivers a suitably explosive performance as he breathes fire into the role while Pete Postlethwaite is sublime and equally outstanding as Gerry's father, Giuseppe. Though father and son do have issues to fight over, it is Giuseppe who is Gerry's conscience and Postlethwaite's heartbreaking act really touches the heart. Emma Thompson holds her own and she is simply excellent. The rest of the cast do a superb job (watch out for Tom Wilkinson in a bit role). The soundtrack fits the mood of the film and the cinematography is good, especially in the prison sequences, where it creates that feeling of claustrophobia which gets stronger after Gerry is alone in his cell. I have liked all of Sheridan's ' films that I have seen so far and 'In The Name Of The Father' is another remarkable film from this fine director. It is a difficult movie to watch due to some disturbing themes and scenes (though most of them are rather suggestive it is the idea behind that sends chills down the spine) but it is definitely worth watching.", u'0.823866', u'Although considerable liberties have been taken with historical facts, this film is based upon true events. In 1974 an IRA bomb in a pub in Guildford, England, killed several people. Four young Irish people ("the Guildford Four") were convicted and sentenced to life imprisonment. Several others ("the Maguire Seven") were convicted of assisting them and sentenced to lengthy prison terms. All were innocent of this crime, and were later exonerated and released from prison when fresh evidence was discovered, particularly evidence that their confessions had been obtained under duress.\n\nAlthough all the main characters are Catholics, some devout, some only nominally so, the title does not have any real religious significance. Rather, it alludes to the film\'s central relationship, that between Gerry Conlon, one of the "Four" and his father Giuseppe, one of the "Seven". The two are very different. Gerry is a wild and rebellious young man, unemployed, a petty criminal and a drug-user. He wears his hair long, something fashionable in the early seventies but often regarded by the older generation as the sign of a hooligan. Giuseppe, by contrast, is a conservative figure; deeply religious, hard-working, law-abiding and honest.\n\nA key moment comes when Gerry recalls a football match in which he played as a boy. His team won, but instead of congratulating him on his victory, Giuseppe reproached his son for a foul committed during the match. This encapsulates the difference in their characters. For Gerry, winning and success are all that matters. Because he has achieved little success, he has no faith in himself and has always drifted through life. For Giuseppe, adherence to moral values is more important than achieving outward success, and it is these values which enable him to retain his self-respect. Because of these differences in character and outlook, the two men\'s relationship is a difficult one. Beneath their differences, however, they also have a deep love for one another; Gerry is persuaded to confess to the bombing, after the police have failed to obtain a confession through bullying and violence, by the threat that his father will be killed if he does not. Later, Gerry\'s love for his father is strengthened by the realisation that although the older man is physically frail, his religious faith and self-belief enable him to cope with the injustice of his plight.\n\nDaniel Day-Lewis has been much praised for his performance as Gerry, and he was certainly good, if at times too showy. For me, however, the real star was Pete Postlethwaite as the long-suffering but dignified Giuseppe. The strongest scenes were those between Gerry and Giuseppe; the weakest were those when Gerry, in prison, befriends Joe McAndrew, an IRA man who claims actually to have planted the Guildford bomb. McAndrew is an invented character, and psychologically this did not seem likely; Gerry was, after all, as much a victim of the bomb as those killed and injured by it. Had there been no bomb, there could have been no conviction, wrongful or otherwise, for planting it. Moreover, by associating himself with the IRA\'s cause, even temporarily, Gerry, although legally innocent, makes himself seem morally guilty.\n\nThere were other things that did not ring true. I was unsure why Giuseppe\'s lawyer thought that Inspector Dixon, the policeman who originally investigated the crime, would be responsible for deciding whether her ailing client should receive compassionate parole, or why so much attention was paid to Gerry\'s alibi that he was in London on the night of the bombing. As the bomb would have had a delayed-action timer, he could easily have returned before it exploded; the "Horse and Groom" pub (I used to live in Guildford) is only a short walk from the station, about half an hour by train from London. (The brutal and corrupt Dixon is another invented character; the name may refer ironically to the popular British TV show, "Dixon of Dock Green", which featured an honest and decent "bobby" named Dixon).\n\nIt surprises me that some have criticised the film as being "pro-IRA". If one were setting out to make a pro-IRA propaganda film, one would not make it about the Guildford bombing, an event in which the IRA cold-bloodedly murdered several innocent civilians without warning. Nor does the film ignore the IRA\'s violence towards the Irish Catholic community it supposedly represents. At the time of the Guildford bombing, Gerry is living in London, having been forced to flee Northern Ireland by IRA threats; like most terrorist organisations it has a sternly moralistic attitude to all crimes other than those committed by its own members and punishes with mediaeval severity those who, like Gerry, are guilty of petty larcenies. The fact that the "Four" and the "Seven" were undoubtedly treated unjustly by the British authorities does not retrospectively justify the IRA\'s crimes of which they were wrongly accused.\n\nThe film does not attempt to be a comprehensive statement about the Northern Ireland situation- the Unionist community, for example, is not even mentioned. Indeed, given the complexities of that situation, and the even greater complexities of Irish history from which it springs, it would not be possible to make such a statement in a film. Nevertheless, "In the Name of the Father" is a very good film, both as a study of father-son relationships and as a warning of the possibilities for injustice inherent in any criminal justice system. 7/10 A goof. In the early scenes, set in 1974, Gerry, while driving along London\'s Lower Thames Street passes a set of orange and white barriers designed to stop vehicles from entering "The City" (London\'s central financial district). These barriers did not exist in 1974; they were erected following a later IRA bombing campaign', u'-0.224736', u"In watching this fine film, on idea kept running though my mind. That being terrorism often hurts the innocent much more than the declared enemy. In the Name of the Father is a powerful, well-acted drama about terrorism and injustice. And also the love one man feels for his father. Some of the events in this film are factual, and others are not. Despite some liberties taken with history, the film still makes a strong point, however.\n\nDaniel Day-Lewis plays Gerry Conlon, a young man falsely accused along with several other friends and family members, of bombing a London pub in 1974. The bombing, performed by the IRA, killed a few persons and wounded several others. Conlon and his friends just happen to be near by when the bombing takes place. Through police torture, Conlon and his best friend confess to the crime, thinking a trial will exonerate them. Trouble is, there had been so many recent bombings that the legal system in Britain was just crying out for a scapegoat. Conlon and four friends are given life sentences. Several members of Conlon's family are also given stiff jail sentences. Even his own father who seems to be the most righteous and kind person imaginable and who never set foot in England at all during the time of the bombing!\n\nThe film starts out like a shot from a cannon, as we see just how violent and chaotic Blefast was during the early seventies. Just living a normal life looked impossible. If the British troops weren't after you, then the IRA members were. The film also scores when we see Conlon head off to London to presumably make a better life for himself. He and a friend force themselves into a commune and enjoy a brief period of free love and decadence. The film gets very heavy once Conlon is arrested and tortured. And the last hour detailing his time behind bars is just plain somber. We watch his father just sort of waste away with him behind bars while an aggressive lawyer (Emma Thompson) fights to get them out. Pete Postletwaite is exceptional as Gerry's father, and seeing him grow sicker and weak is very difficult for the viewer. \n\nThe film tries to shift gears down the stretch and show how Conlon has become determined and more radicalized, but these scenes are nothing spectacular. Even the conclusion seems a little anti-climatic, but at least we see some justice finally get done. The acting is very, very good. Lewis is as good as ever, and nobody looks out of their league. There are some historical liberties taken. Gerry and his father never actually lived in the same cell, for instance. Overall, this film will stick with you, though.\n\nIn watching this film, one cannot help but feel for the victims of terrorism. I have personally not much knowledge of the conflict between the IRA and Britain, except to say that I'm well aware of how long and deep the scars run between the English and Irish peoples. That said, there is simply no excuse for terrorism. Look at how many victims that pub bombing created. Not only those who perished or were injured. That act of terror sent several innocent people to jail and ruined their lives! The British legal system is certainly to blame for sending the wrong people to jail, but would this have even happened if the IRA had not bombed that pub? A similar situation can be seen in the Middle East today. Radical Muslims look to strike out at Western interests, but their actions often hurt scores more other Muslims than any actual Western interests! Will we ever all learn to get along on this planet?\n\n8 of 10 stars.\n\nThe Hound.", u'-0.360735', u"'In the Name of the Father' is a compelling portrayal of the harrowing ordeal faced by Gerry Conlon, his family and friends, who were wrongfully imprisoned for the Guildford Pub bombing in the 1970s. \n\nThe film is skilfully manipulated to show a myriad of contrasts and juxtapositions, such as when Gerry is being tortured and interrogated in his cell, the police in the hallway are unconcerned as they celebrate someone's birthday with a cake.\n\nThe framing of shots and camera angles used emphasise the helplessness Gerry and the others experience. There is also a particularly moving scene in which prisoners show their respect when Gerry's father dies by dropping flaming material from their windows, like a waterfall of burning tears.\n\nThe soundtrack uses music which is carefree or haunting in all the right places, perfectly mirroring the scenes and adding to the mood of the film. \n\nThe themes of injustice and corruption are heightened through irony in the dialogue, and are representative of the problems faced by Irish Catholics in the 1970s and beyond.\n\n'In the Name of the Father' is a beautifully constructed film which is a credit to the actors, direction and production crew.\n\nI challenge you not to be moved by this film.", u'0.651771', u'\nI do not see this film as being political nonsense at all.Rather it serves as a warning of what can happen when blanket stereotyping is allowed to influence the course of justice.As Gareth Peirce (impressively portrayed by the excellent Emma Thompson) points out, the only reason Giueseppe Conlon and Co were tried in the first place was on the shaky premise that "they were bloody well Irish". As Irish people living in England in the 1970s, they must therefore have been terrorists.Logical?I thought not.The authorities never thought for a second that they might actually have been trying to escape that nonsense through carving out a new life for themselves in England.With a British public baying for blood, the police capitulated by picking up the first "paddies" they found and making an example of them, without making any serious efforts to root out the real perpetrators and ensuring they were rendered incapable of causing more harm through doling out lengthy imprisonments to them, as opposed to ruining the lives of an innocent family.Ironically of course such actions could well have served to make terrorist sympathisers out of the Conlons through the horrific treatment meted out to them!It didn\'t of course but there is always the danger in that type of case that a person could become embittered to that extent.\n\nObviously given the unstable climate of the time Irish people in England were sometimes regarded with suspicion,yet the fact remains that the events portrayed in the film were unacceptable in a supposed western democracy committed to the rule of law.While neither side was entirely innocent the fact remains that England was undeniably culpable in this instance, and the judiciary involved in the case must bear full responsibilty for the devestating effects of their knee-jerk ruling, given to appease an irrational and hysterical public.\n\nIn this respect the Conlons and Co can viably be seen by some as "Irish martyrs". While I am no fan of Hollywood fare which seeks to glamourise Irish terrorists at the expense of England who is invariably portrayed as the cold and unrelenting oppressor (inaccurate and unfair in the present day I feel) I strongly believe that in this case the criticism and negative portrayal of the English legal system is justified to a considerable extent.The film has especial resonance and significance for us today in the wake of al-Quaeda and the resultant perceptions of Muslims as a whole as being "the enemy" in certain quarters.The recent incarceration of an innocent Syrian who had lived his entire adult life in Canada, and who was imprisoned purely on the basis of his ethnicity, only serves to remind us of the perils of "judging a book by its cover" and making snap judgements, a danger which is admirably illustrated in this well-acted film.', u'-0.411009', u'\nBefore seeing this movie I thought it was more about the crimes committed by IRA during the "hot" period, a sort of documentary. IRA plays indeed an important rule in the events, but the main thing is that this movie is the true story of a family that has been destroyed by the madness of the time, by the need of a scapegoat to pay for all the crimes that were committed. Very well directed. A very famous prison in Dublin, that had an important rules during the independence from England, has been chosen as setting. Watch it, you will be satisfied!\n', u'0.0649763'], u'tt0046268': [u'This is an extraordinary movie. From the opening scene showing the squalor of a Latin American town with filth and vultures in the street and naked children begging for food amid the oppressive, fly-stirred heat, to the finale on a winding mountain road, it is just plain fascinating. True, some of the action does not bear close scrutiny. One does not siphon nitroclycerine nor does one avoid potholes or bumps in the road by driving at forty miles per hour. No matter. Let\'s allow a little license. And the title doesn\'t entirely make sense because the wages of sin are death, but the wages of those who followed their fear and did not seek to drive a nitroclycerine truck over 300 miles of bad road are life. Again, no matter.\n\nThis is such an original movie, every scene like little or nothing you\'ve ever seen before (and for sure will never see again), that the little inconsistencies and some stretching of what is possible are not important. This is man against nature, man against himself reduced to a simple task. It is life in the raw. One mistake and you are dead.\n\nYves Montand has the lead as Mario, a Frenchman stranded in this god-forsaken town with only one way out: get enough money to pay for airfare. Charles Vanel is the older, tin-horn dandy who ends up with a case of the shakes. Peter Van Eyck is the man with the nerves of steel who finds this little adventure a piece of cake after forced labor in the salt mines for the Nazis. And Folco Lulli is Luigi, the happy, singing baker who hopes to return to Italy with the two thousand dollars they are paying him to drive the nitro-loaded truck.\n\nThis is a film depicting the primitive nature of a macho mentality. There\'s a lot of posturing. Every event is a potential test of manhood. Status and privilege are flouted. The weak and the poor do not inherit the earth.\n\nHenri-Georges Clouzet directs and somehow manages to come up with a work of genius. One wonders how. The story, on the face of it, would seem to belong in the slush pile of a ten-cent pulp fiction mag from the 1930\'s. The acting is good, very good in places, but not great. The cinematography is straightforward, but nonetheless very effective. It is lean and focused always, showing us what needs to be seen without drawing attention to itself: the invisible style, which is the best. Clouzet\'s direction is characterized by a vivid depiction of things that we can feel: the mud and filth in the streets, the desperation and the boredom, the cruelty and meanness of men, the oil on their bodies, the singular fact of a ton of nitro in the back seat so that every move is a neuron-exposing adventure. I think that the visceral experience from beginning to end and the fine pacing are the essence of what makes this a great film.\n\nClouzet\'s wife, Vera Clouzet, plays Linda who first appears scrubbing the floor in an open-air bistro. She is rather extraordinary herself, finely made up and creamy white like a star of the silent film era. She grovels a lot, especially for Mario. She provides the counter-point, the contrast for the testosterone action of the movie.\n\nNo student of film should miss this. It would be like missing Citizen Kane or Dr. Strangelove or especially The Treasure of the Sierra Madre, which it vaguely and strangely resembles. "La salaire de la peur" is, regardless of its flaws, one of the best ever made.\n\n(Note: Over 500 of my movie reviews are now available in my book "Cut to the Chaise Lounge or I Can\'t Believe I Swallowed the Remote!" Get it at Amazon!)', u'-0.0675172', u'This movie is astonishing, a gritty story filmed in an ultra-real style that relies simply on the beauty of lighting and film to achieve its stunning effects. It seems from another world, which in a way, it is. The acting is superb: Montand\'s Mario is full of jerky movements and intense impulses but always maintains his Gallic savoir-faire, while Charles Vanel as Jo brings, at first at least, a type of macho to the screen that modern movie-makers simply do not comprehend. The rest of the cast, especially the camp chief, Luigi, and Peter van Eyck as Bimba are incredible, as is Vera Clouzot who is incomprehensibly but believably upbeat and innocent - and totally gorgeous - in the midst of the hellhole of a town they\'re all stuck in. Clouzot\'s directing is flawless - I don\'t think anyone has ever squeezed more tension with just a few essential scene elements. The trucks wheeze and grunt as well as they ever have in the movies - the only comparison is Spielberg\'s early gem, "The Duel", but Clouzot\'s automotive cinematics outdo even Spielberg. The stripped down existentialism of the characters, the starkness of their shared dilemma, the grim and grimy scenery, and the cinematography itself are all of a piece. The latter is what elevates this movie to the very top rank, including some of the most dramatic and effective black and white shooting I\'ve ever seen. Yet it never becomes mannered or gratuitous - it is orchestrated with the rise - and rise! - of tension in the film. The final scene takes on a surreal as opposed to ultra-realistic quality that has its own logic. One last word about the acting - we don\'t see anything like it anymore. The self-conscious mannerism of method acting (which has had its own triumphs) and the toxic awareness of everyone from the actors to the audience, the camera, directors, etc. that each actor is a celebrity and potential artiste, has ruined that conviction that actors were once larger than life people before they went on-screen, that they came to acting as an outcome of living rough, unadorned, and yet imaginative lives as opposed to shooting for fame and fortune and celebrity within an artificial corporate star-making incubator.', u'0.213434', u'This movie is a true masterpiece in every way! When I rented the DVD and read the story it sounded familiar, because I had watched the newer version before in color with Roy Scheider, which was good as well. But watching the original film truly blew me away. This movie is well made in every detail. It puts a lot of detail-work in the creation of the characters, and once you think that is over and the "regular action-part" starts, it becomes even better and the story takes a 90 degree turn! After I had finished watching the entire movie, I needed at least 5 minutes just to "digest" it and rethink this fantastic film. If you got a chance to watch it, don\'t miss it! It is entertaining from the first to the last minute!', u'0.691051', u'\nA completely novel plot.  Happened upon this on late night TV  about 10 years ago.  Thought I had seen all the best of the  classics and then this came on.  "Where have you been all my  life?" was the overwhelming question.  What an incredibly  beautiful and stark movie at the same time.  Absolutely  unprecedented.  Everything about it--especially the cinematography (check out the scene with the turnabout for the  trucks) is superior.  If you care about plot, allegory,  intelligent directing and acting, this is one which is second to  none.  Nitroglycerine being transported across the Venezuelan  countryside. . .who comes up with this stuff?  The remake  (Sorcerer) is decent, but doesn\'t even come close.  Outstanding  flick.  ', u'0.120079', u"Georges Arnaud's novel LE SALAIRE DE LA PEUR has been filmed twice, by Henri-Georges Clouzot as THE WAGES OF FEAR (1953) and by William Friedkin as SORCERER (1977). While both films are worth seeing, the earlier version is the one regarded as a classic, and rightly so. Although SORCERER goes into more detail about the political climate and the various misdeeds that led the four desperate protagonists to the South American hellhole where they accept high-paying but life-risking jobs driving nitroglycerin through treacherous terrain, WAGES... distinguishes the men's personalities better, giving the audience more rooting interest in them. Both films have excellent casts, with charismatic leads in Yves Montand (WAGES...) and Roy Scheider (SORCERER), plus WAGES... also provides feminine charm in the form of beguiling Vera Clouzot as the caf\xe9 waitress who loves Montand. Both films have tense action sequences as well, but somehow for all the staging and skillful editing, SORCERER's action scenes seem strangely slow, slogging along in the mud just like the protagonists in their less-than-state-of-the-art trucks. Both versions have enough good things in them to be worth a look, but if you only have the time and resources to check out one of them, it's WAGES... that really pays off!", u'0.894402', u'\nWhoever it may be to rightly claim that he invented the action thriller genre (M\xe9li\xe8s, I suppose), Henri-Georges Clouzot\'s "Le salaire de la peur" is an indispensable milestone on the exciting route to the best films of that kind in the 70\'s, 80\'s and nowadays. In its tenseness, as symbolized by the danger of explosion of the lorries\' loads, it has hardly been surpassed.\n\nThe plot is perfectly worked out from start to end, the leading players act in some of their best parts ever, the (almost) absence of music supports the brutal realism and the consequent choice of authentic outdoor settings contributed a lot to the film\'s deserved success. Historically, it ranges between neorealismo and nouvelle vague, and yet it is its pure action and suspense that make it worth watching for younger audiences who wouldn\'t go in for just the artistic way. - Only flaw I can see is the curious, rather artificial change in Vanel\'s character which has no comprehensible motivation, at least for me whenever I see it.\n\nApart from that, Clouzot\'s wife V\xe9ra (also well-known from his "Les diaboliques") plays to the "most breathtaking angles" gallery when she bows down to scrub the floor of Dario Moreno\'s gin joint. It\'s a man\'s world after all and there are male perspectives on human survival only. Well, it\'s existentialism, mates. Altogether, the black and white photography is gripping. The gun scene between Lulli and Vanel is one of the best montages in film history, and there is more excellent editing in "Salaire" (including the finale) that completely fits the hot atmosphere.', u'0.414634', u'\nThis is richer, tenser, more atmospheric, and in all ways a better film than Clouzot\'s next one, "Les Diabolique" - which is saying a lot.  I\'ve never understood why Clouzot isn\'t more highly regarded.  Indeed, for a long time I simply couldn\'t believe that he wasn\'t.\n\nOne charge that hangs over his head is misogyny.  With regards to "Les Diabolique" this is simply ridiculous; with regards to "The Wages of Fear", I can see how one could harbour the uncomfortable feeling that there is, perhaps, something in it.  But what, really, does the evidence amount to?  The fact that one of the heroes is inexcusably cruel to his girlfriend?  It\'s not as if the film endorses this, or invites us to take pleasure in it, or even, for that matter, allows us to.  The characters are all flawed, and the film doesn\'t seek to deny it.  It does, however, make an attempt to explain it.  That town in the middle of nowhere is, we feel, really in the MIDDLE of nowhere; it must be the dustiest and most demoralising place on Earth.  After a while we feel as if we could start kicking someone, just to break the monotony.\n\nThere\'s no doubt that the initial monotony gives the rest of the film half its strength.  William Wyler once said that if you want to surprise or shock an audience the best thing you can do is bore them half to death beforehand - and although I can think of absolutely no reason why this should be so, allowing for a little exaggeration, it\'s true.  The seemingly aimless opening sequences help make every single frame, from the moment the nitro-glycerin is mentioned, electric.\n\nSo much is, in retrospect, amazing.  There\'s the way Clouzot manages to show us the humanity in these seemingly squalid people.  (Even the oil magnate, just when we think he\'s the world\'s most heartless capitalist, reveals he has a heart with an unexpected remark, and yet the remark doesn\'t feel at all out of character - it\'s the kind of masterful characterisation film-goers live for.)  Then there\'s the obstacles these drivers must face.  All are memorable; most are so perfectly realised they deserve to be called mythic.', u'-0.169967', u'"The Wages of Fear" was awarded by unanimous verdict the Grand Prix at 1953 Cannes Film Festival where it won over 27 films, some of which were made by Jacques Tati, Alfred Hitchcock, and Luis Bu\xf1uel. Cluozot\'s own screenplay (based a novel by George Arnaud) focuses on four down-and-out European adventurers (Yves Montand, Folco Lulli, Peter Van Eyck, Charles Vanel) who stuck nearly penniless in a festering town in an unnamed South American country. An oil company need a load of highly dangerous and explosive nitroglycerin to be delivered to a remote well fire 300 miles away burning out of control. The route is through jungles and over crude and treacherous mountains and those men are desperate enough to take the chance. None of these men is heroic or generous, they are in for the money. The four were chosen by the managers of oil company because "if something happens to them, no one would care, they have nobody to worry about them". Henri-Georges Clouzot\'s view on humanity is not particularly optimistic but he finds a way to make a viewer care about disenchanted but desperate characters. Thanks to Clouzot\'s ability to create not only a gripping action film but a powerful study of failure, the four men will stay for long time in our memory.', u'-0.133876', u'In Clouzot, relationships are arenas of conflict: violent, callous, and often destined to sink into a whirlpool of deceit and destructive cruelty\x85 \n\nClouzot forms with "The Wages of Fear" two teams of four desperate European expatriates who agree to drive two trucks of nitroglycerine across miles of rocky mountain matched with craters to a site of an oil refinery fire so that the oil company can then blow the pipeline and put out the blaze... \n\nThe audaciously slow, atmospheric opening establishes both characters and the malignant influence of US oil interests in a dusty South American village, before the odyssey begins\x85 The tension never stumbles: friendship falls prey to financial greed, honor to a sweaty fear of sudden death\x85', u'-0.773294', u"\nClouzot rarely gets the attention he deserves. He made not one, but two of the greatest thrillers of all time, 'Les Diaboliques' and 'The Wages Of Fear', both perfect examples of how to make genuinely suspenseful movies that build up an amazing amount of tension.  Most so-called thrillers made in Hollywood these days are thrillers in name only and could learn a lesson or two from these movie classics. 'The Wages Of Fear' could even be described as an action movie, but it is a CHARACTER DRIVEN action movie, and that's what makes it so special. Modern audiences with MTV attention spans might find the plot a little slow, but I think the first half of the movie, which deals with the motley collection of exiles in a poor Latin American town, is not only fascinating in itself, but really makes a massive impact on the second half. By taking his time introducing the characters and exploring their relationships and possible motivations, Clouzet adds depth and meaning to the rest of the exciting story, something very rarely achieved in this type of movie since. The cast, every single one of them, are flawless. The four leads, Mario, the fairly decent guy played by yves Montand, his new best friend the shifty M. Jo (Charles Vanel), his old pal the kind hearted Luigi (Folco Lulli), and the enigmatic Bimba (Peter van Eyck), are all brilliant. Great performances, taut and imaginative direction, crisp and impressive cinematography, and a handful of the most riveting sequences ever committed to film make 'Wages Of Fear' a truly unforgettable experience. Suspense movies don't come much better than this! Simply a masterpiece.", u'0.450469', u'\nIn the opening scene of Wages of Fear (1953), director Georges Henri-Clouzot provides  an inkling of the kind of claustrophobic ride we are in for. In a steamy, impoverished Latin American town called Las Piedras, insects grope clumsily in the dust, struggling to escape the strings that children have tied to them. People from all over the world congregate in the streets and bars and the air is thick with choking dust. Clouzot makes clear the desperation of the residents, "It\'s like prison," explains one of them. "Easy to get in, but escape is impossible." The Southern Oil Company (SOC - same initials as Standard Oil) runs the town and enjoys its profits while the villagers are compelled to work odd jobs just to stay alive. After a fire breaks out at one of the oil fields killing many workers, the anti-union American boss seeks experienced drivers from among the townspeople to put out the fire. It is here that the anti-American flavor runs thick and where much of this part of the film was originally excised for American audiences (but has since been restored). \n\nFour men, desperate to escape their trap, agree to drive a truck loaded with nitroglycerine 300 miles over treacherous mountain roads in the hot sun for the sum of $2000 each. Transporting the nitroglycerine for them is a way out of hopelessness -- either through a big paycheck or through sudden death, with the latter appearing the more probable. Though sadly past the point in time when we can still be shocked over gangster capitalism and men selling out for money, the story is nonetheless compelling. The four who are chosen to go on this fool\'s errand include Mario, a young Corsican played by Yves Montand in a role that brought him widespread attention. He is carrying on an affair with a local servant girl, Linda (Vera Clouzot) who is in love with him. His treatment of her, however, is atrocious and reflects the attitude of the male-dominated society they live in. Also picked to drive one of the trucks is Jo, an aging Parisian small-time crook (Charles Vanel), Luigi (Folco Lulli), an Italian with less than a year to live, and an ex-nazi pilot (Peter van Eyck). This unlikely group will play a cat-and-mouse game with death for the remainder of the film.\n\nClouzot depicts several incidents that bring the tension to the boiling point. In the first one, the trucks must travel at least 40 mph over a pot-holed stretch of road to prevent the vibrations from setting off the nitroglycerine. The second involves a sharp, narrow turn that requires the trucks to back up onto an unstable, rotten wooden platform causing it to buckle. Almost immediately afterwards, the trucks are stopped by a huge boulder in the middle of the road and must siphon off some of the nitroglycerine to blow it up. Finally, Mario must deftly maneuver the truck over a depression of spilled oil with the wheels stuck in reverse. As the long treacherous journey unfolds, roles are reversed between Mario and Jo as Mario becomes the strong dominant one and Jo, in Charles Vanel\'s brilliant performance, becomes shaken, fearful, and docile. Their relationship becomes the highlight of the film as the two become mutually dependent on each other for survival and comfort. \n\nI found Wages of Fear to be an involving experience that kept me riveted throughout, though I did sense that there would not be a two and a half-hour film unless somebody survived. Although the unexpected plot twists were gripping, the best part of the film for me was the revelation of each character when faced with fear. It reminded me of the "Treasure of the Sierra Madre", a film that also showed men discovering the truth about themselves and others while pursuing their dream of wealth. Wages of Fear lived up to its accolades, but for me the discordant ending clashed both with the tone of the film and with my experience of the universe not as arbitrary or capricious but as filled with meaning and purpose.\n', u'-0.104404', u'\nI\'ve often heard of Clouzot referred to as the \'French Hitchcock\' although this film seems to share more of a cousin hood with the work of John Houston.\n\nWages of Fear is about how a bunch of immigrants in Latin America, for money, take on the reckless task of transporting a large consignment of explosive nitroglycerin across 300-miles of obstacle-riddled paths, every moment aware that a single concussion could ignite the entire shipment, blowing them all to bits.\n\nThe film begins with the setting of the locale and introduction of its principal characters - the regular irregulars Mario and Luigi (just realized the striking similarity to Nintendo\'s famous plumber duo, hmm), the mafioso type new entrant Jo who strikes up a friendship with the raffish Mario becoming his mentor but antagonizes the rest of the townsfolk with his bossy attitude, Mario\'s mistress Linda who naively worships him but is in turn kept as a pleasure item. The town is a dead-end rife with poverty and unemployment, its only industry being the Southern Oil Corporation (SOC) a Yankee enterprise. The residents are too demoralized to even consider escape to better climes. Like Mario explains to Jo in the course of a brilliantly spliced sequence of jump-cuts that covers the entire aspect of the town, "It\'s like prison. Easy to get in, but escape is impossible."\n\nA major fire at the oil-wells calls for immediate shipment of explosive to isolate the blaze, but it\'s too late to bring in the specialized transportation. The company offers a payment of $2000 each for 4 locals who will carry the hazardous shipment in ordinary trucks. Mario, Jo, Luigi and a Jew Bimba take on the job, the promise of money to help them escape from the town sufficient even to temporarily offset the fear of death. Thus begins the arduous, tension-ridden journey that occupies most of this 148-min film. The trucks must move above a certain minimum speed to minimize vibrations (a ruse reused in 1994\'s Speed). On the way they face various blocks including a rickety wooden bridge the trucks must back up over. Mid-journey one of the trucks blows up. Mario and Jo who are in the other truck must overcome their horror at the catastrophe and cross further hurdles including a lake of oil created by the bursting of a pipeline.\n\nIn the course of the journey we see a reversal in the roles of Jo and Mario. Initially Mario looks up to Jo, in awe of his cool and worldly-wise manner. But Jo is soon revealed to be in reality a scared old man for whom Mario has only a contemptuous pity. This character drama makes for engrossing viewing and in no small measure due to the excellent performances, especially Charles Vanel as Jo.\n\nThe story moves smoothly thanks to very precise cutting, and some of the nighttime photography, as also the scene at the oil lake, is worth mentioning. Clouzot obviously has a sure hand over the bulk of the proceedings although he slips up in a couple of places: The oil company is portrayed in a rather ham-fisted (and badly acted) way as this evil uncaring monolith that would gladly blame dead employees for disasters to avoid compensation and resort to thoroughly unethical means to get its job done. Most of the supporting characters are cardboard. Also, some of the miniature work is painfully obvious, although that\'d be likely a limitation of technical facilities available to the crew. The ending of the film is finely executed but seems all too contrived to give you your daily dose of irony.\n\nIn the end, this remains a taut and finger-licking good old-school thriller, which bothers to provide characters interesting enough for us to care about their life and death.\n', u'-0.166616', u'I intend to deal explicitly with the ending of this film. Be warned.\n\nMany comments have dealt with the gradual build-up of tension and character which makes this film so riveting. They are all true. But a lot of people cannot understand the ending, and therefore condemn it. The ending is, however, integral to the meaning of the film as a whole. These four men are warned that taking this job, no matter how much it pays, will cost them their lives. We understand that they are in a situation where one mistake will cost them their lives, and only fearlessness can save them. We see that M. Jo, a bully who gets what he wants by pushing people like Luigi around, turns into a snivelling coward when faced with a couple of tons of nitro he can\'t bully. His fear causes him to lose others\' respect, his self-respect, and eventually his life. But our hero has no fear, and so of course he must survive, right? Wrong. Fear protects us, keeps us from endangering ourselves. Without fear, our hero cannot keep himself out of danger. Therefore he dies. Stupidly. And it\'s his own fault.\n\nThink about what was going on in 1953; millions of people had eight years earlier come out of a situation as nail-biting as driving a truck full of nitro. They talk about the "lost generation" being the survivors of the First World War, but the same happened in the Second. The ending makes sense of the title; not only the wages of sin but the wages of fear (of having to face extreme fear, that is)is death. It is brilliant how a film which is so entertaining on a superficial level is also so deep.', u'-0.225988', u'Four unsavory down-and-outs whiling away their hours in a poverty-stricken South American village accept the fool\'s errand of transporting two truckloads of nitroglycerin across terrible roads to an oil company accident site. Once some preliminary character development is disposed of and the men are on their way, the movie settles into one hell of a nail-biter, sort of a French, 1950s inversion of "Speed" -- if they go too fast, or make one false move, they go up in flames.\n\nThe first hour of "The Wages of Fear" is a marvel of production design. Director Clouzot packs his frame with things to look at, and the village, though built specifically for the movie, reeks of authenticity. The mise-en-scene alone is fascinating to watch -- some incidental action going on in the background of one shot (like a hothead smacking his girlfriend) is then picked up as the principal action in the next scene. And the Blu-Ray looks terrific; every mud puddle and heat-dazed fly is clear as a bell.\n\nThe second half of the film is pure suspense. It\'s a study in male machismo and one-upsmanship. The oldest member of the group, who struts around like Mr. Big Shot in the town when he has nothing to fear, crumples like a baby when faced with the prospect of death for real. But the movie doesn\'t let us be disdainful of him. As he says at one point, he\'s scared because he has enough life experience to know what death is, unlike the young hotshots who think to be frightened is to be weak.\n\nClouzot doesn\'t seem to have a rosy outlook on life, if the film\'s fatalistic ending is any indication. Or maybe he\'s just making the point that life is futile for men who approach it in a certain way.\n\n"The Wages of Fear" feels way ahead of its time, both in style and substance. I had trouble believing that it was actually made in 1953.\n\nGrade: A', u'-0.534195', u"If you want to talk about a film that is exceptionally dark for its time then look no further than The Wages of Fear. The film follows four men in a desolate South American village who are strapped for cash and will do almost anything. They agree to transport a shipment of nitroglycerin by truck across the rugged terrain of Central America. The catch is that nitroglycerin is an extremely dangerous substance that has to be handled with extreme caution. Thus one bad bump in the road could be the end for these men. Along the way then encounter all sorts of obstacles, including each other. But they have no choice but to press on, desperate for the money that awaits them at the end of their treacherous journey.\n\nThe Wages of Fear captures what true suspense is all about. The film is full of incredibly high tension scenes that will leave you on the edge of your seat in stomach churning anxiety. You feel every drop of anguish the characters feel as they run into obstacle after obstacle, growing more and more tired and frustrated with their circumstances. The tension amongst the group mixed with the tension of the situations these men get themselves into makes the suspense almost unbearable but wildly exciting. This film engages its audience so fantastically. You feel a part of you amongst the action as the film draws you further and further into the riveting suspense this film delivers. I don't remember the last time I was this engaged in a film and was so anxious about what could happen. The gravity of the film is so immense as it forces its fear upon you so unapologetically powerful.\n\nBut of course it gets better. Not only is The Wages of Fear an riveting suspense film, it is also an intense character study. We have four characters transporting the nitroglycerin, Mario, Jo, Luigi, Bimba. Each of the men have a unique personality and different ideas about this job. Some are desperate for the cash and will stop at nothing, even if it means risking not just their life, but everyone else's as well. Then there are those who would rather give up when things become too harrowing and too risky. The clashing of these two ideas create some intense scenes of psychological anguish. The ironic thing is that these four characters begin the film as friends, but the journey transforms them and turns them against each other in thrilling and disturbing ways. The film has a fantastic script which examines these things intensely and eloquently. It is a truly brilliant cinematic feat.\n\nThe film works so well as a character study, while also being an incredibly intense film full of riveting suspense. The combination of these two elements is done so perfectly, neither one taking over the other. Instead they blend beautifully, making an astoundingly powerful film. I wouldn't hesitate to call this film a masterpiece, so I will. The Wages of Fear is a masterpiece.", u'0.360115'], u'tt0117951': [u'After reading some of the reviews that trash this film I had to speak up.\n\nThis film is gritty and dirty. There is content which is not pleasant, swearing and violence amounts other things. What else would you expect a film about drug addiction to be about? Well more than that actually, it about choices and what you Choose! Never at any point did this film make drugs look at all appealing to me in any way, I never did understand why so many people thought that it did. At no point did it ever say "Look at this, its cool." For those who think the level of swearing in this film is too much then they clearly haven\'t spent any time with working class people in Britain, not just Scotland. I being one of them can say its fairly accurate in that account.\n\nThat being said, those things do not take anything away from the film, the quality of plot and story, or the acting which is Stunning! Robert Carlise as Begbe was excellent, and Ewan MacGregor shined. Also the character Spud was worth a mention he really was quite good.\n\nThis film is in my Opinion a work of Genius, that represents the book accurately.', u'0.177113', u'\nIn the aftermath of _Pulp Fiction_, much of the filmmaking of the 1990s thrived upon attempts to appear "edgy" within the constructs of independent films, or merely to provide empty shock value cliches. And no film ever came close to the sheer cleverness of Tarantino\'s masterpiece.\n\n_Trainspotting_, however, somehow manages to take the excesses of the mid-90s and rise far, far above the cinematic cliches that it easily could have become. A film that tackles any hot-button social issue can, and usually does, simply become a didactic propaganda piece. Thankfully, _Trainspotting_ is vastly more intelligent in its edginess and its shock.\n\nIn order to appreciate _Trainspotting_ fully, the viewer must abandon any preconceptions about what defines truly great cinema, because this film defies convention at nearly every turn. And with the rapid pace of its plot, that\'s quite a bit of ground to cover.\n\nThough a great deal of the picture\'s brilliance is derived from director Danny Boyle\'s consistent rejection of typical cinematic techniques, the most satisfying and _best_ aspect of _Trainspotting_ is that Boyle creates a film that is neither pro-drug or anti-drug. Instead, he maintains a rare objectivity throughout the film, depicting this fascinating array of complex, beautifully acted characters with an honesty that it seldom captured on film. And, given the life that each character lives, it\'s nearly incomprehensible that a director would refrain from influencing the viewer\'s impressions in any way, yet that\'s exactly what Boyle does.\n\nThe dialogue-- or at least what portions of the brogue-drenched dialogue American viewers will be able to comprehend-- is alternately hilarious, raw, and brutal. And Ewan McGregor, Jonny Lee Miller, and Robert Carlyle bring a remarkable compassion and depth to their portrayals of characters that could have easily lapsed into cliche.\n\nDespite its sheer brilliance, _Trainspotting_ is not a film that\'s easy to watch. The viewer is bombarded with images that transcend visceral discomfort in their horror-- this movie contains two of the most graphic, horrifying scenes I\'ve ever encountered. But, amazingly, none of these elements is used merely for shock value. Though the viewer will be mortified by some of the things that happen onscreen-- the well-documented dive into Scotland\'s most vile public toilet, for example-- these scenes all make _perfect sense_ within the context of a masterfully told story.\n\nIn order to notice all of the subtlety that also exists in _Trainspotting_, repeat viewings are necessary, primarily to reduce some of the most powerful shocks ever-so-slightly, though their effects are never lost entirely. Some of the images will likely haunt even the most cynical, jaded viewer for weeks.\n\nRATING: 10 out of 10. Never patronizing and completely unpretentious, _Trainspotting_ is one of the most daring, unconventional films ever made. It inspires a level of discomfort rivaled by very few movies, because, even at its most graphic, Boyle never insults the viewer with mere shock tactics. Brilliantly acted, directed, and written, with a truly rare objectivity that allows each viewer to interpret its story on his/her own terms.', u'0.171772', u'\nThis film became almost a cultural phenomenon as soon as it was released in Britain in February 1996.\n\nAdapted from the first (and best) book by Irvine Welsh, the film shows the lives of a group of Edinburgh heroin addicts.\n\nThe film is a black comedy, at times hilarious, tragic, surreal, brutal and uplifting.  The film is full of memorable moments such as the chase down Edinburgh\'s Princes Street which opens the film (I happened to be there when they were filming that scene) and Ewan McGregor diving down the "Worst Toilet in Scotland" headfirst.\n\nThe film doesn\'t condemn drug addicts, but it is probably more effective then any amount of preachy moralising as it depicts the devastating consequences that can happen to drug users.  \n\nThe film is well acted by a cast who have (mostly) become pretty famous since.  Especially memorable is Robert Carlyle as the violent Begbie.\n\nI have seen this film many times.  It is an instant classic.  Go check it out.', u'0.201611', u"\nRenton is a heroin addict.  He is one of a group of friends who live their lives day to day and hit to hit.  When he tries to kick the habit he manages it for a while but eventually falls back into his old way.  Meanwhile his friends are as messed up as he is, whether it be Spud's pathetic addiction, Begbie's violent rages or the fact that he is sleeping with a girl who still goes to school.\n\nWhen it came out this film was very hyped, the poster became a must-have on every student's bedroom wall and the media went nuts over it's supposed glamorisation of drug use.  The plot is very difficult to summarise, as it doesn't really have a narrative flow other than the very disjointed experience of Renton.  However it manages to be very funny and imaginative all the way, using many different tricks and touches to be funny.  The dialogue is very well written and I must admit I found it a lot funnier than the last few comedies I watched.\n\nThe media may have condemned this film as promoting drug use, but I can only imagine that they watched a different film from me.  Sure, the film shows drugs as being fun and enjoyable but, like Renton says, `why else would we do it?'  However the film clearly shows a massive downside where people's lives are destroyed, people OD and lives go day to day just trying to get high.  True, it does show this downside in a stylish and funny way but there is no question that the film is promoting drug use in any sense.\n\nToo often I see films that are style over substance; Trainspotting gets it just perfect, stylish but not at the expense of dialogue, character or film. It is helped by a great cast.  McGregor jumped to stardom off the back of this role and he deserved it.  He keeps his character both likeable but repulsive at the same time and carries the film with surprising ease.  The support cast is excellent, even if they lack the same good character of Renton.  Whether it is the comic Bremner, the violent Carlyle or the tragic McKidd.  While not all their characters are well developed, they do all give good accounts of themselves, whether it is comic or showing the effects of heroin on their lives.\n\nOverall this is a great film that is refreshing to see now without all the `cult student cool' hype or media feeding frenzy over it's supposed pro-drug approach.  It is stylish, funny, depressing and downright sobering.", u'0.067773', u'It\'s ironic that I\'m saying "many people missed the point" because I did, too. My original review on IMDb gave the film a negative rating. I deleted it months ago because I have since purchased the Director\'s Cut on DVD and fallen in love with it.\n\nThe movie is energetic, imaginative and unique. It\'s taken from Irvine Welsh\'s novel, which I now really want to read. It\'s about a group of heroin addicts (led by Ewan McGregor\'s Renton) in Scotland who can\'t seem to live past their addiction...everything centers around drugs.\n\n"Trainspotting" was condemned for promoting drug use, but I agree with fellow reviewer Bob the Moo who claims this was a misinterpretation on the media\'s behalf - yeah, it may show drugs as being "funny" at times (like Renton\'s wacky hallucination) but it certainly doesn\'t glamorize them. Some of the sequences are sickeningly realistic and depressing - like the scene with the baby. That\'s tragic stuff, and totally unexpected. It\'s also effective because by that point in the film we care about the characters enough for it to affect us on an emotional level.\n\nThe movie was really popular in the UK but never got much acclaim overseas. Americans in general will always be less liberal and be quicker to damn films for their messages. "Taxi Driver" was hailed by Europeans in \'76...can\'t really say the same for US critics - it was a huge split in opinion at the time.\n\nDitto here. Most Americans didn\'t really "get it" and the only attention it received was the controversy surrounding the appearance of Mr. McGregor\'s genitalia. Oh, the humanity! If you haven\'t seen "Trainspotting" yet, I highly recommend it. Don\'t be turned off at first by its bleak humor and sick content - I won\'t lie, it IS a rough ride...but by the end, it\'s worth it.', u'0.04984', u'\nAn extremely competent look at the Scottish drug-Scene, Trainspotting is a\nperfect example of the potential of the UK industry to tell a story of tragedy, horror and hope in a manner that the American industry has yet to do without drifting into tired Cliche. While the manner and style of delivery are extremely funny and at times appear almost unreal, the fact remains that these characters are real. The clearly psychotic and alcoholic Begbie, played by Robert Carlyle is a supporting role that is actually of immense value to the film. Here we have character who I\'ve met, you\'ve met and we\'ve all met. A man with very little to lose absorbed in a sea of alcohol and prone to violence. I choose him as example because he isnt even involved in the drug-scene in which the main characters are central. In fact his opposition is somewhat humorous when we consider his own vices make him argueably worse off and the incidences of violence he becomes involved in\n\nare most definitely black humour. Considering what is actually happening isnt funny, watching it play out, aside from one major incident, is extremely funny. And that is the tone of the film throughout, as characters continually talk nonsence and sail through the lives they have chosen, making very little progress, but instead drifting downwards until an opportunity presents itself to change their ways, where upon Renton, Ewan McGregor, must make a choice between his own life or his friends. McGregor himself is excellent in the film that made him, as is Jonny Lee Miller, who surprised me in this film by having a more thought-provoking character than the script and time strictly allowed considering his relatively minimal place in the main storyline. Ewen Bremner provided some excellent and often well-needed comic relief and Carlyle as I mentioned, was outstanding. This film is both real and unreal, taking the Humour of "Human Traffic" and the somber tone of "My name is Joe" and blending them together to create an unforgettable experience vividly accompanied by strains of "Perfect day" and other cultural and nostalgic sounds, particularly of the place and period. Trainspotting has been accused of glamourising drug-use but I firmly believe anyone who takes this view hasnt watched it properly. The fun is equally, if not more so, matched by some nasty images and for the time it was released, provided what was a very necessary look at the growing drug industry, the loss it creates and the hope that can arise. Superb.', u'0.469216', u'Danny Boyle\'s "Trainspotting" is a film in which everything goes the right way. Few films are fortunate to \'be\' at the right time and right place and take the world by storm as "Trainspotting" did, but the ultimate proof of this film\'s greatness is that if you watched it alone or with a large group of people, in 2008 or in 1996, it has the same effect- absolute power. This film is nothing more- or less- than one of the most effective and perfect artistic works ever committed to celluloid.\n\nThe film follows the lives of a group of drug attics in Scotland in the late 1980\'s but is constructed less as a conventional narrative and more as a series of vignettes connected by characters and set to the film\'s dazzling soundtrack (the fact that I mention the scenes being \'set\' to the soundtrack is proof of its importance in this particular film). Almost every scene is as powerful as the next, with three montages in particular being possibly the definitive examples of how to do a memorable cinematic montage.\n\nPop culture has been kind to "Trainspotting", remembering it as a unique and great film, especially in Britain. I certainly do not disagree with this consensus, but I feel the film has been hurt by familiarity, with even television series like "Family Guy" parodying the film\'s well-known scenes (and badly). This doesn\'t mean that the film\'s popularity is being hurt, but that it doesn\'t feel as fresh and original to people now as it did back in 1996. This is hardly the thing the film\'s reputation suffers most from however, with the significantly large number of people who claim the film supports and promotes drug use. I have to ask, and forgive my rudeness, how stupid can you possibly be? No, drug addicts in this film are not vilified, but they are consistently shown in a brutally realistic and horrifically tragic context, and just because the film doesn\'t go out of its way to emotionally manipulate you into completely hating its characters doesn\'t mean that it promotes drug use, it means that it\'s a knowing film careful enough not to become a sappy, melodramatic Hollywood product. \n\nThe acting is phenomenal, the music is terrific, the film is a pitch-perfect example of energizing editing and brilliant use of montage, and its script is one of the best ever written, alternately hilarious, horrifying, tragic, and benefiting from a rare level of depth and resonance. A British classic is what Trainspotting is recognized as, and a British classic is what it is. \n\n10/10', u'0.193559', u"\nTrainspotting is the best movie I've ever seen!  Danny Boyle did a excellent job of directing a movie based on Irvine Welsh's bestselling novel about desperate and hopeless Scottish heroin addicts.  And all the cast did a superb job acting some of the most outrageous and offensive characters I've ever seen.  The only downside of this movie is understanding those thick Scottish accents, but that also adds a bit of humor to the movie.\n\n\nWhat I liked best about Trainspotting was the characters.  They were the most unbelievable low-life, junky, sleazy, immoral, trash I've ever seen. I\nloved it! They'll make you both despise and pity them while loving them at the same time.\n\nAnd the plot (which can be credited to Irvine Welsh) was unbelievable. Although some of the shocking elements this movie had distracted me from the story at first, repeated viewings of it made me appreciate it as one of the most profound stories ever.", u'0.401496', u'In 1996 John Hodge took Irvine Welsh\'s novel "Trainspotting" and with the help of Danny Boyle\'s direction created one of the most influential, modern cult classics Britain has to offer. Commonly ranked among the greatest films of the 90s; "Trainspotting" delivers satisfactory viewing every single time. The essential drug film.\n\nThe term "trainspotting" in this case, is not the non-drug based hobby, but has two meanings for this film. A) The act of "trainspotting" is UK slang for trying to find a vein to intravenously inject drugs. And B) A joke not featured in the film, but two of the characters go to a disused train station to buy drugs and say they are going "trainspotting".\n\nEwan McGregor stars as Mark Renton, a performance that put him on the map, a man who spends; or wastes, most of his time taking drugs with his friends in one of their apartments. Until he decides to finally pack it in and go cold turkey. We see the highs and lows of the drugs as Renton attempts to build a new life. He battles the strain and the influences of his mates; including Sick Boy (Johnny Lee Miller) a man who stops at nothing to take all, Spud (Ewen Bremner) a fast-paced anxious performance and Francis Begbie (Robert Carylye) a frighteningly intense character who is possibly my favourite of all-time; and Renton\'s sex life.\n\nVibrant colour is used to exaggerate the actions to intensify the imagery on screen. This also makes it stand out from other films creating a massive impact on the viewer. Unforgettable. The soundtrack consists of the pop culture the characters themselves love and some regularly featured in real life at the time. The film captures the era perfectly.\n\nDanny Boyle\'s stylish direction is what mainly is so appealing about the film. Delivering an expertly structured adrenalin rush. The daring topic of the film was well perceived by critics and audiences to claim universal praise. But, they were still unsure if it was supporting drugs or an anti-drug film. In a way it is both.\n\nWe are guided through the film with Renton\'s narration, making it an extremely watchable viewing, one irresistible to want to experience several times. A hilarious triumph. This is movie-making at its most exhilarating.\n\n9/10', u'0.456544', u"I may only be young but not many films can effect me like 'Trainspotting'.It is able to pull you into the lives of the characters and makes you empathetic to their feelings while still in-keeping with Boyles contemporary look and style of film making.Its give you a different look about being Scottish which many of my friends have pointed out.Ewan Mc Gregor shows his best acting skills he shows that he has an amazing way of keeping you watching.He has proved himself a skilled actor and has contributed greatly to the British film industry.We are thankful.Its a film i can watch over and over again and still smile at the end.NOt one to miss.A must see!!", u'0.954771', u"#1 BEST FILM OF 1996 \n\nYoung filmmaker Danny Boyle's film adaptation of Irvine Welsh's incredible novel, about a band of social misfits that just so happen to be sleazy heroin junkies, is the movie that got me hooked on independent flicks. One late Friday night I was cruising through the movie channels on Satellite and I stumbled upon a channel called IFC (Independent Film Channel). On it there was this film 'Trainspotting'. I watched it and immediately fell in love with it. I never really saw anything quite like it, it was stylish, cool, depressing, dark and disturbing all at the same time. After this I got hooked on IFC channel, and if it wasn't for the smash U.K. hit 'Trainspotting', I might have never watched an independent film.\n\nFollowing the novel surprisingly closely, 'Trainspotting' revolves around a band of friends. Most are heroin junkies, one is an alcoholic psycho and the other is actually a good guy. These friends play soccer together and hang out all the time. They are led by Mark Renton (played by Ewan McGregor - Star Wars, Moulin Rouge) the central character and narrator of this macabre yet intriguing tale. We watch him as he tries to get off heroin and how this effects his friends -- Spud (Ewen Bremner - Snatch., The Acid House) a silly, naive, never-hurt-a-fly kind of heroin addict who serves as the film's oaf; Sick Boy (Jonny Lee Miller - Dracula 2000, Hackers) a selfish, sneaky and manipulative heroin junkie obsessed with James Bond who Renton secretly despises; Tommy (Kevin McKidd - The Acid House) the only honest friend of Renton's who is drug and alcohol free; and Francis Begbie (Robert Carlyle - The Full Monty, Riff Raff) a deranged, alcoholic violent madman with a mean temper and a large knife. The story follows Renton's struggle to get off drugs and start a life while interacting with his friends and eventually arranging a drug deal with them at the end to strike it rich.\n\n'Trainspotting' is a nearly perfect picture with extraordinary acting, directing and writing. The performances are nothing short of first-rate in 'Trainspotting'. Ewan McGregor gives perhaps his finest and most unfairly ignored screen performances as our hero and struggling heroin junkie. He plays the role with such authenticity and passion for the craft of acting you'd never think he wasn't a heroin junkie in real life. Ewen Bremner is funny as the film's idiot, but Jonny Lee Miller surprisingly gives an outstanding performance as Renton's slippery so-called friend. Kevin McKidd is good as Tommy and Kelly MacDonald does a fine job with her acting debut as Renton's underage lay who becomes kind of like a mentor to him as the film progresses. One of the absolute finest performances in this movie is by Robert Carlyle, most known as a British acting coach. It's hard to explain why he's so wonderful, but I'll try. He plays the bad guy in a way that it makes you uncomfortable and scared watching him. That takes talent and it's not easy to do for any actor. Danny Boyle provides us with breathtaking camera work and has some Tarantino-ish qualities, that makes him one of the most talented filmmakers working in the independent film industry. There is a scene in which the main character, Renton, is going through withdrawal and he has a hallucination of a friend's deceased infant child crawls up on his bedroom wall and spins his head all the way around in a kind of Linda Blair Exorcist style. It's a freaky scene but it's also a carefully layered and admirable scene that proves Danny Boyle's directing talents to be most impressive. John Hodge (who writes most of Boyle's films) does a phenomenal job capturing the material from Welsh's groundbreaking and provocative novel that should have won him the Oscar in the 1997 Academy Award ceremony. The cinematography is consistently amazing but the film editing is a tad choppy. But, that's not really something to get bent out of shape about, because the rest of the film is always engrossing especially the magnificent and extensive soundtrack including music from Blur, Lou Reed and Iggy Pop.\n\nAll in all, 'Trainspotting' is an astounding indie achievement from British filmmaker Danny Boyle who also did the highly successful indie romp 'Shallow Grave' starring Ewan McGregor and the major flop 'The Beach' starring Leonardo DiCaprio and Robert Carlyle. If you've never seen 'Trainspotting' and have a very strong stomach and an urge to see something peculiar yet brilliant, be sure to rent it your next stop at the videostore. If you've seen it and liked it enough to purchase it, be sure to get the the 2-disc special edition DVD with some excellent extras including full-length audio commentary with some insightful information. 'Trainspotting' is the film that started my love with indie cinema. Be sure you don't miss it. Grade: A\n\nMADE MY TOP 300 LIST AT #27", u'0.411141', u'\nThere\'s a good reason why the imdb recommendations guide, which lists movies that those who liked Trainspotting should also like, lists some of the greatest, most critically acclaimed movies ever made. It\'s because this is one of them, and rightfully so. It won critical acclaim across the globe for its gritty portrayal of the unfortunate existence of a hapless group of losers and drug addicts, living the low life in Edinburgh, Scotland.\n\nIt is a dialogue driven movie, though, so if you don\'t get the lines, and don\'t understand the humor, which is very dry at times, and never comes in the form of a \'joke\', you\'ll unknowingly call this movie "slow" or "depressing" or "bad." In a delightfully madcap exchange when Renton announces he\'s through with heroin, the lines "...he\'s lacking in moral fiber" "He knows a lot about Sean Connery." "Thats hardly a substitute!" sums up the writing quite well. It only works in the context of the scene itself, but the way it\'s played and the scene it\'s set in make it beyond hilarious.\n\nIt\'s one of the most powerfully written and played movies I\'ve ever seen. Renton (Ewan McGregor), the main character, undergoes pseudo metamorphases to illustrate his own attempts at regaining his sanity. His friends, who enter the movie with static roles, illustrate their own inability to change by remaining undeveloped, only sinking deeper into their self-created abysses.\n\nTommy (Kevin McKidd), who falls victim to heroin addiction and dies from it after entering the movie as the epitome of clean, healthy living, undergoes a downward spiral which we flash into occasionally to see how he\'s being rapidly destroyed by drugs about which he professed "I\'m an adult, I can find out for myself."\n\nThough Renton\'s character is the only one which is fully explored, all of Renton\'s "so called friends" are cleanly written, well summarized, and do their part to create the air of hostility and pressure which Renton faces in his battle to rid himself of heroin.\n\nBegbie, played with powerful energy by Robert Carlyle, adds much needed comic relief with his hilarious and sometimes disturbing violent outbursts, while exposing the ironic nature of his legal addiction to alcohol when played in the background of a heroin movie.\n\nDiane, his love interest, simply adds to the pressure of life, using him for sex and echoing the chorus from his non-drug user friends and family members that he\'s destroying his life, "poisoning [his] body with that sh!te."\n\nIt gets depressing at times, as it should, to properly illustrate the horror and depravity that comes with the lifestyle. The "carpet" scene couldn\'t have been more brilliantly imagined to portray the feeling of emptiness and detachment as Renton nears death from an overdose.\n\nOverall, it gets a 10. This movie can\'t lose when played to an audience with the intelligence, wit, and sense of humor to understand it.\n', u'0.21641', u'\nI saw this movie last year as a friend had it on DVD from the UK and, being a Ewan McGregor fan, I thought I\'d give it a shot even though it\'s considered an \'artsy\' film. I was so shocked!  It is a fantastic movie. I watched it over & over until she made me give it back. The young Ewan gives an Oscar-worthy (why he wasn\'t nominated is beyond me) turn as the heroin addict trying to pull himself out and away from his addict buddies. He narrates the whole film with that rich Scot accent of his (reminds me of my Scottish grandparents) which gives even more depth to the characters and situations. The descent into the hell of addiction to the death of an innocent baby (very realistic) in their \'home\', Ewan swimming through a vast sea of crap (yes, THAT kind) in a toilet, on through the entire film showing his constant struggle within himself amidst his friends to stay clean & sober is amazing. I could go on and on. It brings a memory of another film I\nsaw years ago with a young Leo DiCaprio & David Thewlis in a little-seen movie called "Total Eclipse" and which is also considered an "art" film and really quite good. If you get a chance to see this, please do. You will not be sorry. If you happen to find it on DVD, BUY IT.', u'0.144668', u'Judging by the high rating the other users of this site have bestowed on this film, I guess some people might say I\'m off my rocker to rate it a mere 6, but hey...what can I say? Everyone\'s entitled to their own opinion. And in mine, I can\'t help but feel this movie is a bit overrated.\n\nLet me start by saying I like movies in this sub-genre. As an ex-drug abuser myself, I find solace in watching fictional characters struggle with an affliction that was once part of my own life, and there\'s a sort of therapy involved there that seems to make one feel as if someone, even a fictional someone, at least understands the pain an addict goes through. I also just plain like raw, dark, and gritty movies. I\'m not a "Mary Poppins" or "The Sound of Music" kind of guy, and any movie that sheds light on the seedy underbelly of society is okay in my book. Sure, the message is often bleak and depressing, but at least it\'s not contributing to the lie that mainstream movies try to sell, where everything is cute, life is wonderful, the bad guys always get punished, and any conflict is wrapped up with a nice little bow in the end.\n\nWith that being said, I went into "Trainspotting" fully prepared to feast on the dark nature of the film and find myself immersed in a cast of characters that I could relate to. But I was sadly disappointed. Things started off well enough: I loved Ewan McGregor\'s opening monologue, describing the pointless, clich\xe9 choices we as civilized humans tend to make in regards to our lives...as if we\'re all just drones, doing whatever society tells us we should do. I know that I can personally relate to feeling like this at many points in my life. But sadly, it was all downhill from there.\n\nIf I had to point out any one, main problem with the movie, it was my lack of attachment to any of the central characters. I felt unable to sympathize, or ever really care what happened to any of them. And in a movie like this, such a thing is critical. The cast was all fine and dandy, so it was nothing to do with that, but I just felt...detached. I think it might have had something to do with the fact that from the moment we are introduced to these characters, they\'re all already drug addicts. Part of the impact of these sort of films, for me anyway, is being able to witness the fall from grace...to see a good life gutted and destroyed by drug abuse. But as it stands, we never get a glimpse of what life was like -before- these characters were all on drugs, and to me that leaves a bit of a void.\n\nAnd for however "dark" one may think the film is, I personally didn\'t find it all that bleak. "Requiem for a Dream" (my personal favorite movie about drug addiction of all time) makes this look somewhat childish in comparison. That\'s not to say that there aren\'t dark moments in the film, because there are, and when they do it hit, they leave an impact. But overall, I felt more emphasis was placed on the weirdness of the characters, and some of them were a little too much for me to handle.\n\nThe film is surprisingly void of any intense drama, which I sort of expected considering the subject matter. I realize this was probably intentional and done to avoid being "cliche", but I could have done with a little more intensity and drama.\n\nThis bland feeling overpowered me through most of the movie, and I found myself checking the running time to see how much time had elapsed, which is usually always a bad sign while watching any movie. I have to say the film did redeem itself in the end, and probably made me add another star to it than I normally would have. I really liked the outcome of the story, which makes it a shame that both the beginning and end caps of the film were filled with what was in between.\n\nI realize I\'m going against the grain here with this review, but I see no point in hailing this as some sort of modern masterpiece when personally I don\'t see it myself. Maybe I just have bad taste, but I feel it pays to be honest in these matters, and I\'m not going to jump on the bandwagon and call this a fantastic movie when I don\'t really believe it is. Something about it felt empty to me, and it wasn\'t nearly as impacting as I had hoped it would be. It\'s no "Requiem for a Dream", that\'s for sure.', u'-0.448314', u'The last time I remember seeing someone going through withdrawal was Frank Sinatra in The Man With the Golden Arm: "You mean just stop? Cold turkey? You don\'t understand! The pain..." \n\nRenton (Ewan McGregor) was a little more expressive: "I don\'t feel the sickness yet, but it\'s in the post. That\'s for sure. I\'m in the junkie limbo at the moment. Too ill to sleep. Too tired to stay awake, but the sickness is on its way. Sweat, chills, nausea. Pain and craving. A need like nothing else I\'ve ever known will soon take hold of me. It\'s on its way." \n\nThe truth about drugs and the awful toll it take is clearly shown here. The most awful moment come after the baby dies and the mother is quick to "relieve her pain." The most disgusting moment was the toilet: an apt illustration of just what you will do for drugs. The amorality of sex with a schoolgirl is also apropos.\n\nThis film is funny at times, but certainly there was no glamor. It was just some sick people with their lives going in circles.\n\nJohn Hodge\'s screenplay was magnificent. Danny Boyle\'s (Shallow Grave, 28 Days Later...) direction was super. Along with McGregor, the performances of Robert Carlyle (The Full Monty, Human Trafficking) and Kelly Macdonald (What\'s her connection to Sinatra?) were impressive.', u'-0.326064'], u'tt0077416': [u"A comment re the other comments: A lot of the comments criticize the first half hour as being too long. In my opinion, these comments miss the point of the movie.\n\nOf course many of the scenes in the first hour don't advance the narrative. They're not supposed to; they're for character development.\n\nThe whole point of the movie is to show us how the various characters were affected by the war. It wouldn't have worked nearly as powerfully as it does had the first hour been trimmed down. We have to sense the careless and frat-boy-like immaturity of these young men. That's why the scenes all revolve around frivolity and seemingly senseless boyish behavior; it creates such a stark contrast to the devastated characters of the three who went to war (and the relatively unaffected personalities of those who stayed behind, like Stanley).\n\nThe strong points of the film are the outstanding performances of nearly every actor in the movie. Yes, there are technical deficiencies in the sound, but it hardly matters. This is nitpicking compared to the overall construction of the film.", u'-0.148839', u'No, this is not the best film about the Vietnam War; it\'s hardly about Vietnam at all. The vets who don\'t like it have it wrong, as do the Vietnamese who found it racist. It could be any war, with any combatants. But because the (primary) victims here are recognizable American archetypes, Americans will feel this in their gut more than any other war film I know of. This is one of the very few post-war Hollywood films that shows a sincere reverence for the lives of small town Americans.\n\nAfter seeing it in a very high quality theater on its initial release, I walked out thinking it was easily one of the best movies I had ever seen - and that I never wanted to see it again. But I looked at it today on cable and found that not much had changed about it, or me. I don\'t want to see it again...but I want you to see it.\n\nEven now, the Russian Roulette scene (in context, people: watch all that comes before it first) is the single most intense sequence I\'ve seen; it makes the end of "Reservoir Dogs" seem like a cartoon. Best Walken performance, period. Meryl Streep glows, DeNiro has seldom been more affecting. A unique classic...it is not surprising that Cimino didn\'t have another movie in him after something this wrenching.', u'-0.033063', u'"One shot is what it\'s all about. A deer has to be taken with one shot."\n\nThere\'s that particularly infamous scene in "The Deer Hunter" that seems to remain more disturbing each time we view it, when Michael (Robert De Niro), a Vietnam veteran, tracks down a friend of his named Nicky (Christopher Walken), who never arrived home after the war and is eventually found in Saigon, playing Russian Roulette for money, his mind an utter mess. He is unable to fully remember Michael, and refuses to return home, and what proceeds in the following sequence is a haunting example of gut-wrenching film-making.\n\nThe Vietnam sequences take place midway through the movie, serving as a connection between the beginning and the end, both of which study the lives of the men and not the war around them. Michael, Nicky and Steven (John Savage) are young Pennsylvanian miners drafted into the war. Steven has just gotten married to the love of his life, but has little time to celebrate as he is shipped overseas with his friends. They eventually all find themselves taken hostage in a Vietnamese POW camp where their captors force them to play Russian Roulette. The rules of the game? Put a single bullet in a random chamber of a handgun, spin it, snap it, raise it to your head, squeeze the trigger, and repeat these steps until there\'s only one man left standing.\n\nAfter a series of fortunate events Michael, Nicky and Steven escape and make their way downriver. All three men are eventually rescued, Nicky via helicopter and Michael and Steven later on. Steven\'s battered, infected legs are amputated and he is left helpless in a wheelchair. Michael returns home as well only to find that Nicky is still back in Vietnam. Nicky\'s girlfriend back home, Linda (Meryl Street), begins to fall in love with Michael, but Michael soon remembers his promise to Nicky ("If I don\'t make it back don\'t leave me over there") and travels over 2,000 miles back into the middle of his own personal hell to find and rescue his best friend. It\'s hard for him to understand why Nicky doesn\'t recognize him when he finally tracks him down. "It\'s me, Mike." "Mike who?"\n\nCausing mass controversy upon its release because of its alleged "racist" content regarding the Vietnamese, a crowd of Vietnam veterans gathered around outside the Oscars ceremony and caused riots as well, claiming that the film was "not accurate" and somehow insulting to the veterans of the war. \n\nHowever as many film historians, authors and critics have already pointed out, the film is never meant to be a 100% accurate depiction of the events in Vietnam. It is not really a Vietnam War picture at all. Instead, it is a focus on the aftermath of war, and how damaging it can be, both physically and mentally, to its participants. Because of the era that "The Deer Hunter" was released in, Vietnam was a recent event, the focus of the nation, and is therefore used as a more convenient -- and relative -- backdrop (much like "Apocalypse Now"). Unlike "Platoon" this is not a movie relating specifically to the Vietnam War, in fact less than a half an hour is devoted to the war scenes. It is a character study, and accusations of racism -- although perhaps justified to some extent -- are hardly convincing as the film itself is not concerned with bashing the participants of the war as it is the war itself.\n\nIt is the film\'s necessary setup that is often called long and boring and, ironically, unnecessary, but this is essentially where the nature of each character is examined for the audience. To launch directly into the war sequences would be sloppy, and we would have a harder time caring for the characters. Instead, we are given scenes with weddings, discussions, and hunting trips -- normal events. Then, the end, a somber reflection upon the past, chronicles the aftermath of the damaging events in the lives of Michael, Steven, Nicky and their loved ones. Michael has a hard time adapting back to his normal life. It would be hard for anyone, after experiencing such damaging events and images. \n\nDe Niro made a few post-Vietnam films during the \'70s and \'80s, the most famous being "Taxi Driver," in which Travis Bickle was totally unable to find his way in life again after the war and resorted to violence in order to justify his existence and release his anger. "The Deer Hunter" is similar in approach but reveals more background; this would be a suitable prequel of sorts if the names had been changed.\n\nOver the years "The Deer Hunter" has surprisingly gained a fairly bad reputation -- most of which stems back to the controversy surroundings its release and protested accolades. Director Michael Cimino\'s follow-up ("Heaven\'s Gate") was an enormous flop, bankrupting United Artists, and he had a hard time finding work afterwards. His first feature film, "Thunderbolt and Lightfoot," which starred Clint Eastwood and Jeff Bridges, was a buddy road movie that was also a sign of things to come in Cimino\' later features, most notably the process of male bonding, which is a huge primal element in this project. Cimino was an extremely talented and visionary director, and it\'s a shame that the ambition of "Heaven\'s Gate" cost him his career.\n\nAnd furthermore, despite the negativity surrounding "The Deer Hunter," it is still one of the finest works of American cinema, a touching, poignant and ultimately depressing film that asks us if the effects of war extend past the physical and into the realm of human mentality. Yes, I think they do.', u'-0.235452', u"Most young people today need to learn that Robert De Niro was not just \r the person in Meet the Parents or The Adventures of Rocky and \r Bullwinkle, but he starred in films like The Deer Hunter, which got him \r to where he is today. Not only is he a great actor, he always picks \r good films to act in. And with a strong supporting cast, also, you \r can't really go wrong with The Deer Hunter.\r \r\nMichael (De Niro), Nick (Christopher Walken), and Steven (John Savage) \r sign up to go to Vietnam. They leave after a farewell party/wedding \r party for Stanley and Angela (Rutanya Alda). Once in the \r midst of the war, they are forced into playing Russian Roulette and \r eventually they escape, but none of them can forget the experiences \r from the war.\r \r\nIt's sad to see that Michael Cimino fade from view, because his \r direction here is really memorable and it's what holds the film \r together. There's about 70 minutes in the beginning of the film that \r has nothing to do with the rest of the film, but it gets us to know \r these three main characters, and it seems like you wouldn't care if \r they even went to Vietnam, because you certainly were intrigued by \r these three people. And once they're in the perils of war, you feel \r enough for these three basic people to get through the war.\r \r\nThe Russian Roulette scenes are harrowing, even when it's a complete \r stranger who has the gun to their head. I read that to get the tension \r on set, a live bullet was put into the gun, but it was checked to make \r sure that it wasn't the one about to be shot. And, since you've known \r these people for 90 minutes already, you obviously didn't want them to \r die, making them all the more nervous.\r \r\nThe Deer Hunter is quite unlike another great Vietnam film, Full Metal \r Jacket. While FMJ just showed the immediate results, this movie showed \r the results immediately and in the future, back at home. This helped \r make everything seem more realistic, which it was. For each of the \r three main characters, the war has changed them greatly, and none for \r the better.\r \r\nDe Niro is great, but the stand out here is Walken, who accurately \r takes his role and makes it into something memorable. Thankfully, he \r won best supporting actor. Meryl Streep was nominated as a supporting \r character, deservedly. However, this movie is not all about the acting, \r it's about the feeling you get. As one character says, 'I don't know \r how I feel.' That's exactly how you'll feel after seeing this \r tour-de-force.\r \r\nMy rating: 10/10\r \r\nRated R for strong language and violence.", u'0.267344', u"\n I've now seen this film three times with a decade or more between viewings, and every time I see it I come away feeling that movies can't get any better than this.  People always comment on the Viet Nam scenes, and it's true that they are as powerful and intense as any war scenes ever filmed.  The Russian-roulette betting game, in both its up-river and Saigon venues, may be the most riveting, shattering plot device ever invented, as measured by the pounding of the heart.\n\n But it's the 'home front' scenes that stick with me through the years.  I think all the steel town scenes are nearly perfect, untoppable.  And that very much includes the Eastern Orthodox wedding and its sequel.  When anyone tells me they were bored I just shake my head.  There's no arguing with short and shallow attention spans.  You're either capable of appreciating art or you're not. \n\n  I do have a quibble or two.  The deer-hunting scenes looked like nowhere I've ever seen in Pennsylvania, or anywhere else East of the Rockies.  I think Cimino deliberately picked an ethereal location above the clouds as a contrast to the steel town.  When John Cazale and the others get loaded and act like jerks it jars on Michael, because they have brought the stupid distractions of ordinary life to an extraordinary place.  This would matter less if the 'genius loci' were not so strongly present in the other home front scenes. I wish he had used the soft, green forested hills of Pennsylvania for the hunting.\n\n  And some of the dialogue--Meryl Streep's in particular--wouldn't work on the page, and only first-rate acting by an inspired ensemble--has there ever been a better cast of young actors?--pulls it off.  But these are forgivable errors in one of the finest films ever made.", u'0.0524615', u'Outstanding and haunting Best Picture winner of 1978 that still packs a punch nearly 25 years later. Robert DeNiro (Oscar-nominated), Christopher Walken (Oscar-winning for Best Supporting Actor) and John Savage are on their way to fight for their country in Vietnam. The three are in for a rude awakening from their simple lives in a small steel town in Pennsylvania. The terrors of Vietnam will change all. DeNiro, an avid deer hunter, cannot stand to even shoot a gun after he returns. Savage loses his legs and is too ashamed and scared to return home to his new wife and friends. Walken has lost it mentally and stays in Vietnam and develops the taste for Russian roulette. The movie is a trial to sit through in many ways, but it is also an important film that was the first commentary on the topic of Vietnam. Meryl Streep also received her first of a record 12 Oscar nominations as Walken\'s love interest. John Cazale was deathly ill during the making of the movie and died shortly after the film was completed of terminal cancer. Michael Cimino\'s amazing Oscar-nominated screenplay and out-of-this-world Oscar-winning direction are right on key. "The Deer Hunter" is important film-making that has a strong message about life, death and love. It is a movie that should be experienced by everyone at least once. 5 stars out of 5.', u'0.173874', u"I cannot fathom the absolute horror that war brings to a persons life, but never has a film depicted it more harrowing than The Deerhunter. At 182 minutes, it seemed to fly by, leaving me wanting more and wishing this would not end. all facets are explored, all people's emotions are laid bare, not just the combatants. If we obviously did not know better, one would have to say this was a British film, as it has all the best elements that British movie making displays. i can eulogise for hundreds of lines, but this really is the ONLY American movie i can think of (others? apart from taxi driver) that is RAW. A strange word i know but the movie oozes a raw edge to it. Immense performances from all concerned, and if i had to say, i believe i have not seen Christopher Walken in a better role. One of the very few films i deservedly give 10/10. A must for any collection and a stunning example of every aspect of film making coming together, albeit for a sombre depiction of life.", u'-0.0132102', u"Those other negative comments that suggest that maybe this movie was good when it came out, but hasn't aged well, are dead wrong! I waited in line to see it on Opening Night in 1978. As a Vietnam veteran and a huge DeNiro fan, I was really looking forward to the first big movie about Nam. And it was as hideous, boring, exploitive, senseless, and unrealistic that night as it is now! They're going to Nam the next day?!? Without any kind of basic training or anything? The Walken character survives how many years playing Russian roulette?? How does DeNiro get away with that beard in Special Forces? I knew many soldiers from Western Pennsylvania steel mills, but not one with Walken's blow-dried hair-do that not even New York dancers were wearing till the late '70s! Okay, so let's suspend disbelief and not criticize its lack of anything vaguely realistic. In that case, we are left with a boring, long, boring, disjointed, boring, meaningless, exploitive piece of crap that had nothing whatever to do with the Vietnam War. And did I mention boring? For those who want a movie about the Vietnam War, I recommend Apocalypse Now, Full Metal Jacket, Platoon, and a wonderful almost-unknown Burt Lancaster movie called Go Tell The Spartans that also came out in '78. Almost every Vietnam vet I know liked Apocalypse Now -- almost all thought The Deer Hunter was crap. And Cimino's later career supplies ample evidence for that point of view!", u'-0.455335', u"The first hour of this movie concerns a bunch of guys at a wedding reception. They spend their time drinking and not saying much, so we don't know who they are. Hmmmmm. Eventually we learn that these guys are going to 'fight for their country in Vietnam' (apparently without joining the army first.) At this point, you'll really start to go 'hmmmm....' The guys, who work in Pennsylvania, leave the wedding reception, still boxed out on beer, and travel (a 45 minute drive) to the Canadian Rockies to hunt elk. Hmmmm. \n\nNext, they show up in Vietnam. Apparently they made a special deal with the U.S. Army to serve in the same squad. Hmmmmm.\n\nNext, they are all in a hut in the jungle playing Russian Roulette. I think they are being forced to by sinister villains, but I'm not sure. Hmmmmm.\n\nTwo of the guys are rescued, but one guy disappears, to pursue a career as world reigning Russian roulette champion. Seven or three or five years later, DeNiro goes back to Saigon to rescue him. Apparently the roulette champion had been lucky enough to last years playing this deadly game and made a fortune. Will his luck hold out? Hmmmmmm. Anyway, The last day the Americans are in Vietnam, and refugees are killing themselves to rush the last helicopter at the embassy, DeNiro shows up on a commercial flight, casually strolling through the Saigon airport. Hmmmmm.\n\nI think they call it suspension of disbelief. Hmmmmmm.", u'0.0613386', u'Story about three buddies (played by Robert DeNiro, John Savage and Christopher Walken) going off to Vietnam. They\'re all gung ho about going and aren\'t prepared for what they experience. They all return home--one mentally affected, one physically handicapped and one dead.\n\nThis came out in 1978 and was immediately hailed as a masterpiece. It was one of the few movies that dealt with Vietnam realistically (somewhat). It also really hit a lot of Vietnam vets and young guys hard. A friend of mine went to see it and after it was over he was in the mens room and saw 4 guys in their 20s crying nonstop. I saw it around that time. I was in high school and was bored silly. I figured at the time I was too young to appreciate it. I saw it years later and was STILL bored.\n\nFor starters--it\'s too long--3 hours. The wedding sequence at the beginning goes on and on and ON. You learn nothing more about the characters than you could have in about 10 minutes. Even after they return home it moves slowly. The Russian roulette sequences (which were VERY hotly debated) never happened in reality. There\'s no proof at all that it ever happened. Also one character makes a living out of playing Russian roulette???? Come on! The Vietnamese are portrayed as victims or monsters--very black and white. No shadings of character. With the sole exceptions of DeNiro, Savage and Meryl Strepp the acting sucks. Seriously--HOW did Walken get an Oscar for this? DeNiro should have gotten it. And the irony at the end (when they\'re all singing "God Bless America") was SO heavy-handed it was almost comic. Wildly overpraised and overrated. This does not belong in the top 250 on IMDb. A 1 all the way.', u'-0.310113', u'Of the first two American films about the Vietnam war with a priceless artistic weight, "the Deer Hunter" wins hands down over "Apocalypse Now" (1979) although Francis Ford Coppola\'s work is very potent too.\n\nBut would it be judicious to pigeonhole Michael Cimino\'s work in the category of the war movie? Unlike Coppola\'s visual nightmare, only the central part takes place in Vietnam and the filmmaker barely shoots one fight sequence before Mike (Robert De Niro), Nick (Christopher Walken) and Stevie (John Savage) are prisoners of the enemy and are forced to play Russian roulette in the notorious unbearable scene. Actually "the Deer Hunter" is a film straddling two movie genres: the war movie and the social drama. Rather than shooting a political film, Cimino chose to represent us the deadly impact this nightmarish war had on an American community whose hopes and values disappeared.\n\nDividing his work in three parts: before, during, after and thanks to symbolical images, scenes or even eloquent details, Cimino used and honed his own cinematographic language to set out his stalls and the result can only command respect and admiration. Each sequence could be separately taken and carefully studied like the representation of the humdrum but reassuring living standards of the blue-collars with their everyday rituals (Cimino\'s obsession with rites and customs) revolving around factory, bar, friends and hunting (you have to admire the startling contrast between the dirty little town and the gorgeous, wild landscapes). Archetypal sequences that epitomize life and it reaches its height in the famous, unusually long wedding sequence. Perhaps Cimino wanted to stretch this sequence to make his characters take advantage of this rapture moment. But even during this state of bliss that lives inside them, the imminent tragedy ominously lurks: Mike and Nick gently laugh at an officer who remains dumb and when Stevie and his wife have to drink in a dish, some drops fall on her wedding dress. This sequence also epitomizes the polar opposite to the sequence of the Russian roulette in which death is just around the corner. After the war when Mike comes back to the small town, he\'s completely altered. Before, a devotee of deer hunting; after his traumatizing experience, he can\'t kill one. He\'s unable to talk about about what he went through and for his sidekicks, the experience of a war like this one is incomprehensible. Cimino eschews classical, predictable storytelling and hasn\'t recourse to psychological study. Nearly everything occurs in gestures and looks while the suggested has a meaty part in the dialogs. Besides, during the whole movie the topic of the war is barely mentioned by the characters. A lyrical whiff blows on the film, dovetailed by Cimino\'s astounding directing.\n\nCimino was consumed with ambition and went at it hammer and tongs to get his crew completely involved in his project. He was hard on his actors (Robert De Niro has often said that "the Deer Hunter" was his most grueling role to date) and was obsessed with absolute control. But the efforts weren\'t vain at all and gave a heartfelt, invaluable yardstick in war movie, even American cinema which reached the streets when America rose from its ruins. It was also the beginning of the end for Cimino, a filmmaker ahead of his time and on the fringe of cinematographic trends.', u'-0.0380569', u'Clearly, there are many people who value this movie. I have no problem admitting that I just "don\'t get it" -- as long as those who like this movie are open to the idea that, just possibly, there is an elephant in the room that they are overlooking. Actually, from some other comments, it looks like some other people have seen the elephant, but think that it fits well into the room.\n\nMy case rests on the fact that this is meant to be a "serious" movie, but I have had less trouble suspending disbelief with the X-Men than with this movie: if the main characters had escaped from the Vietcongs using their super-powers, that would have left me less uncomfortable than what I have seen in this movie.\n\nSome other IMDb reviewers have mentioned the extreme improbability of Nick making a living out of playing Russian roulette professionally. But the weirdness does not end there, because his buddy Michael returns to Vietnam to rescue him from his insanity. How? why, by playing Russian roulette with him, of course! You might think that this is the action least likely to bring the two of them back together to the USA -- and you would be right, because Nick shoots himself during the game. The way it looks to me is that Michael unwittingly ends Nick\'s successful career.\n\nThe earlier escape scene is also absurd. It makes sense that Michael and Nick plan to escape by using the gun they are supposed to play Russian roulette with. It makes sense that they figure they need three bullets to escape. It might even make sense that, before starting to fire at the Vietcongs, they want to be sure that the next chamber has a bullet in it (although the way they make sure would mean a very likely failure for their plan, in real life). But why did the Vietcongs let them keep a gun with three bullets ready to be fired? The escape plan boils down to hoping that the Vietcongs will let them keep a loaded gun, if they survive Russian roulette. Nothing wrong with trying; but the scriptwriters should not have allowed them to survive both the odds of Russian roulette and the odds that at least one of the Vietcongs would use his brain.\n\nThe Russian roulette scenes are surreal. Watching them, I could feel no suspense whatsoever, in spite of the characters screaming themselves hoarse: I simply could not suspend my disbelief. I had the uncomfortable feeling of missing something: perhaps they were playing some other game that looks a lot like Russian roulette, except that the person with the gun knows whether the next chamber has a cartridge in it. That might help to explain both the escape from the Vietcongs and Nick\'s survival as a professional player, but it would introduce other difficulties, such as Nick shooting himself.\n\nNow, all of the above comments are about the Russian roulette scenes, and it might be said that i am overlooking the rest of the movie: that this is not a war movie, but a movie about the trauma of war. Maybe so, but suppose that you had seen the movie without the Russian roulette scenes: would you think that the movie could be improved by adding a few silly scenes?\n\nFor me, the addition of silly scenes means that i must take away one or two points from my rating. My rating is already pretty low because I "don\'t get" the rest of the movie, and in addition because I had high expectations for this movie and was disappointed; so i am giving the minimum rating to the movie as a whole.', u'-0.326004', u'Opening in Pennsylvania steel town that morning, Steven (John Savage) is going to get married\x85 Just a few days later, he and his best friends Michael (Robert De Niro) and Nick (Christopher Walken) will join the Army and go to Vietnam\x85 \n\nAll three are made prisoners of war who finally escape their ordeal, although with several complications\x85 The terrible experiences that they are subjected to change their whole life\x85 \n\nOver the course of more than three-hours of screen time, "The Deer Hunter" presents outrageous and impressive scenes of sadistic Vietcong force tossing grenades into shelters filled with helpless women and children, and later forcing American captives to play Russian roulette for their amusement, while the prison guards bet on the result\x85 \n\nWhatever his intention, Cimino goes courageously forth, staging with power his big end during the fall of Saigon, depicting the trauma of war and the effort of one friend to rescue the other\x85 \n\nThe extreme effects of the conflict provide indelible images, and make us feel the pain, the compulsion, the threat, and the terror of war\x85', u'-0.901279', u'"The story we tell ourselves about ourselves in order to account for what we are doing, is a lie. The truth lies outside, in what we do." - Zizek \n\nA near scene-for-scene remake of 1939\'s "The Four Feathers", Michael Cimino\'s "The Deer Hunter" tells the story of several friends (Robert DeNiro, Christopher Walken) from small town Pennsylvania. Early sequences watch as the gang work in a steel mill, congregate and go on hunting expeditions. Cimino\'s photography, aided by cinematographer Vilmos Zsigmond, is exceptional throughout, but his film quickly nosedives into pretentious, unintentionally funny territory. Cimino indulges in a prolonged wedding sequence (cribbed from Coppola who cribbed from Visconti), filters "Best Years of Our Lives" through a Vietnam era prism, has DeNiro run about naked like a Method Actor fishing for Oscars, and treats us to a forced sequence in which our heroes play Chopin on a piano whilst looking REALLY REALLY SERIOUS. This is a deep movie, see.\n\nThe hell of Industrial America then becomes the hell of the Vietnam War. Here our heroes, now American soldiers, watch North Vietnamese "savages" kill civilians. They\'re then captured by the Vietnamese and made to play Russian Roulette. They survive this ordeal, but Walken\'s character is pushed into madness and begins to play Russian Roulette for money in a Saigon gambling hall. Symbolically unable to escape the damage done by Vietnam, he spends six years there, gambling with bullets. You\'d think the law of averages would catch up with him, but no.\n\n"Don\'t leave me over there," Walken tells his buddy DeNiro, which leads to DeNiro having the longest delayed reaction in the history of cinema. Eight years later he goes back to Saigon in the hopes of finding Walken, a missing person\'s search which is apparently really easy. They find each other, Walken commits suicide (partially to punish - and prove his love to - "best man" DeNiro), the film ends with a funeral and a silly, unearned scene in which our gang sing "God Bless America". You can feel Cimino straining with every scene to make a GREAT EPIC. The film won five Oscars.\n\nLike most Vietnam war movies, "Hunter" hinges on romanticised madness. Deer hunting becomes a metaphor for "virtuous, humane kills" and Russian Roulette becomes a metaphor for the madness inducing chaos of Vietnam. As is typical of racist war films, the Vietnamese are portrayed as grinning (their dialogue is not even Vietnamese), Oriental savages (introduced with propagandistic scenes showing the NVA killing babies and women) and the "reason" for US defeat is sidestepped by making the Vietnam war itself incomprehensible. Where else but in a wholly irrational country could the US lose a war? \n\nWhilst several sequences play with irony (Russian-Americans playing Russian roulette etc), Cimino\'s tale is one of solemn tragedy. An account of what evil, sadistic, barbaric Vietnamese did to poor, innocent Americans, the film, like "Apocalypse Now", oozes macho self pity with a dash of counter-culture disillusionment and strained appeals to high culture (Conrad, Eliot, Chopin songs, Orthodox hymns etc). The film is silly elsewhere, with random helicopter rescues, love triangles, many cheesy "dramatic" scenes and exploitative Roulette sequences (why\'s everyone in Saigaon playing Roulette?) which Cimino shoe-horned from another Las Vegas themed script he was working on. Some critics, like Jonathan Rosenbaum, spotted the film\'s hokiness right away. Pulitzer Prize winner Peter Arnett would call it a "simplistic lie".\n\nAs with most war movies, the overriding message is "look what they did to us". Cimino perpetuates the racist stereotype that sustained much of America\'s involvement in Indochina, and hides behind designer madness and much irrationality. Compare to Pontecorvo\'s "Burn!", which offered a clear analysis of imperialist expansion, and "In the Year of the Pig" and "Hearts and Minds", two documentaries which the CIA waged war upon and whose theatres met with bomb threats.\n\nIn 2012, the Pentagon began The Vietnam War Commemoration Project, a 13 year, 65 million dollar propaganda effort to clean up the image of the Vietnam war. What are they covering up? The fact that the North Vietnamese constituted a political movement with near total local, popular support, that the US artificially divided Vietnam in disregard of Geneva negotiations (becase Eisenhower knew over 80 percent of the population would vote for Ho Chi Minh), that the US put in place and backed psycho puppet leaders, that even the South didn\'t support the US, that the US did everything it could to prevent unification and scuttle elections, that 4 million Vietnamese died, that more bombs were dropped than in all previous wars combined, that tens of thousands were assassinated by the CIA\'s Phoenix Program, that nukes were threatened 13 times, that US land-mines still kill Vietnamese to this day (52000 and counting), that millions of gallons of poison, herbicide and chemicals were used, that US campaigns in Cambodia were directly responsible for the rise of the Khmer Rouge under Pol Pot (later supported with 89 million dollars) and the genocide which took place afterwards, that the first Tonkin Gulf incident was started by US aggression, that the second never happened, that over five million villagers were forcibly displaced, that political prisoners were jailed/tortured in "tiger cages" and that 90 percent of Northern levees, hospitals, villages, towns and industries were intentionally bombed. The US has similarly destabilised over 80 countries in the past 100 years. And yet here\'s a film with the NVA torturing small-town Americans.\n\nDuring and after the Iraq war, US soldiers committed suicide at a rate of 1 every 25 hours. This figure doesn\'t include attempted suicides (roughly 1900 in 2009 alone). In Vietnam, the number of US suicides totalled about 150,000. In real life, these vets were trapped in a double bind, unable to reconcile their belief that their conflict was righteous with their actual deeds; they thus nihilistically self-destructed. Cimino wants you to believe the opposite; that the NVA pushed men to suicide.\n\n3/10 \x96 Depressing.', u'-0.376456', u"This movie is just awful. Take away 1 scene (De Niro shooting the guards) and the average rating for this movie would probably drop 2 to 3 points. And that scene had nothing to do with the actual Vietnam war but was just sort of 'COOL'. \n\nI enjoy war flicks and Apocalypse Now is one of my all-time favorite movies.. But this movie just didn't make sense.\n\nThe editing is terrible.. The wedding scene just goes on and on. I suspect it was the best footage they had shot and they just couldn't bring themselves to cut any of it. Then the war starts.. We see a brief helicopter scene and next thing we know our heroes are in a POW-camp? Excuse me?! What just happened? After that point the movie just gets progressively worse.\n\nThe plot is just outrageous. You don't have to be a statistician to understand that Walken having a successful career in Russian roulette is absurd.. His successful streak ending just the moment his buddy comes looking for him makes it even more silly. \n\nI guess many people see good symbolism for war in the Russian roulette theme and thats part of why this movie scores so high... but come on, you cant reduce the Vietnam war to something that never happened in it..\n\nThis movie insults my intelligence! Its a silly Hollywood action flick posing as a meaningful war drama.. and quite possibly the most overrated movie of all times!", u'-0.435285'], u'tt1392190': [u"It's hard to believe that the same talented director who made the influential cult action classic The Road Warrior had anything to do with this disaster.\n\nRoad Warrior was raw, gritty, violent and uncompromising, and this movie is the exact opposite. It's like Road Warrior for kids who need constant action in their movies.\n\nThis is the movie. The good guys get into a fight with the bad guys, outrun them, they break down in their vehicle and fix it. Rinse and repeat. The second half of the movie is the first half again just done faster.\n\nThe Road Warrior may have been a simple premise but it made you feel something, even with it's opening narration before any action was even shown. And the supporting characters were given just enough time for each of them to be likable or relatable.\n\nIn this movie there is absolutely nothing and no one to care about. We're supposed to care about the characters because... well we should. George Miller just wants us to, and in one of the most cringe worthy moments Charlize Theron's character breaks down while dramatic music plays to try desperately to make us care.\n\nTom Hardy is pathetic as Max. One of the dullest leading men I've seen in a long time. There's not one single moment throughout the entire movie where he comes anywhere near reaching the same level of charisma Mel Gibson did in the role. Gibson made more of an impression just eating a tin of dog food.\n\nIn the previous movies, fuel and guns and bullets were rare. Not anymore. It doesn't even seem Post-Apocalyptic. There's no sense of desperation anymore and everything is too glossy looking. And the main villain's super model looking wives with their perfect skin are about as convincing as apocalyptic survivors as Hardy's Australian accent is.\n\nSome of the green screen is very obvious and fake looking, and the CGI sandstorm is laughably bad.\n\nThere's no tension, no real struggle, or any real dirt and grit that Road Warrior had. Everything George Miller got right with that masterpiece he gets completely wrong here.", u'-0.365002', u"I'm not completely sure what I was expecting from Fury Road, but it was more than this. This is the latest example of Hollywood rehashing a successful and good movie franchise solely for profit. It's mindless, repetitive action sequences melded between horrible acting and overused clich\xe9s.\n\nOne of the allures of this series is seeing the outlandish road vehicles that are used, and in this the movie mostly delivers. You have the high-powered Warrior Rig driven by Furiosa. There's battle vehicles equipped with spikes, rigs with counter-balanced poles for launching warriors into other vehicles, and there's even a vehicle equipped with large bass drums and a stack of speakers that would make KISS jealous with a psychotic guitarist wailing away for our musical enjoyment. And of course, each vehicle comes equipped with more explosive arsenal than a battle ship. And it's put to good use.\n\nHowever, once you get past the eye candy, you realize there's nothing else to it. The story is weak. The characters are weaker. And the acting is the worst. The movie never drew me in. Not even close. Whenever the movie 'tried' to add depth and be dramatic, it was painful and embarrassing to watch. The scene where Furiosa reacts to finding out her birth home is gone by taking off her prosthetic arm and dropping down to her knees may be the worst movie scene I've ever watched. And it says something when the most interesting character is Nux, a relentless slave/warrior who actually has a mind of his own and decides to help Max and Furiosa in their quest. Of course, one of Immortan Joe's wives falls for him, representing one of the many poorly executed clich\xe9s this movie is riddled with.\n\nI can watch a superficial action movie and enjoy it for what it is, to a point. This one, however, is just generally so poorly executed that it leaves a lot to be desired. I didn't hate it, but I have absolutely no desire to see it again.", u'-0.341679', u"First off, this is another movie in which the action sequences last so long that you can go to the bathroom, get a soda, come back and still find the same people fighting the same fights you saw begin 15 minutes earlier. Personally, these type of action movies bore me to tears, because the story has to stop moving every time we watch one of these extended action sequences. In terms of story, the good guys and the bad guys meeting is a plot point. Then they fight, then one of them wins. As an audience member, I'm ready to know who wins as soon as they start fighting. And I really need the lead characters to have some logical reasons for doing what they are doing. \n\nHere's my spoiler: They drive away from someplace for half the movie and then decide to turn around and go back. The only thing that happened was that they picked up a gang of old ladies. That's as deep as it gets right there. They're running away, fighting the whole way, they get away and then they decide to go back, so they have to fight the whole way. Nothing makes much sense, no characters are anything but as shallow as they could have possibly been made. If you like Avatar, you'll like this movie. If you liked Mad Max and Road Warrior, you're going to be angry about how that franchise was exploited in name and setting only. \n\nThis character isn't Mad Max. He doesn't have a dog, he doesn't eat dog food, he doesn't eat anything. Nobody in the film ever eats anything. Nor are people clamoring for gasoline, they all just seem to have it. There's an issue with water, but it makes no sense and the entire weak plot seems to depend on it. The movie ends with giant water valves being opened just like the air valves on Mars get turned on in the end of that Governor Arnold movie, I can't remember the name. The reviews calling this something new and different are absolute hogwash. This is nothing but things blowing up and cars crashing for two hours, which, by the way, is another egregious offense of these silly movies. They take a 90 minute movie with a great story line, and they strip it of plot and somehow extend it by 30 minutes. It's a scary trend, the kind of thing that makes one think Idiocracy was prophetic. The less the story and the more things blow up, the higher the ratings. Ridiculous!", u'-0.421129', u'It\'s troubling that a movie can be singularly focused on loud explosions and violence with no plot, dialogue, or character development, yet receive widespread critical acclaim. This is the first film I\'ve ever seen that actually reminded me of the type the populace in Idiocracy would find enthralling. \n\nTo be clear, there are no redeeming qualities about this film. None. And I went in with pretty low expectations, figuring this would be some fun, mindless entertainment i.e The Expendables or any Jason Statham movie. The first few minutes weren\'t too bad: it looked cheesy, but it had potential. But then I realized that this movie is one long (boring) car chase...and that\'s it. Really. I mean it really was boring -- exactly what an action movie should not be. The car chases are all one and the same. After a few minutes, it just isn\'t exciting.\n\nThere is no story. The two leads drive to the middle of nowhere, then turn around. That\'s it. Two of the characters mention they are "looking for redemption" or some other trite nonsense, but the audience is never told why. Not that they\'d care. Is the story about survival? At first you\'d think so. Max mentions in the opening credits that he is a man reduced to one trait: survival. Yet at the film\'s end, when he finally has an opportunity to survive....he chooses not to? What? The movie was bad enough until this. Actually I forgot, there is an incredibly forced romance between two side characters that does nothing to further the story. This is a B movie with a big budget.\n\nLikewise, there is essentially no dialogue, save a few grunts from Max and cringe-inducingly awkward lines from the rest. \n\nThere isn\'t any character development, but then again, the characters themselves resemble video game characters. There are no characters to develop, just two-dimensional avatars used for an excuse to show explosions. \n\nSo what is this film\'s targeted demographic? I\'m not sure. I can imagine that if you are a 13-year old boy, really into cars/trucks/slipknot, pretty redneck, and probably a little slow, this movie may seem pretty cool. I mean it does have ridiculous cars/trucks outfitted with lots of weapons, spikes, flame-exhausts, (breast-milk?) and guys playing "cool" guitar riffs for no apparent reason. There\'s also lots of explosions and fighting. And scantily clad women. And tornadoes. And skulls. On top of all that, there is no need to pay attention to petty plot lines or dialogue in order to enjoy the film. Hell once they reach the desert, the movie repeats itself as the leads drive the truck back through the same place being chased by the same guys for no discernible reason. \n\nThe special effects aren\'t even that good. The whole movie looks fake. I know they went to great measures to avoid using CGI, but honestly, I thought I\'d at least be impressed by the special effects, since clearly nothing was spent on anything else. And I\'m not the kind of person who usually notices when CGI is used or not. \n\nTruly awful. I would rate it lower if I could. The only recent movie that may have actually been worse that this was Lucy, which was also mind-numbingly stupid. \n\nAs the principal in Billy Madison once said, "everyone in this room is now dumber for having (watched) it." AVOID', u'-0.492377', u'I can\'t believe why people like this movie unless you\'re a fan of no-brainer action-packed movies without a story. 2 hours of non stop rubbish without dialogue. I was a fan of the original Mad Max and at first Tom Hardy seemed like a great actor for the role, but this movie didn\'t do him justice. He did well as Bane but he wasn\'t the star in this movie, almost like a support character. I almost fell asleep and left the theater because I can find better ways to waste my time. The only positive thing I can say is that the world looks great as well as the props. Good job on that George Miller. At least there\'s something good about it. The trailer was promising and since many people praised this movie, I gave it a shot. How can you watch this for a second time "to indulge in the deep content and story it provides". There was absolutely nothing in there. Yes beautiful woman, owned by a dictator who holds all the water and controls the people. Let\'s escape, make a diversion, trap him, beat the living hell out of him and return to be happily accepted as the new rulers. Hurray.', u'-0.0272512', u'Absolute rubbish. This movie caters to 13-year olds (sorry 13-y olds, no offense). Skulls on the cars - cool (sorry, the correct spelling is KOOL)! Skull on the steering wheel - KOOL! Ordinary spears causing explosions every time they hit something - KOOL! Silly masks just for the sake of being silly - KOOL! Guy playing a flame-throwing guitar on a truck while chasing and everybody shooting - KOOL! Explosion - KOOL! Another explosion 1 sec later KOOL!!! And another one another second later - SUPER KOOL! You get the picture...\n\nI walked out after 1hr 15min. Where to begin...? There was no sense in anything characters did. No character was likable, nobody to root for, no character to care for. They are all morons that can\'t speak English. Max (was it?) points to the cutter, then to the chain, then he grunts. How about saying "You, Blondie! Get those cutters over here and cut this chain!" There is NO SENSE in anything! First, they chase and capture this guy. Then they chain him to the front of the car while engaging in a deadly chase. When he finally breaks free, you would think he would make immediate allies with Charlize\'s characters as they seem to have the same enemy. But no! They fight and growl at each other. Then one of the girls who was running away from the bad guy wants all of a sudden to go back. Then they make friends with the silver-spray-mouth zombie/albino who was chasing them and trying to kill Furiosa! Yeah, poor thing had a rough childhood! I was bored to tears and upset that I paid for this piece of crap. When I walked out, it felt like I was under the water drowning and finally got to breath some air!', u'-0.491394', u"if you wanna go and see this movie, please expect nothing but frustrating, dazing, predictable outcome action, and then just when you think the movie is ending you get an extra 30-45 minutes of the same action same explosions, same cars and faces doing the same thing they did during the whole first half of the movie. Do not expect any engaging drama or any plot of any kind, but here's the story: post apocalypse, no water (yet there are hundreds of people alive and working), no fuel (yet they all have it in their vehicles), women escaping \x96 women returning back the same day. What a plot! Visually it was stunning, but that's all you get.", u'-0.208348', u"I saw the original mad max... it was violent, it had car battles, it had minimal character development. I had very realistic expectations going into the theater to see this new version.\n\nNever have I been more disappointed with a movie. The acting on both leads parts was mediocre at best, with the male lead switching from being well spoken to being capable of nothing but grunting.. \n\nThe story line seems to have been written and edited by remedial English students, the characters are unbelievable and seriously lack any character development, it has horrible motorcycle stunts... and guys bouncing back and forth on poles of all things.\n\nand come on.. a flame-throwing guitar and fat women being milked for no explained reason to trade for gasoline to power the flame throwing guitar?... it's full of shitty clich\xe9s... badly cut scenes.. and lots of explosions. \n\nSave your money see anything else and you will be better off.", u'-0.221186', u"Mad Max Fury Road is George Miller's return to the franchise he started way back in 1979 with Mad Max. I will start by saying this movie was absolutely batsh** insane. It was filled right to the brim with continuous over the top bloody ridiculous action sequences that keep you on the edge of the seat and just amazed at what Is happening on screen. Now this film doesn't have much of a plot at all but seriously you're not going into this film for an intense plot, this is a film that almost didn't even need one at all. The one thing I was worried about going in was whether I needed to have seen the previous films to understand this one and thankfully you don't, the story is independent of the previous film which was really helpful. \n\nThe characters were all awesome and it did an amazing job to introduce them all almost instantly and get right into the action. Max (Tom Hardy? and Furiosa (Charlize Theron) were were great and extremely likable characters. Even the villain who I will just call Sweet Tooth was so great, he wasn't anything too special but was a great threat throughout the film. \n\nI just absolutely loved this movie, intense action from start to finish and didn't slow down at all, that made it ridiculously fun to watch. The great characters and the performances are awesome on screen and we're always interesting to watch. If there was ever a Twisted Metal movie, this is what it would be. Nothing really let the film down and everything really worked, such a great time and the best cinema experience this year so far. - 10", u'0.402069', u'George Miller returns with a bang and takes the helm of this crazy 2hr bonkers extravaganza named Mad Max: Fury Road. First of all, the stunts and action sequences are SPECTACULAR. Tom Hardy breaths life into Max Rockatansky and Charlize Theron is excellent and emotionally perfect as Furiosa. The story opens, with Immortan Joe who has young ladies as his wives, but he\'ll goes down when they escape the sadist\'s hands. Max, who has a violent past with Joe\'s cronies, decides to help Imperior Furiosa take the girls somewhere safe. Furiosa can\'t trust Max, and neither can he. So it all comes down to Joe\'s cronies fighting against them reaching to their destination. The movie is a bananas car chase for the runtime, as Max and Furiosa work together to fight against the evils. And then, there is Nux, a bonkers "really skin coloured" guy, who works with Joe, played well by Nicholas Hoult. The 3D really pays off, and is worth the extra ticket. The movie puts all other action movies of shame, the effects really pop out. Well, this is a definite masterpiece. One of the best movies of the year, one of the best action movies ever made and the role of Theron\'s life. Miller is truly a mastermind as stated clearly in the trailer. This exceeded my expectations, and will exceed yours as well. The dark style, dark comedy and the over the top characters make a return in this reboot. Must watch, and worth the extra IMAX 3D ticket.', u'0.116745', u'first of all , i am not fond of writing reviews pertaining to movies but this movie reluctantly compelled me to write a review for the first time. So lets start,i had been desperately waiting for this movie since long and today i got a chance to watch it and after watching it i was left agape with incredulity that how a movie like this is being applauded by the masses , Seriously it had nothing, except for extraordinary nonsense action. This movie is devoid of a sane story but in fact according to me it neither have a story nor a plot and regretfully i have to say that this is the worst movie i have seen in recent history. Mad max fury road is highly overrated and is mocking other movies which have ratings between 8 and 8.7. Albeit, I am a huge fan of Tom Hardy and Chalize Therone but their acting could not save it from becoming a complete ruin. i am giving it a one point and seriously if there had been an option to rate a movie below one point then i would have given it much lower points. Its also a suggestion to IMDb developers that they should ameliorate the movie rating algorithm and incorporate an option that can rate movies below the current lowest mark so that people should rate according to their aspirations. Finally i am exhorting that do not watch this movie its a detestable and a ridiculous movie.', u'-0.717478', u"An action essential through and through, it's plain and simple! Since the days of 'Die Hard' and 'Terminator', the action genre has turned into a repetitive, over-the-top array of films trying too hard to create entertaining sequences that instead look too cheesy due to bad composition or an overuse of CGI, of course along the way we have had some fine exceptions in the style of 'Casino Royale' and 'The Dark Knight', but certain directors *cough* Michael Bay... don't seem to be able to use their knowledge of an action sequence to its full potential and instead have constant fiery explosions and over-the-top shaky camera-work among other things... oh but then there's 'Mad Max: Fury Road', talk about epic action pieces. It has been 30 years since the release of 'Beyond Thunderdome' back in 1985, and George Miller decided to return to the directorial chair for a Mad Max reboot, and my God, he truly is a mastermind of action. After creating the epic scale of an action film in the form of 'Mad Max: The Road Warrior' it was going to be hard to live up to the previous films in the franchise, but Miller didn't just do that, he excelled at it and instead beat his previous films. With Tom Hardy as the new face of Max and Namibia as the new backdrop for post- apocalyptic Australia, 'Fury Road' is an exhilarating action fest that goes beyond its boundaries in creating what might just be one of the greatest action films ever made. Hearing that nearly 90% of the stunts and effects were practical literally blew me away, the sequences are extravagant and complex with frequent fireballs and car crashes filling the screen. George Miller's 2015 vigorous tale blends emotion and brutality with drama and action to reignite Australia's greatest film franchise and create the epitome of the action genre.", u'0.225716', u'It is almost hard too put into words how bad this movie was: The plot was virtually nonexistent , Most of the acting (bar Hardy and Theoren) was absolutely diabolical ,The script was like a ten year old wrote it, And Oh My God what was with that guy and the flaming guitar???\n\nBefore you assume that I hate action films and that I am only giving this movie a bad review because I hate action films. Your wrong. Action is my favorite movie genre , and I was so excited to see this movie , but during the film I actually found myself checking my watch every five or ten minutes because it dragged on for so long , and for what ? Absolutely nothing.\n\nThis is probably one of the worst action films I have ever seen in my entire life and I do not recommend it too anybody. The only really good thing about this movie was the visual effects , which where great.\n\nFinal verdict : 3/10', u'-0.49865', u'I have a theory on why so many people love this movie, despite what are absolutely glaring flaws that many of us see.\n\na) So many people waited 35 years for a new Mad Max movie that any movie will do.\n\nb) The hype train around the "feminist" angles of the film had a bunch of people voting an agenda and not the film\'s actual quality.\n\nFlaw One: everything is a ridiculously simplistic caricature. \n\nGas Town makes gasoline. The Bullet Farm makes bullets. The War Boys are an all-male army. Immortan Joe promises immortality. Furiosa is furious. Mad Max is semi-insane. Splendid is beautiful. Capable is capable. The Dag blurts things out. Fragile is fragile. The Knowing is wise. Rictus Erectus is strong and tall.\n\nHow bad does it get? The Citadel is patriarchal, and the director doesn\'t want you to possibly miss this fact, so he has a "Dad" who literally keeps The Wives in a vault and locked into chastity belts, literally milks his Cows to produce Mother\'s Milk, visibly pines for healthy sons so he can fill his War Boys, and literally sends those War Boys off to die so they can enter Valhalla. That\'s pretty much every negative stereotype about masculinity that you can dredge up, delivered directly to the temple by a sledgehammer. \n\nAnd, of course the reverse is true: The Wives are all model beautiful, fecund, and they pine for the Green Place where stuff still grows, and who tends the Green Place? The kind and beneficent all-female Vulvolani (yes, there\'s a tribe named for their frigging vulva) who loathe men and carry around a cache of seeds in a medical bag. \n\nDo you get it? Masculinity kills, femininity grows. \n\nYou don\'t get a much more blatant thematically, than two artificially created poles, a male one around destruction and war, and a female one around growth and fecundity. Miller\'s film reads like he\'s a 15 year old, naive Utopian, not 70.\n\nFlaw Two: there\'s no plot. \n\nFemale slaves flee the patriarchy in search of the mythological matriarchy. They find out that myth doesn\'t hold up to reality, and turn around to topple the patriarchy. The entire movie is the car chase away from the Citadel, and then the car chase back to the Citadel.\n\nFlaw Three: Non Sequitor after Non-Sequitor after Non-Sequitor. \n\nIn a film where the land is referred to as poisoned and tainted, repeatedly, and it\'s alluded to as being irradiated to the point of not being able to bear life, such that even the Green Place gets tainted and decays, The Citadel manages to grow all sorts of plants, just by drilling for water, and the Many Mothers still have viable seeds. Selective radiation for the win!\n\nIn an all-male society, where women are literally enslaved, Immortan Joe just turns a blind eye to very female Furiosa, lets her compete with the men of the War Boys and rise up through the ranks to become Imperator? And we\'re expected to believe that she does this despite the role being filled by an ex-model, and despite the fact she\'s only got one arm? I guess he can turn that patriarchy off, after all ... at least when the plot needs a Deus Ex Machina on demand. \n\nImmortan Joe values his wives so highly he locks them into a vault and into chastity belts, but a housekeeper can spring them and somehow gets access to a shotgun when most of the War Boys don\'t even have firearms? Deus Ex Machina number two. \n\nMad Max is feral, having clearly survived for years in the wasteland by his wits alone, but he\'s caught in the first two minutes of the film in a cinematic afterthought? Deus Ex Machina number three.\n\nNux needs a "blood bag" to survive, and Max is a valuable universal donor, but they strap him to the front of a vehicle going into combat, in the desert, while driving at high speed? Deus Ex Machina number four and five, this time to justify why Max is even in the film that\'s named after him. \n\nMax has just beat her up, then shot at her, commandeered her vehicle, and attempted to flee, but Furiosa teaches him the code to avoiding her kill switch on the rig a few minutes later? Everyone\'s paranoid survivalists in the wasteland ... except when they need to cooperate to forward the plot, apparently.\n\nThe Knowing discovers the War Boy, Nux, hidden on the rig and she instantly falls for him, and he for her? From enemies looking to kill each other to mind-lovers, in one scene? Of course, it has to happen, because Nux has to sacrifice himself to save those lovely, lovely women at the end of the film. The shoe-horned quasi romance is Deus Ex Machina number 987.\n\nFuriosa is just one of Joe\'s Imperators, but when she returns with The Wives, the entire Citadel f\xeates her like she\'s the second coming of Christ? Not one of the dozens of semi-brainwashed War Boys in training decides to fight back? Immortan Joe\'s midget son doesn\'t command them to fight her? It\'s essentially a religious cult, but apparently the only fanatics are in the cars.\n\nFlaw Four: this isn\'t a Mad Max film.\n\nIt\'s clearly a set up to transition from Mad Max to Furiosa going forward in the series. Anyone who can visit Wikipedia knows that the next movie is Mad Max: Furiosa directly. Max has a dozen lines, spends half the movie chained up, and is clearly not the protagonist.\n\nDon\'t jerk people around, Miller.\n\nSummary: this film took literally 12 years to make and for half of that period, the film didn\'t even have a script and worked solely from a story board. It shows.', u'-0.37708', u'This must be one of the worst movies of all time. 2 hours of shootings and blasts. There is a lot of action, but it is the same through the hole movie. People left the theater before the movie ended, There is no story. It\'s a chase for 2 hours, where the main character (should be) Mad Max has a role as a sidekick. The movie title should have been "Furiousa". Mad Max has only a few lines, and after each sentence, he growls. The movie starts of well, but after 15 min. It is downhill with silly conversation. Normally a good action movie should be entertaining and you Would leave the theater with a smile, but not here. Then in the middle, we have a lot of fire, shootings and blasts and a lot of stunt/animated scenes. But it does not have any power It\'s just the same over and over again. The end has a brief rise, but again ends poorly and foreseen. The old Mad Max movies starring Mel Gibson had power and lines with humor and bite. Maybe they are going for a new story in this movie.....but there is none to be found. Crap!', u'-0.533725'], u'tt1979320': [u"What a breath of fresh air... A brilliant film in every respect. I was lucky enough to this movie at a special preview and I cant tell you how great a film this is... At first you think its about racing cars, but its not it really does give you an insight into the human condition...\n\nThe rivalry between Hunt and Lauder is just played brilliantly... The race sequences are superb, really taking you back to the 70s... The heyday of this awesome sport. It shows the end of an era where the gentlemen drivers begin to give way to professional sportsmen and the end (in my opinion) of the excitement of the sport. It shows what a pale reflection today's F1 is of this once great sport, and what great characters we have lost...\n\nA real must see movie", u'0.706985', u'The film is just over 2 hours long, but when it was over it seemed like I had been in the cinema about 30 minutes. \n\nThe film centres on the battle for the 1976 Formula 1 World Championship, and the rivalry between the Austrian "professor" Nikki Lauda and the British playboy James Hunt. \n\nThe two are depicted as enemies, but in actual fact they were good friends who trusted and respected each other on, as well as off-track. This bit of artistic licence does not spoil the film and is reasonable in order to make the battle between the two for the F1 crown more intense. \n\nThe film is nicely paced. We are introduced to both characters through their own narrative and scenes that leave the watcher in no doubt as to their background and philosophy on life. \n\nThe two are first seen in competition in 1970 at a Formula 3 race at Crystal Palace (where they have a coming together) and sets the scene for the rivalry throughout the film. I\'m not sure if this is further artistic licence. The two definitely did race each other in F3, but I am not convinced as to whether this actual incident occurred. \n\nAfter that we are given a whistle stop journey between 1973 (when Hunt came into F1) to 1975. We are shown the dangerous nature of F1 at the time with the Francois Cevert accident at Watkins Glen in gory detail \x96 although this does not seem like gratuitous, but necessary to bring home just how unforgiving the sport was back then \x96 and it truly was (of the top 12 points scorers in 1976, F1 cars were to claim 3, 1 ended up in a wheelchair and 1 had his career ended by a leg crunching crash). \n\nWe are then taken to 1976 and that titanic struggle for the World Crown. Only one real issue here \x96 the British Grand Prix result, but I suspect this was simplified in the interests of time. \n\nThe casting is superb. Chris Hemsworth, an Aussie, does an excellent job on public schoolboy James Hunt, while Daniel Bruhl both sounds and looks frighteningly like the Austrian. There is little room for a supporting cast amongst the drivers which is a shame \x96 only Clay Regazzoni has a part of any real substance. Peterson, Watson, Depailler, Scheckter, Andretti et al could have featured a little more I think. What did their contemporaries think of the two protagonists? The supporting cast is mainly required for Hunt \x96 Lord Hesketh, "Bubbles" Horsley and Teddy Mayer / Tyler Alexander of McLaren, while the Ferrari team principals are rarely seen. \n\nThe love angle is perfectly catered for by Olivia Wilde (Hunt\'s first wife Suzy) and the gorgeous Alexandra Maria Lara - of Downfall fame \x96 as the future Marlene Lauda. Both give quality performances. \n\nThe attention to detail is superb. Although the tracks are not the actual ones (for understandable reasons) the cars, the helmets, the sponsors are all authentic. The film "feels" like it\'s happening in the 70\'s. \n\nFor anyone interested in great personal stories, F1, the 70\'s, cars or just like to see a great film, then Rush is for you.', u'0.223543', u"Really. \n\nHis performance in Rush came as a huge surprise. This is his best performance by quite some margin, a role which he plays with a great deal of maturity and respect. He plays Hunt with just the right level of arrogance, cockiness, confidence and audacity to convince you that he was real life 70's playboy James Hunt, a man destined to live fast and die young.\n\nBruhl is superb as Niki too. It's a role that he deserves much recognition for, particularly his accent and mannerisms. Lauda was one of the first of a new generation of professional driver, driving the old playboy characters out of the sport and Bruhl nails this icy determination to succeed magnificently. \n\nA particular nod goes to Christian McKay's portrayal as the slightly eccentric, petrol head extraordinaire, ever so aristocratic but hopelessly financially incompetent Lord Hesketh. \n\nThe camera work is spectacular, none less so than with some very creative angles of the beautifully filmed on track action. The brief in-helmet camera shots are inspired, giving you a glimpse of the drivers world. CGI work will be spotted by the keen eyed, but you have to consider that without it that there are certain scenes involving priceless period machinery (the sound of a Cosworth DFV firing up and filling the cinema was worth the ticket price alone) that would be just impossible to film as accurately as they were depicted here with real machinery. As a result, they are able to use the CGI sparingly and to good effect.\n\nThe main facts of the 1976 season are on the whole handled very accurately. Certainly, some liberties are taken with poetic licence, but this is still a scripted film and not a documentary. The factually heavy writing of the script along with beautifully filmed and liberal use of period machinery being recorded at pace on real asphalt will be enough to keep the fans of the sport well represented.\n\nIt's a gripping telling of the 1976 Formula 1 season, which whilst not sharing the same shear spectacle of Howard's other 'too unbelievable to be true' film Apollo 13, Rush tells a story which would be just too unbelievable in terms of human bravery and personal destiny for any fictional story to be given credence. It's a tale which will be enough to hold the unfamiliar or casual viewer's attention with a steel firm grip to see how the different personalities handle the pressures of life both on and off the track and how rising to the top takes it's tole on these two polar opposite real life gladiators of the race track.\n\nWith the lead actors clearly committed to giving their best performances yet and a tastefully handled script, Ron Howard delivers a visually impressive account of events that may well become one of his most respected directorial efforts yet.\n\n10/10", u'0.618657', u"This is an amazing film. I can't recommend it highly enough for F1 fans like me, sports fans, or anyone interested in a story of rivalry i.e. something different to the unoriginal junk movies which get churned out each year.\n\nAll the crew involved should pat themselves on the back. They've done a fabulous job making this film critique, explore and honour two memorable F1 drivers.\n\nJames Hunt's fun, party lifestyle along with his brash and raw driving talent. This is contrasted against Niki Lauda's methodical thinking, technical brilliance and professional lifestyle. These two characters are total opposites but as their lives are explored it also acknowledges the value of an enemy, i.e. something to beat. I believe this is a commentary on human nature in that the best of us shines when we have something to beat or overcome.\n\nDo yourself a favour and see it now.", u'0.568019', u"Mr. Ron Howard is a great story teller, this movie is about human nature, love and tears.\n\nIt is difficult to make a good movie about car racing, especially to make one for the time period from 1970 to 1976. I don't know how they did it to bring those old F1 cars back to life. You will feel like you are really there watching the racing, it's really unbelievable.\n\nIt is truly touching to see each character played their perfect role for this movie, Chris Hemsworth did a great performance, he is such a talented and devoted actor. Daniel Br\xfchl also did a great job on portraying the eccentric and unsociable legendary F1 driver Niki Lauda.\n\nA great movie is like having a great meal, a good starter, a good soup/salad, a good main course and a good dessert, well balanced. Rush is that good meal, it's a fun ride!\n\nI have to say I really enjoyed watching this movie. Thank you Mr. Ron Howard for making this masterpiece.", u'0.632048', u"Having seen the trailers and TV set-up (BBC as a Grand Prix insert) I was thinking OK so I've probably seen the best of this and it's going to be 'clunky' in parts or too far up it's own a$$.\n\nBut hey we can all be wrong, Ron Howard has added depth to a story I knew well, the presentation has a feel for the era the colour's are sometimes harsh and edgy.\n\nThe set pieces are well researched, the owners of some of the classic F1 hardware must have had an enjoyable time (not quite so sure about the Insurance Underwriters).\n\nWhere the story hits the spot for me is the acting of the main protagonists, they have life and depth. Hemsworths presentation of James Hunt is uncanny it's like a documentary he's almost as good as Daniel Day-Lewis in Lincoln.\n\nIf your not a F1 fan or from the 70's it may not be more than a blokes film, but give it a go it is going to end up being a important as Apollo 13 in the life of Mr Howard and quite frankly is by far the best car racing movie ever", u'0.371856', u'In 1976, the rivalry between two brilliant racing car drivers, the British James Hunt and the Austrian Nikki Lauda, came to a head in the almost literally life-and-death struggle of the Formula One championship. American director Ron Howard ("Apollo 13", "A Beautiful Mind", "Frost/Nixon") and British scriptwriter Peter Morgan (both play and screenplay of "Frost/Nixon") have done a terrific job bringing the titanic struggle to the big screen, aided by some excellent casting and powerful sound and cinematography. Those were the days when most years a couple of drivers would be killed, so the stakes could not be higher.\n\nSensibly the car racing does not over-dominate, since this is essentially a character- driven conflict, but when the racing is on screen - notably in the final race - the excitement is visceral. The Australian Chris Hemsworth (previously best known as "Thor") and the Spanish-born German Daniel Br\xfchl ("Inglourious Basterds") are so good as the British and Austrian drivers respectively that the dialect coaches should receive a special commendation. Arguably Br\xfchl gives the stronger performance which should auger well for his future career.\n\nA great strength of this tale is that there is not a hero or a villain. Both drivers had privileged backgrounds and were superbly talented, but both were flawed. although in very contrasting ways, including styles of thinking, driving and womanising (Olivia Wilde as model Suzy Miller and Alexandra Maria Lara as aristocratic Marlene Knaus respectively).\n\nI never saw the recent film "Senna" (2010) so "Rush" reminded me most of the much older "Grand Prix" (1966), but what is stunning about "Rush" is that it all happened. A season of the fastest sport in the world decided in the last race by one point - you couldn\'t make it up. Rush to see the movie.', u'0.533411', u"Just come out the cinema in York from watching Rush! Oh my god! One of the most intense films I have watched in a very long time with gripping performances from Hemsworth and Br\xfchl! An extremely clever script from Peter Morgan in which he doesn't pick sides, but instead allows the audience to view these characters in their own light.\n\nI am a huge fan of F1 so when viewing a film relating to that sport it would be questionable that there are some anachronisms or minor problems. But no! There was not a single fault with this film, it is the most realistic sports film I have viewed! A film that portrays the rivalry between the British and Austrian world champions and the fateful crash. With some powerful dialogue from Lauda and Hunt.\n\nEven if you aren't a fan of F1, the intense action and no-holds adrenaline should keep you entertained from start to finish. With a great sway of emotions from melancholy to ecstatic! This film deserves the acclaimed reviews it has been receiving.", u'0.42672', u"As a Cineworld Card Holder I was invited to a screening last night of Ron Howards new movie Rush.\n\nBefore I start...I am not a F1 fan, but I knew enough of the history of the main protagonists to appreciate the film. The main set pieces of the film set a year before I was born in 1976, so mainly my knowledge was based on my Fathers recollection of the events. I'd seen James Hunt in interviews and recently watched footage with Niki Lauda so got an idea of the characters.\n\nThe film is bang on in period, cars fashion and sets the tone excellently, the cinematography is nothing short of breathtaking and the fx are very much in keeping with the period, no ridiculous CGI.\n\nThe acting, on the whole is nothing short of miraculous, Hemsworth and Bruhl are fantastic, particularly Hemsworth, who's accent, mannerisms and natural acting was a big surprise. I could see a few awards for this role. I have seen Bruhl in quite a few films and I am always impressed so this just continues the trend. All the support actors are very good in smaller roles.\n\nThe film is well paced for 2 hours and quite graphic, particularly a few accident scenes.\n\nDirection: Ron Howard - nice job, I'm not a massive fan and particularly after the da vinci/Angels fiasco's a big return to decent form. The flair was there but played safe (As normal) but let the story and the actors take centre stage.\n\nIf you like History in F1, a well documented rivalry and a film that capture this, watch it. It is similar to the excellent Control, Moneyball etc but with a bit of heart.\n\n8 1/2 out of 10", u'0.304672', u'DIRECTION Ron Howard is amazing. His camera work here is absolutely incredible. I wouldn\'t at all be surprised if the cinematography and the sound editing are nominated for Oscars. The engines roaring alongside Hans Zimmer\'s score really gets you into the mood. The backdrop is gritty with lots of dark and gray colors giving it a tough 1970\u2032s aesthetic. Howard places is camera so specifically and we get so many different angles that are gripping. Camera work inside the cars giving you the intense look of driving an F1 car as well as camera\'s on the grass looking up as they fly by. Howard\'s use of slow motion is also perfect and helps build the intensity of the rivalry he is exploring here. The racing is intense and the dangers are shown in some dramatic ways as the suspense keeps building up. The biggest problem is that Formula 1 isn\'t the biggest of sports here in the U.S. If people can get past that and go see this, they won\'t regret it.\n\nGrade: A\n\nSCRIPT The story follows two F1 drivers in the mid 1970\u2032s that don\'t always get a long but have a mutual respect for one another. It centers around British driver, James Hunt and the Austrian Niki Lauda. Peter Morgan\'s script is brilliant and Howard brings it to life in some really great ways. In essence, both characters are the protagonist and the antagonist of the story. The film explores Hunt and his immature ways but at the same time makes him very likable. Then the story switches to Lauda and his quest to live his own life outside the big family business, yet again making him likable. However, at the same time each take their own turn in being the "bad guy" and showing you qualities that make this person flawed and unlikable in some ways. But then the movie brings it back around showing you why these characters are good characters to root for and the mutual respect they have for one another. It\'s the competition that drives them in this story. What makes it so great though, is that the audience really gets to choose who they want to root for. They build up and tear down each character so flawlessly. The use of narration at the beginning and at the end was a perfect choice as well. The ending becomes a bit sentimental and hits the buttons that you\'d expect from Howard and company.\n\nGrade: A\n\nPERFORMANCES Daniel Br\xfchl and Chris Hemsworth are amazing. This is perhaps Hemsworth\'s best as he portray\'s James Hunt in some incredible ways. He\'s the dangerous driver that has Tony Stark mentalities in terms of partying, women and being extremely likable. Yet Hemsworth shows some depth and some emotion here as well which this character calls for in some ways. Br\xfchl, who you may know from Inglorious Basterds, almost steals the show. He\'s the Austrian car genius who becomes famous for knowing how to make the cars lighter and faster, thus making him part of the Ferrari team. One can argue he\'s the bigger lead here as he narrates a good chunk of the story and brings in some great perspectives. Br\xfchl\'s performance is spot on though and brings life to this character even when Lauda is more deadpanned. Olivia Wilde is good here although her character is a small role. This is about Br\xfchl and Hemsworth and they carry the movie extremely well.\n\nGrade: A+\n\nSCORE Freakin Hans Zimmer. The dude is on fire lately. A lot of people like to criticize Zimmer for having score\'s that are similar or nothing new but they work. His score for Man of Steel added a lot to that film and his score for The Lone Ranger was about the only good part of that movie. And his score for Rush was really great, again. It added a lot of intensity to the racing moments and has become something he\'s perfected. The score here is more laid back and in the backdrop though many moments but when the action ramped up, so did his score as well as your emotion.\n\nGrade: A-\n\nFINAL THOUGHTS Rush was an unexpected pleasant surprise. Given the sports stature of F1 in the U.S., I didn\'t have much expectations but Ron Howard usually delivers and he does once again. The cinematography is gorgeous and makes it visually very exciting. The performances are stand outs which makes the story feel so alive in many places.\n\nOverall Grade: A', u'0.57792', u"RUSH is such an enthralling movie!! Amazing direction by Ron Howard, strong performances by Chris Hemsworth and Daniel Bruhl (he exactly sounded like Niki Lauda). Hanz Zimmer is the man for scoring this movie. The movie is not about the sport, it's about the hateful and envious relationship between two rivals the whole world knows about. I did not expect this movie to surprise me so much as it did, the drama was invigorating and exciting at the same time. It was such an honor to meet Niki Lauda who flew himself specially from Monza, Italy for the premier at TIFF. Such an amazing night.\n\nThe movie is based on the rivalry of Britain's McLaren F1 driver James Hunt and Austrian driver Niki Lauda who represented Ferrari at the time. Great men!", u'0.413193', u'As Asif Kapadia\'s gripping and extremely moving 2010 documentary Senna \r proved, cinema audiences have a thirst for the larger-than-life \r characters that inhabit the Formula One track. The sport itself is \r frightfully dull (although I\'m sure plenty will disagree with that), \r but the sportsmen willing to lay down their life for a kick and a \r trophy are infinitely more fascinating, especially in the days of lax \r safety rules. The sport nowadays is little more than advertising on \r wheels, but when the likes of James Hunt and Niki Lauda battled it out \r on the track, epic rivalries were created, and no matter how talented \r these men were at driving these "coffins on wheels", every race could \r spell out death.\r \r\nRush portrays the clash of two opposing personalities. The long-haired, \r dashing Englishman James Hunt (Chris Hemsworth) was all about the \r adrenaline, embracing the post-race parties and lying with the many \r women that would throw themselves at him. He was reckless, willing to \r risk his life and others in order to win, but, as described in the \r film, there was no better driver in the world in terms of raw talent. \r His rival, Austrian Niki Lauda (Daniel Bruhl), was focused, clinical, \r and even helped design the cars he would drive. He was the early-night \r type, \'rat-faced\' and cold. In every sense, he\'s the perfect villain.\r \r\nBut where Rush succeeds the most is challenging our early conceptions \r of these two characters. There\'s little fun to be had with Lauda, but \r played by Bruhl, he evolves into the underdog of the movie, perhaps the \r only one that actually gives a damn about his own life and the life of \r his opponents. This, naturally, leads to tragedy and a particularly \r wince-inducing scene in which Lauda requires having his lungs vacuumed, \r but it\'s at this point that we realise just what these two drivers mean \r to each other. As Lauda watches Hunt claw back some points in the 1976 \r Formula One season, it becomes clear that these two need each other to \r survive. Their hatred of one another only serves to fuel the flames, \r and leads to Lauda\'s defiant early return to the driver\'s seat, scarred \r and bandaged.\r \r\nFast cars, beautiful women and exotic locations hardly sounds like a \r recognisable workload for Ron Howard, one of the most play-it-easy \r directors out there. His past films have been unjustifiably successful, \r critically and commercially, never stamping a recognisable directorial \r trait onto his work. Yet here, although the bright sheen of the 70\'s \r initially takes some getting used to, he has managed to create a world \r that is very much alive, using snappy editing, a pumping soundtrack and \r some growing sound design to re-create this world for petrol-heads. But \r he doesn\'t neglect his characters, and evokes the great work done on \r Frost/Nixon (2008), which was also a study of two giant, clashing \r personalities coming together on the world stage.\r \r\nRush is an exhilarating experience, able to distinguish each race from \r the next and literally putting us in the driver\'s seat with the use of \r digital cameras. Although it occasionally drifts into formulaic \r territory with the introduction of the \'wives\' (played by Oivia Wilde \r and Alexandra Maria Lara, respectively), Howard cleverly uses this as \r an insight into Hunt and Lauda\'s personalities. Hemsworth is very good \r in his first \'proper\' post-Thor role, but it is Bruhl that you take \r away from the film. How he gets you to initially loath him, only to be \r cheering him on at the climax is the work of a great actor, and it\'s a \r crime that he has been snubbed by the Academy this year. Hopefully this \r will inspire a host of decent sports movies, as Rush proves that you \r can mix character study and even existential musings with the thrill of \r sport.\r \r\n', u'0.318756', u'Those who have seen the trailer will know that Rush is the \'Formula 1 film\'. The presence of Ron Howard\'s and Chris Hemsworth\'s names above the title may put some bums on seats but the fact of it being a film about motor racing will undoubtedly ostracize some potential viewers.\n\nSo stop right there. Rush is not a movie about motor racing for speed fans any more than Titanic was about sailing for merchant seamen. Rush is a superbly shot, directed, edited and performed film that transcends the sport of motor racing, just as the principal protagonists themselves did almost forty years ago.\n\nThe rivalry between F1 drivers James Hunt (Hemsworth) and Niki Lauda (Daniel Br\xfchl) is common knowledge. Just a couple of minutes trawling through Google\'s gifts will tell you how many championships each driver won, how they met, how they sparred, how they lived and (nearly) died\x85 Rush isn\'t a film that tells you their story. Rush is the film that takes you into their world and shows you how that story unfolded in all its fast, crazy, riotous, dazzling, cynical, brash excess. By the end you may still not want to be an F1 driver or even watch a grand prix, but you sure as hell will wish you could have been there for at least some of the 70s.\n\nHoward has provided us with a mixed bag of films over the years with schmaltzy, flicks (A Beautiful Mind), thoughtful biopics (Frost/Nixon), compelling dramas (Apollo 13) and utter twaddle (Angels and Demons). So which category would Rush fall into? The tension Howard creates is ridiculous. Pistons pump, colours blur, the scream of engines deafen us. The editing is so tight it feels as though something will snap. The anticipation prickles the skin and, though we already know what and when, it is almost too much for us to watch it unfold. Technically, Rush verges on exquisite. The digital creation blends flawlessly with the live action and the skids, tumbles, crashes and explosions are horrifying.\n\nBut it isn\'t just with the speed and madness around the track where Howard guides perfectly. The hospital scenes when Lauda is treated are almost grotesque. We find ourselves shying away from the visuals, involuntarily grimacing at Lauda\'s agony even when he demands more pain in order to drive him towards recovery and revenge.\n\nRush boasts one of the finest film scores of the year so far with Hans Zimmer proving why he is among the busiest composers in Hollywood. It\'s not that the score that makes the film, but it enhances it beautifully, adding emotional colour to the startling visuals to magnify the tension.\n\nThe joint leads are on impeccable form. Hemsworth portrays Hunt as the playboy we wish we could be (or bed) and his charisma doesn\'t ooze, it gushes. He is arrogant, cocksure, charming and handsome. He makes it obvious why men wanted Hunt\'s life and so many women welcomed him into theirs. It is a confident, full performance from Hemsworth that marks him out yet again as an actor with a certain chameleon-like quality and undeniable star power. Immediately we like Hunt but as 123 minutes rush by, he evolves into a flawed man we admire but ultimately decide we don\'t really want to be and, in some ways, pity. It\'s a fine performance that engages us on every level.\n\nWhen Br\xfchl\'s (The Edukators, Inglorious Basterds) Lauda strides onto the screen, it is with purpose, his Austrian directness and confidence taken as conceit and arrogance. He does not suffer fools (or almost anyone else) whether they are subordinates, rivals or the men paying for his drive. Supremely confident to the exclusion of social niceties, the Lauda we observe puts our backs up immediately but, just as the Hunt on screen evolves, so, too, does Lauda and by the film\'s end our allegiance has wavered. It is a sensitive performance from Br\xfchl and his understanding of the man he portrays and clear admiration for him infects us thoroughly.\n\nSome of the dialogue is lumpy, there are numerous liberties taken with the truth (though not to the extent that U571 completely rewrote history!) and much is glossed over. Howard has perhaps tried too hard to appeal to a mass audience by focusing on the principal women in the drivers\' lives, notably Hunt\'s wife, Suzy (Olivia Wilde) and Br\xfchl\'s, Marlene (Alexandra Maria Lara). In Marlene\'s case, she is relatively impactful on her husband\'s life, suffering through his accident with him. In Suzy\'s case, however, though she was influential on a period of Hunt\'s career, it is difficult to see her as anything other than a bystander in his life and yet Howard sees fit to return to her though she is far from his thoughts.\n\nThese are minor quibbles that make Rush a very good film instead of a \'great\'. Nevertheless, my companion for the film who has no interest in motor racing and less knowledge gave a simple summary: "Excellent." \n\nMe? I\'m a fair weather F1 fan. If there is a realistic hope of Button, Hamilton and Di Resta winning or there\'s been enough hype, I\'m there. Otherwise it\'s Formula what? But, as I wrote, Rush transcends the sport. I was gripped throughout, I gritted my teeth, I gasped, clenched my buttocks and willed the drivers to the finish, on the track, in the hospital and in life.\n\nFor more reviews from The Squiss, subscribe to my blog and like the Facebook page.', u'0.109475', u"i just saw this movie a few days ago at a special advanced screening. as and avid F1 fan myself i loved it. this review might contain Spoiloers depending on how much you want to know about the movie. i don't give many movies a 10/10 but this one got it. overall a superb movie, this is Hollywood's first attempt at telling and showing F1 on the big screen and they nailed it. yes there were a few things they could have done better but not everything is perfect. \n\nWhen you hear those V12 engines start up in the opening scene, you get that Rush of testosterone in the pit of your stomach because of the sheer ferociousness of the sound in the theater. from that point on you are hooked. even if your not an F1 fan that scene will make you want more. every girl i talked to about the movie said they were seeing it for Hemsworth, and after the movie they were in awe about the awesomeness of Formula 1 and what it takes to succeed in the sport. from then on the movie moves at a good pace. as an F1 fan i wish there were a few more race scenes, but it is a Hollywood movie not a documentary so they have to appeal to everyone. the plot and the way the present it was great. i wish they went a little more in depth on Lauda and Hunts backgrounds and also went more in depth on the supporting characters like andretti and regazzoni. but since they didn't do that it lead to a better look at the intense rivalry between lauda and hunt. the small amount of comedy that was in it was very funny, it was somewhat unexpected. the Cinematography is amazing. so many different shots throughout the car and driver as an audience you feel like your right there with them, and as an F1 fan you get all the shots you expect and more. you also get a very good sense of the 1970s era, it feels like a movie made in the 70s with modern quality. some parts look gritty like they used 35mm film.\n\noverall i think this is one of, if not the best movie I've ever seen. i saw it 4 days ago and i cant stop thinking and replaying scenes from the movie in my head. i cannot wait for it to come out on blu ray. obviously go see it if your an F1 fan, but even if you aren't i guarantee you will like it. take your girlfriend or sister or mom to go see it and they will enjoy it no matter what. and you definitely wont be bored, it kept me on the edge of my seat the entire movie. not one person left the theater once it started.", u'0.355868', u"''Rush'' is a very good film about the rivalry between two Formula 1 race car drivers and their lives behind it. Directed by Ron Howard, the film is a triumph concerning action sequences, film editing and sound. Despite it being a sports film about racing, ''Rush'' never fails to develop its characters, its story and its suspense thus delivering a deeply satisfying conclusion.\n\nBeginning with the film's performances, one would expect to see little character development, acting and emotion but a whole lot of action. However, this is not the case. The film's performances are very good. Daniel Br\xfchl gives an outstanding performance as Austrian Niki Lauda: from the character's personality, body movement, expressions and emotions to his speaking accent, Br\xfchl manages to handle it more than well and deliver a very authentic and powerful performance. From his first appearance in the film, he stays a very powerful figure throughout the film and very memorable after it. He realizes the character's motives and feelings which enables him to fully portray his character. Despite his performances in films such as ''Thor'', ''Red Dawn'' and ''The Cabin in the Woods'', Chris Hemsworth gives a decent enough performance as James Hunt. He is far from outstanding but he portrays his character as he should be, never overacting nor underplaying his character, thus delivering a satisfying and believable performance as a race car driver. The rest of the cast doesn't have much screen time since the film mainly focuses on the two protagonists but their acting does not disappoint.\n\nThe film's exhilarating action sequences are probably the main reason people will go to see it and they will not be disappointed. With rapid but smooth editing, the renowned film editing duo (Daniel P. Hanley, Mike Hill) manages to ''tell'' the story rather clearly rather than just smothering it under its heavy action scenes. Other technical aspects such as sound editing, sound mixing and cinematography are superb. Sound, especially, plays a very important role in the film and luckily, the sound is clear, realistic and not bombastic as most Hollywood action films. The racing sequences are superb: we see them from every angle possible, never confusing nor annoying the viewer with their rapid cuts, instead keeping the viewer interested (especially during the final climatic race). As for the score, Hans Zimmer's fast paced music adds nicely to the film's racing sequences, turning the suspense meter way up without distracting the viewer. As with most of Zimmer's works, the film's score is very epic and memorable which captures the film's action.\n\nWhat works very well in the film is the fact that it's not just a film full or car explosions, racing and trophies but a film which tells the story of two people who succeeded in the race tracks, a film which doesn't drown its characters under its impressive action sequences but allows them to breath.", u'0.592244'], u'tt0087544': [u'\nFirst off, let me state emphatically that I\'m referring to the REAL version of the film, not the pathetic crippled creature distributed as "Warriors of the Wind" on video. Although I must admit that I first fell in love with the movie in that form, I have now seen the full subtitled version, and I place a hideous curse on those who hacked over 20 minutes from its running time.\n\nAlthough the incredible "Princess Mononoke" later upstaged this early work in terms of art and detail, in many ways I still prefer "Nausicaa". Its imaginitive and well-conceived world puts me in mind of Dune with its feuding factions, its giant creatures, and its strong ecological message. Even with a rather long running time, the story moves very briskly (boiled down as it was from a very lengthy manga series). The music deserves special mention, as well, as it is a large step up from the electronic pop stylings of most anime.\n\nIf you can get your hands on a copy of the original version, you\'ll find it more than worth the effort.\n', u'0.465837', u'\nI saw the dubbed version years ago and, even in that form, was taken by the imaginative visuals, interesting storyline, and worthwhile characters. I was also impressed by the fact the lead character was a strong young woman, who was a "warrior" yet whose greatest strength lay in her compassion (rather than striving to become a female Rambo.)\n\nI tracked down a copy of the VHS and sent it to my young nieces, pleased with a "kid\'s" movie which provided a positive role model without being dumb. The movie captivated them as well -- they wore the tape out, and it started them on a lifelong interest in anime. It was they who sent me the uncut subtitled version years later, completing the circle.\n\nNausicaa is decent science fiction, often breath-taking animation, and unusually *human* characters, and every time I see it I am glad I returned. Everyone should give it a chance, especially those who have written off anime as "round eyed kids and lots of explosions".', u'0.706762', u"\nThis was the film which introduced me (and many others in the 1980s) to Miyazake, and even in the form of a poor quality VHS on an ordinary TV, it was amazing.  By 1984 Miyazake was already well known in Japan for his anime work in film, TV, and for the comic strip that this film was based upon.\n\nIn this early full length film he really got to spread his wings.  There are fantastic aerial sequences like the jet-glider evading the flying snakes, which (this predates computed 3D, and aerial sequences are present in most of his work) are just a tour-de-force of imagination and geometry.  And yet this is a world that feels very organic, not geometric, with a cast of characters drawn in a unique cross between hobo, samurai, and pirate - totally blending in to an imaginary post apocalyptic world where humans scratch out a precarious life in villages hidden in the few green valleys left in a world of desert, where the only remaining resources are wind, sunlight, and humans.\n\nBut it is also a world of enormous dangers, including airborne bandits and the strange, mutated creatures that have evolved to control the barren and scarred earth.  When our heroine's valley home is attacked by raiders, she embarks on an adventure against them that will lead her, and some unlikely allies found along the way, to an eventual confrontation combining warring armies of bandits, ancient machines of infernal destruction, and the implacable, mysterious, threatening beasts which roam the badlands.  The pace is swashbuckling - if this were a book, it would be one you could not stop reading.\n\nIt has the feel of the original comic books, but plays out wonderfully on the screen - you don't need to know the comics.  The style is very unique. Even though it is very stylized (no photorealism here), you immediately get the feeling of the world and the characters.  The story works for children of all ages (mine both first saw this before they were 6, and have memorized it long since), and combined with the wonderful visuals it is a treat for adults too.  As a genre I would classify it as soft (no attempt at scientific correctness) sci-fi rather than fantasy, though some might think it more a work of fantasy.  It is fascinating partly because its roots in style and action are unexpected for a western viewer.  Japanese manga and stories had evolved in their own way, and although this is early Miyazake, it is already a product of that mature and distinct art form.\n\nAs always with Miyazake - if you haven't seen his work, well you haven't seen anything like it, and it is time you did.", u'0.0907736', u"\nThe first thing to establish is that this is a science fiction epic. It has more in common with 'Dune' or any number of SF novels - Brian Aldiss's 'Hothouse' springs to mind for one- than it does with a typical western animated children's film. Therefore one's expectations should be a little different, and ultimately it was the SF aspect which gave the movie such a high grade in my books. Whereas it didn't have quite the emotional clout that I look for in an animated feature, it was a stupendously told SF story.\n\nTechnically not a Ghibli film (Miyazaki actually used the studio which did most of 'The Last Unicorn', and which more or less became Ghibli when 'Laputa' was made a couple of years later), 'Nausicaa' is a far-future SF story with a princess/warrior/nature-lover heroine and strong environmental themes. There's also an opposing princess/leader trying to use technology to overcome the apparently hostile environment. If you're starting to think 'Princess Mononoke', you'd be on the right track. In some ways 'Nausicaa' seems like an early stab in the direction of 'Mononoke', though the latter would delve far more into spirituality and mythology, eschewing the SF aspects.\n\nThere aren't really any major weak points in Nausicaa - unless you count the frustrating 12 drawings per second animation which I constantly complain about in Japanese animation. The backgrounds aren't as amazing and the animation not as good as the last few Ghibli films, but for 1984 it was plenty good enough. I have a fairly trivial complaint in that the character of Kuratowa is drawn in a slightly more 'anime' style, ala Lupin III, whereas all of the other characters are done in a realistic style. He just seems a little out of place, though he's quite delightfully drawn.\n\nThe really strong points of the movie are its pacing (at least until the very end. Miyazaki was unhappy with the end too), its story telling, which manages to be sophisticated without being impossibly complex, its engrossing background drawings and settings, - and most of all in the amazing attention to detail in the fully realized post-apocalypse SF-fantasy world in which the story is set. Every little thing is worked out and placed such that you find yourself admiring inventions, ideas, structures, creatures, etc which don't draw attention to themselves, but simply exist as part of the backdrop of the movie. Of course 'Nausicaa' had existed for several years as a serialised Manga, so Miyazaki no doubt knew its universe inside-out.\n\nThere's a very clever plot, which I won't give away, but which involves humanity's relationship with the Earth and nature.\n\nIt's the sort of movie which you can get thoroughly caught up in, and which will stand repeated viewings. It really is a film which is perfectly pitched at both a young and an adult audience. As Miyazaki's second feature film it is also, rightly or wrongly, usually considered the start of Studio Ghibli, and is arguably worth watching for historical reasons, too.\n\nNot the very best from Miyazaki or Ghibli, but an auspicious beginning.\n\nPS, in case you didn't know, there was a heavily butchered US version floating around called 'Warriors of the Wind', which is universally reviled as a disgrace. Just to make it confusing, some of the Japanese copies are also called 'Warriors of the Wind'. The thing to look for is the 116 minute running length. If you get that, you've got the right one. At the moment the only way you can get the film is in Japanese dialog with English subtitles. Personally I'd go ahead and do that, rather than wait while Disney squats on the US distribution rights (Amazon gives it a release date of 2010 for God's sake). You can always replace it later.\n\nGood stuff.\n", u'0.248654', u'\n\nThe film of all times. My personal favorite of all films, anime and non-anime. It has it all, a great, involving story that holds many important lessons of life. Interesting characters. Action, adventure, and above all feeling, the mood just sucks me in and holds on till the very end and beyond. The music is epic, and the animation is top class. The setting is a futuristic kind of midevil inspired fantasy... if that says anything... but anyway it feels very real although fantastic and apeals to me. This movie is from the very heart of Hayao Miyazaki, the master of anime... Its so sad that the dubbed version was so butchered, it was the first version I saw(actualy the swedish dubbing of the american dubbing(sigh)) and I thaught it was great, but now that I have seen the original, a new door has opened and revealed a true masterpiece. I recomend this film to all and everyone. Average 10(10)', u'0.501479', u'Director Hayao Miyazaki won a place in my heart after I saw his 2001 film Spirited Away. I\'m in no position to claim to be an expert on Miyazaki (I\'ve only seen three of his films), nor am I really a big fan of Japanese animation; but I can safely say that Nausica\xe4 of the Valley of the Wind is one of the very best animated films I have ever seen. The beauty of the animation is stunning, with its close attention to detail--every frame is constructed as a work of art--and the story is enthralling. As with other Miyazaki films, the majority of characters are much more three-dimensional that you typically get in Western animated features, and nearly all of them aren\'t exactly what they seem to be.\n\nNausica\xe4, which is based on Miyazaki\'s gargantuan Manga series, is set in the distant future, after fires destroyed much of the earth. The world is being consumed by the Sea of Decay, a toxic forest that spreads through airborne spores and is protected by giant insects called ohmu. The Valley of the Wind is one of the last pure places on earth, and its Princess, Nausica\xe4, is a strong-willed yet free-spirited young woman seeking to solve the mystery of the Sea of Decay. A nearby nation, which claims to have harnessed the power that allowed humans to rule the earth a thousand years before, takes over after a plane carrying a mysterious living cargo crashes in the valley. What follows in the film is a struggle, not of good versus evil, but of man versus nature. The story is complex, as is its message, and Miyazaki has ingeniously spun deep complexities into the animated characters: what look like foes may not be, and what look like friends may be a bit more dangerous.\n\nThe animation is colorful, sweeping, expansive, and beautiful, as are the plot and characters. There is an immediacy to the story that makes a big emotional impact and makes us question how we handle our position in nature. As one of the characters in the film asks, have humans become but a tribe destined to be swallowed by the Sea of Decay? It is ultimately a film about compassion in the face of violence and war, which is what makes it so different from Western features.\n\nDisney\'s recent DVD release is excellent. The film can be watched either in the original Japanese audio or Pixar\'s dub with Patrick Stewart and Uma Thurman, and there are separate subtitles for each language track--a literal one (hallelujah!) for the Japanese track, and a more closed-captions style set for the English track. The film is so stunning in the Japanese that I have never considered watching the dub, though a fellow film buff has said that it is "not so bad." After this film was released in the US in the 1980s in a completely mangled version called Warriors of the Wind, Miyazaki suspended all US rights of all his other films until the distributor would honor the stipulation that they be released without any editing. The fact that Disney, which is known for watering down nearly everything it touches, has done this with such a non-Western-style movie is amazing.', u'0.4157', u"Now that everyone knows Miyazaki is a great talent and he has been doing many great stuff, his earlier works are internationally popular. After Sen to Chihiro no kamikakushi, Miyazaki's well deserved fame got huge. Since his fame increased, his older works has been taken from the drawers to upper shelves and this is leading to discussions of which of his works are better than which. Kaze no tani no Naushika has been compared many times with his Mononoke - hime, however regarding how Naushika formed a perfect background for the further works of Miyazaki, this comparison is not very fair. Kaze no tani no Naushika is the basis of Miyazaki's charming mastery which becomes more and more apparent in 1990s. It features one of the greatest heroines in anime history in an unusual sci-fi environment. The story of the film shows us how resourceful human imagination can be. What makes Naushika a cornerstone is not only this efficient story telling but also the visual fiesta that it has been presented in. So lose no time in comparing this film to another, instead savor it again and again.", u'0.433587', u"Brilliant, captivating, and sometimes just plain awesome are some of things that come to mind while watching yet another one of Miyazaki's epic tales: Nausica\xe4 of the Valley of the Winds. Deliberately slow-moving at points, yet undeniably exciting in and out of it's action sequences, it's one of those animes (a Japanese animated movie or show) that deserve a second viewing, and a fantastic introduction to anime itself.\n\nWithout revealing too much of the plot, it takes us through the life of Nausicaa, a princess of a small village, and her struggles to stop warring nations from destroying an important source that can save the planet. The planet has already gone through a major destruction that nearly wiped out humanity, and their are large insects called ohmu, that guard the source that is spreading through the world.\n\nMiyazaki introduces an empowerment of female characters in his animes, such as Princess Mononoke, Kiki's Delivery Service, and his most recent, Howl's Moving Castle (Hauru no ugoku shiro). The characters are done with style and care, and, in Nausicaa, there is no exception.\n\nIt amazes me that this film created some controversy when released, being banned in Poland because of it's depiction of an ecological disaster. Though the movie is obviously fantasy, it turns out that some may consider it a touchy subject. I didn't find any offense whatsoever with anything the movie showed, just a futuristic disaster no doubt caused by man.\n\nCombining fantasy and science-fiction, Nausicaa is nice to look at. It certainly shows it's age when compared to some newer animes, not having the help from high-end computers. Considering it was done in the 80's, Miyazaki's production team did a great job. Little details, backgrounds, gadgets, & animals are drawn slightly better then some Japanese animes from that time.\n\nKeep in mind that my review is based on the Disney release (Feb 2005). It's cleaned up, unedited, with new voices from well known actors that sound great (but I still prefer subtitles). Keep far away from the old version 'Warriors of the Wind', which chops off more then half-hour from the movie.\n\n9 out of 10", u'0.0722908', u'"Nausicaa of the valley of the wind" is about an epic story of mankind in the wastelands of polluted earth. Thousand years after the end of industrialized civilization mankind is once again in the wrath of nature as it is taking it\'s vengeance for the brutality it has received from the human. Although being an action packed adventure, the main story of the movie is one of the most humane stories ever told. Nausicaa, one of the most powerful characters of modern motion picture, tries to find a way to make the connection between earth and human to save mankind from extinction. I will stop here for rest of the story you have to find out yourself. I can assure you that you will not regret it. And for movie lovers it is a movie that you just cannot miss.\n\nThere are actually only three 100% real Hayao Miyazaki movies. They are 1.Nausicaa of the valley of the wind, 2.Laputa: Castle in the sky and 3.Princess Mononoke. All these films are considered as masterpieces of the history of animation. Of all the movies that Hayao Miyazaki has created "Nausicaa\'s" is the best. Many people will argue with me on that point because they have not seen the original uncut Disney version. If you are a people outside South America and speak in a different language than English and Disney\'s animations are available in your native language only then you can understand the quality of a dubbing of Disney. So please see the movie with the English dub by Disney, I am pretty much optimistic that you will surely say that "Nausicaa of the valley of the wind" is the greatest movie ever built.\n\nNB1: Please try to watch only the Disney dubbed movies of studio Ghibli if that is not found it is better to watch it English subbed.\n\nNB2: Try to watch the real Miyazaki movies (the three I mentioned here and whisper of the heart) in theaters or at night in a quiet place. Believe me I have tried this and I was able to understand the movies better. \n\nNB3: one of the main problems in Miyazaki\'s movies is the expectation. Here are some tips the three movies I mentioned here are real movies (I don\'t like to degrade them by saying they are animes) not cartoons. Howls moving castle and Lupin the third are animation movies and the rest are cartoons just like cars or toy story. \n\nNB4: Many people argue about the fact of watching foreign movies dubbed. I won\'t argue with them. I will just go with Miyazaki in the point, he told 20% of the movie will be lost if you read the subtitles instead of watching the movie. \n\nSpecial request: because of the kidified version of "Nausicaa of the valley of the wind" many people have rated it quite badly. So please watch the movie rate it according to your enjoyment and rate my review too. \n\nMany thank for viewing.', u'0.229506', u'\nUsually I try to compare one anime with another but I find it impossible to do for Nausicaa. I doubt if any other anime tried to repeat (or at least not successfully) the combination of science fiction, drama and medievalism that\'s in this film. However the most captivating (yet stereotypical perhaps) aspect of Nausicaa is her sympathy to all living things and her uncanny intuition about the things around her. Her abilities are the only drawback to this film because such characters can be found in most anime involving a heroine, whereas the storyline makes it a most unique experience.\n\nI was somewhat dissappointed with the ending. I won\'t give it away but the character of the Princess was just made to conform to the "standards of a heroine". Animation was acceptable but not superb although the designs of some landscapes and characters were spectacular. Overall an 8.', u'-0.0132194', u'Before I start my review, let me state that I did manage to see this film subtitled at an art museum in New York. For me, it was a very interesting experience to discover Miyazaki in his youngest days. While some may find the quality of this film to be a bit dated upon initial glance, it is important to remember that NAUSICAA OF THE VALLEY OF THE WIND was made back in 1984, so the animation, likewise, does not have as much polish as Miyazaki\'s later work displays. But this is not to say that NAUSICAA is unwatchable because of that. This is a deeply complex, imaginative tale set in a post-apocalyptic world which will remind many of PRINCESS MONONOKE, only the protagonist is a girl. Nausicaa is a compassionate princess who prefers to solve problems with peace, not vengeance. Her struggle to resolve a bitter conflict between two warring kingdoms and prevent them from reaching her home valley is not a good vs. evil tale. The characters are all flawed, believable people with their own agendas and redeeming qualities.\n\nIn a testament to Miyazaki\'s admiration of nature, the film offers a sub-plot involving a supposedly poisonous jungle. The product of a terrible global war, this thick, lush forest not only showcases Miyazaki\'s imagination (those insects sure are creepy-looking!) but also emphasizes the dangers of world pollution.\n\nWhile NAUSICAA is an older movie from Miyazaki, it manages to hold surprisingly well--most classics have such staying power.\n\nIts long journey to America is a story in and of itself. In 1985 (a year after the film broke records in Japan), NAUSICAA was brought to the America--retitled WARRIORS OF THE WIND, drastically altered, and cut by a quarter of its two-hour running time, much to the outrage of Miyazaki and his colleagues. Since that time, Miyazaki declared that any adaptations of his films for American release must be done under the supervision of his company, Studio Ghibli.\n\nAs much as some folks love to hate Disney these days, one can credit them for taking the time to strike a deal with Miyazaki to distribute his films globally. While the Mouse House has made their share of marketing mistakes with his films, the dubs they\'ve produced thus far--KIKI\'S DELIVERY SERVICE, PRINCESS MONONOKE, SPIRITED AWAY, and CASTLE IN THE SKY--all have maintained a quality of excellence and strong performances from a solid cast of well-known actors and actresses. This brand new English version of NAUSICAA is no exception.\n\nAs the title character, Alison Lohman provides commendable sincerity, compassion, and vulnerability, and is amply supported by a grand cast of side characters, which include Uma Thurman (the embittered empress Kushana); Chris Sarandon (the sneaky, smarmy Kurotowa); Edward James Olmos (feisty, loyal Mito); and unexpected appearances by veteran character stalwarts Tress MacNeille, Jeff Bennett, Tony Jay (who does a brief opening voice-over), and the Little Mermaid herself, Jodi Benson. Shia LaBeouf\'s Asbel sounds a bit rocky at first, but he grew on me. Mark Hamill, fresh from his outstanding turn as the evil Muska on the brilliant yet under-appreciated (on some places anyway) CASTLE IN THE SKY dub, plays a small role as the Mayor of Pejite. He only appears in two scenes, and consequently, his performance here isn\'t as remarkable as his work in CASTLE IN THE SKY, but it\'s nonetheless great to hear his golden voice in another Miyazaki dub. Arguably the highlight of this dub is Patrick Stewart as Nausicaa\'s mentor, Lord Yupa. He speaks with strong Shakespearian diction and carries the dub as a whole through his subtle, charismatic rendition of this skilled swordsman.\n\nMiyazaki declared that any new adaptation of his masterpiece should be nothing but a straight translation and no cuts. English dub scriptwriters Donald H. Hewitt and Cindy Davis Hewitt (who worked on SPIRITED AWAY) honor his wishes through their adaptation, remaining faithful to the story while tweaking a bit of terminology for comprehension purposes.\n\nAs with Miyazaki\'s other works, Joe Hisaishi provides the music score. Compared to the more lush soundtracks he composed for Miyazaki\'s later films, his score for NAUSICAA, while undeniably beautiful, occasionally comes off as a tad primitive, notably when it breaks into sometimes jarring techno-synth jingles. For better or worse, his score remains intact in the new cut of NAUSICAA which will no doubt please purists. I was a bit disappointed, however--especially when his ambitious reworking of the CASTLE IN THE SKY score (composed exclusively for that dub) turned out so well IMO. A film like this deserves a 5.1 remix! Nonetheless, it\'s my one quibble of this otherwise top-notch English track of Miyazaki\'s most revered masterpiece.\n\nThe DVD sports a near flawless visual transfer and a humble serving of extras--which include the typical English voice talent featurette we saw on Disney\'s previous wave of Miyazaki\'s films, trailers and TV spots, and a second disc devoted entirely to storyboards. The most noteworthy feature on this disk is a 30-minute long documentary, "The Birth of Studio Ghibli", which is undistractingly dubbed into English. For fans that are curious about the upbringing of this animation studio and wondering which of their films have yet to be released, this is a must-see.\n\nAs someone who has been very pleased with Disney\'s releases of Miyazaki\'s works so far, I am delighted to say that they have done yet another bang-up job on polishing this legendary classic for new generations to cherish. Don\'t be fooled by its primitive looks; NAUSICAA OF THE VALLEY OF THE WIND\'s status as a masterpiece resonates from the first minute to the last.', u'0.417899', u'of all the movies i\'ve ever seen (including nearly all of Miyazakis films) i can\'t seem to remember a single one that fascinated me as much as Nausicaa... \n\nKaze no Tani no Naushika opened on March 11, 1984 in japan. It\'s big success lead to the founding of Studio Ghibli, the film studio where all Miyazaki films after Nausicaa where made.\n\nThere is also a Manga of the same name, which was drawn by Miyazaki as sort of promotion, after the film was rejected by his financiers. After the success of the Manga (which counted already 16 chapters back then) the planned film finally got into production. The Manga should continue after that for a total of 13 years (with breaks) until it came to an unsuspected ending in chapter 59, that is quite different from what you might guess after seeing the film.\n\n>>Around the mid 1980s, a severely-edited version of this film was released in video under the title Warriors of the Wind. The editing was done without the knowledge of Miyazaki or Studio Ghibli. They were unhappy when they learned about it and want those who have seen it "to dismiss it from /their/ minds.<< (Nausicaa.net)\n\nThis is the reason why all negotiations about translations of Studio Ghibli films were so hard: After that disappointment Miyazaki won\'t allow any cutting or changing of his films. Warriors of the Wind was a Movie that had nothing to do with the original film and better never had existed at all...\n\nso, what is the real film about?\n\n1000 years after the breakdown of all industrialized civilization in a war only remembered as "the seven days of fire", mankind is on the brink of extinction. a deadly forest of fungi - spreading poisonous spores and gases - spreads over the world and threatens the very survival of the human race. this is the world that Nausicaa lives in, and amongst all the people fearing and hating the forest and the monstrous insects protecting it, she seems to be the only one full of love for all life, even the forest and the insects.\n\ni have seen this film countless times again and again. so many times, that i can watch the Japanese version without subtitles and still understand every word that\'s spoken (without knowing a single word of Japanese)... i don\'t like to watch the translated movie (neither the English nor the German one) since Nausicaa doesn\'t seem to be the same girl like in the original. there\'s much too much anger in her voice, which absolutely doesn\'t fit her at all. she seems so naive at times, or even dumb... i\'d really advise anyone rather to watch the original version with subtitles than any dubbed version. \n\nso what is it, that makes this film so special, so extraordinary? IMHO it is Nausicaa herself! the film is great in all aspects: the story, the (absolutely not flat or typical) characters, atmosphere, etc... and still she outshines all of that. although she seems so fragile and helpless at times, she is incredibly strong and powerful. a typical Miyazaki heroine. but the one thing that i find adorable the most: she has (nearly) totally freed herself of all hate. she doesn\'t judge others because of their opinions or goals, even if they collide with her own... and i really admire that. that is what makes her a real hero in my eyes. she has something that doesn\'t seem to exist in the real world out there: unbroken, untainted love...', u'-0.301487', u'Riveting and marvelous film by the genius cartoonist Hayao Miyazaki , it\'s a classic cartoon movie set many years from now , a dangerous, desolate post-industrial world of the future where rules the strongest law . This magnificent cartoon movie concerns about Nausicaa legend, a young princess and heiress to the throne living in the far future who attempts to understand and feels it is wrong to destroy the toxic jungle. This fascinating and haunting adventure set in the post-apocalyptic wasteland world by the great Hayao Miyazaki and happens upon a thousand years after a nuclear war left the Earth as an aftermath , with the barren and stark lands . Human race has destroyed the Earth in the "Seven Days of Fire". Now, there are small pockets of humans that survive . Warrior/pacifist Princess Nausica\xe4 desperately fights to avoid two warring countries from destroying themselves and their dying . The Valley of the Wind, a small community commanded by King Jil battles for survival as the kingdom attempts to defend the Valley from gigantic Ohm bugs and toxic plants that live beyond the Valley in the Sea of Decay . The Valley is invaded by the Tolmekian warriors who scheme to destroy the Sea of Decay by utilizing the greatest monsters that caused the holocaust. Nausicaa goes after the pirates, severely damaging their aircraft but she is gunned down . After Nausica\xe4 is caught , Nausica\xe4 breaks out and goes beneath the Sea of Decay where she learns the toxic plants are not poisoning the air and are purifying the world by draining the air of radiation and toxins. Later on , Nausicaa join forces with the creatures Ohms and makes a friend ; both of them will confront on the air taking place overwhelming chases , pursuits and dogfighting on the skies and set out to the Valley and foil the Tolmekians schemes of unleashing the Great Monster Warrior.\n\nThis wonderful film is plenty of fantasy , adventures, spectacular dogfighting and with agreeable message. The picture is narrated with sensibility and sense of wonder and is quite entertaining , as is apt for small kids but no contains graphic violence such as \xa8Monokome-Hime\xa8 and similarly contains an ecologist message. The film packs lively situations , hilarious scenes , spectacular images and culminating in an impressive confrontation with breathtaking ending . Note that the foreign release titled Warriors of the Wind is an adaptation well restored and remastered from television series and released in cinemas , being entirely kiddiefied rendition that edits the original episodes heavily, thus creating a completely diverse tale . All roles have multiple dimensions and display really astonishing humanity . The drawings have a special ancient touch that conveys the forgotten wisdom of the past that could really affect the way you interact with others and with the ambient . This stunning film with appropriate runtime , converted the first of any kind to gross over the box office in Japan and around the world. The motion picture is splendidly realized by Hayao Miyazaki and accompanied with sensible music score composed by his usual musician, Joe Hisaishi. Miyazaki also directed other excellent cartoon movies as \xa8 Ponyo , Howl\'s moving castle, Chihiro, Nicky , Porco Rosso , My neighbor Tororo , Castle in the sky \xa8 and many others . Sensational and fantastic tale, it\'s a masterpiece cartoon movie , a great animation with an enjoyable meaning . One of a kind, if you enjoy interesting stories and have a soft spot for deep characters and well planed scenarios, you are in for a great one. Rating : Better that average , worthwhile watching ; advisable to see for children and adults who appeal the gorgeous drawings .', u'0.37901', u"I don't know how he does this things (Mononoke, Nausicaa, Spirited Away, Howl's Moving Castle and goes on) but i know something that he is one of the most worthiest people living under this blue sky. Of course as he says people doesn't care about earth, they even can't feel it and i agree with him. He tries to make at least a few people feel it. Miyazakisan please go on what you are doing... In another part of this world, people that you don't even know they are living, sometimes laughs and sometimes cries with you. And i'm sure that when you finished making that movies. You cried out too.. Farewell This movie is for people who can feels the wind", u'-0.441958', u'I have been watching Anime since I can remember. Of every single one of the Miazaki films, and all the other Anime films that I have seen, without a doubt, this has to be my favorite one of all time. This movie is just so incredibly beautiful in every way. The characters are so easy to fall in love and sympathize with. The scenery and music are both simply spectacular. Hayao Miazaki is obviously a man who cares deeply for the environment, and I truly think this film shows his undeniable love and compassion for all living things better than all of his movies. This Anime contains some of the most powerful and touching scenes I have ever seen in any movie, anime or no. I cry without fail every time I watch it. In my opinion, this is truly the most precious masterpiece in all Anime films. I recommend this to anyone, whether you enjoy Anime films or not, there is just no denying how wonderful this film is.', u'0.550968'], u'tt1028532': [u"Well what can i say. I'm a guy i don't cry about movies i know its fake but i gotta say this one caught me by surprise even tho id watched the trailer and read a few reviews already. by the end of the movie i was in tears absolutely broken down crying my eyes out. and saying that i probably haven't shed a tear in about 8 years for anything but i love dogs and this is the most amazing story I've ever seen this is probably the best movie I've seen in about 10 years and i have seen almost everything.\n\nas u can prob tell i would advise everyone to see this and stop and think for a moment if we all cared for each other like we know we should like this movie teaches us wouldn't the world be a better place?", u'0.607206', u"I'm not at all an emotional person,but this movie really touched me,i couldn't even stop crying after 15 minutes from the final.I just sat on my armchair,and started to cry. This movie,teaches us first of all about love,there is no power bigger than love,nothing compares to this strong feeling. I'm really objective when it comes about movies,and honestly no one till now,have cut me as deep. It's surprising...but true,that everything in this world,is ruled by love,and if you thought that only humans are aware of this,you did wrong. I liked the performance,i loved the music(it was so so calm)\n\nSo glad to see this film,and i truly recommend it for everyone,i'm really sure you will enjoy it.", u'-0.0489331', u"I just saw this movie today, and I'm so glad I did.\n\nIt is based on a true story and it's only natural that the movie is great because the real story itself is very touching. One of the things that sets this movie apart from the other movies that involve animals is how they stuck to reality instead of throwing in some a-little-hard-to-believe elements here and there just to make it more entertaining.\n\nSometimes they show things through Hachi's eyes as opposed to human eyes, which helps you relate to him and understand how he felt and what he thought then, as well as emphasizes that Hachi is the main character of the movie.\n\nThis is not just a kids' movie. In the end everyone including myself was crying because we were so moved. It is a must-see.", u'0.311792', u"Well, I just came back from seeing this in Shinjuku earlier and I can honestly say that I have NEVER seen so many people crying at the end of a movie.... it really is a sad story.\n\nHowever, it's also a heartwarming tale of loyalty, about how people and dogs are more than just friends and, I guess most of all, about how a dog's love for its master never fades - even after his/her death!\n\nRichard Gere was fantastic in this movie, he bonded really well with the dog and it never felt like watching an actor at all - it genuinely seemed to be a movie with his own dog! \n\nI highly recommend this to people of all ages. There are enough bits to laugh at (seeing Richard Gere teaching his dog to play 'fetch' was brilliant!) and the story is portrayed really well (even if there were some changes made to the original Japanese tale)", u'0.495782', u"Knowing the real-life story behind it, Hachiko: A Dog's Story (2009) has been made in a sort of staged documentary style, similar to the kind of movies often seen on documentary channels (e.g. NatGeo), however without a narrator so common in documentaries, and including well-known actors (Richard Gere, Sarah Roemer and Joan Allen), making it more suitable for theatrical distribution.\n\nBefore my last year's visit to Tokyo I've been unaware of the true-life story this movie is based upon. In time an occasion came up to meet a friend in Shibuya city, contemporary center of Tokyo's youth culture (shopping, fashion, nightlife...), and that's how I've learned about the popular local meeting point for all Tokyoites, the Hachik\u014d Akita dog statue just outside of Shibuya Train Station, but the real story behind it has been still eluding me ever since. After seeing this movie, and some additional research on the web, all pieces have fallen into place.\n\nIn retelling the story of common bonding between the dog and its owner, so usual that it comes so natural, film is moving at slow pace, following events of an ordinary life, though not without occasional comedic and dramatic overtones. Even past the dramatic highpoint, when common acts of affection and loyalty evolve towards such an unheard-of faithfulness and ultimate devotion, pace of the storytelling does not change, relying primarily on fine details and emotional build-up. Of course, this might not attract everybody, providing that majority of movie audience today is highly dependent on fast paced, action packed scenes, getting thrills from 3D CG stylized ambiance and suspense, high volume amplitudes and aggressive, often rude highlights of any other nature. However, for those who can do without it, and keep alive their interest even in a simple story, who won't shy away from emotional involvement (as if this can be controlled), they shall easily find themselves consumed by its mere beauty and warmth. Usual man's-best-friend story, spiced with an intriguing yet inspiring detail, shall leave you a bit sad, inevitably pensive, but ultimately delighted. Even more so after the reading of the real-life epilogue.", u'0.355457', u"Hachi is a movie based on the true story about a dog in Japan, Hachiko, who would wait at the train station every day for his owner to arrive even after the owner passed away.\n\nI have never seen the original Japanese version of the movie but know the story well as I have been told by many people here in Japan. There is a statue of Hachiko that stands outside of Shibuya Station in Tokyo. Now the statue is the most popular place for Tokyoites to meet their friends before going out shopping or dining in Shibuya.\n\nUnlike other Japanese remakes, this movie actually gives credit to the original story so that you don't get the sense that Hollywood wants to call it its own. All actors/actresses in the movie do a superb job in making you feel as if you were a part of the community embracing the dog. Compared to the original story, people were more accepting of Hachi rather than considering him a nuisance. Of course this is going to be released in the U.S. as a holiday movie so the goal is to make it uplifting.\n\nJust a warning, do take many tissues. I am a grown man and can honestly say that I have never really cried during a movie. I think the score of the movie plus the dog being so adorable made me lose myself. When I looked around the theater though, every single person was crying and I saw a lot of red eyes as I left the Men's restroom. Any movie that can make me do that deserves a 10/10.", u'0.133052', u'Finally a film without explosions, computer graphics, and violence. A family film with a message. Adults will relate to the story of life-long friendship and loyalty. Children will love the "dog story" A tender story will huge box office potential. The possible "sleeper hit" of the holidays. Pet lovers everywhere will relate to this film and will leave theaters in tears. A weepy, wonderful film about the bond that develops between one man and a dog after a chance meeting at a train station. Bring extra tissues! Based on a true story, this film was shot mostly in Woonsocket, Rhode Island at a historic old train station. Beautifully shot and edited. The film runs less than 2-hours. The film generally adheres to the actual true story of a dog in Japan. The dog became a national treasure and a monument was erected to honor him.', u'0.393466', u'Finally a film from the USA (albeit based on a true story in the 1920s Japan) that is without guns, explosions and free of violence and not based at all on romantic elements!\n\n"Love and Loyalty" succinctly sums up the film. The love so simple, so pure and the loyalty so unfailing, so steadfast that it would melt any steel heart. I was so embarrassed that as soon as the film came to the end I dashed straight into the loo only to see my eyes sore red (!!)\n\nThe main characters never "take flight" but that matters not at all. It\'s the simple story of the love between a man and his best friend that more than sufficiently works all the wonders. Not a sad one, but profoundly touching, So touching that even a tough guy like me couldn\'t possibly hold his tears.\n\nHachiko, the Akita dog, has set the Yardstick of loyalty under which all loyalty among us human beings are to be measured. Loyalty that is truly monumental. Loyalty that is to be surpassed only by God Himself.\n\nA must-watch film, especially for all dog lovers. Highly recommended for all families and people of all ages.', u'0.493604', u"Its really hard to articulate when you have so much to write and so little words to express. And even lesser words which could actually help you convey what you want to say. The closest word which comes to my mind in this case is 'stupendous'.\n\nHachiko is a true story about a dog in Japan and the special bond he shared with a professor whom he met when it was a little puppy. The story has been put forward exceptionally well by the cast and the director.\n\nThe movie has been kept extremely simple with minimum effort on the scenes, yet remarkably you are kept spellbound after a couple of minutes into the movie. And as the other reviews suggest, making the whole theater grab onto their tissues explains how good it really is.\n\nLastly, coming for someone who also rates 'Eight below' as one of his favorite's, a high rating of Hachiko would seem a little biased to many. But in my honest opinion I don't think that anybody who has watched this movie can rate it below 10.", u'0.166519', u'Saw this movie while traveling in Belarus it brought me to my knees this was a show of the ages and without question a Richard Gere classic and performance of a lifetime this show will be Seen for Years and lifetimes to come I have been back in the U.S. for 2 weeks now and tell everyone about it I think of it many times a day it was yes----that good this is a movie You will never ever forget or get it out of your mind and heart will see it again when it opens in the US in December you may think this is a over statement but when you leave the theater it will be a known fact you will remember this show for ever it was and is a classic forever and a true story to boot...... wow.', u'0.923266', u'I first knew about "Hachiko: A Dog\'s Story" because of Sarah Roemer, my favorite actress. When I read more about this movie and found out that Richard Gere and Joan Allen were in the cast too, I was really excited.\n\nI saw the movie on 29 Setember at "Festival do Rio de Janeiro" and I loved it! It\'s really powerful and touching. I loved how they showed the dog\'s vision in black & white.\n\nThe only thing that I didn\'t like at all was that the characters seems to "never take flight". I know Parker (Richard Gere) and the dog Hachiko are the main characters, but I think that the other characters could have been explored a bit more. But I do understand why it wasn\'t done.\n\nIf you are a dog person, you will definitely love this movie! It\'s a sad, beautiful story that touches everyone\'s heart! A must-see.', u'0.368761', u"I think at the end of the day, what matters in a movie is how different it leaves you after you've watched it. It could be technically brilliant and leave you in amazement about how a narrative can be structured, leave you thinking about an issue from a totally unique perspective or just leave you thinking.\n\nBut if you believe that the impact a movie has on you is important - you cannot afford to miss this movie. I've never written a review in the past 7-8 years of using IMDb but signed up just so I could say how much I loved this movie.\n\nI read a couple of reviews talk about crying during the movie and thought it odd. I can't remember the last time I cried during a movie - but towards the last 15 minutes of the movie I didn't only cry - I cried from the depth of my heart, not out of sadness but from a much deeper sense of realization the power of true love and how it can manifest itself. You hear so many times that there is 'God' in all of us if we can realize it - at the end of this movie you will know why it's true.\n\nIt's a must watch movie.", u'0.395195', u"I have watched some touching and moving movies in my lifetime and about 2 movies have made me cry, However i was crying my eyes out when i was watching this Hachiko movie. I was crying for a good 10 -15 minutes even after this movie ended. I have browsed through the comments and reviews on this IMDb board and on other online forums and have noticed that so many other people who watched this movie have also cried. I really think NO OTHER MOVIE has made so many people cry. Whenever i saw Hachiko go to the station and sit there waiting oblivious to the fact his owner died, my heart died a little each time.\n\nKnowing that this movie was actually based on a real life story set in the 1920s-1930s in Tokyo whereby an Akita-breed dog waited in front of the Shibuya train station day by day around the same time at the same spot for NINE WHOLE YEARS for his beloved university professor Professor Ueno to come back from work, really breaks my heart.\n\nNo animal or human would ever sit in front of the station to wait for someone they love for THIS LONG (9 FREAKING YEARS). This dog Hachiko must have had such ENORMOUS love for his owner that he would throw his life away (9 years is like 7 decades in dog years) waiting in front of the station at the RIGHT TIME each day.\n\nHow clever are dogs? Real-life Hachiko somehow knew how to read the time in order to wait at the station at the same time everyday for 9 years. Waiting for 9 years- wow! I never knew that the extent of an animal's LOVE and DEDICATION and PERSISTENCE could reach those heights.\n\nIn real life, Hachiko's was given away after his master's death, but he routinely escaped, showing up again and again at his old home. This showed that Hachiko loved his original owners (Ueno and his wife and kids) too much to let go of his master Ueno or his memory of him and wanted to return to his remaining living owners. \n\nEventually, Hachiko's apparently realized that his Professor Ueno no longer lived at the house. So he went to look for his master at the train station where he had accompanied him so many times before. How smart and clever is that of a dog? The other original owners of Hachiko had moved to a different location and Hachiko could not find his other living original owners since he is a dog and so he decided to wait in front of the railway station like he always used to do for his master to turn up and be reunited with him, \n\nThis real life story of Hachiko clearly demonstrated UNDYING, UNCONDITIONAL LOVE FOR ANOTHER since both the PHYSICAL ABSENCE of his owner Professor Ueno and the PASSING OF TIME would not diminish Hachiko's love and UNFLINCHING LOYALTY for his original master Ueno. This real life story also reminds us about HOW LOVE CAN MAKE ANYONE (INCLUDING ANIMALS AND DOGS) do CRAZY THINGS for someone they love.\n\nSomehow I just wished that in real-life, the wife and family of Professor Ueno should have just placed lifeless body of Professor Ueno on the floor for a while for Hachiko to sniff and inspect the body. This might sound crazy to all you people reading this but i believe that dogs know about life and death and would be able to tell if a fellow dog or a human is dead. \n\nI am quite sure that Hachiko, being clever enough to wait at the station at the same time everyday for 9 years, would be able to figure out that Ueno was dead. Then this would have given Hachiko at least CLOSURE, then he would not have to wait for 9 years. \n\nYou can read up on the real life story of Hachiko in this Wikipedia page which also lists all the Japanese films made about Hachiko. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hachiko Or you can just Yahoo! Or Google Hachiko's real life story for more information.", u'-0.0379092', u'I don\'t think you find a better example of a dog\'s devotion to his master than this one, a based-on-a-true-life tale of a dog who was into a routine of meeting his beloved male owner every day at 5 p.m. at the train station.\n\nI saw this movie a week ago and I still can\'t get it out of my mind. If the words "love" and "loyalty" mean anything to you, this is a nice story see unfold.\n\nThe only major mistake made in this movie is that it should have been done as a 1920s period piece. I say that because throughout the story, the dog runs free around the town/city, which is impossible today with leash laws everywhere.\n\nWhatever, the story is still very good, very memorable and very touching in spots near the end. The only spoiler I\'ll use is a good one: if you fear watching an animal film with a bad/sad ending, you\'re safe: the dog survives....that\'s all I\'ll say on that.\n\nKudos to Richard Gere for a nice performance. This is definitely not he kind of film he usually does but he explains in a bonus feature, "I read the script, cried, and couldn\'t say no." The story was too good for him to pass up. That\'s my recommendation to you: go rent the DVD, sit back and enjoy a nice memorable tale of man\'s best friend.', u'0.28801', u"This is my first ever review. I have been a reader of user reviews on IMDb for a few years and this is the first time I felt I had to write something about a film. I will try and not spoil the film for you. The film is based on a real story which took place in Japan from 1923-1935 about a dog named Hachiko who used to wait for his master's return at the train station everyday for 9 years even after his master passed away. That's the basic plot, the rest you just have to see to actually feel the story.\n\nJust finished watching this movie yesterday and still can't get it out of my head. A feeling of sadness has engulfed me after watching this. I am at a loss for words to describe this movie as no other movie has ever touched me so deeply. I was pretty much crying and sobbing the entire second half of the film and by the time it was over, it brought me down to my knees.\n\nRichard Gere was at his usual best but the real highlight of the film was the acting of the dogs. They were incredible in how they were able to portray the range of emotions through their facial expression and body language. The music throughout the film was brilliant too and that helped in driving home the felling of sadness and loneliness that Hachi went through.\n\nI had a dog too and it brings back memories of how sad and depressed I felt for a month after he passed away. I have experienced such undying, unconditional love and loyalty from my dog too and it made this movie extra special for me. If there was ever a movie that I will remember for the rest of my life, this has to be it. This is a must see for any person with a heart and soul. I know I am a better person today after watching this and I am confident it might also have the same effect on some of you. Thanks for reading and do take care whoever you are. Love your dogs and always remember that he will always be there for you even in your darkest, loneliest hours.", u'0.224486'], u'tt2278388': [u'It has often been said that Wes Anderson walks the fine line between folly and genius. In the "Grand Budapest Hotel", however, this distinction no longer exists: the ridiculous becomes brilliant, and brilliant has never been this ridiculous. \n\nIt is his best work, or at least the film which has all of Anderson\'s creative impulses working in one direction, producing a coherent work of art. His films have always been quirky, charming and out-of-this world, but never before has the audience been immersed in Andersonland as fully as with this film. The colours, the camera movement that switches between different parts of the set, the music, the lens angle distortion, the ridiculously stellar cast, all of Anderson\'s trademark elements, combine to produce the ultimate Anderson film. The absolutely ridiculous CGI is used perfectly to add to the surrealism of the movie. It is also extremely well crafted, not only visually, but structurally. Unlike some of his previous work, the editing, the pacing and the rhythm of "Budapest" are pitch-perfect.\n\nIs it a great film? I\'m not sure. It does not attempt to cope with the issues of death, love, despair, the big ones. On the other hand, it seeps with nostalgia, a bittersweet longing for an age long past, and the fascinating characters it produced. It is technically a detective comedy, and one has to note that the genre seems to suit Anderson\'s peculiar brand of filmmaking very well. But never before has Hitchcock\'s Macguffin been as explicitly embodied as by the "Boy With the Apple". The plot is merely a mechanism that allows Anderson to transport his vision onto the screen, a vision of a peculiar world seemingly different from our own, but filled with just as much loss and, at the same time, human compassion as ours. There is comedy, but its either very subtle or incredibly over the top, and most viewers are uncomfortable with both. There isn\'t a single \'ordinary shot\', pretty much every image is out of place to such an extent that they begin to form one coherent film, and a fantastic one at that.', u'0.379562', u"My heart is still rolling from the escape to 30's Europe this afternoon, and without jet lag. This movie is an inspiration, a dream, a walk through a painting and a study of humanity. \n\nRalph Fiennes\ufeff is a phenomenon as M. Gustave. his interactions with every cast member and especially newcomer Tony Revolori are fantastic. The later holds his own weight beyond belief and the entire film is an amazing adventure with James Bond style chases, a large murder mystery, the best placed cussing and of course the sensational cinematography. The sets, models, angles and even the most nondescript characters come to life each on their own and together as a symphony of beauty. It's freaking brilliant; The Grand Budapest Hotel.", u'0.619215', u"Can a film be absurd, funny, exciting, violent and colourful at the same time? Yes. 'The Grand Budapest Hotel' combines all those elements. And I didn't even mention the most important characteristic: it is visually wonderful. \n\nIn this film, director Wes Anderson creates his own universe, full of colourful characters, old-world charm and witty one-liners. The nice thing about creating your own universe is that you can make it look perfect. Every shot, every little detail and every set is flawless. From lead character Gustave H.'s purple jacket to the title of the newspaper announcing the war (The Trans-Alpine Yodel) - Anderson has given thought and attention to everything. \n\nThe story is not very important, because it is merely a vehicle for the stunning visuals, the dark humour and the rapid-fire dialogue. It's all about a hotel concierge, Gustave H., who is being chased by various villains for stealing a painting. All this is set against the backdrop of the Nazis invading Central Europe (although in Anderson's fantasy world they are not called Nazis of course). Some of the scenes are very funny, but there is always a darker tone because of the looming war. Anderson doesn't shy away from extreme violence, but he shows it in an offbeat and almost comical manner. \n\nMy favourite scene, in which it all comes together, shows concierges in hotels all over Europe, calling each other to help Gustave H. Each of them is shown in his hotel (with a wonderful fantasy name off course), busy doing some important job like tasting the soup or giving first aid to an unconscious hotel guest, when he is being called away to the telephone. Each hands the job over to his assistant, and answers the phone. This fast succession of little scenes is done so perfectly, it's a great joy to watch. \n\nRalph Fiennes steals the show as the sophisticated Gustave H., who never despairs, even in the most unfavourable circumstances. He is supported by a large number of star actors, who are sometimes almost unrecognizable. Because of the amount of support actors, some of them are a bit underused. Tilda Swinton gets rather little screen time, as does Harvey Keitel. \n\nThe film moves forward at a breakneck speed. You have to be very alert in order not to miss something. The plot is not always very easy to follow, and the dialogue is fast. And there are the great camera angles and the wonderful detailed sets to pay attention to. I think by seeing the film a second time you can discover lots of things you didn't notice the first time.", u'0.531267', u'Wes Anderson is one of the most original film makers working today. None of his films can be categorized into any particular genre. His latest, The Grand Budapest Hotel, which opened the Berlin Film Festival, continues that trend. It is a tale within a tale within another tale. Whilst every shot has been meticulously arranged as though a work of Art hanging in a museum, story wise Anderson has let his imagination run wild. Though the tale (with Tom Wilkinson as the author of the story) and the tale within the tale (with Jude Law as the young author & F Murray Abraham as the mysterious owner of THe Grand Budapest Hotel) have straightforward narratives, the tale within the tale within the tale, which comprises the bulk of the film and is set in the years preceding the Second World War, is a wild uproarious train ride of story telling. It also boasts the cast of a life time: Ralph Fiennes, Tilda Swinton, Edward Norton, Adrien Brody, Willem Dafoe, Harvey Keitel, Jeff Goldblum, Bill Murray, Owen Wilson & countless cameos. It will delight Anderson fans but is more likely destined for Art house cinemas as it is too off center for mainstream audiences. The production design and music are outstanding and even the end credits are imaginatively done (and received another ovation from the audience).', u'0.390404', u'I would consider myself a Wes Anderson fan, however in saying that, I have only seen a handful of his movies. I was very excited for The Grand Budapest Hotel, because of its excellent cast, the fact it\'s directed by Wes Anderson and just by how unique it looked. After watching The Grand Budapest Hotel, I can confidently say that it\'s my new favourite Wes Anderson film, and probably his best.\n\nAs I was hoping, the story to The Grand Budapest Hotel is very original and unique, some may even say strange. And as the movie goes on, the story only gets wilder and wilder. The film is often very hilarious, with some seriously funny dark humour thrown in there as well. Characters are extremely well written, with the bond between Gustave and Zero being the backbone of the whole movie as it\'s so well written. The Grand Budapest Hotel features an odd narrative structure that works very well for the film, again adding to the uniqueness and freshness of it. I wasn\'t exactly sure how the story would play out, as I purposely avoided all promotional materiel so I would know as little as possible before watching. This was a great benefit to my viewing experience as I loved everything I saw, and felt as though nothing was spoiled from watching too many trailers.\n\nI haven\'t been a huge fan of most of Ralph Fiennes\' work since his phenomenal performance in 1993\u2032s "Schindler\'s List", but this is easily his best performance since then. He proves he can do comedy just as well as he can do drama, providing a perfect balance of both. Newcomer Tony Revolori is excellent as well. I won\'t get into the whole supporting cast because there\'s so many who were all so great, but I was particularly impressed by Willem Dafoe, Adrien Brody, Harvey Keitel, Jude Law and Saoirse Ronan.\n\nThe Grand Budapest Hotel is definitely a Wes Anderson film, down to its very core. If you know his style, then you known what to expect, as this movie is full of it. Thankfully though, it\'s not a case of style over substance, with a great story to accompany the gorgeous visuals. The colour palette is beautiful; it\'s nice to see lot\'s of bright colours when so many other films are so dark and dreary. The set design and costumes are perfect, and there\'s so much attention to detail within the sets. The cinematography is phenomenal, and I really like how the film was presented in different aspect ratios.\n\nYou really can\'t go wrong with this film. It\'s probably Wes Anderson\'s best film, it has gorgeous visuals, excellent acting and a wonderful story. If you\'re a fan of Wes Anderson\'s previous work, you cannot miss this, and even if you\'re not a fan you should go and see it anyway.', u'0.494006', u"Wes Anderson is one of the last directors -auteurs- who's got complete control on the film set and has the power to make whatever kind of film he desires. His distinct visual style is apparent since his 1996 debut Bottle Rcoket. But that was just a start, with every film he made he was perfecting his technique more and more. This marvelous attention to detail, the way he composes his shots( tracking shots, the symmetry, the characters running in slow-motion), chase scenes, love story, nostalgia, explanatory montages, the colourful set design and the prevalent theme of every one of his films: family. This all adds up to the reason why the audience enjoys Anderson's film so much. This all is brought to perfection in Grandhotel Budapest. \n\nThrough complex narrative framework, which itself is a mockery of all these films that are being narrated by someone and is also being an excuse for not being too realistic, we get to a story of a young lobby boy named Zero Moustafa and Gustave H. (Ralph Fiennes)the concierge of the Grandhotel Budapest. Many of the female guests of the hotel mainly come to enjoy Gustave's company. When one of these ladies passes away, Gustave grabs Zero and boards a train for her mansion. Soon he's blamed for her murder and hunted by police led by Edward Norton and a grim-faced assassin played by Willem Dafoe. There also is a love story between two young teens - Zero and Agatha (Saoirse Ronan) who has a birthmark in the shape of Mexico.\n\nI frankly don't understand how can this film be successful in the USA. This film is just so typically European, that I guess some aspects of the film Americans just aren't familiar with. Some of the humor reminded of old French, Italian and Czech comedies. \n\nWes Anderson remains to be a stand-out filmmaker who never disappoints with any of his creations and is a safe bet to rely on his qualities. You won't want to return to the real world when the credits start to roll.", u'0.398814', u'The Grand Budapest Hotel is the latest from Wes Anderson, and what great fun it is. My review of Monuments Men pointed out that putting the likes of George Clooney, Matt Damon, Cate Blanchett, Jean Dujardin, Bill Murray and Hugh Bonneville in the same film was no guarantee of a good film. Following that logic, what should we make of the following turning up together: Ralph Fiennes, Bill Murray, F. Murray Abraham, Adrien Brody, Willem Defoe, Jeff Goldblum, Jude Law, Edward Norton, Tom Wilkinson, Saoirse Ronan, Owen Wilson and (a wonderfully made up) Tilda Swinton? The answer is a near masterpiece of cameos that add up to a highly entertaining and memorable film.\n\nIn a complex serious of flashbacks, Tom Wilkinson plays an author remembering his younger self (Jude Law) being recounted, a number of years before, the life story of The Grand Budapest\'s mysterious elderly guest Zero Moustafa, played by Abraham. (Are you still with me?) Featuring strongly in this life story, Ralph Fiennes plays hotel concierge and lothario Gustave H., seducer of his elderly and wealthy guests. He is supported in this role \x96 for everything outside the bedroom that is \x96 by trainee Bellboy, and Gustave\'s prot\xe9g\xe9, Zero (in the younger form of Tony Revolori).\n\nFollowing the murder of one such guest (Tilda Swinton), Gustave is not surprised to feature strongly in her will, awarded a priceless Renaissance painting \x96 Boy with Apple. This is much to the displeasure of her son Dimitri (Adrien Brody) and his evil henchman Jopling (Willem Defoe). What follows is a madcap pursuit across snowy landscapes, various grisly murders, a couple of civil wars, some disconnected fingers, a prison break and a downhill ski chase.\n\nAll the cast seem to enjoy themselves immensely, but it is the production design and cinematography that really shines through: every single shot of the film is just a joy to look at, from the bright pastel colours of some scenes to the oak-panelled finery of the elderly lady\'s mansion. Beautifully crafted, beautifully lit,beautifully costumed, beautifully filmed. Bringing a film out so early in the new Oscar-year must be risky: but one can only hope that the voting members have a long enough memory to recognise this movie in these sorts of categories.\n\nThere are some interesting crossovers to recent films: both \'The Book Thief\' and \'The Monuments Men\' were filmed \x96 as this was \x96 in Studio Babelsberg in Potsdam. No coincidence then that the steam train chugging through the East European countryside looked startlingly similar to that in the opening scenes of \'The Book Thief\'; and if you have Bill Murray and Bob Balaban in town for Monuments Men, then why not stick them together for this film too? Simples! Alexandre Desplat turns up AGAIN with another quirky and fitting score.\n\nAll in all, if you like the quirky style of films of the likes of Moulin Rouge then you\'ll love this. Highly recommended.\n\n(If you enjoyed this review, please check out my archive of other reviews and while there sign up to "Follow the Fad"! Thanks!).', u'0.505063', u'After seeing the previews several times, I thought I would enjoy a delightful almost-fantasy-like film. But, at age 64, after going to the movies literally hundreds of times in my lifetime, I did something today that I\'ve only ever done 3 times previously -- I walked out of a movie halfway through the picture. I didn\'t blame Wes Anderson, because clearly his films have a following...but I thought it must be an acquired taste...that I had not acquired. I admitted that it was a uniquely visually pleasing film, but I wondered why so many fine actors agreed to what were rather small parts. At the time I said that this film bored me even more than "Moonrise Kingdom". \n\nThe the other night it was on cable. I thought I would give it another try, but I fully expected to turn it off at home, also. Perhaps it helped that rather than watch it all in one setting, I broke it into roughly 30 minute segments with breaks in between. Guess what. This time I liked it. I\'m not saying I loved it. But I did like it. What did I see this time that I didn\'t see before. Well, perhaps the tongue-in-cheek attitude of the film. The chance to see Ralph Finnes be downright silly instead of his typical dramatic role. The wonderful photography and special effects. The skill of young actor Tony Revolori. The pleasure of seeing F. Murray Abraham again. And, this time enjoying the many "cameo" shots.\n\nI still think it dragged on a bit too long (at 100 minutes there are still a few small bits that could have been edited more tightly or even eliminated). And, I\'m still not a raving fan of it. But, this time around I did "like" it. But it won\'t end up on my DVD shelf, and I doubt I\'ll watch it again. But, bravo...good (not great) job!', u'-0.0245515', u'21 March 2014 Film of Choice at The Plaza Tonight - The Grand Budapest Hotel. I really had no idea what this film was about, having seen only one trailer which in the event, bore no relation to the plot whatsoever. However, my interest was piqued so this evening found me watching a splendid little film packed to the rafters with stars. This was the tale of Gustave H, the legendary and infamous Concierge of The Grand Budapest Hotel, a rather glamorous edifice perched atop a mountain and his prot\xe9g\xe9 and most trusted friend Zero, The Lobby Boy. This is a tale of friendship, murder, revenge and deep dark plotting. There were some completely ridiculous moments which were quite refreshing and several, what I like to call Guffaw moments where several members of the audience emit a loud blast of laughter followed by slightly hysterical giggling that you find yourself joining in with. As I said a host of stars in this film ranging from Ralph Fiennes, Jeff Goldblum, Jude Law and Bill Murray to Tilda Swinton, Owen Wilson and Harvey Keitel to name a few, but one of the outstanding performances must go to Tony Revolori, a relatively unknown young actor who plays Zero, who is In almost every scene. An entertaining film, worth watching.', u'0.431804', u"Wes Anderson seems to be one of those Directors to look forward to as he has gained a reputation for his quirky eccentricity and stylish flair over the years. In his new film, 'The Grand Budapest Hotel' he tightly weaves together a crime caper that is sharp, witty and slick, but sadly lacks interesting characters.\n\nI won't go too far in explaining the plot because a lot happens in the 1 hour and 40 minute running time. The narrative is rather complex as it is handed down from Tom Wilkinson who plays the author who hands the story to his younger self played by Jude Law, who then speaks to Mr Moustafa (F. Murray Abraham) who then tells Jude Law his times of when he got a job as a Lobby Boy at the Grand Budapest Hotel, working for the eccentric perfectionist M. Gustave (Ralph Fiennes). We then move from the run down Hotel of that time to the 1930\u2032s when the hotel was booming. We see the hotel in a wedding cake style aesthetic, where anyone who is anyone in the aristocratic world comes to stay, and alt of the time, sleep with Gustave. This includes elderly aristocrat Madame D (An unrecognisable Tilda Swinton). When Madame D dies, she leaves Gustave a priceless painting 'Boy with Apple', to the disgust of Madame D's greedy family, especially her conniving son Dimitri (Adrien Brody). This starts off a chain events which involve lawyers and hit men, an elaborate prison break, a secret society, a woman who hides things in her detailed cakes, and unspecified war and much more.\n\nThe film looks amazing. It adopts the aesthetic which has become the signature of Wes Anderson films. The perfect framing, the elaborate set design, the costumes matching the sets and all the quirkiness and eccentric deadpan humour to boot. Ralph Fiennes proves to be a fantastic comic lead. His sense of timing and delivery is perfect. Also, his character is very interesting as he initially comes across as a self serving eccentric, but as the film goes on, you realise he has a lot of good in him. Unfortunately, I felt he was the only interesting character in it. Many of the touted cameos which include Owen Wilson, Jason Schwartzman, Bill Murray, Lea Seydoux, Harvey Keitel, Jeff Goldblum and Willem Dafoe play a small part in the plot, but a lot of them are underused. The talented Saoirse Ronan I felt was particularly underused. The intricate and complicated plot felt tiresome towards the end as so much takes place and the dialogue is so quick and sharp, that if you miss a line, you will miss a big part of the plot. It started to feel too cluttered as there were too many people in it and too much happening. It is still consistently funny and dazzling, but lacked emotional involvement that it felt slightly empty. I think personally, I still pine for Wes Anderson's more melancholic tones of 'The Royal Tenembaums' and 'Rushmore'. In those films, I cared more for the characters and enjoyed the visual and quirky style. I feel his films are drifting towards a more silly and farcical tone, which is fine, but in my opinion I don't feel it is for the better.\n\nSee my Film Review Blog - www.projectionistreview.wordpress.com", u'0.193262', u'Having been to a few of Wes Anderson\'s films, the twee, absurd caricature, dead-pan precious, lush, scenic, cardboard Tim Burton-esque cinematography that many insisted is synonymous with "intelligent humour" were all expected. What wasn\'t is the insufferable, sophomoric idiocy of the story, gratuitous characters and shallowness of the plot, the script, the character development, the entire purpose of the making of this film. What on earth is it suppose to say?! What deeper layers are there to uncover other than it being a madcap caper about promiscuous hotel staff carrying on with obscenely rich geriatrics, murderous villains and relatives, an outrageous and unbelievable jailbreak adventure? What is the point to this wedding cake indulgence of a film, exactly? And please don\'t sniff haughtily with a "You just don\'t get its brilliance/genius/subversion/provocation, blah..blah...blah...go watch a Tom Cruise flick!" retort. I honestly don\'t get much more from this film than its gruel thin plot.', u'-0.35492', u'A former lobby boy, Zero Moustafaw tells a story to a writer, who tells this tale of a hotel, it\'s guests and the outstanding concierge Monsieur Gustav H to us. It\'s about (blind) loyalty, duty beyond the required, greed, stupidity, love for women in any age ... and the power of influence when treating persons with the grace of that person\'s beauty. \n\nIt\'s (black) comedy at its best. The ridiculous becomes brilliant through cleverly constructed dialog, impeccable executed timing and timbre change. Many camera shots are little art pieces like in Moonrise Kingdom, beautifully constructed with cuts that ad to the timing, visually. The production design takes you from the shabby to over-the-top kitsch to breath taking wooden interiors and mountains. The CGI reminds me of Monty Python, deliberately unrealistic which is part of the humor yet makes it at the same time oddly believable.\n\nNever thought of Ralph Fiennes as a comedic actor. He convinced me here. Tony Revolori as young Zero Saoirse Ronan as Agatha are remarkable. And then there were: F. Murray Abraham, Jude Law, Tilda Swinton, Adrien Brody, Willem Defoe, Jeff Goldblum, Edward Norton, L\xe9a Seydoux, Harvey Keitel, Tom Wilkinson, Bill Murray, Owen Wilson, (I think I saw George Cloony for 2 sec)... Just to be able to get all these heavy weights to sign up for minor roles, demands respect. To get them all set their mark in a few minutes, is awesome.\n\n"He retained the illusion with remarkable grace." is one of the last lines in the movie. It describes both the main character and also the heart of the movie. This is a real 9 - beauty combined with dirt, great cinematography with dry jokes and art with silliness. If you like to be amazed, see something out of the ordinary, are able to go with a flow, you will LOVE this movie.', u'0.406756', u"Here we are with Wes Anderson's latest film, The Grand Budapest Hotel, which once again excels in everything Anderson knows best by delivering another kind of film. This movie combines early comedy slapstick and hijinks with that Anderson dry humor and melancholy along with the requisite great cast, performances, and set design to make this one of his best films easily.\n\nGood: I love the whole cast. Ralph Fiennes as Gustave is amazing and he is one of the best lead roles in an Anderson movie to date. Newcomer Tony Revolori easily keeps up with Fiennes doing a fantastic job. Everyone else from Norton to Ronan are fantastic. The set design and cinematography are magnificent as usual with great scenery and cool children book style backgrounds. The comedy hits every time and it even packs some surprises to with a great murder mystery that gels with a road film. There's even some sweetness underneath the zaniness giving it some surprising depth to it.\n\nOverall, it's definitely one of my favorites of his movies and further cementing him as a great voice in movies today.", u'0.882343', u'I\'ve really enjoyed some of Anderson\'s films, and even "Moonrise Kingdom," which wasn\'t good, had some thought-provoking qualities. This one, by contrast, was awful, and to me it suggests he has become "full of himself" or is "mailing it in." It\'s not funny, nor insightful, nor compelling on any level. At the very beginning, the worn, 1960s decor was amusing, and overall I got the sense that this was going to be about a small number of "quirky" hotel guests in the mid 1980s. These were people who were trapped in the past, but didn\'t know how to move forward because they had enough money to keep them at the "luxury resort hotel." I was really looking forward to that kind of presentation, but instead we are then taken to another flashback !\n\nWe are then introduced to a "lobby boy" and a hotel manager (who is "full of himself" and rather unappealing) who are living during the heyday of the hotel, several decades earlier. Now I\'m thinking that this still might be about quirky hotel guests, but of a different period, and seen through the eyes of these two (or at least one of them). Instead, the film degenerates into a ridiculous plot about the manager (Fiennes) being framed for murder, then plotting to escape, then trying to clear his name. Not long after he does this, he is killed by Nazi-like soldiers (why couldn\'t they be actual Nazi soldiers?). The lobby boy\'s wife dies in childbirth, along with the child, for no good reason, and we have to be told that this happens - we don\'t see the lobby boy and his wife as a married couple (so there is no character development).\n\nThere are a few crude jokes, and several murders, one of a cat that seemed like it was something from a "Beavis and Butthead" episode. Overall, this was a very unpleasant cinematic experience, and even the special effects, which tried to create a cute and "magical" atmosphere, did not fit in well - some were used over and over again, to the point of being irritating. If you are not going to create realistic characters, then there needs to be something compelling. The special effects certainly don\'t make up for this shortfall, as can be the case in action or sci-fi movies, nor is there anything in the plot that works, such as an elaborate murder mystery. It\'s not even a "feel good" film with a message about "personal redemption" or "doing the right thing."\n\nNow I\'m all for "dark" films about subjects like "losing faith" (which often contain insights one can\'t help but ponder), yet you\'re not going to get anything like that here either! As my title suggests, this is a bizarre "cute" yet mean and nasty effort, and I gave it an extra star because it\'s outright weird, conceptually. I was not impressed by "Moonrise Kingdom," but I think I understood the "coming of age" idea behind it; with this film, I am left wondering what Anderson was trying to accomplish. If you enjoy this film, that\'s fine with me, though I have no idea what you could have found compelling or humorous, but if you think it\'s some sort of contribution to the history of cinema, I think you would benefit from taking some college courses on this subject. If you are a fan of old, silly-looking decor, go ahead and watch the first ten minutes, but after that, I can\'t imagine what anyone could enjoy about it, other than a few seconds here or there.', u'-0.346748', u'Interesting sets, beautifully locations, wooden characters. Too much of the story takes places in trains, a prison and the countryside. I really wish more of the plot had taken place in the hotel. Following a confusing beginning (there is a double flashback), the story took off without any real direction or reason. When the movie ended, many people in the audience applauded. My feeling was "that\'s it?" All the ingredients were there but the cake didn\'t rise.\n\nStill, I\'m not sorry I saw the movie. It was different and that\'s always refreshing in a time of cookie-cutter plots.\n\nAt one point I noticed that the movie was no longer being shown in widescreen but more of a television aspect ratio. Once the movie returned to 1985 or the present, it was widescreen. Weird.', u'-0.158553'], u'tt0052311': [u'\nSeldom have I seen so many comments with so little understanding. The movie is not about Heston\'s "Mexican-ness" or lack of it. The movie is not about the 5 or 8 or 10 minute opening shot. The movie is not even, god help us, about Welles\' descent from the heights into "slumming it" in a "Grade B" flick.\n\nThe movie is about two things : film-making, and character. Every shot worth remembering (and there are few that aren\'t) is an exercise in the possibilities of film, particularly black and white film. Woody Allen makes movies in black and white that are  all conversation. Welles made movies in black and white because that\'s where the colors of the characters, the location and ultimately the meaning of the movie are possible. Black and white film is about the infinite possibilities of shadow. Touch of Evil is about the infinite possibilities of human nature.\n\nHeston, for those of you who just can\'t see past a "bad" accent is about rigidity and short-sightedness. What kind of idiot would leave his wife in all those threatening situations? The kind of idiot who can\'t imagine that anyone would harm HIS wife, simply because she IS his wife! Akim Tamiroff\'s Grandi is about flexibility to the point of breakage. Always playing ALL ends against the middle he is the essence of "harmless" corruption, that ultimately harms everyone.\n\nAnd Welles\' Hank Quinlan ... I just don\'t have the time or space to explain that Quinlan is about the true cost of police work when the humanity has gone out of it. Ultimately Quinlan would kill his best and only friend, the only one, as Dietrich has it, who really loves him. At one time, perhaps, Quinlan WAS the image that Pete  Menzies saw. But the man behind that image was eaten up long ago with alcohol and frustrated grief. It\'s all about winning and losing now, and things he would never do. Until he does them.\n\nThere are so many other moments and characters that I\'m afraid you\'ll just have to watch the film with your eyes and your mind open instead of shut to "get it". Pay attention to what\'s on the screen instead of the smart, cynical, hip comments you can make about an actual work of heart.\n\nWell, what the hell. Joan Didion said it best. Film criticism is petit point on kleenex.\n\nRaoul Duke', u'-0.097757', u'\nThere are only two ways to write a review that would truly do this film justice.  Either one would have to write an exceedingly long review, or a short, concise one.  I choose to do the latter.\n\nWhen I first saw "Touch of Evil," I was glued to the chair.  When I found out it was not Welles\' definitive vision, I wondered how on earth it could have been made better.  And when I saw the re-released version, I wondered why the studio altered it.  The stunning black-and-white images, the intricate plot, and the powerful, engaging performances took a hold of my imagination.  At times, I imagined myself on the street with the characters, because the atmosphere was so thick I felt surrounded in it.\n\nThe actors all did an outstanding job, especially Leigh and Heston (who, although not thoroughly convincing as a Mexican, soared above his usual powerful, furious presence).  This is Welles\' picture, however, and whenever the camera catches his obese figure, you are fully aware of the man as a director and an actor.  His powerful vision drives the film, from the single-cut opening sequence to the cat-and-mouse finale.\n\nI suggest watching the 1998 restored version over the original theatrical release, but regardless of which version, "Touch of Evil" will have you stuck in your seat, questioning your views of morality until long after the last credit has rolled up the screen.', u'0.256659', u'Rather than films like Citizen Kane (1941) and The Lady from Shanghai (1947), neither of which am I a big fan of, Touch of Evil evidences director/writer/star Orson Welles\' capacity for cinematic genius. The story is engaging, suspenseful, tight and well paced; the cinematography is consistently beautiful, inventive and symbolic; the setting and overall tone of the film, including the performances, are captivating, yet slightly surreal and otherworldly; and there are many interesting subtexts. This all combines to create a complex artwork that will reward however far a viewer wishes to dig into the film.\n\nBased on a novel by Whit Masterson, Badge of Evil, Touch of Evil is a battle between two policemen--Hank Quinlan (Orson Welles) and Ramon Miguel Vargas (Charlton Heston). Parallel to this is a kind of border battle between the United States, represented by Quinlan, and Mexico, represented by Vargas; the film is set in two border towns, frequently crossing over.\n\nAs Touch of Evil opens, we see a bomb being placed in the trunk of a car in Mexico. A construction company owner, Mr. Linnekar, gets in with his girlfriend. Vargas and his new wife, Susan (Janet Leigh), manage to walk along next to the car--they\'re all crossing the border into the United States. Shortly after crossing, the bomb goes off. This brings the gruff Quinlan into the picture. His investigation of the bombing brings him into Mexico for suspects. Meanwhile, Vargas and his wife are being threatened by Joe Grandi (Akim Tamiroff), a Mexican mob boss, and his underlings. Both Quinlan and Vargas are well respected in their countries, and both are used to getting what they want. But the bombing investigation ends up putting them at loggerheads, and Quinlan gradually turns out to have more than a "touch of evil".\n\nAs with many of his films, Orson Welles ended up having to battle the studio to realize his artistic vision. Usually, as here, the battle was unsuccessful for him. Despite his 58-page memo detailing various problems with Universal\'s non-director supervised reshoots (by Harry Keller) and re-edits, because they felt that Welles\' final cut "could use some improvement", the film was released in a form that was not satisfactory to Welles. The fiasco has resulted in various versions of Touch of Evil appearing throughout the years. The 58-page memo was thought to have been lost, but a copy was discovered relatively recently in Charlton Heston\'s possession. The film was recut in 1998 based on Welles\' memo. So make sure that you watch the 111-minute version first released by Universal on DVD in 2000.\n\nThe opening scene of Touch of Evil is famous, and rightfully so. Beginning with the timer being set on the bomb, then the bomb being placed in Linnekar\'s trunk before he gets into the car, we follow both the car and the relative ebb and flow of Vargases as they roughly walk alongside the car, all in one very long tracking shot that covers a lot of ground and features a lot of unusual angles. Welles stages the scene so that there are all kinds of complex background and foreground elements interacting with the car and our protagonist pedestrians. The suspense built up in this scene is incredible--you just know that bomb is going to go off, but you don\'t know just when, or who it is going to hurt. Compositionally, the scene is simply beautiful. The film is worth watching for this opening alone, but the whole of Touch of Evil features similar, meticulously planned artistry, filled with suspense.\n\nWelles as an actor tends to have a very peculiar way of speaking that is full of affectations. Sometimes this can be a detriment to the film, as it was in The Lady from Shanghai. Here, though, the oddity works, and this despite the fact that, like Woody Allen, he seems to direct his whole cast to deliver their dialogue as if they were him. As a result, Touch of Evil has very peculiar, contrapuntal scenes where people frequently talk on top of one another, with odd phrasing. It works because of the particular kinds of personality conflicts that Welles set up in the script. These are people who frequently _would_ talk on top of each other and occasionally not pay attention to each other.\n\nBut that\'s not the only odd thing about the film. Welles managed to find locations that, shot in this highly stylized and cinematographically complex film-noir manner, seem almost otherworldly. Except for a couple expansive desert shots, Touch of Evil feels eerily claustrophobic, even though most locations aren\'t exactly enclosed. The various modes and settings are all perfect for their dramatic material, which is mostly dark and moody. One change that Universal made was the excision of a lot of comic relief material featuring the Grandi family. Universal was right to cut it, and wisely, Welles agreed.\n\nThe music in the film is also extremely effective but unusual. Most of it is incidental. Latin and rock \'n\' roll emanates from radios, for example, and the climax intermittently has a repeating, contextually haunting theme from a pianola.\n\nBut of course the story is just as important. Although Welles stated hyperbolically at various points that he was trying to "infuriate" the audience with a somewhat inscrutable plot, and it\'s true that the plot isn\'t exactly given in a straightforward manner, once you figure out the gist, it\'s relatively simple but extremely captivating. At the same time, it is full of symbolism and subtexts, including commentary on justice systems and perhaps some irony about the popular conceptions of the U.S. versus Mexico (made more complex by the fact that Quinlan spends just as much time south of the border and Vargas seems to spend a lot of time north). But as for being annoyed, you\'re more likely to become infuriated with Quinlan, who becomes more and more deliciously despicable as the film unfolds.', u'0.045548', u'Considered by many to be the last "classic" noir film ever made, and perhaps the last masterwork from child prodigy Orson Welles, who looks about sixty in this film, despite his 42 years. In TOUCH OF EVIL the "noirish" dark streets and shadows are darker than ever, practically swallowing up the soft tones like a murky swamp. The action takes place in a nondescript U.S./Mexico border town where the worst that both sides has to offer is most in evidence. The famous opening scene (a 3 1/2-minute continuous shot) where we witness a time bomb being placed in the trunk of a Cadillac is masterful. The camera pulls in and out of the city scene as it follows the motion of the vehicle winding its way through streets littered with pedestrians, thus effectively creating a level of anxiety that could not be duplicated with multiple edits. After the inevitable explosion, the drama dives into a seedy world of corrupt police justice and malevolent decrepitude, which is filmed with such a stylish flair, it is almost weirdly humorous and playful! Mike Vargas, the good guy, is played by Charlton Heston and seems more than a wee bit miscast as a Mexican narcotics officer with his face darkened by makeup. When U.S. Police Captain Hank Quinlan (Orson Welles) first meets him he remarks, "He doesn\'t look Mexican." Quinlan is the ultimate repugnant cop gone bad and Welles has the camera looking up into his nostrils most of the time making his character look even more monstrous. But Quinlan is also pitifully sad. A man who once had the instincts of a cat and the intelligence of a fox has been reduced to an insignificant mass of tissue, who\'s "instinct" is having a knack for finding evidence that he himself has planted. And while he may be revered by the local officials in law enforcement, he\'s acutely aware that he is a fraud and petrified that Vargas, has seen him naked.', u'-0.135337', u"\nHere is a film that wouldn't be made today because nobody makes 'B' movies anymore; and this is the greatest 'B' movie in the history of cinema. Here is the perfect example of why Orson Welles should be considered a genius. He has made this film look so effortlessly easy that it could almost be considered film making by numbers. From the famous opening sequence to the closing titles, this is the film students' reference book.\n\n Welles portrayal of the bloated cop Hank Quinlan is only bettered by his Harry Lime in 'The Third Man'. He gets right inside the seedy, corrupt Quinlan; but still leaves room for just the lightest touch sympathy because we know that, after all, he's a fallible human like all of us. We almost feel sad at his fate especially when Marlene Dietrich gives her sad soliliquay about him.\n\nThis is another film that can only exist in black and white, and begs the question, why can't directors work effectively in this medium today? Some have tried but none have have really suceeded. David Lynch's Eraserhead is probably the best modern example of a black and white only film. Woody Allen's Manhattan tries hard but ends up looking too much like a documentary. I don't think that directors today use this medium enough, too many rely on colour and the efffects that can only work in colour to get them out of trouble.\n\n  So put A Touch Of Evil on your 'must see' list and enjoy a work of film making artistry.", u'0.166143', u"\nTouch of Evil has, perhaps, the BEST cinematography and lighting in ANY film ever made.  Not just in the film noir genre, but in all categories.  Orson Welles tended to use wide shots for all of his films, and Touch of Evil's use of wide shots took filmmaking to another level, especially with the amazing opening shot.  The camera techniques and lighting are too spectacular to fathom, it is the grandmaster of all movies.  Brilliant is an understatement.  See this film, if not for the excellent acting and sheer brilliance in terms of the camera (this film had a GREAT D.P.!!), but for entertainment value.  But if you are a film student or just want to see great camera work, Touch of Evil will astonish you.", u'0.472337', u'Orson Welles\' "Touch of Evil" is a complex, ironic examination of the relationship between the law and justice... The film must stand beside the very best in detectives genre...\n\nIts enormous confused tracking shots, its low angles, its tormented lighting, its obscure intelligent photography, its great use of the wide-angle lens, its hard complexity and complete fictional night-city word, all represent a brilliant essay of pure cinema establishing Welles as an alarming genius, one of the greatest filmmakers with movies years ahead of their time...\n\n"Touch of Evil" is an outstanding achievement of a great cinematic mind, displaying a powerful range of Gothic expressionism... Welles\' first appearance as a corrupt used-up Texas police captain (Hank Quinlan) is no less surprising...\n\nA police car comes to a stop to the scene of a murder and unexpectedly there is Welles, sitting in the back seat: gross, unshaven, sweaty, and with a cigar clenched between his teeth... He seems a repellent person, with "intuition," manifesting that sensation of evil, as no crime movie has managed to do since, a suggestion of corruption that is the key to the fascinating and doubtful character he plays... Welles character will cheat, lie and murder in order to prevent the truth from emerging... One hates his toughness, yet one still understands him and feels pity for him than for his victims...\n\nJoseph Calleia, his slightly more presentable assistant, is like Dana Andrews in Otto Preminger\'s "Where the Sidewalks Ends," a villain with unchanged methods: he waits, watches, leaves the police work to others, remains loyal to his profession and to his boss\x97but could not exist without him, or in another environment...\n\nFrom that moment, we are caught between admiration of his brilliant directorial effects and fascination with his characterization of Quilan, a chief able to make a quick arrest by the simple expedient of framing the most likely suspects... He appears to have been using the techniques for years, but before this he has usually fitted the frame round the guilty party... It is a performance which frequently gives great energy to the screen...\n\nStanley Kubrick once said that the first shot of a movie should be the most captivating... Definitely, Welles\' legendary opening shot satisfies one of the key requirements of the movie mystery... Of course, Russ Metty deserves a lot of credit...\n\nThe long traveling shot starts with a close-up of a time-bomb being placed in the trunk of a car by a shadowy figure, then, the richest man in town (Rudy Lanniker) and his mistress appearing from the background, getting into the car and driving away across the border from Mexico to the United States and through the border town... By this time the roving camera\x97that seems never to come to a standstill, has offered to us long view of the surroundings (crumbling arches, peeling walls, poor hotels and night clubs and a lot of trash) which will enclose the plot...\n\nWhile the convertible stops at a crossroad, the camera descends swiftly to introduce a Mexican gentleman, an idealistic justice department lawyer Ramon Vargas (Charlton Heston) and his bride, the blonde American Susan (Janet Leigh) walking toward the frontier...\n\nThe superlative camera tracks the couple for some time, catching again the car as both Vargas and the automobile meet at the U.S. Customs post... We see and hear a conversation between Vargas, his wife and the border guard as the vehicle moves out of the frame... We proceed with the couple about to cross the border until the bomb goes off and the car explodes... The killing is the start of the conflict between policemen from both sides of the border...\n\n"Touch of Evil" is great and memorable for the distinguished description of its scenes, its images, its acting and its sound track... Its importance lies entirely in how the event is told \'not\' in the message or material...\n\nIn addition to its wonderful opening, the film contains other outstanding sequences: \n\n- The deplorable ambiance of a closed nightclub where Marlene Dietrich wisely advises Welles to "lay off the candy bars." "Honey, you\'re a mess", she says when she finally recognizes Quinlan, and (at the end of the picture) when he asks "Come on, read my future for me," she replies: "You haven\'t got any. Your future is all used up. Why you don\'t go home."\n\n- The single shot (in the murder suspect\'s apartment) where Welles handles his cast with great skill... There is much overlapping conversation as everyone talks at once, and half a dozen characters are brilliantly delineated...\n\n- When the camera meets a group of three characters crossing the street across a hotel lobby and into a restricted elevator, and rides with them slowly up to the second floor until Vargas, who has left them in the lobby, reappears at the very moment the elevator door reopens...\n\n- The horrifying siege of Leigh at the isolated Mirador Motel by a gang of young punks... \n\nPerhaps the finest things about "Touch of Evil" is the cold, strange and unsympathetic atmosphere of its night city (narcotics, gang-rape, racism, prostitution) an almost universal corruption...\n\nIt\'s unlikely that there will ever be a more unpleasant or offensive or disgusting detective than Welles or a more fascinating one...\n\nWatch for Mercedes McCambridge in it... but look quickly, or it will be too late.', u'0.13846', u'\nOrson Welles made this film over 15 years after "Citizen Kane", but even though it doesn\'t reach the level of "Kane", he never lost his genius touch. With a basic story and regular budget he made the most famous B-film ever. His majesty in the camera control and the editing jump out of the screen. His director geniality is seen through the outstanding performances by great actors like himself, Janet Leigh and Marlene Dietricht, and actors not that great, like Charlton Heston. Several lines of this motion picture are amongst the greatest of all times, specially the Dietrich ones. The credits scene, that runs uncut for about 3 minutes, is one of the greatest moments in the film history, along with the pianola tune at Tanya\'s place. Some might say that "Touch of Evil" is banal and boring, but these are the people that don\'t like real motion pictures, and we all know that, so we don\'t care about them.', u'0.393495', u'This should be a 5-6 but a sharper light shines on Orson Welles.\n\nAt this point in his Career, Welles had abandoned any attempt at storytelling in favor of atmosphere and meaning via oblique camera angles. If you love Welles you\'ll see the brilliance in the camera work and defend the genius, vision, breadth, greatness; you\'ll criticize others for not "getting" it; you\'ll discuss the real meanings with other cognoscenti.\n\nReally though, it\'s an awful movie. I mean, just plain bad. The worst kind of Hollywood: a terrible jazz-like score; villains with all the cartoonish menace of Wild One, Rebel w/o Cause, or On the Waterfont (I kept waiting for Karl Malden to jump out in a priest outfit and punch someone); a meandering story that goes nowhere; and some of the worst acting imaginable. Acting so wincingly bad that it brings tears to your eyes.\n\nWeaver\'s performance is clownishly painful - something out of bad theatre for children. Welles, as always, pontificates and overacts ponderously. Heston, as always, alternates between woodenness and overacting - he was a master at reacting to the wrong things; Leigh overacts and almost jumps out of the screen in places; the list goes on. There isn\'t an understated performance in it.\n\nIn case you haven\'t seen it: Heston plays a Mexican (no, I\'m not kidding) DEA guy with no discernible ethnicity beyond some facepaint and a greased mustache.\n\nThere\'s also the wonderful technique of having 2-3 characters talk at once so that you can\'t possibly follow what\'s going on. Much like real life where the salesman in your group interrupts before you can begin to get to your point.\n\nDietrich is a fortune teller with heavy lines such as (to Welles) "Your future is all used up". This is often quoted as one of the important bits. Cotten is a coroner with his trademark simpering smile.\n\nWhat happens in the end: Welles drowns in the physical, moral and spiritual garbage that he created for himself. Or did the world create it for all of? Why for that matter are we here? Of course he finds time before he goes for a self-pitying speech that questions the meaning of his own life and - yes - all of our lives. Yup, just like Kane and Third Man.\n\nIt\'s a shame about Welles really: he had some great ideas and some beautiful camera techniques. He just couldn\'t present anything without slamming it in your face over and over and over. He\'d have been a good preacher or university professor where he could lecture without any questioning.', u'-0.174481', u"That's a great epitaph Marlene Dietrich and Mort Mills put together for Orson Welles's character police captain Hank Quinlan. In a sense, since Welles directed himself in Touch of Evil he both created the character and the circumstances that bring him down.\n\nTwo stories intersect in Touch of Evil. The first involves a particularly grisly murder in a Texas/Mexican border town of a man named Rudy Linnaker. The weapon was a car bomb, that went off just as Linnkaer and some chippie he was seeing crossed the border. Driving in the car just behind the late Mr. Linnaker was Charlton Heston as Mexican police detective Mike Vargas and his wife Janet Leigh. \n\nHeston is returning to Mexico City where in a few days he's taking the witness stand in the trial of a local drug kingpin. The kingpin's brother is Akim Tamiroff who's the local crime lord in that border town. Heston's case against Tamiroff's brother and Welles's investigation into the car bombing are completely unrelated, but do to some cleverly worked out plot machinations they get intertwined together.\n\nCharlton Heston has been quoted many times in saying that Orson Welles was the greatest director he ever worked for. He also rather modestly has stated that he did not give Welles his best screen performance. My own thought on it is that he really is not a terribly convincing latino. Maybe someone with Robert Mitchum's gift for dialect or a latino actor like Gilbert Roland might have been better. Still it's an earnest effort and Heston has nothing to be ashamed of.\n\nIn fact Heston says and I agree that the story is really about Welles and his destruction. Welles has great instinct as a detective, but he's not really all that scrupulous about due process. That's what has Heston's back up and it forces Welles into an unthinkable alliance with Tamiroff. \n\nJanet Leigh gives us a sneak preview of what was in store for moviegoers in Psycho when she's trapped in that motel room with those punks that Tamiroff has sicced on her. One of the punks in fact was Mercedes McCambridge doing a little gender bending generations before Boys Don't Cry. At the motel Dennis Weaver has a marvelous bit part as the useless and feckless 'night man.'\n\nWelles put a lot of his favorites in small roles here. Ray Collins took time away from Perry Mason on television to play the District Attorney. Joseph Cotten has a small bit as a medical examiner, Harry Shannon was the state's attorney, it was a regular Citizen Kane reunion.\n\nMarlene Dietrich who was Welles's foil and partner in his magic act plays the owner of a border town dive and his mistress who loves him though she recognizes all his faults. This was a banner year for Dietrich because she also did her highly acclaimed role in Witness for the Prosecution. \n\nOne part though that should have been up for an Academy Award was Joseph Calleia who was Welles's devoted subordinate who in the end ironically helps to bring him down. It's a great piece of acting and Charlton Heston said that Joseph Calleia never did anything better in his entire cinema career. I wouldn't argue the point.\n\nNow that the 'director's cut' is available we can now see Touch of Evil and realize what Welles's vision was for this film. Indifferently received when first out, it's grown to become a classic and probably one of the three or four films Welles the director gets the most acclaim for.\n\nAnd now it's probably better than when first seen by the public.", u'-0.0486531', u'After crossing the border of Mexico to the United States of America, the bomb planted in the car of the wealthy businessman Rudy Linneker blows up in Los Robles. The Mexican Chief of Narcotics Miguel Vargas (Charlton Heston) is spending honeymoon with his American wife Susan Vargas (Janet Leigh) in the border town and will testify in the case of the drug dealer Grandi that is arrested in Mexico City. The idolized ex-alcoholic American Police Captain Hank Quinlan (Orson Welles) is in charge of the investigation since the murder happened in the American side of the border, but Mike Vargas participates as observer since the Mexican citizen Sanchez (Victor Millan) is the prime suspect. Meanwhile, Uncle Joe Grandi (Akim Tamitoff) unsuccessfully presses Susie, trying to convince her husband to drop the case. When Hank plants two dynamites in the house of Sanchez in a shoe box that Vargas had seen empty ten minutes before, he confronts Hanks. Joe Grandi witnesses their argument and associates to Hank to discredit Vargas, dishonoring Susie.\n\n"Touch of Evil" is a masterpiece of malevolence and loss of humanity and one of my favorite movies ever. The long sequence in the beginning is in my opinion the best in cinema history, with a perfect timing. The black and white cinematography is amazing, with the perfect use of shadows and lighting. The story is fantastic and Orson Welles is awesome in the role of a despicable policeman that believes in his hunches, eternally grieves the loss of his wife and wishes to bring justice no matter the means and without any ethic. Janet Leigh performs a strong female character unusual in the 50\'s. Charlton Heston has also an unforgettable performance in the role of an ethical police office that is the opposite of Hank and prioritizes his work to his family, leaving his wife alone to seek the truth about his opponent. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "A Marca da Maldade" ("The Mark of the Malevolence")', u'0.221939', u"After sitting through almost 40 minutes of this unwatchable film, I just had to turn it off. The acting was poor, the screenplay was disjointed, and the storyline was illogical. Some examples: Charlton Heston is supposed to be a Mexican. They give him a Cisco Kid mustache but his accent is from Iowa. His new bride, Janet Leigh, and he are on their honeymoon in Tijuana. If you are taking Janet Leigh on a honeymoon, there are certainly much better places to take her than a scruffy border town. But catch more of this logic. Heston is a law officer in Mexico who is pursuing a drug gang. Right at the border, near where they are walking, a bomb blows up a convertible with two people inside. Heston is with his wife. Logic says that he would assume that this is a dangerous place, not only for him but his wife. But that does not stop him. He tells her to go by herself back to the fleabag hotel where they have chosen to spend their honeymoon. On the way, she is accosted by a bunch of toughs who say that they have a message for her husband. And she follows them! Later on, she is undressing in her hotel room, which has no shades and someone shines a flashlight on her from a window across the street. After she covers up, what does she do? Does she turn the light off in her room? Does she call the management? No, she climbs up and unscrews the hot light bulb in her room, (without a tinge of pain) and throws it across the street into the window where the light came from and she hits a bullseye. (Try throwing a light bulb once. It's like throwing a ping-pong ball.) Later Heston can't seem to find another hotel in the town so the takes her to a fleabag motel in the boondocks, where she is the only guest. (I half expected it to be the Bates Motel). She lounges around the room in a bustier, while a gang of toughs in hot cars arrive. She shows absolutely no fear or trepidation at this turn of events. Meanwhile, her husband still does not seem concerned over her safety, even though the motel is owned by the drug gang chief. At the point I turned it off, Heston was holding a meeting with a few American cops and takes them to his hotel room, which looked perfectly fine. Why then is she in the boondocks? Note that there are pointless cameos of Marlene Dietrich and Eva Gabor and even Dennis Weaver whose acting consists of looking back and forth nervously behind a set of overly large glasses. For those of you who view this film positively, you must have watched a different movie than the one I watched.", u'-0.216907', u'Sorry Little Miss Sunshine: THIS is the dumbest film I\'ve seen in a long time. So much so, after I finished watching it I felt the desperate urge to see something better so I wouldn\'t to lose my faith in movies; something like Plan 9 From Outer Space or Gigli for ex... I\'m not exaggerating. How bad this film is? Well, it\'s so bad, even true Mexicans here look phony, as if they had been imitating the bad acting of the Americans playing them; especially Chuck, in one of the worst miscasts in film history. And if you consider that even at best of times he isn\'t a great actor, not even a good one, imagine how bad he can be when playing Mexicans. And his--for the occasion--blackened mug doesn\'t help either; he looks like having spent the last 24 hours sweeping chimneys, not to mention his phony accent in both languages. When speaking Spanish, or English, he sounds like an American badly impersonating a Mexican badly impersonating an American...you get the picture.\n\nFor starters, the plot of the movie is amateurish and full of holes; a tenth grader would have done a better job at it. The acting goes from bad to awful and the Mancini score--intrusive & strident at times\x97is more a nuisance and a mood killer rather than a mood maker, especially during some crucial scenes, as it distracts you from ongoing events (not that such events are much worth seeing). The only good thing about TOE is the cinematography, which may be useful for film students. The long shot from a craning camera at the beginning is worth mentioning as the series of shots from different angles during the final shootout. Apart from that there\'s little of value here.\n\nHere\'s a stupid plot, I said, unfolding in an idiotic fashion carried on by dumb characters. I only needed 10 min. to come to that conclusion and I don\'t need to abound on that, as already many reviewers have delved on it; I\'ll just state that by that time Vargas & wife have proved to be the dumbest romantic couple ever walking on Earth. Exs.: right after a terrorist bombing he sends her away alone in an unknown and hostile land, telling her to go back to her hotel, only to see her almost run over by truck right there--which doesn\'t bothers him the least anyway. But then she proceeds to show she\'s even dumber than him when following a total stranger to a place she doesn\'t even known, only because the guy is holding a paper in which someone has written that he got something which could interest her husband. "Aw, what can I lose?" She murmurs innocently, before marching on at the heels of the stranger--Your life, dummy! Moments later Wells himself shows up, a caricature of the bad guy in some cheap B movie, displaying his arched brows, his evil stare, driving with a hedge hammer the point that he\'s the real villain in this film. But all that\'s topped later by the even dumber shouting match between she--Vargas and Brandi, which brought memories of the original TV Batman series--only that in this case we are supposed to take the confrontation seriously. And that brings me to the subject of the characters themselves.\n\nThey are not even stereotypical; they are simple cartoons. Caricatures of caricatures. Speedy Gonzalez is a better developed character than Heston\'s Vargas even if he\'s just a mouse. And Leigh doesn\'t fare much better either: her she--Vargas here is just a parody of her Psycho\'s Marion Crane. She may be a great actress but she doesn\'t have anything to work on, there\'s no meat in her role, as the film sorely lacks in tension and conflict, simply because the villains here are also caricatures; nothing more than pathetic mock ups of the real stuff\x97just think about the current drug war in that same region which has claimed the lives of almost 30.000 people in the last few years, and try to put Brandi and his nephews in that picture. No way. They are simply laughable--so much so even Leigh can shout the clan boss down, even calling him "pig" in his face, with no unpleasant repercussions. But that\'s easy for her to do, as Brandi looks and acts more like a watered down, innocuous, version of De Vito\'s Penguin--rather than a mob boss--and his nephews like rejects from auditions for some Broadway take on West Side Story. While watching them I couldn\'t help thinking that here\'s probably where the creators of the orig. Batman TV series got the inspiration for their villains. (See that fight with Vargas in the bar for ex.; the only thing missing there was those familiar Bang! Auch! Slam!) As for Wells, he doesn\'t even look menacing; only fat, unkempt, even disgusting. (I wouldn\'t come anywhere near that guy before eating, and neither after). But the worst of them all is that utterly superfluous fruitcake of night motel manager--What is his raison d\'etre here anyway? \n\nIn any film with true villains the atmosphere\'s set in the beginning in images, scenes that strike the viewer\'s imagination\x97like a horse head in a bed, for ex. or the Spectre minion failing in his mission and then being eaten by sharks. That\'s cinematographic genius. In TOE instead, Wells uses that same technique to destroy the mood of his movie, to de-construct it. That scene in the lot, when Brandi slaps his nephew, and in response this one gives him a finger, indicates that we\'ll have no villains here, just a sad lot of clownish punks. From that moment on you couldn\'t take the Brandi clan seriously anymore and that killed all possible suspense, tension; and with that, the movie.\n\n2/10 only for the cinematography.', u'-0.529429', u"I love noir. I love Wells. I love black and white. But this film is a terrible mess. 1. The plot is senseless and full of holes 2. There is no logic to any actions by the characters 3. The story is as flimsy as Wells is enormous\n\nWells forgot the first rule in any film, you've got to have a good story or the rest doesn't matter. All the odd angles, the interesting lighting and even the greatness of Wells himself cant save this pile of waste. Its like going to the best restaurant in town, expensive and elegant, and getting served a happy meal thats cold and stale. A complete waste of time. Unless of course you overlook the story, the acting, and all of the swiss cheese holes. Just miserable.", u'-0.326895', u'Orson Welles\' classic crime drama about corruption and betrayal features a colourful array of characters and some excellent performances from its very talented cast. Its fluid style is established right from the start with the incredibly accomplished long tracking sequence which opens the film. The use of some marvellous camera-work and Russell Metty\'s exceptional cinematography also produce a dark and sometimes oppressive atmosphere which is totally compatible with the story\'s sordid and pessimistic nature.\n\nHenry Mancini\'s musical score incorporates jazz and Latin American influences but the action is also effectively accompanied by a pianola and a variety of ambient sounds which also contribute solidly to the movie\'s atmosphere.\n\nWhen a bomb is planted in a car in a Mexican town and the vehicle subsequently blows up in U.S territory, the cross border cooperation which becomes necessary brings together Police Captain Hank Quinlan (Orson Welles) and Mike Vargas (Charlton Heston) who is a newly married Mexican narcotics enforcement official. Quinlan, a detective who has a reputation for quick convictions, is openly hostile to Vargas\' involvement and even makes racist remarks about him. Vargas is also involved in the prosecution of a case against a member of the Grandi gang and suspects them of planting the bomb which resulted in the death of a local man, Rudy Linnekar and the young lady who was travelling with him.\n\nMeanwhile, Vargas\' wife Susan (Janet Leigh) is subjected to threats by "Uncle" Joe Grandi (Akim Tamiroff) who demands that Vargas should call off the prosecution of his brother on drugs charges. Susan is not intimidated but is nevertheless moved to a motel on the American side of the border for her own safety.\n\nQuinlan uses his intuition and identifies Manolo Sanchez (Victor Millan) (who is secretly married to Linnekar\'s daughter) as a suspect and when his colleague Sgt Pete Menzies (Joseph Calleia) discovers two sticks of dynamite in a shoebox, this seems to confirm Sanchez\'s guilt. Vargas realises, however, that the evidence had been planted as he\'d seen the shoebox empty shortly before Menzies made the discovery. Vargas informs Quinlan\'s superior officer about the evidence being planted and in retaliation Quinlan agrees to a suggestion from "Uncle" Joe Grandi that they work together to destroy Vargas\' reputation. Shortly after, Susan is terrorised and drugged by Grandi\'s gang and moved back to his hotel on the Mexican side of the border. Quinlan then strangles Grandi and frames Susan for the murder.\n\nVargas gets access to Quinlan\'s case files which confirm that after his wife had been murdered by a "half-breed", he hadn\'t been able to get the necessary evidence to get a conviction and he had since been using his intuition and planting evidence to secure convictions.\n\nWhen Vargas fails to contact his wife by telephone, he goes to the motel and finds her room in chaos and reeking of marijuana. Later, he discovers that she\'s been jailed on suspicion of using drugs and murdering Grandi.\n\nSgt Pete Menzies had always hero worshipped Quinlan and had been tremendously loyal to him, not least because, in the past, Quinlan had taken a bullet for him and this had been the cause of his colleague\'s permanent limp. However, after Vargas tells him what he found in the case files, Menzies is convinced that the information is true and when he reveals that he found Quinlan\'s cane in the room where Susan was found, the detective\'s involvement becomes clear. The two men then team up and ultimately bring a permanent end to Quinlan\'s corrupt practices.\n\nInitially, Quinlan, a towering, obese and corrupt character with a history of alcoholism, seems totally unsympathetic but the revelations about the circumstances of his wife\'s murder put another complexion on his behaviour and point to the source of his racism. The fact that he took a bullet for a colleague is also indicative of a more noble side to his character and clearly the failure to bring his wife\'s murderer to justice tormented him cruelly and presumably led to his alcoholism. His dealings with ex-lover and fortune teller Tanya (Marlene Dietrich) also reveal greater warmth and humanity than are evident at first. Vargas is significantly younger than Quinlan and his integrity and idealism are still intact but interestingly, the way in which he loses control following his wife\'s abduction points clearly to the potential that exists for him to take the same route as Quinlan in the longer term.\n\nWhen Sgt Menzies became aware that he\'d been regularly used to find the evidence that Quinlan had planted he felt betrayed and responded by betraying his old friend and colleague. Quinlan\'s methods were clearly corrupt, however, a revelation in the latter part of the movie suggests that his intuition was sound and the people who he\'d previously arrested and convicted were, in all probability, guilty.\n\n"Touch Of Evil" is one of those films which make a profound impression overall but surprisingly its most haunting lines are delivered not by one of the leading characters but instead by Marlene Dietrich\'s Tanya.', u'-0.166128'], u'tt0064115': [u'\nOK, for those of you who aren\'t sure whether "Butch Cassidy and The Sundance Kid" is a good, or even great movie, just do the following:\n\nScroll up to "memorable quotes".  Go on, do it and then read what follows.  I\'ll be right here when you get back.\n\nFinished?  Did you read those lines?  THAT, my friends, that and the fact they are spoken by some great actors is what makes this film so wonderful.  They are perfectly balanced between being funny, endearing and also revealing about the characters.  There\'s genuine emotion and warmth in a lot of that.\n\nConrad Hall, George Roy Hill, Burt Bacharach et al all contributed marvelously but I love the cast; such quality and for some of them, in small, but memorable roles:  George Furth, Ted Cassidy, Kenneth Mars, Strother Martin, Katherine Ross and the stars at the top; Newman and Redford who did perfect justice to Goldman\'s script.', u'0.809069', u'\n"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is rightfully hailed as one of the greatest westerns ever made, although much of the movie takes place in South America.  It is a great look at two likeable outlaws, full of witty dialogue and exciting action sequences.\n\nButch Cassidy (Paul Newman) and The Sundance Kid (Robert Redford) are two bank robbers, chased by the law.  The plot follows them as they travel to Bolivia after a railroad president hires a posse to hunt them do.  The story is mostly composed of short pieces telling a little story about them.  There is really no connection all the way through, for the most part.\n\nThe story isn\'t about the plot, however.  It is about Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid.  It is a close look at two criminals, the talented Sundance Kid, and Butch Cassidy, the one who does all the thinking.  The charisma and screen presence of the two actors and the way they work together is what drives the film.  Watching the two interact, with a superb script full of great dialogue, is what makes this movie so exciting.\n\nSee this movie if you are a fan of westerns, or just a fan of good movies.  It is exciting, superbly made (with lots of interesting silent scenes to music and montages of photographs), but it also has a lot of depth.\n\n**** out of ****', u'0.447678', u'George Roy Hill\'s film has its excitements and it claims the fashionable climactic bloodbath, but mostly it\'s played for fun\x85 \n\nIt\'s a highly individual Western; a triumph of style, in fact\x85 The style is dominant, intelligent, flowing with charm; the playful teasing, and Newman supplied with a hat on a bike, and the contemporary lyrical Bacharach pop tune\x85 It\'s a style that flowers in the Newman-Redford relationship, which is one of the most affecting in movies\x85\n\nAll this gives it the feel and look of fanciful myth carried to a point unusually removed from reality... Backgrounds are sketched rather than etched\x85 You are never really moving toward the west in time and place... With belief suspended, feelings are only light1y involved\x85\n\nBut it\'s derring-do at its most flamboyant and given a tangy taste by its essentially modern sense of humor... When Butch and Sundance ride back from relaxation to their Hole-in-the-Wall lair and find they have a mutiny on their hands\x97Harvey Logan (Ted Cassidy) wants to take over\x97Butch doesn\'t quell it with bullets but with a boot up Logan\'s backside\x85 It\'s that kind of picture\x85\n\nSimilarly, when too much dynamite scatters the haul from a rail hold-up, this is a moment for wry, amusing comment\x85 And when the posse pursues the pair this is one posse that \'heroes\' can\'t easily shake off\x85 It\'s always there, cleverly made more irksome by long-shot, so that finally only a \'death defying leap\' as the circuses say, can separate hunted from hunters\x85. \n\n"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is undoubtedly a captivating tour de force\x85 Its flavor is preserved from cloying by just the right edge of wistfulness provided by Katharine Ross as the schoolteacher girl-friend who goes along and who suggests the transience of it all\x85\n\nNewman and Redford good-natured fellowship is felt from the opening to the final scene\x85 Sundance seems closer to the traditional Western character... He is strong, silent, willing to face confrontations and shoot it out\x85 Butch is an atypical outlaw, enormously charming and courteous, has never killed anyone, and tries to avoid showdowns\x85 \n\nThroughout the film, Newman is engagingly spontaneous in his expressions, gestures and timing of dialog\x85While Sundance is practical, Butch is a hopelessly ridiculous optimist and romantic dreamer\x85 While they flee the posse, he continually expresses optimism, but beneath is a child-like need for reassurance\x85 Small indications of his self-awareness emerge at other times, undercutting his casual exterior\x85 For instance, despite the naturalness of the m\xe9nage-\xe0-trois, Butch is really the outsider, and he knows it\x85 In the lovely still-photo montage of their New York holiday, Butch watches with wistful longing as they dance, but then smiles\x97aware of his isolation but content in their happiness\x85 \n\n"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" earned seven Academy Award nominations including Best Picture... It won four (Cinematography, Score, Song, and Original Screenplay).', u'0.84036', u'"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is a great film just due to the pairing of Paul Newman and Robert Redford. These two work so well together that the film would have been impressive no matter what. However, with a smart story and great direction by George Roy Hill, "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" was the smash-hit of 1969 as it achieved box office dominance and won more Oscars (four) than any other film that year. It did not win the Best Picture or Best Director Oscars as "Midnight Cowboy" and its director John Schlesinger took home those honors, but it has stood the test of time and is right up there with the other imperative films of that important year ("Midnight Cowboy", "Easy Rider", and "The Wild Bunch"). The two titled characters are two shrewd outlaws who love to rob trains and banks. However, the law has about had it with the outlaws and the two decide that Bolivia is the place they need to be. Also along for the ride is school-teacher Katharine Ross who obviously has feelings for both men. They both want to go straight in Bolivia, but temptation is too big for them and in the end tragedy will occur for the titled characters. Of course this film is based on real people, but so little is known about them that the film-makers were able to take many liberties with the tale. The film-makers went for comedy and action, but it is the drama and the likable characters that make "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" one of the best films produced in the 1960s. 5 stars out of 5.', u'0.423392', u'\n   "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is one of the greatest movies ever made.  It is my favorite film of all time, and the biggest reason for that is because of its script by William Goldman.  It\'s very rare in film that a script has perfect lines in it from beginning to end, but this film is an example of what can be achieved by Hollywood screenwriters. It was William Goldman\'s script of this movie that sparked my passion for the American cinema.  Though most Westerns of the cinema past have serious and gritty tones to them, this film has just the right mix of comedy, wit, and adventure.  The greatest team in Hollywood history, arguably, is the team of Paul Newman and Robert Redford.  The presence by these two Hollywood legends has help cement this film as one of the greatest movies ever made - according to organizations like the American Film Institute.  The direction by George Roy Hill is first rate, and much credit also has to be given to cinematographer Conrad Hall, who did a great job giving this film the superior look of the Old West. \n\n   Katherine Ross adds to this film in the role as the beautiful Etta Place, as does the score, which makes us feel good about going to the movies.  This was the film that, for the first time, got audiences to root for "the bad guys".  This film should be shown in every film school to show film students how to make a theatrical film.  I will always love this movie, and indeed, this movie is something special.  It is also special to me because the REAL Sundance Kid was born in my hometown of Phoenixville, Pennsylvania.', u'0.45966', u'\nThis is pretty much the ultimate action western movie I can think of. This movie has everything you could want, and it appeals to almost any type of viewer. Paul Newman, one of if not the best actor of our time is the lead along with Robert Redford, the two go together perfectly, I dare say this is one of the best combinations in Hollywood history.\n\nAnyways the story takes place in the midwest, Newman and Redord run "The Hole in the Wall Gang" named after their hideout. They rob trains and take big scores, later the Pacific railroad gets together the best tracker and lawmen in the entire Western United States to track and kill Butch and Sundance. They must manage to evade their elite counterparts, the movie is 100 percent entertainment, especially during the chases. The movie is based on true events and is spectacular.\n\nThis movie won Best Score, Best Song (Raindrops) which was very good untraditional music in a western, it fit good in this movie, Best Cinematography, shot by Conrad L. Hall who also did Road To Perdition, arguably the best cinematography done to this very day, and Adapated Screenplay, all for the right reasons. George Roy Hill, Paul Newman, and Robert Redford all went on to create "The Sting" in 1973, which is possibly one of the best movies ever made. I praise this movie, 10/10', u'0.824566', u'One of the best and most-liked films of the 1960s, this is still a fun movie to watch today. When I saw this on DVD on a nice flat-screen set, I was amazed how good this looked. I had seen it several times before on VHS and hadn\'t realized how good this was photographed. I just discovered Conrad Hall was the cinematographer, which explains it. Few, if any, were better than him.\n\nOne remembers this western for several things: the two leads looking over their shoulders incredulous that their pursers seem to be always there; Paul Newman riding a bicycle to the tune of "Raindrops Keep Falling On My Head," the beautiful Katharine Ross, the chemistry of Newman and Robert Redford as a two-man team, on and on. Those three lead actors, with the repartee between them, and the likability of each, make them fun to watch as they dominate this picture. \n\nIt\'s just solid entertainment and another example of good film-making that doesn\'t need a lot of R-rated material to make it successful. Photography-wise, the western scenery was great, there were some wonderful closeup shots and I really liked the tinted old-time footage inserted in here. \n\nSo, when you combine all the elements, it\'s no surprise this film won so many awards and endures so well.', u'0.681336', u"This has got to be one of my favorite westerns. It has everything you could possibly want for every movie fan. They're so many great aspect and I will attempt to display some of them.\n\nThe acting, what can I say about it. It was a perfect fit for Redford and Newman who are both friends in the movie and real life. They deliver exhilarating, funny and electrifying performance. It is so great I can't even put it into words. These two actors were robbed of an at least an Oscar nomination. It has to be the biggest Oscar snub ever. Watching this movie my only wish is that Redford and Newman would have done more movies together.\n\nThe writing was great and creative. I have never witnessed a movie that was so serious and yet so funny. The writing totally propelled this movie forward. The fact that Butch and Sundance went to Bolivia trying to outrun the law was hilarious. This has got to be some of the best writing ever.\n\nThe directing by George Roy Hill was as well amazing displaying the chase scenes and just sitting back and letting the writing and directing take over. But most of all he let Robert Redford and Paul Newman do their thing. You could see that they were both feeding off each other and George Roy Hill never seemed to interrupt their chemistry. \n\nI would advise anyone and everyone to watch this. They are just so many laughs, many fun action scenes and of course Paul Newman and Robert Redford.", u'0.588985', u"\nThis is a great movie all around. It's a great Western, it's a great comedy, it's a great action, and it's a great drama. George Roy Hill did an excellent job with this movie. Paul Newman is one of my favorite actors, and who doesn't like Robert Redford? I just recently saw this movie and I was very pleased when it was over. They also managed to make this an accurate depiction, because, like the tagline states, for the most part, it's true.\n\n\nPaul Newman and Robert Redford do outstanding jobs as Butch and Sundance. They have make a great team, and it's fun to watch them rob trains and banks, and narrowly escape from the Pinkerton Posse. This movie also has great performances. The two actors make you like Butch and Sundance, and you want them to escape.\n\nI also thought it was interesting when I learned that the real Hole In The Wall Gang (besides Butch and Sundance)would soon become the Wild Bunch, or so I'm told. I find this movie a total enjoyment and can be enjoyed by anyone. I think that even the most shrill person can find things they like about this movie, so check it out, because it is and always will be a classic! 10/10  ", u'0.490667', u"\nGeorge Roy Hill\xb4s funny Western is still modern and hasn't aged bad at all. Paul Newman is charming and charismatic, and Robert Redford is energetic. I don't know why some Western-fans doesn't like it because it is filled with powerful and spectacular gunfights, humor, friendship and beautiful pictures - which is the reasons why you watch Westerns, isn't it? I am fully aware of the fact that 'Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid' was an unusual Western when it came. After this there were made other attempts or experiments like this but I don't think that they succeeded. 'Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid' has also the rare ability to even smell, taste or feel classic when you watch it ... Robert Redford was never better than here.\n\nRating: 9 of 10. ", u'0.423848', u'\nI can remember seeing this movie, at the Colony Theater in Portsmouth Virginia, when it was first released. Since then, I\'ve seen it at least 30 times, most recently last night. In my humble opinion, Paul Newman & Robert Redford made an excellent movie twosome 30 years ago [and expanded on it a few years later, in The Sting]. In reading the reviews submitted about this movie it makes me happy to see that most of the people agree with my opinion. How could you not like these characters, along with Etta, "those guys" following them and eventually Strother [who will always be remembered for his "what we have here is a failure to communicate" in Cool Hand Luke] Martin? Not to mention the scenes where Etta enters the picture, when Butch has to fight Logan, when they have to jump in the water and, of course, the ending sequence of events. I won\'t say "they don\'t make them like they used to", but this one is a keeper. And if you agree with my evaluation, and have a DVD player, watch the DVD that has interviews, etc., to give you an even better picture of this excellent movie.\n', u'0.378293', u"\nSeeing this film again on DVD -- more than 30 years after the first time I saw it -- I'm struck by two things. First, it holds up well for a movie so redolent of a particular time (the 1960s, of course, not the 1890s). Second, whether the filmmakers fully intended it this way or not, it's really a very good film about a topic Westerns don't tackle often: arrested adolescence.\n\nMost great Westerns -- ``My Darling Clementine,'' ``Rio Bravo,'' ``The Wild Bunch,'' ``Unforgiven'' -- are about adults. ``Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid'' is about two guys who, physically, are pushing 40, but whose mental age is stuck somewhere around 16. They may be charming, but their whole lives revolve around their narcissistic pal-ship. For them, being outlaws doesn't seem to be about expressing anti-social impulses or even getting money they haven't earned, but merely about hanging out with each other. Their talk with each other is mainly brittle ritualized patter and stock jokes, mixed with Butch's pipe dreams. They can't talk about anything serious even at the end, when they must realize -- at some level -- that they're about to die. Screenwriter William Goldman emphasizes the oddly callow, adolescent tone of their relationship by repeatedly having them express surprise when they stumble over some bit of biography -- their real names, or the fact that Sundance is from New Jersey -- that you'd think real friends would have known about decades ago.\n\nThe movie's whole point is that Butch and Sundance can't develop any type of dramatic arc. Harshly changing times demand they change with the times or die -- and they can't change and ultimately choose, by default, to die. They do get a huge lucky break when they get away from the Superposse _ but all they can think to do with it is change not what they're doing, but merely where they're doing it. They can't even change enough to keep Etta Place with them, even though both Butch and Sundance really do love her, in their way. (Etta, in contrast to Butch and Sundance, is harshly realistic about her life and her limits -- she knows she isn't strong enough to die with them or to see them die.) Butch and Sundance, as far as we can see, don't care about much outside themselves and Etta. \n\nThis is why the movie's ending -- that famous freeze frame -- is so perfect. Butch and Sundance are secure, together, in their niche in history. They don't have to worry about changing times or the baffling world outside themselves any longer. They've won out over time and change -- the only way anybody ever can.", u'-0.218361', u'I saw this movie when it first came out, like, almost 40 years ago. Was it really that long ago? I guess it was. Anyway, I remember it as being a good movie and I haven\'t seen it since. So now I have kids who are teenagers and so I think, hey, maybe they\'d like to see a good western, funny and entertaining, so I put it in my Netflix queue, and it finally came up last week and we watched it last weekend.\n\nWhat a disappointment.\n\nFor the life of me, I cannot understand why I ever liked this movie or how it got the reputation it has. It is simply a bad movie that does not hold up well. What makes it bad? The one attribute I would give this movie is boring. Really boring. The scenes just dragged on and on and it got so that I just wanted it to end. Like the bicycle/Raindrops-keep-fallin\'-on-my-head scene. What was Hill thinking? If he wanted to establish a relationship between Newman and Ross, the length of that scene could have been cut by about two thirds. Likewise later on, when the camera was panning across sepia photographs of the three main characters to illustrate them making their way down to Bolivia. Again, way too long. We already got the point, but still the sequence dragged on interminably. I actually hit the FF button on my DVD remote at one point and even at 2X, I was surprised how long it took to get to the end of that sequence.\n\nAnd the chemistry between Redford and Newman was almost lifeless, like a glass of soda left out overnight. I don\'t why, but all the lines (like "who ARE those guys?") I remember as being funny just fell mostly flat. Also, a good actress can light up the screen; but Katherine Ross was about as incandescent as an sick firefly. True, she was not given much to do in this film, but what she did get, she did poorly, reciting her lines mostly in a dull monotone. It\'s as if she was anticipating her later role in "The Stepford Wives" (which, incidentally, was a much better movie than this one).\n\nSo I don\'t know why everybody thinks this movie is so wonderful; I did not find it so and I guess I will have to be in the minority.', u'-0.47358', u"I have heard a lot about Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid, story and movie wise. I enjoyed The Good, The Bad, and The Ugly so much that I decided to give Western movies another shot, maybe I just didn't appreciate them more when I was young. But Butch Cassidy was pretty slow paced and doesn't even have much of a story. So why the big fuss? Robert Redford and Paul Newman had good chemistry and I did believe in their friendship and partnership sort of speak. This movie was also beautifully shot, so there are a few points where I can say I had a positive view on the movie.\n\nBut I felt like there was no story and it just wasn't really my type of movie that I could get into. I hope most of IMDb users understand, we've all been there. But if you want my opinion for those of you who don't enjoy Westerns, only stick to The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly. If you want to, give Butch Cassidy a chance, but I did warn you.\n\n5/10", u'-0.159742', u'Usually if you find that you don\'t like a film which has been deemed a classic you can at least see what it may be that leads people to think so highly of the film. That is not the case with Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid. I don\'t get it. I\'m not seeing what so many others apparently are seeing. I see an incredibly overrated film that is not even remotely worthy of the near mythical status it has attained. Whatever it is that supposedly makes this film a classic is well and truly lost on me.\n\nThe biggest problem with the film is that nobody involved apparently could decide what kind of film it was they were making. Was it a serious Western or a comedy Western? The film ends up stuck in some sort of netherworld in between. It\'s much too jokey to take very seriously but not nearly funny enough to be labeled a comedy. The film tries to be multiple things and ends up not being much of anything at all. It\'s a film that never really convinces, things always seem a bit off. Just the very concept that the "good guys", the guys we\'re meant to sympathize with and root for, are actually the bad guys was always going to be a little jarring. Hooray for the train robbers! It could have worked but it really doesn\'t. No fault of the actors as Paul Newman and Robert Redford, Newman especially, make the characters of Butch and Sundance respectively easy to like. And Sundance\'s girl, played by Katharine Ross, certainly has her charms as well. But even if you end up liking these characters it\'s still hard to like the movie.\n\nYou would think it would be hard to make a boring movie based on the exploits of notorious bank and train robbers. But that\'s pretty much what we have here. This film moves at a snail\'s pace, moments of excitement are few and far between. The interminable chase sequence dropped into the middle of the film surely doesn\'t help. If I had to watch Butch peer into the distance and say "Who are those guys?" one more time I\'d scream. Get on with it already. Honestly for much of its running time this movie has you desperately trying to stifle yawns. And when the movie tries to have a little fun it generally doesn\'t work. So many jokes which fall flat. And that famous, yet exceedingly dopey, bicycle sequence. Hard to take the movie seriously after that. Good song though. I just have no idea what in the world it\'s doing in this movie. One thing you can say for the movie is that it is beautifully photographed. Cinematographer Conrad Hall\'s Oscar was well earned. And Newman and Redford, both of course terrific actors, do have very good chemistry and Ross fits in well also. The interactions among the three lead performers provide some good moments. But there are not nearly enough of those moments to salvage the film. It\'s dull and drawn out, it\'s neither serious enough to work as a real Western or funny enough to get by on comedic value. The film just doesn\'t work. But it\'s a "classic". I don\'t get it.', u'-0.234811'], u'tt0046912': [u"Tony Wendice (Ray Milland), an ex-tennis player, unhappily married to Margot (Grace Kelly), correctly guesses that she has been cheating, with Mark Halliday (Robert Cummings). Mark writes crime stories. Unbeknown to Margot and Mark, Tony knows about the affair, and wants to teach Margot a little lesson, by taking away the thing that is her life. But, being too guileful to do it himself, Wendice blackmails one of his old school friends into murdering her, and the essential thing to doing it is his latchkey.\n\nDial M for Murder succeeds on many levels, and it is largely thanks to some superb dialogue, written from a tricksy-yet-capable script that never gets too deep. The cast are a treat. Ray Milland is an absolute gem, extremely sly and dispassionate, yet a character so full of self-assurance that one almost sides with him. Grace Kelly completes her great year (she gave an Oscar-winning performance in The Country Girl and also starred in Rear Window) by emanating the poised, beautiful being, that is vulnerable, yet oddly unassailable. And it's weird in that even though she's cheating on her husband, you care for her a lot more than him (although that could do with the fact that he's trying to kill her...) And John Williams, as the police detective, is quite wonderful.\n\nAlfred Hitchcock manipulates and enthrals his audience here like the master that he is. Each scene has a sense of direction, great pacing, and is staged realistically. Stunning full colour photography and a haunting, atmospheric score from Dimitri Tiomkin complete this great package. The ending, when it comes, feels a little too nice to be truly realistic, but that is my only major quibble with an otherwise highly entertaining, thrilling movie.", u'0.458211', u'After earning an Academy award nomination for her performance in John Ford\'s 1953 tale of romance and adventure, "Mogambo", the beautiful actress Grace Kelly proved that she was way more than just a pretty face and that there was real talent behind her image. However, what truly took her career to new levels were three now classic films she made directed by the legendary Master of Suspense, Alfred Hitchcock. Under his direction, Kelly made an integral part of the Master\'s films, becoming the perfect embodiment of Hitchcock\'s idea of a female protagonist. While Kelly debuted two years earlier in the classic Western "High Noon", one could say that it was Hitchcock who really introduced the beauty and talent of Grace Kelly to the world. "Dial M for Murder" was the first of Hitchcock\'s films with Kelly, and a movie where once again the Master returns to a familiar theme: the perfect murder.\n\nThe movie is the story of Tony Wendice (Ray Milland), a former tennis player married to the beautiful and wealthy Margot (Grace Kelly) and living in an nice apartment in London. Life is good for Tony, until he discovers that his wife is cheating on him with an old flame of her, famous crime novel writer Mark Halliday (Robert Cummings). After that discovery, Tony spends a whole years plotting the perfect way to murder his wife in order to inherit her money, carefully planning every detail of the crime. When Mark visits London again, Tony finds the perfect chance to set his plan in motion, and as planned, he recruits Charles Swann (Anthony Dawson) to kill his wife. However, bad luck and a sudden change of events will test Tony\'s plan\'s infallibility as, just as Mark points out, human action can originate flaws even in the most perfectly devised plan.\n\nLike most Hitchcock\'s films, "Dial M for Murder" was an adaptation of another art-form, this time a popular play by Frederick Knott. As Knott was also the writer of the screenplay, the movie remains extremely faithful to the play, although of course, not without its differences. Knott\'s script is wonderfully constructed, as like in the play, the dialog is witty and simply captivating, with many twists and turns that spiced up the complex plot and keep it from being boring or tiresome. An interesting feature of the movie is that oddly, there are no black and white morality in the characters, and it\'s easy not only to sympathize with Margot (despite she being cheating on her husband) but also to sympathize with Tony (despite he wanting to kill his wife), as the characters are wonderfully developed with very detailed personalities.\n\nIt seems that Hitchcock\'s knows that the dialog is the highlight of the play, as he deliberately focuses on his actors and uses an elegant camera-work to frame the whole movie inside the apartment. The movie literally is shot entirely in one single room (only two other sets are used, and only briefly), but Hitchcock\'s classy way of using the camera allow a highly dynamic flow that never lets the movie be tiresome. This is also very helpful as Hitchcock just lets his characters keep speaking, carefully describing actions and events (when other directors would use flashbacks) in a similar way to a what the real play would be. While this approach could easily get boring, Hitchcock\'s use of colors and overall visual imagery simply creates the perfect medium to allow Knott\'s dialog to shine.\n\nWithout disrespecting John Ford or Fred Zinnemann, I think that it was Hitchcock who finally could allow Kelly\'s talent to shine beyond her physical beauty. Grace Kelly makes her character shine with her subtle and restrained performance, specially showing her skill in the second half of the film. While often Kelly receives top honors in this movie, it is actually Ray Milland who makes the whole movie work with his suave and charming "villian". Milland\'s performance is simply terrific, making his character nice enough to win the sympathies of the audience, yet still frighteningly intelligent as the mastermind of the plot. John Williams appears as the Inspector in charge to solve the complex puzzle, and delivers a classic performance as the Enlgish gentleman decided to find the final answer. Only Robert Cummings seems miscast as Mark Halliday, although a lot of his weak performance could be blamed to Milland, Kelly and Williams overshadowing him with their excellent work.\n\nIn many ways, "Dial M for Murder" shares many things with "Rope", as not only the two films are based on successful plays, they are also about committing the perfect murder and oddly, they are both "experiments": while "Rope" was conceived as a "movie in one take", "Dial M for Murder" was done as 3-D movie. Sadly, the interest in 3-D was dying when the film was released, so few theaters carried the movie complete with the gimmick; a real shame, as Hitchcock\'s use of the technology, unlike most 3-D films of its time, was conceived as a way to enhance the claustrophobia of the Wendices\' apartment instead of using it to merely shock the audience with "stuff coming out of the screen" (as seen in for example, "House of Wax"). While not too fond of the gimmick, Hitchcock truly gave it a good and intelligent (albeit subtle) use to it.\n\n"Dial M for Murder" is probably less celebrated than the Master\'s most famous movies, the fact that it came out the same years as "Rear Window" (again with Grace Kelly) may have had something to do with it too. While a subtler and more restrained tale of suspense, this is still the Master at his best, as the movie proves that when he was at the top of his game, no other director was comparable to him. 9/10', u'0.639903', u'\n1954 was a big year for Grace Kelly.  She played in Hitchcock\'s classic "Rear window" and she won an Oscar for best actress in "The country girl" and most people tend to forget that she starred in yet another classic, "Dial M for murder".  Starring Grace Kelly, Ray Milland, and Robert Cummings, it is simply one of Hitchcock\'s finest movies of all-time.  In fact, I would consider it to be my second favorite Hitchcock movie ever, my first being "Psycho" (although I haven\'t seen "Rear window" yet).\n\n  Margot (Grace Kelly) is married to Tony Wendice (Ray Milland), an ex-tennis player.  However, she has been seeing another man named Mark Halliday (Robert Cummings).  Mark writes crime stories.  The two of them think that Tony doesn\'t know about their relationship but they\'re wrong; Tony has known about this relationship for one year and seems to have had enough of it.  So when Mark, who lives in New-York, comes to London to see Margot, Tony wants to go out with Mark and his wife.  But the night of the event, Tony is unable to go.  So he tells Margot to take Mark out and to have a good time.  The only problem is that Tony doesn\'t really have something that\'s keeping him from going out with Margot and Mark.  He has another plan, the plan being to blackmail one of his old college friends that has become a small time crook into murdering his wife.\n\n  What follows this is pure entertainment at its best.  As usual, Hitchcock masterfully directs this movie and has the right actors to do the job.  Ray Milland and Grace Kelly deliver very good performances and surprisingly enough, Robert Cummings does a rather good job in his role of Mark Halliday, the American crime novel writer who accidentally stumbles on the answer.  But it is John Williams who steals the show with his great performance as Inspector Hubbard, the detective who holds the key to the whole mistery.  He is simply excellent and pretty funny when he is supposed to be.  Another of his great performances is in "Witness for the prosecution" where he played Brogan Moore, Charles Laughton\'s very good friend and seconding lawyer in the case.  As for "Dial M for murder", well it\'s one of those movies that anyone should see at pretty much any cost.\n', u'0.356857', u'This is a fine example of the kind of mystery that little old ladies \r from Pasadena (or Russell Square) adore. Perhaps Arsenic and Old Lace \r (1944) starring Cary Grant might be comparable in its gentile and \r bloodless ability to glue us to the screen.\r \r\nThis is certainly one of Hitchcock\'s best, but most of the credit must \r go to a devilishly clever play written by Frederick Knott from which \r the movie was adapted. (He also wrote Wait Until Dark (1967) starring \r Audrey Hepburn.) Hitchcock does a good job in not tinkering \r unnecessarily with the material. He also has the exquisitely beautiful \r Grace Kelly to play the part of Margot Wendice.\r \r\nRay Milland plays, with a kind of high-toned Brit panache, her \r diabolical husband, Tony Wendice, a one-time tennis star who married \r mostly for security. John Williams is the prim and proper Chief \r Inspector Hubbard. He lends to the part a bit of Sherlock Holmesian \r flair. One especially liked his taking a moment to comb his mustache \r after the case is solved. Robert Cummings, unfortunately plays Margot\'s \r American boyfriend as inventively as a sawhorse. For those of you who \r might have blinked, Hitchcock makes his traditional appearance in the \r photo on the wall from Tony Wendice\'s undergraduate days.\r \r\nThe fulcrum of the plot is the latchkey. It is the clue that \r (literally) unlocks the mystery. There is a modernized redoing of this \r movie called A Perfect Murder (1998) starring Michael Douglas and \r Gwyneth Paltrow in which a similar business with latchkeys is employed. \r I am not very good with clues so it was only after seeing that movie \r and Dial M for Murder for the second time that I finally understood \r what happened. Follow the latchkey!\r \r\nOf course I was too distracted by Grace Kelly to fully appreciate such \r intricacies. I found myself struck with the ironic notion that anyone, \r even a cuckolded husband, might want to kill Grace Kelly or that a jury \r might find her guilty of anything! She remains in my psyche America\'s \r fairytale princess who quit Hollywood at the height of her popularity \r after only five years and eleven movies to become a real princess by \r marrying Prince Rainier of Monaco. Something was lost there, and \r something was gained. She was in essence the original Jackie Kennedy \r Onassis. I think, however, that the old saw about the man who marries \r for money, earning it, might apply to American princesses as well.\r \r\nAt any rate, Grace Kelly\'s cool and sublime bearing was on fine display \r here. Hitchcock cloths her in discreet nightgowns and snug (but \r certainly not clinging) dresses that show off her delicate figure and \r her exquisite arms and hint oh so coyly at her subtle sexuality. She \r was 25-years-old, stunningly beautiful, and in full confidence of her \r ability as an actress. She had just finished starring opposite James \r Stewart in another splendid Hitchcock one-room mystery, Rear Window \r (1954), and was about to make The Country Girl (1954) with Bing Crosby \r for which she would win an Oscar for Best Actress.\r \r\nSo see this for Grace Kelly who makes Gwyneth Paltrow (whom I adore) \r look downright gawky, and for Ray Milland whose urbane scheming seems a \r layer or two of hell removed from Michael Douglas\'s evil manipulations.\r \r\nBy the way, the "original theatrical trailer" preceding these Warner \r Brothers Classic videos is what we used to call the "Coming \r Attractions"--that is, clips directly from the movie and a promo. You \r might want to fast forward to the movie itself.', u'0.321577', u'There is a lot to admire about Alfred Hitchcock\'s "Dial M for Murder," and I do hold the film with a great deal of admiration and respect. However, what I adore about the movie the most (more than the cinematography, the suspense, the acting, and even the direction) is the work by screenwriter Frederick Knott. Mr. Knott based the screenplay for "Dial M for Murder" on his successful stage production, which I have never seen, but am told contains almost all of the words we hear in the film. And the words are music to the ears. They sing with intelligence, wit that Mr. Hitchcock certainly found attractive, and, best of all, an easy transition to the screen. Many times when a stage production goes to film, as far as I am concerned, the results, even if good, are uneven. Frequently, the dialogue and restricted set space allowed tend to give off the impression of a filmed play, not a cinematic experience. Another Hitchcock film, 1948\'s "Rope," though valiant, interesting, and successful, attempted this and suffered from this difficult struggle.\n\nBut the dialogue, put on film here, is exceptional. I write this review having seen "Dial M for Murder" two or three times and wanting to see it once again. Many reviewers, myself included, have tried watching films with the sound off. I want to try the opposite. I want to close my eyes and just listen to the dialogue because it\'s so strong. The MacGuffin conversation at the beginning, with a perfectly cast Ray Milland blackmailing a perfectly cast Anthony Dawson into murdering a perfectly cast Grace Kelly is brilliantly written by Mr. Knott. It was clearly from a stage production, as it explains the plot background in great detail, and goes on for the better part of twenty minutes. Both men are fleshed out, giving us their personalities and individual tendencies. And even though "Dial M for Murder" pretty much stays on just one small set (an apartment in London, in which we see mostly the foyer, a little of the bedroom, and just a glimpse of the kitchen), what happens there is so fascinating that we do not really want to venture out into the city.\n\nAnd that is just the setup. The dialogue remains insistently interesting and clever throughout the picture. It also has that subtle, dark sense of humor that Alfred Hitchcock was keen on. It also has the ironic touches, such as when Mr. Milland, as the jealous husband, kisses his unfaithful wife on the night she is to be murdered, and tells her: "Goodbye, my dear." The audience, having been given every single little detail about the scheme and how it is to unfold, cringes with a dark realization that Mr. Hitchcock might just go through with Mr. Milland\'s plot. Mr. Hitchcock, as the director, is also due tremendous credit for his trademark of creating tension. Screenwriter Knott brilliantly lays out for the audience, not the victim, how the murder will go through, but Mr. Hitchcock\'s camera dutifully follows everything as the scheme goes along. And, before we realize it, if something starts to go wrong, we become scared and tense. And you can imagine my guilt when I realized I was feeling scared that a plan to murder someone just might not go through. It\'s Mr. Hitchcock\'s gift at work.\n\nDimitri Tiomkin, a very good film composer, hits all the write notes; that includes knowing when he needs to tell his violins and trumpets to shut up. Robert Burks\' cinematography is also strong with effective usage of shadows and streaks of light. Colors are omnipresent. And even though "Dial M for Murder" was shot with the intent to be seen in 3D, it is hardly evident. When I first saw the film, in much superior 2D, I did not mind the lamps and such in the foreground, such as when one bisects the screen between Ray Milland and Anthony Dawson during the opening sequence. I just thought it was a clever piece of filmmaking and misc en scene, not a cheap gimmick like in most 3D movies today. "Dial M for Murder" is a near-perfect movie of its kind, pumped full of smart dialogue and dazzling energy. This is one of the few play-to-movie transition that I have seen where I have suddenly become eager to see the original stage production.', u'0.213412', u'Undoubtedly, "Dial M for Murder" has a clever plot: Tony Wendice (Ray Milland) plans "the perfect murder" to do away with his wife Margot (Grace Kelly), who cheated on him with novelist Mark (Robert Cummings). He blackmails an old schoolmate into committing the crime and plants clues to mislead the police. But when things don\'t go according to plan, Tony has to plant new clues and think of another explanation to give the detectives, so that suspicion doesn\'t fall on him.\n\nThe trouble is, the plot is the only interesting thing about this movie, and the characters are defined solely by how they can affect the plot. For instance, Mark writes mystery novels only because this explains his ability to "read" the crime scene. Most of the movie\'s dialogue is expository: long scenes where the characters debate the minutiae of evidence found at the scene, without an interesting subtext. The movie is known for taking place almost entirely in the Wendices\' living room, and Hitchcock does a good job of varying the camera angles to make you forget there\'s just one set. But he did this even better in "Rear Window," his other 1954 film.\n\nAdmittedly, Milland gives an enjoyable performance as the villain\x97truly a guy you love to hate, a clever and smiling sociopath. But Kelly and Cummings are surprisingly boring for a pair of adulterous lovers. Kelly also proves herself the ancestor of all those female horror- movie characters who go investigating strange noises in their best lingerie.\n\n"Dial M for Murder" is lightweight without actually being funny\x97a fatal combination. Though serious concerns (adultery, murder, the death penalty) underlie the story, we\'re never made to feel that they are really consequential. It\'s a cold and mechanical movie, which subordinates everything else to the demands of an intricate plot. Contrast this with something like "Rear Window," whose plot is simple and lacking in twists, but whose characters are vividly drawn and act as though their stories really meant something. Having a clever solution to a mystery does not a great movie make.', u'-0.280005', u"\nSurprisingly this is a lesser-known Hitchcock film but still stands up today as an exciting thriller full of twists and turns.\n\nRay Milland is excellent as ex-tennis pro Tony Wendice who decides to commit the perfect murder of his wife (Grace Kelly) when he learns of her affair with Robert Cummings (who isn't given much to do). In fact, Milland's subtle performance has you wanting the murder plot to work! Though it has to be said, Kelly's helpless female turn does not help in this regard either.\n\nHitchcock's skill here is to totally involve the viewer in the labyrinthine plot involving keys, telephone calls and stockings so that at the end of the film you haven't even noticed that virtually all the scenes are in one room.\n\nIf you like clever, wordy films with a touch of humour then I recommend `Dial M For Murder'. 8/10\n\n", u'0.321119', u"Hitchcock brings the successful play, Dial M for Murder by Frederick Knott, to life in a shocking new way. Adapted by use of the amazing 3D technology.\n\nThis movie is unique for Hitchcock in many ways. It is shot entirely in one room, yet there is never a moment of claustrophobia. As for many movies in the early 50's, it was shot in 3D. And you will at times notice scenes that play into that, but are done with the greatest of expertise. Also he chose not to change the play at all, but rather ride it out.\n\nAs the aging tennis pro or the jealous husband, Ray Milland is solid all the way through. And what can I say about Grace Kelly. Behind only Ingrid Bergman and Donna Reed, as the most beautiful and talented actresses of all time. She never fails to impress. She can be quite a darling and at the same time a spectacular bitch.\n\nProbably my favorite Hitchcock film, since it is the first one I saw. I was introduced to him very early in life at the age of 7, by my wicked older sister. For years Psycho haunted me and Vertigo confused. But I do thank her for Notorious and Rear Window. Dial M for and North by Northwest.\n\nSeems to me that Hitch was not the most attractive guy, yet like all of us he favored beautiful women. Especially blonde's. This leads me to the question of, what does a guy like Hitchcock know about women? Maybe simply, how to kill them.", u'0.264896', u"What gets me about this film every time I see it is just how simple it is. The witty urbanity of the dialogue goes without saying (hem), the acting is stagily impeccable, and the direction by Hitchcock is limited by the small sets but masterful for all that.\n\nCold Ray Milland plans and sets up the murder of his demure but faithless wife Grace Kelly by a virtual stranger who is urged on by the stick of exposure of his misdeeds and the carrot of GBP1,000 in used notes. Of course all of his convoluted plans go horribly or thankfully wrong, depending on your point of view, leading to an even more convoluted revised plan. When first seen when young I wasted my time because I wasn't paying attention at the critical moment so missed the point and didn't get it: the key is how did the baddie get into the apartment? It's incredibly verbose, being from a stage play after all and at times it seems nothing more than a radio show with pictures. The long scene setting and verbal sparring by Milland and Anthony Dawson is superb to hear - it's fascinating for its relentless poetry, and of displaying a now-dead world. I could never understand the attraction of 3D movies, least of all with this particular attempt, or why Kelly was continually uglified by the Hollywood machine when she never looked lovelier than in here when she was playing stressed out throughout.\n\nI wonder if Hitch remembered the jokey murder scene he did in 1930 in Elstree Calling when Jameson Thomas realised he was murdering in the wrong apartment? Turn that key you have and go in, it's a remarkably literate film and as intricate inside as any lock.", u'-0.0190887', u'The hit Broadway play by Frederick Knott "Dial M for Murder" has been adapted to the screen several times, including the films made in West Germany and Sweden, as well as a TV movie in 1981 (TV) by Boris Seagal and the film "A Perfect Murder" (1998) directed by Andrew Davis with Michael Douglas, Gwyneth Paltrow, and Viggo Mortensen. Alfred Hitchcock\'s 1954 adaptation was the first and certainly the best one even if the master himself considered it one of his lesser efforts. "Dial M for Murder" will be remembered as Hitchcock\'s first color film and the first of three thrillers he had made with Grace Kelly, the future Princess of Monaco, in the prime of her beauty and her talent. Using color proved to be very effective in the film. The first two scenes featuring Kelly wearing a white morning dress in the idyllic scene with her husband Tony and right after that kissing passionately her American lover, writer (Robert Cummings) in the red dress, immediately, without many words tell the viewer that the story of passion, deception, betrayal, and ultimately, murder will follow. \n\nRay Milland (Tony Wendice) is a surprisingly sympathetic villain (which is perhaps not surprising from the actor with talent, charm, and charisma that equal and remind a lot of both Cary Grant and Jimmy Stewart) who knows about his wife cheating and decides to teach her a lesson by plotting a very clever murder which will make him a sole heir to her money (she is a wealthy one in the family). His plan is perfect and almost works but Margot managed to not only escape the murderer but to turn the table on him while stunned Wendice is on the phone and listens how his well thought of plan collapses. Wendice is very resourceful and he proved to be a master of improvisation because it took him a few minutes in a cab to switch to a plan B that turned a terrified victim Margot into a cold-blooded murderess. Now it is up to seasoned and shrewd inspector Hubbard (John Williams) to find the crucial piece of evidence and to solve the case.\n\nAs always with Hitchcock, his directing is impeccable, the camera rarely leaves Wendice\'s apartment but the film is never claustrophobic which is the case for many plays\' adaptation. It breathes and moves freely and we almost forget that we are in the same room for close to two hours. I would not call "Dial M for Murder" my favorite Hitchcock\'s film but it is enjoyable, clever, and witty thriller with the interesting twists, outstanding performances, and more than one truly memorable scenes.', u'0.39862', u"\nMostly enjoyable movie, but hardly a 'great' movie. I am most disappointed by the lack of depth in the Grace Kelly and Cummings characters, which are both one-note uninteresting roles. Grace Kelly is wasted in a passive, weak, and vapid role which relegates her to the status of window dressing (not that there is anything wrong with that!), she might as well be a nice looking piece of furniture in this movie. The Cummings role is wasted as the passion between him and Kelly is not developed, and amazingly, the tension that would exist between Milland and Cummings is never apparent!. This guy was sleeping with Milland's wife, but you would think they were best friends. What a waste. Would have been a lot more interesting if Kelly and Cummings were not such bland, cardboard harmless people and were a little more human, with real emotions (jealousy, hatred, passion, even a little evil).\n\nMilland makes the move interesting to watch as he sets his plan in motion with great charm and flair. Unfortunately, as he is the only interesting character, you kind of feel bad when he is caught in the end and the two sappy characters prevail. Oh well, it could have been a lot more 'noir' if they had not glossed over the fact that Kelly and Cummings are far from the sweet innocents they are portrayed.\n\n\n", u'-0.454371', u'With "Dial M For Murder", the Master signs another classic of mystery, starring for the first time, the actress who\'d become the quintessential Hitchcock blonde, Grace Kelly. And as much as I appreciated the much more acclaimed "Rear Window", I sincerely believe this is one of Hitchcock\'s finest achievements, which is saying a lot considering his glorious oeuvre, but "Dial M for Murder" takes a special place in my heart, because it represents for many reasons, the typical Hitchcockian film, by many standards.\n\nI. Dial M for \x85 Murder\n\nThe Murder takes place right in the middle of the story and like in "Psycho", it\'s defined by what precedes and what follows, it\'s the emotional reward of a patient but powerful build-up while the resolution is an intelligent case of manipulation. The build-up is the construction of a perfect crime, Tony Wendice, played by Ray Milland, presents to the killer, a remarkable Anthony Edwards, the killing\'s plan as if it was a simple technical operation, following an incredibly methodical scheme, admirably meticulous if it wasn\'t for the purpose of killing. Hitchcock\'s masterful direction creates a plot within the plot, at a point you wonder if you\'re watching the adapted play within a film, or a film that transcended the confined setting of the play. And the second and crucial element of the build-up subtly hints the fact that there\'s always a human factor that undermines any attempt of perfectionism. So, when comes the time of the murder, we have these two parameters, we know how it should happen, but we keep in mind that whatever must go wrong will go wrong. How? When? Where? This is what the whole first part of the suspense is about.\n\nII. Dial M for \x85 Mistake\n\nWhat could have been a lazy exercise of adaptation becomes in the hands of the Master, an extraordinary thriller confined in an elegant room sometimes welcoming, sometimes claustrophobic. The handling of the space and the various objects that occupy it, a telephone, sockets, scissors, keys, the way the camera shows them or hides them till the right moment is crucial in the way they organize what would lead to the fatal mistake. We only see what the characters can see and Hitchcock\'s manipulative effects consists on the way he lets the human factor affect the story only during the villainous parts. As much as we don\'t really care for the love story, because Christopher Hummings who plays the lover, Halliday, is probably the least charismatic of all, we sort of root for the villains, because of that \'humanity\' displayed by the mistake. The point is that the murder is so well crafted, that there\'s a little evil voice inside us that wishes it could work, but again, this is Grace Kelly, and the sight of that creature in danger immediately reverses the rooting process, and then while her hands desperately seek a providential help, one pair of scissors theatrically conclude the heart of the film and the ruthless killer, becomes a worthless killer, before falling as a victim, or a collateral damage at best. The mistake is not just a plot device, it\'s Hitchcock\'s cynical insertion of humanity in a rather cold and emotionless mindset.\n\nIII. Dial M for \x85 Manipulation\n\nThere\'s an interesting trivia about the title\'s translation in French: "The Crime Was Almost Perfect", which conveys the inevitability of human factor like fate in Greek tragedies. It is, no pun intended, the key element of the evolution and resolution of the plot, when Wendice will exploit the mistake to his advantage. Tony Wendice is impressive, because he\'s simply predicted everything, and he puts the level so high, that even Halliday couldn\'t accuse him, although, in the way he deconstructed the murder when trying to convince Wendice to find an alibi to save his wife Margot from execution, he concluded on what could have been the true motive of the murder but he was not in the same caliber than his opponent, hence the entrance of Detective Hubbard, played by an elegant, suave and scene-stealing John Williams. And it\'s only justice, that he could outfight Wendice by using his very weapon, manipulation. It\'s all about manipulating objects, space and people and on that level, Wendice found his archenemy.\n\nIV. Dial M for \x85 Milland\n\nRay Milland is perfect as the quintessential upper class villain, elegant, sophisticated and absolutely and totally unflappable, and I use the word \'perfect\' as the reference to the French title. A perfect murder needs a perfect villain whose perfect scheme wouldn\'t be undermined by any external factor, except something under his own control. The casting of Milland also works because he\'s the one who outshines the other characters, his wife is the victim, the man he hires also appear as the victim, when he tries to kill Grace, you can look on his eyes, that he was a \'casting\' error, Milland also underestimated his wife\'s strength as she managed to overcome her fear and become the killer. But Milland is the only one who doesn\'t change, totally unflappable, he\'s the pillar of the film, and the film is so confident that even when he\'s caught, he doesn\'t flinch an eye.\n\nV. Dial M for \x85 Melodrama\n\nThe film also allows to insert some melodramatic elements to engage our sympathy toward the couple, but it\'s clear that this just works as the foil to justify the murder, and inspire some sympathy toward Milland, when you see him with Margot, all in white, in the opening scene, then she\'s wearing a bright and dazzling red dress with Halliday. In one minute, Hitchcock masterfully highlighted the treachery that would inspire Tony\'s crime. The love will be Halliday\'s motive to fight for innocence but again, it\'s only with the same weapons that Wendice could\'ve been defeated.\n\n\x85 so whether it\'s for murder, manipulation, Milland or melodrama, you know you\'ll dial a definite M for \x85 Masterpiece.', u'0.184567', u"Six years after Rope, Hitchcock released another adaptation from a play, still behind closed doors, but a lot more conventional than its experimental predecessor. Unfortunately, although Dial M for Murder is a real improvement, it is not free from flaws, of which some are recurrent with the English director.\n\nIt's a shame because it started pretty well. One easily gets carried away by the flowing dialogues, and wonders where this story is going to lead to. Granted though it is a bit far-fetched but nonetheless it arouses curiosity. Unfortunately, as soon as we pass the murder (and the intermission), the script struggles a little too much until the final outcome. The second part lacks tension, suspense, but most importantly rhythm which is strongly crippling, let alone for a confined movie.\n\nOnce again, and as it happens too often with Hitchcock, this is a lukewarm feature, not a total flop but not fully accomplished either.", u'-0.0952686', u'For all those who love to watch thriller, Dial M for Murder is a perfect one from the best director of all time. The story is so interesting and it will bind you to your seat.\n\nRecently I heard about this movie and from that time I was looking for it. I went to video library so many times for looking this title and I got it after 3 long weeks. But when I saw this movie I was quite amazed and quite pleased.\n\nThe plot is superb and Ray Milland did an excellent work. John Williams even has an equally powerful role and performance.\n\nThe main thing about this film, which I enjoyed most is how the story progresses and how the suspense come out layer by layer. Everything is just perfect in this film, the story, the characters, the plot. I enjoyed this movie so much.\n\nFor all the fans of thriller, murder and crime, it is an excellent film. Hats off to the Alfred Hitchcock. From me its 9/10.', u'0.575926', u'Thrilling and suspense movie based on Frederick Knott\'s play , author of other successful and equally adapted books as \xa8Wait until dark\xa8 and \xa8The honey pot\xa8 . A London ex-tennis pro (Ray Milland) carries out a plot to murder his wife and then he hires a killer (Anthony Dawson who recreates his stage role) . When things go wrong , he improvises a brilliant plan B . In the city , wealthy Margot Mary Wendice (Grace Kelly) had a brief love affair with the American writer Mark Halliday (Robert Cummings) while her husband and professional tennis player Tony Wendice was on a tennis tour . But his plan for pulling off the perfect crime is temporarily foiled and quickly switches to another plan . Meanwhile a Police Inspector (John Williams who won the 1953 Tony Award to recreate his stage role of Chief Inspector Hubbard) investigates the deeds .\n\nTop-notch suspense film of a man plotting spouse\'s killing , full of sustained intrigue , thrills , a few interesting twists and entertainment . The picture , stagy at times , is formed by two parts , a Plan A and a Plan B with even more fun . Casting is frankly magnificent , the stars are excellently cast . Splendid performances from Ray Milland as a rather likable nasty who desires to inherit his wife\'s fortune and John Williams as an obstinate Inspector who carries out the subsequent investigation . Furthermore , a gorgeous and wonderful Grace Kelly ; Hitch arranged to have Grace dressed in bright colors at the start of the film and made them progressively darker as time goes on. Colorful and shimmer cinematography by Robert Burks who uses intelligent camera vantages , being photographed in Technicolor and 3D , which explains the prevalence of low-angle shots with lamps and other objects between us and the cast members. Thriller and suspenseful musical score by the classic Dimitri Tiomkin . The movie was skillfully shot in 36 days: August 5-September 25 1953 , by the maestro Hithcock , including his well-known touches and as usual the same appears a cameo on the left side of the reunion photograph . Rating : Above average , and ranked #9 on the American Film Institute\'s list of the 10 greatest films in the genre "Mystery" .\n\nRemade for television (1981) by Boris Sagal with Angie Dickinson and Christopher Plummer and for cinema as \xa8A perfect murder\xa8(1998) by Andrew Davis with Viggo Mortensen , Gwyneth Paltrow and Michael Douglas as the husband , but this time , the man he contracts to kill his wife results to be her lover .', u'0.476392'], u'tt0405159': [u'"Million Dollar Baby" has great characters, but it doesn\'t glorify them. It has a wonderful story, but it never tries to impress you. The photography, score and direction is superb, but never distracting. What this movie is, if I have to call it something, is passion. Passion for film-making, passion for storytelling, passion for its characters, passion for its actors, and passion for its story and the means at which it will go to tell it. Amazing.\n\nFrankie Dunn (Clint Eastwood) owns a messy boxing gym which is populated, mostly, by downbeat losers who he spends some time training. He runs it with his friend and former student Eddie Scrap-Iron Dupris (Morgan Freeman), who now lives contently at a room in the gym. One day a young woman named Maggie (Hilary Swank) walks in, looking for a manager and trainer. Frankie shafts her immediately ("girly, tough ain\'t enough"). Frankie has bigger things on his hands. He\'s managing a fighter who has a shot at a title bout.\n\nBut Frankie is old and weathered and not an appealing manager, so the fighter leaves him. Frankie is broken by this; it is another in a long line of rejections and separations. We can tell that, at this time in his life, he only gets really close with those he\'s training (Scrap is the only exception). We can tell that his loneliness \x96 and a bit of persuasion from Scrap \x96 cause him to agree to teach Maggie. Teach, that is the agreement, not manage. But, by the end of the film he will have devoted his life to her.\n\nSo the rest of the story follows these two people. There is no real \'plot\' that you could describe in a trailer because it is constantly changing\x85it is not the inspiring underdog story you may think of it as. No, what it\'s \'about\' is these characters, and how they react to the circumstances around them, which change with each scene.\n\nNarrating the story is Scrap, speaking like he\'s looking back to a time long ago when everything has passed. His voice seems flat, deadpan, but there is a working of subtle sorrow in it. Scrap is a sad human being, he sees himself as the result of missed opportunities in the past, and so he spends his time helping the others, offering them his wise advice, with a tone of deadpan humor and even cockiness. Scrap knows what should be done, and what will happen regardless, and he is sort of okay with everything, in a sort of passive way. But the man also knows what\'s right and he has a deep, inner strength which is displayed in one scene in particular where you just have to cheer. It is an intriguing character, and personally I think it\'s Freeman\'s best performance.\n\nAnd Eastwood\'s best too. He is an elderly man; some might say too elderly to still be working. After all, most people are retired by his age. But if you had to guess when you\'re watching this film, you would never, ever say the man is seventy-four. You would say something closer to the sixties, because the man has such amazing energy and dedication, and above all, he has talent. It\'s been forty long years since "A Fist Full of Dollars" and film has come a long way, and so has this man. At seventy-four, passed all those years as an action hero, nearing what\'s could be the end of his career, Eastwood has made his best movie. I really, really hope he has time to make many more.\n\nAs for Swank, well, she must have found something big that she shared with her character, because this is not acting, it is existing. Swank is Maggie. That\'s all there is too it. This could be the movie she will be remembered for.\n\nSo, "Million Dollar Baby" is a masterpiece. I saw it last night when it opened in my city, and everyone else was seeing "White Noise", and I was shaking my head. Everyone who is even remotely interested in movies should see this one, just so they can know how movies are supposed to be made. I\'m trying to think, and there is not a single thing here where Eastwood went wrong. The acting, directing, writing, score, cinematography\x85they all accomplish precisely what they\'re supposed to with sublime perfection. Many of these aspects will certainly receive Oscars and all of them should.\n\nYou may cry through this film, you may cheer. Whatever the case, you will love it.\n\n9/10.', u'0.111879', u'Flawlessly written, acted and directed, MILLION DOLLAR BABY is being hymned and wreathed by the critics as the best film of 2004. They\'re absolutely right. "An old master\'s new masterpiece," the NEW YORK TIMES said in a review that was more of an open love letter to Eastwood than anything remotely resembling a critical analysis of the film itself. For once such honey-tongued critical adulation is fully merited. Dark, edgy, subtle and at times emotionally devastating, MILLION DOLLAR BABY represents the apotheosis of Eastwood\'s art - the most lucid and intelligently limned expression of his philosophy of the outsider, the noble loners whose personal codes of honour set them both above and apart from the compromised, corrupt societies they inhabit. The Boxing Ring As Metaphor For Life is a hoary trope almost as old as Hollywood itself, employed to varying effect in films as diverse as THE CHAMP, GOLDEN BOY, REQUIEM FOR A HEAVYWEIGHT, THE GREAT WHITE HOPE, FAT CITY, ROCKY and RAGING BULL. In MILLION DOLLAR BABY, though, Eastwood the director brings a fresh eye and an entirely fresh approach to both the setting and characterisations, virtually re-inventing this venerable sub-genre rather than simply recycling its conventions. Eastwood the actor is in fine form - a commanding if increasingly weather-beaten presence - as gym owner Frankie Dunn. A case study in loneliness, Dunn\'s creased face is a map of places you\'d rather not go to and disappointment has clearly been a life-long companion. Co-stars Hilary Swank and the magnificent Morgan Freeman, playing Frankie\'s unlikely protegee Maggie Fitzgerald and friend "Scrap-Iron" Dupris, give what are without question the best performances of their respective careers: deftly underplayed, their roles provide emotionally overwhelming impacts more powerful than anything glimpsed in the film\'s riotous fight sequences. Forming an iron triangle forged from mutual dependence, Dunn and Dupris school the impulsive but untutored Maggie in both the techniques of boxing and the tradecraft of survival in a world pre-disposed to pulverise individualism. The canvas-floored square ring becomes the arena in which all three characters confront their various demons, battling for both victory and personal redemption. Paul Haggis\' screenplay is itself a masterwork, improving on its source material without betraying the concise but compelling situations and superbly drawn characters found in F.X. Toole\'s short stories. And, finally, Eastwood the composer\'s elegiac but unobtrusive score is a minor classic of its kind, a requiem to both lost souls and lost causes. MILLION DOLLAR BABY is not only the best film released in 2004 it is also the most fully realised and richly textured major studio movie of the decade.', u'0.453336', u'Million Dollar Baby is a movie about boxing like Braveheart is a movie about men in kilts riding horses. What it is is a movie to experience if you find yourself ever entertaining thoughts about loyalty, determination, talent, no talent, age, youth, courage, fear, fate, and the pain and joy of both living and dying.\n\nI read reviews of Million Dollar Baby and expected to like it. Roger Ebert can be soft on movies because he is plainly a big fan, but even he does not lightly toss around the M-word, masterpiece. Yet he drops it on MDB, and justly so. The story is simple and searing. A gal (Hilary Swank) with much heart and no experience aspires to be the champion of the world. She is Rocky in a sports bra. A grizzled fight trainer-manager/gym owner (Clint Eastwood) reluctantly takes her on. His best pal and wise-man assistant (Morgan Freemna) stands alongside them, as the plot unwinds steadily, seamlessly, picking up speed, scene by scene, act after act. Eastwood and Freeman are artists at the top of their profession and they, along with the brilliant Swank, present you the very worthy lives of three people you will care about and remember. The arena is boxing, but it might as well have been boating or baking. It is a story about values and truths that far exceed sports and movies. I walked into the Lowes Lincoln Square theater last night knowing Million Dollar Baby was taking me on a ride and willing to hop aboard. What a beautiful, memorable ride it was.', u'0.49219', u'Clint Eastwood is a man of faith. He is an artist who is confident and experienced enough to have a deep faith in the audience that he is trying to reach. He is also a master of omission, of the left-out detail/line, trusting in his gut that his audience is willing to participate in his films by exercising their imaginations; that they never want any aspect of the story to be \'dumbed-down\' for ready consumption. In fact, his trust in the audience to use their own minds to fill in gaps is like a gift of part ownership in the film. "Million Dollar Baby" is a beautiful gift, and a masterpiece if film-making.\n\nEastwood plays Frankie Dunn, an elder boxing coach, manager, and expert \'cut man\' who runs a gym and is learning Gaelic on the side. He\'s a nice enough guy, but he can\'t seem to shake the guilt from ghosts in his past (some we\'re in on, some not quite). His guilt/shame is a constant just beneath the surface and gives him something of a cold exterior, sometimes frozen. Yet, as played by Eastwood, you know Dunn\'s aware of his own plight, but just doesn\'t know how to melt the ice. Or more importantly, if he\'s deserving of such a meltdown.\n\nEnter Maggie Fitzgerald (Swank). She\'s a thirty-something trailer trash woman from southwest Missouri. An unlikely hero for sure. But for my money, Maggie is this generation\'s Rocky. That may seem an easy, simplistic, and over-reaching comparison, but the parallels are deep, obvious and myriad. Like many people, Maggie\'s dream (being a professional boxer) is always just out of reach, yet she cannot give it up. She works as a waitress to make ends meet (or at least the ends are almost touching), but spends all her spare time training. Like Dunn, Maggie has her own ghosts haunting her, and through these ghosts they bond tighter than super glue. The heart and work (incalculably huge amounts) that Swank put into becoming Maggie are unnoticeable. It\'s a silly phrase but it\'s as if she was born to play this part. It fits like a glove. The real life parallel of her relationship to Eastwood no doubt played a part in her ability to connect with the character\'s relationship to Dunn. Yet this in no way diminishes her accomplishment. She is brilliant.\n\nMorgan Freeman plays Dunn\'s right-hand man (Scrape) at the gym, and reprises a role similar to Red from "Shawshank Redemption". He also voices the omniscient narration to the story, a la Red. Like Dunn and Maggie, he\'s similarly bruised, but somehow less deeply. He\'s there when both of them need support and helps to bring them together. I can think of nobody acting in film today who can embody kindness and wisdom through friendship and support better than Freeman. He also serves to bring in another Eastwood trademark \x96 \'Banter\'. Even when themes are heavy, Eastwood\'s sense of humor is never entirely absent and he and Freeman have a good time with each other, as did Bacon and Fishburne in "Mystic River". These three characters together create a beautiful and true, albeit small, family unit Eastwood\'s lifelong themes and \'blurring of lines\' are on full display: good vs. evil, right vs. wrong, the role of violence, redemption, guilt/shame over previous acts, even god and death. Never one for easy answers, his version of the truth lies in the shadows, quite literally. Cinematographer Tom Stern crafts characters in shadow, shifting in and out of light. There is a grey area between the light and the dark where something approaching truth lies waiting, and this is where Eastwood takes us, then leaves us there to ponder. "Million Dollar Baby" is a shadow play. As accomplished as "Unforgiven" and "Mystic River", yet even more personal, this film is a triumph of human storytelling. As Bacon\'s character says in "Mystic River", "\x85and the hits just keep on comin\'."', u'0.211624', u'Saw "Million Dollar Baby" in Manhattan last night. Clint Eastwood, one of the all-time most famous actors -- and directors -- has more than enough money where he could choose to pull the strings on block-buster, mindless action pictures, ala Jerry Bruckheimer, or comic books. Or, hell, in his twilight years he could just lay back and enjoy his millions. But no. He has chosen instead to make quieter, lower-budget, heart-felt, character driven films like "The Unforgiven" "True Crime" "Mystic River" and now Million Dollar Baby. And the world is a better place for it. Eastwood uses his multiple talents to make films that have something valuable to say. In the emotionally powerful, Million Dollar Baby, he tells an allegorical tale of boxing to subtly express themes of hope, redemption, sacrifice, persistence, and belief in one\'s self. The movie emphasizes that failure is a more honorable and personally fulfilling trait than never having tried, while also frowning upon laziness and leeching off others. But see the movie and judge for yourself. I personally consider great films as the ones where I leave the theater with a better understanding of human nature, or a desire to improve the world by even a little bit. Eastwood\'s latest more than succeeds on those counts.', u'0.356644', u'I don\'t know why, but I went into the theater thinking I was about to see a female Rocky Balboa kind of deal. I left the theater in a daze. Overwhelmed by the simple truth of its conclusion. My hat to Clint Eastwood. What an extraordinary career. An artist of enormous proportions so well camouflaged behind a shy smile and a charming, clumsy attitude. I remember focusing on Clint Eastwood through a very different lens after sitting through "Pale Rider" a mythological, lyrical western. Actors love him because he, clearly, doesn\'t lie to them, doesn\'t kiss their asses. He quite simply gives them room to maneuver. Even someone like Meryl Streep, felt freer and capable to stretch herself all the way to Italy under his wing. Sean Penn, Kevin Bacon, Tim Robbins, Jude Law, Morgan Freeman, Gene Hackman yes mostly men but there was also, other than Meryl Streep, Genevieve Boujold. Marcia Gay Harden, Laura Linney and now Hillary Swank with a performance that not even "Boys don\'t Cry" could predict. The film is a triumph in every department. My stomach ached from feeling. That\'s a compliment Mr. Eastwood. Thank you very much.', u'0.112997', u"The movie is excellent. Hillary Swank deserves to receive the Oscar for her performance. I haven't seen much of her lately and am so glad that she was picked for this movie. She seems a natural for this role. Like she didn't even have to act, she just let her own emotions take charge. She stole every scene when she was on. Clint Eastwood is one heck of an actor and his directing of movies is even better. He is 75 years old and hope he has another 10 years of good movie making in him. Morgan Freeman is a great actor who never seems to receive the recognition he deserves. Tell others to see it because it isn't in the top 10 listing of viewed movies last week. I'm concerned the subject matter is too deep for most people and it will be pulled to make room for some lame-brain movie like Fat Albert.", u'0.270695', u'If anyone had doubts about the genius of Clint Eastwood, they should run, not walk, to see "Million Dollar Baby", perhaps the best movie that came out of Hollywood is past year.\n\nMr. Eastwood has that rare quality in choosing an odd story to bring to the screen. With this film he accomplishes what could be, perhaps, the best movie about boxing in history. In the first place, the story by F. X. Toole, in which the movie is based, is an odd choice. We have seen, so far, men boxers, but there is a world out there where women boxers compete in this sport that is not well known, or not commonly seen. The adaptation by Paul Haggis is excellent.\n\n"Million Dollar Baby" has a rhythm of its own, seldom seen in boxing formula pictures. Thanks to Tom Stern almost black and white cinematography, this sordid world of second class gyms in the poor areas of the inner city, makes the film more interesting in its texture. Enhancing it all is the great musical score that Mr. Eastwood, a jazz enthusiast, has created. Music has always complimented Mr. Eastwood\'s work, but never in such a way as in this movie.\n\nIf you haven\'t seen the film, please stop reading now.\n\nFrankie Dunn, is a man who has trained boxing champions. He is a man at odds with himself. He has demons within him that are tearing away at his soul. We watch him going to mass on a daily basis, but does that qualify him as a devout Catholic? Not according to Father Horvak, who sees a troubled soul in search of redemption.\n\nFrankie\'s letters comes back, returned from a daughter that wants nothing to do with him. Frankie, at the beginning of the film, loses the services of one his better boxers because a richer competitor is willing to pay the fighter much more. Frankie keeps the older Eddie "Scrap-Iron" Dupris employed in the gym because he feels guilty in having let this former boxer down at the highest point of Scrap\'s career.\n\nInto this world comes Maggie Fitzgerald. She is a young woman who wants to make it as a fighter; she comes from a white trash background and everything is against her. The only reason she has been allowed in the all-male gym is because she has paid six months worth of membership. We watch Maggie as she struggles on her own without any help from Frankie, the man she would like to interest in coaching her. Frankie realizes there is potential in this young woman, who he sees on a daily basis practicing, and he relents. Maggie proves she follows his instructions well. Then we watch her progress as she wins fight after fight until the million dollar fight with the vicious title holder.\n\nThe ironic twist toward the end of the movie arrives out of nowhere; it shakes us up because it was totally unexpected. It makes Frankie and Maggie become father and daughter. Because of the guilt he feels in his own life, Frankie does the right thing in accepting the responsibility of the situation.\n\nThe ending is the only thing that feels a bit manipulative in the film, although it\'s handled with a lot of taste, as it would have been worse in the hands of another, less capable director. The only other complain is that Mr. Eastwood speaks in a whisper, which distracts from what is going on, as we strain our ears to catch every nuance of the brilliant dialog. Also, the voice over by Morgan Freeman\'s character is at times, unintelligible.\n\nThis is a film totally dominated by Clint Eastwood. As an actor, he brings to the role total credibility as the tormented soul inside Frankie. Hilary Swank makes a brilliant Maggie, the ambitious girl that gets much more than what she bargained for. Ms. Swank has the best moment of her career after her work in "Boys Don\'t Cry". Working with the right elements, Ms. Swank is an actress that works with little gestures to achieve her input in the character she is playing.\n\nMorgan Freeman is excellent as the beaten Scrap, a man who "could have been a contender". He underplays this character with sensational results. Brian O\'Byrne, a theater actor who has been seen in two important plays this year in the New York stages, makes an impression as Father Hovark, who seems to understand Frankie. Margo Martindale is convincing as Maggie\'s mother.\n\nSometimes it takes a lot for a film to be good. All the right elements were gathered by Clint Eastwood for this movie. It makes one wonder what will his next project be, or if he can surpass the milestone he created with "Million Dollar Baby".', u'0.100087', u"Wow- what an incredible movie! There are so many layers to this film, one could almost see it 4 times and get something new out of it every time. I loved first and foremost its message that we create ourselves through our drive, loyalty, ambition, dedication, and work. Secondly, I love its insistence in the good of the American Dream, and I loved its excitement and beautiful, touching message toward the end. A movie about violence and ambition that evolves into a movie about love, hard-earned sacrifice, and doing something meaningful with one's life. Grade A entertainment with a beautiful message to boot! Hilary Swank and Clint Eastwood should both win their second Oscars for their contribution to cinema.", u'0.897856', u'"Million Dollar Baby" is the story of three different characters\x85 Actually, two of them, Frankie Dunn (Eastwood) and Scrap Iron (Freeman) are pretty much mirror images of each other\x85\n\nFrankie owns a rundown Los Angeles gym where he trains up-and-comers\x85 His motto for his fighters is "protect yourself at all times." Scrap is an elderly ex-boxer who helps out around the gym and keeps Frankie company\x85 Frankie was the \'cut-man\' in one of Scraps\' fights that turned bad\x85 Frankie still feels he\'s partly to blame\x85 \n\nBut 31 year old Maggie (Hilary Swank) is totally different\x85 She works as a waitress but aspires to be a boxer\x85 She is so poor that she has to pick leftover meat off her customers\' plates just to have the energy to keep going\x85 \n\nMaggie needs boxing to make something of herself and gain respect\x85 When she first approaches Frankie, asking to be trained, he told her he never trains girls\x85 She continues to hang around and after much harassment he eventually changes his mind\x85 From there, we begin to feel some natural affinity between the two\x85To say more would be to ruin a lovely, heartbreaking film carefully layered with surprises\x85\n\nBeneath "Million Dollar Baby," there is a love story\x85 A deep love story between two people with scars in their lives... Both are haunted by family problems\x85 Maggie\'s family, led by her opportunistic mother is alternately cruel and exploitative\x85 Frankie has an unloving daughter he writes to constantly, but his letters always returned unopened, unread and intact\x85 We never know what came between them\x85\n\nEastwood handles his role with such ease that it\'s hard to judge whether his acting or directing is the greater accomplishment\x85 He stands as a challenge to his conscience when he finds the correct answer in his heart\x85', u'0.796604', u'Saw this last night in LA without much knowing what to expect. Hadn\'t read many reviews...only knew I liked the work of the three main stars. Swank carries the film and is at her absolute best. The last 45 minutes are some of the most powerful film-making I can remember. Eastwood is also in top form but allows Swank\'s performance to trump his own. Freeman is outstanding and might have done enough to earn a Best Supporting Actor nomination. This is so much more than a boxing movie, but it\'s right there with "Raging Bull" and "Rocky". I saw "The Aviator" two days ago and enjoyed "MDB" more.\n\nHowever, the film is not without fault...Eastwood has a tendency to allow scenes to go on too long and to fill them with too much dead air. The dialogue at times appears a little too ad-libbed. There are some minor logical inconsistencies. But the positives far outweigh the negatives.', u'-0.0735894', u"Million Dollar Baby, 25th feature directed by masterful storyteller Clint Eastwood, brings the art that is boxing and implants such raw emotion into it, not one person will leave the theatre with a dry eye.\n\nMillion Dollar Baby tells the story of an old boxing trainer, Frankie, disowned by his daughter, left by his boxer, and has been attending mass almost daily for the past 23 years in the hopes of finding some sort of solitude from the sins he can't seem to forgive himself for. eastwood has never been a more finer actor, who's skills only seem to improve with age. Mr. Eastwood has for so long been honing his acting skills, he disappears into the role of Frankie, played with such remorse, such pain, the audience immediately sympathizes with him over the events that have happened in his life. once he meets Maggie, he tries so hard to not let her in, but due to her strong will to succeed, he gives in, grows and builds a relationship and a love that is so deep, he sees a light at the end of the tunnel, that maybe life is worth living after all. Mr. Eastwood took full control of his character, taking his acting to such depths that it's amazing to think of all the other aspects he put into this masterful film besides his extraordinary acting.\n\nWhich brings up Hilary Swank, who in the past few years has experienced a bad run of scripts since Boys Don't Cry, again proves to Hollywood that when given the right material, she is absolutely stunning at becoming and knowing her character. Her face is so expressive the film very well could have been carried off of her facial expressions alone, she was so open to what she was feeling. Swank has cemented an Oscar nomination with this performance and quite possibly her second win as well. Just stunning...\n\nWhich of course also leads to the wonderful Morgan Freeman. How this talented actor has not been recognized for his achievements by the Academy is astounding, as he again turns in a tremendous performance as Scrap, an old boxer Frankie feels responsible for for the loss of his eye. freeman plays the exposition or the narration in this film, and given to any other actor the performance would have been average. Yet Freeman has such a presence, such power on the screen, that he turns a semi-small part and makes it a standout.\n\nThe score was poignant, thoughtful, and enduring. the screenplay was stunning, the words these characters said to each other, the story, the plot, the list goes on and on. Do not come into this film and expect not to be moved in any way. The film touches you, stays with you, and makes you think of the own decisions you have made in your life and how you've dealt with the consequences.\n\nMillion Dollar Baby is hands down THE BEST film of 2004, bar non. See this extraordinary film while it's still in theatres, and prepare to be moved by it's emotional story about overcoming adversity, and fighting with all your heart for what you want in your life.\n\nHIGHLY Recommended.\n\nMJR", u'0.418991', u'It would be difficult to imagine a more perfect trio of performers the likes of Hilary Swank, Clint Eastwood, and Morgan Freeman in their respective roles in the emotionally-charged "Million Dollar Baby." \n\nMy favorite scenes were the early sequences in which Maggie (Swank) visits the dowdy boxing gym and co-opts Eastwood\'s crusty boxing trainer Frankie into becoming her mentor. Along with the veteran, retired boxer Eddie, played by Freeman, the performances were as electric as the Ali shuffle.\n\nIn the overall arc of the story of "Million Dollar Baby," there were three extraneous subplots: (1) Frankie\'s visits to church and his talks with the priest; (2) the story of the mentally-challenged young man named Danger, who appears in the gym and is taunted by the boxers; and (3) Maggie\'s family members introduced in two scenes filled with such vulgarity that much of the film\'s hard-earned credibility was lost. Not only would the film have worked effectively without the subplots, it would have been a much better film without them.\n\nWhile Eastwood\'s direction was superb, much credit should also go to the designers, especially the stylish work with lighting. I cannot recall a film as dimly lit as this one, and the subdued lighting contributed substantially to the characters and mood evoked in this sensitive film. The three main performances were standouts. But this film was also a very successful team effort.', u'0.142104', u'At the end of the movie, I cried what deep sorrow I felt, how true to life and moving with emotion this movie is. To be on top of the world to fall so hard, but to have the drive to complete the task, what ever that task may be. The boxing scenes are so real and full of excitement you can almost smell the blood and sweat. I felt like I was in the arena boxing with Hillary. MR Clint Eastwood; has a directing style that is cool and smooth easy going,brilliant. To see Morgan Freeman together with Clint Eastwood two great actors verbally sparring what a treat. Morgan can hold his own against a legend. Hilary Swank Is so believable as Maggie, I feel each blow. Hilary deserves an Oscar for her performance.', u'0.283204', u"I find the praise that MILLION DOLLAR BABY has received from critics baffling. I did not feel that the film connected on an emotional level, and that it was more like watching stock characters in action. Hillary Swank is very good, but her character moves from amateur boxer to championship contender while showing practically nothing in between. Clint failed to impress me with his performance (and I am a Clint fan), and Morgan Freeman continues to be highly overrated. The second half drags considerably, and I felt the whole third act to be very manipulative. I know I'm in the minority, but I felt a dissenting opinion should be voiced.", u'-0.206747'], u'tt0079470': [u'And in the 1979th year of Our Lord, God took in a screening of Monty Python\'s "Life Of Brian," and thought it was funny. \n\nHe did NOT think the film was blasphemous or offensive in any way. Yea, God did admire it\'s incredibly clever pokes at religion and at religious fanatics, for God Himself knew the virtue of being able to laugh at one\'s self. He also knew before He even walked into the theater that the title character, Brian, was NOT Jesus Christ, but merely a man who was born at the same time as Christ---right next door, in fact---and became mistaken for a messiah. God settled into His seat, with popcorn in one hand and diet soda in another, and had a rollicking good time.\n\nHe recommended "Life Of Brian" to His Son, Jesus, who went to see it the following week. He, too, thought it was a hilarious film, and immediately sang the praises of the Monty Python troupe---John Cleese, Graham Chapman, Eric Idle, Terry Jones, Terry Gilliam & Michael Palin---for creating such a wonderful spoof. And He recommended the film to His friends. Have an open mind, He told them, and have fun. \n\nBut God and His Son were quite puzzled why so many people in the Bible Belt community were so upset by "Life Of Brian"---especially the ones who hadn\'t even bothered to SEE the frigging film for fear of being damned for all time. And They both shook their heads in dismay. It\'s only a movie, They thought, and a very funny, harmless one at that. Get a life!\n\nBut God gave Monty Python\'s "Life Of Brian" the power to overcome such ridiculous adversity, and today, well over two decades later, the film is rightfully regarded as a comedy classic, and one of the Python\'s finest works. It\'s *still* not a film for everybody, but does it have to be? If you\'re in tune with the Python\'s style of zany comedy, you\'ll enjoy "Life Of Brian."\n\nAnd praise be to Saint George Harrison, late of The Beatles, for lending the Pythons a hand in making this wonderful movie. :-)', u'0.394053', u'In Life of Brian, Python created what John Cleese called simply "our masterpiece". As a piece of writing, it is the most impressive of the three feature length Python movies. The scenes remain episodic, but there is a much more coherent narrative than in the earlier Holy Grail \x96 I loved HG too, but for different reasons. The characters (well about one or two of the characters) have acquired some subtle shading, which is rare in comedy and, alas, rare in British comedy in particular. The plight of Chapman\'s Brian is one that I really cared about (although his death is also extremely funny, upbeat and one of the truly iconic moments in British cinema).\n\nThe story must be fairly well known. Brian is born at the same time as Jesus with whom he leads a kind of parallel life, thus allowing the team to lampoon and satirise everything from religious zealotry and mob hysteria to 1950s biblical/sword & sandals epic cinema. It does this by marrying historic situations with more modern attitudes; thus we have revolutionary Stan who wants to be Loretta and have the right to have babies, the old man who can\'t understand why he\'s being stoned for saying simply "that piece of halibut was good enough for Jehovah!" the gruff centurion correcting Brian\'s Latin grammar while he\'s trying to daub anti-Roman slogans on a wall and the gentle centurion asking each of a line of the condemned "crucifixion? Good" while ticking them off on his clipboard. Interspersed with this is slapstick, pantomime women (I\'m not sure there are any real women in Python, which is probably its greatest failing) and a small amount of the trademark Python surrealism (the spaceship, the "prophet" talking about the sons misplacing the things owned by their fathers who had placed them down only just a moment ago\x85 etc). In short, something for everyone \x96 except, perhaps, committed Christians.\n\nA lot of attention has been paid to whether LoB is blasphemous. The Pythons claim not and I\'m not sufficiently religious to care very much. On the surface, I disagree. There are also occasional sideswipes at ancient Jewish custom \x96 although, to be fair, only stoning which, if you\'ll pardon the pun, might be considered a fair target. Jesus is not criticised, but the film\'s central message seems to be; be in the right place at the right time and even a man called Brian can become God. Almost the last line is from Eric Idle saying; "you come from nothing and go back to nothing" which doesn\'t suggest that the man on the mount at the beginning is a divinity, no matter whether he\'s talking sense or not.\n\nMost importantly though, LoB is refreshingly satirical. There always was an element of this in Python (mediaeval Christian philosophy lampooned in the Holy Grail for example "this new learning amazes me Sir Bedevere, explain again how sheeps\' bladders may be employed to prevent earthquakes\x85 so, if she weighs the same as a duck, she must be made of wood, and therefore - a witch". I guess LoB attracted attention because the satire had never been so bold or obvious before. This is also what makes LoB such an incredibly funny film to watch; but put it this way \x96 despite what Rowan Atkinson may have once said \x96 I\'d be very surprised if the Python\'s weren\'t expecting the Spanish Inquisition.\n\nThat shouldn\'t put you off, though. Unless your faith is too weak to survive Python\'s gentle humanism, watch this movie \x96 you\'ll probably love it.', u'0.0222352', u'\nOne of my fave films of all time, this film has so many laugh-out-loud jokes and ridiculous thought processes that it would probably be unfair to pick out just a few. Tough - I\'m going to: John Cleese as the legionnary Latin teacher rebuking Brian not for daring to use graffiti on the Roman fort but for using the wrong tense, Michael Palin trying to find his place in life as an ex-leper, Terry Jones as Brian\'s mother trying to protect him from myrrh - let\'s face it, we\'ve all wondered what myrrh is ! The bit that always makes me laugh without fail is something that isn\'t always noticed - when Michael Palin is having a go at the guards; "Do you find it risible when I say the name of my friend Biggus Diccus ?" if you look carefully you\'ll see that Palin is trying really hard not to laugh.\n\nPuerile, silly but also very very clever. This film doesn\'t criticise religion or Jesus in any way ( what was wrong with the people who tried to ban it ? ) - it\'s just asking what it could have been like in a society that was expecting the Messiah to show up at any moment, and covering it in a massive coating of comedy.\n\nThis film is an absolute classic - 10 out of 10.', u'-0.0335558', u"\nIt's impossible for me to be objective about this film.  I know every scene and line by heart.  Not because I'm one of those ghastly Python nerds, whose anal obsessiveness sucks the whole spirit out of everything they did, and actually misses the joke, which is on them; they are the perfect subjects for a Python lampoon.  No.  I only know LIFE OF BRIAN so intimately because I've seen it so often, it's still one of the funniest comedies I've ever seen, and persists in being hilarious despite familiarity, which, as in so much Python did, is the reverse of what comedy is 'supposed' to be made of (i.e. surprise).\n\nAlso, nostalgia value.  MONTY PYTHON were my first heroes, before I even reached double figures.  I gobbled up every programme, film and record in a\nspace of a couple of short years, so they are bound up with a period of my life when I was very happy and hopeful, so I go all misty-eyed when I see it.  Bizarrely, we were first encouraged to watch BRIAN by our Latin teacher, who felt it was very insightful about Roman society.\n\nBut no-one watches PYTHON anymore, except that dorkish clique.  My brother, only a couple of years my junior, is as mystified now by my reaction to it as my parents were then.  But surely BRIAN is a comic masterpiece in itself, accessible to anyone who found the very male, elitist, academic bias of the programme somewhat alienating?\n\nHow can I implore you to watch this?  It's got a straight narrative, with some of the greatest set-pieces and dialogue of any film ever.  It's not a great FILM comedy - Terry Jones is no Gilliam - but the style suits the humour perfectly, allowing it to breathe, and sometimes pulling off an extraordinarily evocative shot, such as when Brian and his mother are walking from Jesus' sermon, and squabbling about petty things like big noses, and the camera pulls back to a vast Judean wasteland, with a massive Roman statue being wheeled, and a set of crucifixes being planted: a marvellous encapsulation of a period in history.\n\nThis is the film's true triumph - it's a magnificent deconstruction of historical distortion.  By paralleling the life of Christ with that of an ordinary little man, Python reclaim history from symbol and myth.  It brings the body back into history.  Its resolute rejection of divinity leads to a bleak, ironic conclusion (listen to 'Always Look On The Bright Side Of Life' carefully, and in context: it's NOT comforting) - the story of Jesus without redemption is ghastly.\n\nThe intelligence behind the juvenile gags is astonishing - the film is a learned commentary on power, totalitarianism, repression, language, gender, the writing of history, the politics of subversion, the complicity of the repressed.  Myth is thrown to the wind - the film succeeds where Reg and his revolutionaries fail, by revealing a whole series of repressive apparatum (sic?).  No-one is spared - the film is unashamedly destructive, but the film's satire is not arid or narrow; there are many rich parallels with our own time, as the extraordinary reaction from the religious on the film's release showed.\n\nBut BRIAN is not just an attack on religion, but on all who would seek to write selective histories for their own interests, suppressing others' voices.  The silliest jokes are also the most profound - in one scene, the kidnappers enter Pilate's palace through a tiled floor.  They emerge through a modesty-concealing leaf painted on this floor.  This is snickering schoolboy humour, and very very funny, but is also a comment on the phallocentricity of imperialism.  Jokes like these are why BRIAN will always remain vital - it turns you into a ludicrous, ill-informed amateur historian.\n\nThe acting is an astonishing feat of multiple performances, but Graham Chapman, always my favorite Python, holds the chaos together, ironically as the Kafkaesque hero who races towards the abyss, an anti-Jesus to love and identify with.  If I've made the film sound like hard work, than I'm an idiot.  The seriousness is only there if you want it.  Like Alice in Wonderland, or Buster Keaton, PYTHON seem to be full of metaphors that encapsulate the pains of life, but are also damnably entertaining.  It's strange that men as supposedly 'surreal' and 'out there' as the Pythons should speak such good sense.  Only BRINGING UP BABY, THE PALM BEACH STORY, and MONTY PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL, are funnier than this.  Treasure it.", u'0.0150293', u'Personally, I believe this to be one of the most intelligent comedies ever made. It might not appear that way at first because the film does have its share of simple slapstick and "naughty" moments, but generally, the topics the Pythons tackle here are very serious - albeit dealt with in a way that makes this a true contender for the funniest film of all time. \n\nA firework of hilarious sketches, timeless quotes and clever comments on the human condition, this film was deemed too dangerous for the masses and therefore, until recently, banned in several countries (normally, this only used to happen to the so called "Video Nasties").\n\nThis film never once makes fun of Jesus (Christ) - but it DOES take the mickey out of blind, fanatic followers of any political movement or religion.\n\nAn outstanding achievement and endlessly re-watchable. \n\nMy vote: 10 out of 10\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/', u'0.664644', u"This film is by far the best of the Python outings. It ranks as one of my favorite films of all time, which unlike 'The Holy Grail', hasn't dated with time but improves with repeated viewing.\n\nThe Pythons supposed take on Christianity, which caused outrage when it was first released (mostly by people who hadn't seen it), is actually a take on cults, both religious and political, and the people who follow them.\n\nBrian, our hapless hero, is confused, horny, and constantly mistaken for the Messiah; who just happened to be born in the manger next to him. Brian just wants to be left alone, and to pursue his love for Judith, a member of the People's Front of Judea. Judith just wants the Romans to go home; but only after they've left the sanitation, the medicine, education, irrigation, roads, public order, etc., etc. ... oh and don't forget the wine! \n\nWill Brian's love for Judith go unrequited? Will only the cheese makers be blessed, or does this refer to all manufacturers of dairy products? And just what have the Romans ever done for us? \n\nIt's subtle; it's anarchic; and it's possibly still banned in Norway. This is classic seamless comedy at its best. 10/10.", u'0.163123', u'This is, in my opinion, the best religious movie ever made. Monty Python\'s Flying Circus knows how to do everything hilariously. Focusing on Brian Cohen (Graham Chapman), who gets mistaken for the messiah in Judea in 33 AD, the movie pokes fun at everything: Romans, Jews, imperialism, even extraterrestrials. With sardonic lines almost every minute, they play religious fundamentalism for what it is: silly. I don\'t even know which scene was my favorite; every part was so funny. You\'ll never forget the song at the end. This is comedy in its greatest form, and it makes sense that it would come from the guys who brought us the "parrot sketch". Absolutely a hoot.', u'0.644728', u"\nTrue, my tastes are eclectic. This movie is so incredibly clever and thought provoking that it's not surprising that it raised so many hackles. Plus, it's as fast paced and funny as a Marx Brothers movie without the musical breaks. You can watch it 20 times and you'll still sing at the end. Undoubtedly one of the top 10!!", u'0.629153', u'\nWhen a film is still funny 25 years after it\'s made, and doesn\'t feel particularly aged, even a quarter of a century later, then you know that you\'ve struck gold. The famous Monty Python crew once again take a well-known subject and make a lot of fun of it. This time, the subject is religion, or, more specifically, Christianity. Everyone who knows at least a little about Christianity, which is pretty much anyone from the western world, will probably be able to laugh at something in this movie. Unless, of course, you are very Christian yourself, in that case you will probably feel that the film is blasphemous(I don\'t personally think so, since it makes fun of the followers and the general stupidity of people and organizations back in 30-something A.D., rather than Jesus and his teachings). The plot is about as incoherent as the usual Monty Python team film, though it should be noted that, like Monty Python and the Holy Grail, it is an actual film, and not a series of sketches, like, for example, the Meaning of Life. It\'s about as paced as they usually are, most of the scenes contain a lot of jokes, and then they move on to the next scene, after about five minutes of jokes and sight gags. This is, unfortunately, the problem with their films; if you don\'t like the jokes, the film might seem extremely slow to you; of course, one could argue that Monty Python mainly make movies for the jokes sake, but they could do better on the pacing, for the sake of viewers who don\'t like all those repeated jokes. That\'s not to say that I don\'t like them, I laugh at them most of the time, heck, I laughed so hard that I almost got stomach ache from it at one particular instant. But, I guess that a lot of people won\'t like them for this way of making movies. Oh well. You can\'t please everyone. The humor is great, it\'s standard Python wacky, crazy humor, so every Python fan should enjoy it. People who don\'t like Monty Python should give this a chance too, if they have at least a little humor, and they aren\'t Christian extremists. Christian "believers" can probably laugh at it too, like I said, it\'s not the religion itself, it\'s more the brainwashed followers that the film makes fun of. All in all, a great film for fans of the Python crew, and people who have a sense of humor about religion(a dark sense of humor, that is). I recommend it to fans of Monty Python, people who enjoy dark humor and people who can laugh a little at the less intelligent parts of Christianity. I fall into all three categories, and I loved it. 8/10', u'0.00711637', u'\nMonty Python\'s follow-up to their cult smash Holy Grail was Life of Brian, a film that takes on (if not always with the utmost seriousness, then usually with a mix of silliness and slight intellectualism) the believers in religions, the zealous nature that belief brings out in people.  I first saw the film in the theater upon its re-release last month, and I found it very funny, though not with the kind of belly laughs that I had on my first reaction to Holy Grail.  It\'s not without it\'s scenes that stick out as some of Python\'s finest (the Stoning, Pilate\'s scenes, the Spaceship sequence), even as sometimes it goes a little too broad for comfort (part of the colisseum).\n\nYet, the great strengths that lie in Life of Brian are that 1) the writers and performers (Chapman, Cleese, Gilliam, Jones, Idle, Palin) bring their irreverent strengths to a fine point with the script and multiple roles.  Even when a scene doesn\'t get the laughs it could\'ve or should\'ve, it turns out to be a scene brimming with a cleverness that could only exist in the "Python-esque" universe.  2) the director (Jones) and designer/animator (Gilliam) lay the groundwork for this realistic atmosphere of 33 A.D. and bring out what is the best in the acting, Pythons or otherwise (famous British comedian Spike Milligan has a role of note).  Held over from the sets of Franco Zeferelli\'s Christ film, the Pythons use all these locations and settings and little details to spring out their wild, brilliant gags.  The look of the film enriches the comedic elements, and the result is (arguably, of course) the troupe\'s best film.  Not for all tastes by the way (Monty Python in general for me took some while to warm up to, but paid off once it worked).  Grade: A', u'0.374964', u'While Quest for the Holy Grail was funny because it was so low-budgetty and silly, Life of Brian is more advanced and with a greater variation of humour. It also has a bigger budget, which is great to see. Every scene looks realistic, and the sets (someone said they were formerly used by "The Last Temptation of Christ?) are great.\n\nAlmost every line in this movie is a classic, and all of them very quotable. The characters are hilarious, and out-of-this world zany.The plot is good, and contrary to the Holy Grail, it actually comes to a satisfying conclusion.\n\nThe movie also dares to joke about religion. No, they don\'t joke about Jesus or God, but about the believers in them. The line "I say you are Messiah, and I should know. I\'ve followed a few" is so spot-on it hurts(when I laugh).\n\nAll in all, watch this. This is possibly the funniest movie ever created. You can\'t afford to miss it.', u'0.369264', u"Although this movie is made mostly for laughs, I think the Python comedy troupe recognized what opportunities the genre afforded them, and used it to their advantage as a way to inspire people to be better. In my opinion, movies should be any combination of three things: entertaining, thought provoking, and inspiring. While entertainment is at the forefront here, there are some of the other two elements here. The primary two things that I think they are trying to get across here is 1. Be able to think for yourself and 2. Be careful who you follow. These subtle ideas are probably more incriminating on religions than any of the actual jokes made. But in some ways, the psychology of the masses that follow Brian are not as inaccurate as they are made to be.\n\nThere is a bit of a different feel from Holy Grail here. Once again, every actor has his own style of comedy and plays similar characters, but there is slightly less absurdity, less budget cut gags, and much more verbal comedy. Graham Chapman plays our protagonist again, and mostly makes us laugh through his facial expressions and reactions to the events around him. John Cleese plays most of the supporting cast and probably has the most lines out of any actor. Terry Jones is featured a few times in very different roles, but always making us giggle at his vocal versatility. Michael Palin makes a few appearances, most notably as the ex-leper. But Eric Idle really steals the show in this one, popping up all over the place, often multiple times in the same scene and always with a big grin on his face.\n\nI'm not quite sure what makes the comedy of this movie feel so spot on. Holy Grail was hilarious for sure, but it was outrageous and didn't change tone very much. But with Life Of Brian, it just seemed like the Pythons knew just when to extend their jokes and where to stop them off and how to blend their jokes. Brian haggling over price when he doesn't want to is funny enough, but then they take it further and make it happen at an incredibly inconvenient time. Having a Roman general named Biggus Dickus isn't worth making an extended joke with a whole family of off-color names, so instead they make it a bigger joke by directing the humor at the guards not being able to contain their laughter. Then you get a couple random moments like Brian getting suddenly picked up by aliens. And then adding in tiny laughs like the guy who says he's not different round it out. Of course, this doesn't mean it will make everyone laugh, and it's definitely not LCD comedy, but it just seems like they nailed their comedic pacing. It's really too bad that so few comedies today decide to be more intelligent and original, but I won't go into that.\n\nIf you liked Holy Grail or Meaning of Life, definitely watch this. If you were turned off by Holy Grail, this will probably be more appealing to you because it's less absurd. It's probably the best one of the three to start with if you aren't sure you'll like the style, though Holy Grail is the most kid-friendly. There really aren't that many jokes that poke fun at Christianity, but much of the humor requires some biblical knowledge to be fully appreciated. So, this may not be the comedy for you, but I would give it about ten minutes and if you aren't amused by then, it's not worth your time. Overall Rating: 8.6/10.", u'0.00635249', u"This movie is a masterpiece it is a brilliant satire. A outrageous comedy. A well acted movie one of the funniest films of all time. This is my favorite out of the three Python films. If you like comedy this is a movie you have to see. Brilliant the second funniest British film of all time the funniest being death at a funeral third being a fish called Wanda 4th being holy grail and 5th being in Bruges which is also a very good crime movie as well as black comedy. Anyways I'm getting side traced. The life of Brian is one of the greatest movies of all time. I loved every frame of it. Even if you are a Christian you will still enjoy this movie because it is just that funny. It's almost funny the same way South Park bigger longer and uncut of tropic thunder are funny ( 2 of the funniest American films ) this is so amazing if you like humid you will love this. If you hate comedy you will love comedy after watching this movie .", u'0.509925', u'Life of Brian by Monty Python is a film that has been mostly unjustly criticized and accused of blasphemy. The film is a satire of confusion and misunderstandings in religion and politics. It is not a mockery of Jesus or his life or teachings. Brian is a fictional character not meant to resemble Christ. Even as a Catholic sensitive to mockery of Jesus Christ or his Church, I am not offended by the satire in Life of Brian and acknowledge that the film is not blasphemous. The blasphemy accusations against this movie are ridiculous, and I wonder if those who made these statements even watched the film. Life of Brian by Monty Python is one of the greatest comedies ever put on film. I don\'t think there was a single scene in the movie that didn\'t make me laugh. Then again, what else can one expect from Monty Python? The troupe combines their intelligent satire with their total absurdity as usual. They portray their silly view on life as brilliantly and hilariously as always. The renowned closing musical number, Always Look on the Bright Side of Life, sums up the whole philosophy of Python, and is by many men on crosses, despite the obvious slow and painful death they\'re going to suffer. Monty Python, everyone! The entire film is like this. Life of Brian satirizes the misunderstandings in religion, and shows how silly some people can be. At the beginning of the movie, hundreds of people are gathered and listening to Jesus\' Sermon on the Mount, but get so caught up in misunderstandings and bickering over little things they completely miss out on what Jesus is saying and the meaning of what he says. "What was that?"\n\n"I don\'t know. I was too busy talking to big nose." "I think it was \'blessed are the cheesemakers\'."\n\n"What\'s so special about the cheesemakers?"\n\n"Well, obviously it\'s not meant to be taken literally. It refers to any manufacturers of dairy products." This happens throughout the movie. The people will take pieces of statements and completely reinterpret the entire statement (need I bring up the media today?) Brian (played wonderfully straight-faced by Graham Chapman) keeps telling the people that he is not the Messiah, but the people don\'t listen, and take little things as signs of divinity. Jesus is alive at this time and they\'re aware of his existence, but they keep going after Brian anyway. When Brian points out a juniper bush, the people believe that it is a miracle and a sign that he is the Messiah. Brian is a normal guy and is aware of it, and he simply wants to be left alone. At one point he even tells them that he is the Messiah just to get them to "f*** off". Even then, the people ask him "how shall we f*** off, oh Lord?" The movie also sneaks in some hilarious biting satire on left-wing politics of the 1970\'s, slightly tying into the silliness that can possibly arise from misunderstandings in religion or belief in impossible things, such as a man\'s "right" to want to give birth. It also shows about their desire to complain about everything and present themselves as victims when they\'re actually pretty well off. This idea is realized in a group called the People\'s Front of Judea (as opposed to the Judean People\'s Front). Their leader, played by John Cleese, spends the entire movie complaining about how the Romans have done nothing for the Judeans, and yet in a scene is given a list of what the Romans have done for the quality of life in their community. Everybody in the film seems to be picky. A Roman centurion catches Brian painting graffiti on a palace, and he does not complain about the vandalism, but he complains about the grammar of the Latin graffiti itself. And during all of this film, Graham Chapman as Brian is the only straight-faced one amongst a huge group of people who are insane. Classic Chapman there, and classic Python.', u'-0.135229', u'I love British humor, and Monty Python in particular. I can take 10 episodes of "Are you being served" in a row. Even MP\'s lesser works, like "Holy Grail" still tickle my fancy. So take that 8/10 with the corresponding grain of salt.\n\nTreating the life and times of Christ with a touch of comedy is not an easy task. MP came up with the perfect solution by chronicling instead the inglourious basterd born next door, Brian. Brian\'s life in many ways parallel\'s Jesus - and in some others, not.\n\nMP is known for short sketches, and really this movie is just a concatenation of brilliant sketches, but so well fused together, that it stands as a full-length feature comedy chronicling the life of a mistaken prophet on his way to crucifixion. It is populated by the most funny characters, like a lisping Pontius Pilate, who revels in telling his soldiers about his friend "Biggus Dickus" and his wife "Incontinentia Buttox," throwing them to the lions if they dare laugh. In this inimitable scene, as in many others, it is not the relative lame joke that brings down the house, but the way it is relentlessly built up even more, just when you think it\'s had its 15 seconds of fame. Sometimes more is ...more!\n\nThe film is a not-so-hidden diatribe against religious zealotry, feeble politicians, and that most dangerous thing, mass opinion, which is all too easily manipulated as Alex de Tocqueville has taught us.\n\nThe sets are surprisingly good for such a comedy production, as many were left over from another biblical film and reused. This works extremely well in the film\'s favor, as it juxtaposes the slyness and buffoonery of its characters against a very believable backdrop. And who can complain about some Mozart sacral music in the background?\n\nDefinitely one of the best comedies ever filmed, almost in a league with "Dr. Strangelove," which is high praise from me because I am an even bigger Kubrick fan than MP fan.', u'0.435528'], u'tt0092005': [u'\nI find it hard to comment on this film without simply repeating what has already been said. It\'s not that I can\'t think of anything original, but that others seem to have felt the exact same emotions as I did when watching this film.\n\nI saw this movie when I was about 12, 13, maybe 14 years old. So it didn\'t have the same nostalgic sense it had for so many. But what it did, was make me ache for those memories. I wanted (in the words of another reviewer) to be 12, and *that* cool. I wished I had been like that, that I had had friends like that, laughed like that, and had adventures like that.\n\nThe \'milk-money\' scene was probably one of my all-time favourite scenes in movie history. Up until I saw this movie I had never held much regard for River Phoenix, but the poignancy and sincerity which River added to the role of Chris Chambers touched me to the point of tears. I read in yet another review that in this scene, River was asked to think of a time when he had been hurt by an adult, and that even after the cameras stopped rolling, River sat there still, sobbing and hurting. And I felt every tear and heard every word as though I were there with Chris.\n\nThis movie made me laugh, cry, rejoice and fear with Chris, Gordie, Teddy and Vern. I loved the campfire scenes, and today I look back on my own childhood, and remember with a laugh the amazingly similar things I used to laugh and wonder about with my friends. I remember dreaming about being a writer and an actress, I remember standing up to bullies, I remember walking or riding with my friends, I remember being afraid, and crying onto a friend\'s shoulder.\n\nI guess what this movie does for everyone, is take them back in time, even though the situations may have been different, chances are you\'ll find the similarities, and remember with a smile that yes, your life was once *that* cool. In the words of Vern, "a great time"\n\nI especially loved the ending. That they found out who was strong, and who just talked tough. I loved the last scene with Chris and Gordie, and the closing monologue.\n\n"I never had any friends later on, like the ones I had when I was twelve...Jesus....does anyone?"', u'0.00966569', u"\nStand By Me is yet another one of the stories made into a movie from the author who has had more stories made into movies than any other author in history, Stephen King. Clearly, the central character here is Gordie Lachance, from whose point of view the story is told and who obviously symbolizes King himself, given many of his characteristics as well as some of the content of the film. This movie is literally filled with actors who have achieved varying degrees of success over the years, such as Jerry O'Connell, who played Vern, River Phoenix, who could have been bigger than Leonardo DiCaprio if he hadn't died, Corey Feldman, who has grown into an unenviable but visible existence, Kiefer Sutherland, who has become an excellent and very well known actor, John Cusack can be seen in a small role as Gordie's late brother, and of course, Richard Dreyfuss, who played the narrator and Gordie as an adult, has remained famous but originally achieved fame more than a decade before Stand By Me was filmed or the original story was even written.\n\nStand By Me takes place in the summer of 1959, the general time period that Stephen King is most skilled at presenting, and four friends set out to find the body of a kid who was killed by a train, hoping to find what they predicted would be astronomical fame. Unfortunately, the town's bullies are also out to find the body for the same reason, which leads to the films ultimate final climax. Even though this is a very clever story with which to tell a fall from innocence story, it is the brilliant characterization and the incredible acting that really make this a classic film. It is extremely rare that a film comes along that stars young kids and is so moving and powerful. Also, every one of those kids is made three dimensional in creative and smooth ways, making you feel like you really knew them by the end of the film. Vern is the fat kid who always gets picked on, Teddy and Chris both have abusive or deranged fathers, not to mention Chris's cruel brother, and Gordie is a young boy who lost his brother three months earlier in a violent accident and who has been largely ignored by his parents ever since. In one memorable scene, Gordie wonders how Teddy can be so enthusiastic about his father's alleged military achievements when the man once held his head to a stove, nearly burning his ear off. Gordie is mystified because he could care less about his own father, who hadn't laid a hand on him since he was three years old and got caught `eating bleach under the sink.'\n\nStephen King pokes fun at his own craft many times in the film, such as in Gordie's vehement line, `F*ck writing. I don't want to be a writer, it's a stupid waste of time!' Not only that, but there are also obvious references to his other works, such as when the boys first realize that no one brought food, and Teddy says, `This is great, what are we supposed to do, eat our feet?' People who actually read instead of just lazily watching the movies will recognize this as a major part of the plot of another of King's short stories, `Survivor Type,' from which Cast Away borrowed heavily. And why don't you people read these books? `The Body,' which Stand By Me was based on, is only 148 pages long, you could read that in a couple of hours and the experience is totally different from a movie. It's even more disturbing that `The Body' was published in the same book (Different Seasons) as a couple of King's other famous stories \x96 `Apt Pupil' and, of course, `Rita Hayworth and the Shawshank Redemption.'\n\nStand By Me is a story of how one event can unexpectedly change lives. It seems to be a story about friends and how important they are, but this possible theme is clearly dispelled in a line from the narration spoken at the end of the film \x96 `As time went on, we saw less and less of Teddy and Vern, until eventually they became just two more faces in the halls. It happens sometimes, friends come in and out of your life like busboys at a restaurant.' Instead, the film is about learning from a life changing experience and actually making changes or modifying your life in some way because of it, and this is heavily emphasized at the end of the film.\n\nStand By Me is a timeless film. Stephen King's story is skillfully brought to the screen under the direction of Rob Reiner, and the 1950s are brought back to life just as successfully as King so often does in his stories and novels, with the slicked back hair, the hot rods, and in the film, and excellent 50s soundtrack. There is so much more to this film than just the superficial story \x96 things about the characters and the story, but also about the tremendously talented man who wrote it all.\n", u'0.307464', u"This film is a brilliant, well-acted masterpiece! What touched me the most was the late River Phoenix's acting, but all of the young actors performances were incredible. They are why you should see this film. 'Stand By Me' is not a bubblegum Disney film, nor a dry Hollywood film; it is a movie that captures childhood in a poignant, non-candy coated manner that is dead on. I saw this movie only a couple months ago and was blown away by it's style and acting. It is rare that you see such fresh, relaxed and deep performances that the actors in this film offered. Although this is not a recent film, it is a genuine, inspiring film that is so refreshing-being so different than the films Hollywood often gives us. I give this film a 100+ and recommend it to everyone. You will benefit from it's message and it's wonderful acting.", u'0.570019', u"Perhaps this is a personal bias because I had friends like this when I was 12, but having said that this is one of the best films I have ever seen and it hits every chord perfectly.\n\nThere were four of us that were friends and we were known as the Stand By Me Crew. Mike, Gary, Andy and myself were inseparable. And as this film prophesizes correctly, the group has since split up and now I am only good friends with one of them. This movie makes you remember what it was like to have friends when you were 12 and it makes you glad that they were there when they were.\n\nThe story involves these four kids going on a weekend hike to find a dead kid that apparently got hit by a train. Now if that is all the movie was about, it would probably be pretty boring. But this film explores the fears and anxieties of what it was like to be 12 again. Twelve year olds deal with a plethora of issues and it is not often that adults listen to what kids have to say or see what they deal with. But this film is honest about it's assessment of how they feel.\n\nThe four boys are played brilliantly by Wil Wheaton, Jerry O'Connell\n\nCoosh from Jerry Maguire ), Corey Feldman and River Phoenix. The story moves along and hits a nerve because of the life that these four actors brings to their characters. There is a real sense of comrarderie between the four of them. But ultimately it is Phoenix that brings the most life to his character and I would say that the milk money scene with him and Gordie (Wheaton) is one of the more touching and poignant scenes ever filmed.\n\nWhat Stand By Me does is brings you back to a time when friendship was more pure and innocent and meant more. You can't help but get caught up in the nostalgia. Perhaps this film means more to me for personal reasons ( as I've already stated ) but it is a wonderful film and it should be enjoyed by everyone.\n\nThe last line of the movie is so true. Do we really ever have friends as good as the ones when we were twelve? I doubt it.", u'0.32735', u"I am 14 years old, and I absolutely love this movie. But don't let my age fool you. I'm not just going to sit here and talk about how hott River Pheonix was.\n\nThis movie is well rounded in my perspective. Everyone can relate to at least one of the boys in it at one time in their life. The actors are matched perfectly with who their character portrays.Corey Feldman's character Teddy is the boy who's sensitive about his dad, but tries to hide it, Jerry O' Connell's character Vern is the chubby, wussy kid, but still part of the club, Wil Wheaton's character Gordie is the sweet, intelligent friend who tells stories to the other boys and is ignored by his parents, and River Phoenix's character Chris is the boy in the neighborhood that's been labeled a bad kid and feels he'll never get out of their town, the peacemaker, and Gordie's best friend. \n\nThis movie just sucks you in as soon as you start watching it. It's not overly mushy and sad, but it's not so tough that only a sixteen year old boy could stand it. You feel for each character, no matter how mean or nice they are. My personal favorite is Chris Chambers, which i know this will probably drive you guys nuts that almost every other person does too, but River Phoenix is just so touching. The campfire scene is great, the milk money seen is great, and one of my favorites is the train scene. You can definitely see the terror in their faces. It's funny that they all act so tough, except maybe Vern, although he tries, and they still like talking about goofy and dancing and singing along to Lollipop. You also just want to be there with them. Feel that kind of friendship that so many people long for. It's such a feel good movie, but not in the sense of a 10 year old's feel good movie. It makes you feel complete when you watch it. It's not jam packed with action sequences or it doesn't have fluffy pink bunnies hopping around in it either. It's just one of a kind. Definitely worth my time and yours.\n\nThe newest DVD of Stand By Me (Special Edition) has Walking the Tracks: The Summer of Stand By Me where all the main actors,except River, and Rob Reiner are interviewed. They also talk about working with River Phoenix. There's also the Stand By Me music video with River Phoenix, Wil Wheaton, and obviously Ben E. King. Not to mention an extra CD with some awesome oldie's songs like Everyday, Lollipop, Stand By Me, and Mr. Lee.", u'0.157092', u'\nAs a lover of Stephen King\'s writing style and Rob Reiner\'s directing techniques, this movie leaves me speechless every time. It is an almost forgotten film about a time and a youth nearly forgotten, as well. And I will say, as a writer, the novella that this film was based upon, "The Body" has and always will be the inspiration for my style of writing.\n\nFirst of all, I enjoy the title that was chosen for the film. "Stand By Me" fits what the characters in the story are facing.  I think that all who have seen this film will agree that the problems are all things that we can relate to.  All of us know someone like these characters. Most of us have met the boy down the road who had a brother with a bad name and a father with an alcohol problem, automatically being labeled as a "bad kid." And the boy with the military father, abusive and a little whacko. The fat kid, picked on and ridiculed for his weight.\n\nTo me, Gordy represents all of us. I found myself seeing a little of me in Gordy as I watched the film. I don\'t know if any one else shares this, but it was true. Gordy was not very strong, at first, and was not sure what he wanted, except to be with his friends. Still coping with the loss of his brother and the fact that his father was disrespectful to him, Gordy still stood up for what he believed in. And, in the end he surprised the characters and the viewers by standing up to the bullies that had plagued them all.\n\nThis film is certainly one of my top favorites. In fact, it lies in my top three, probably at #2 or #3. I feel that it is a film that everyone should see at some point in their life due to the fact it changes your look at youth and their trials. Few films are able to do that and I think that this one was an inspiration for others that will do the same in the future.\n\n', u'-0.109533', u"\nGrowing up isn't easy for anyone. There are times when you feel no one understands you at all. Although growing up is tough, the friends you have at a young age are the friends you'll remember for the rest of your life. Stand By Me is a very wonderful film, a masterpiece on a small scale. The film is full of great insights into the minds of a group of four boys who decide they want to see what a dead body looks like, and it sparks their interest even more that they actually knew this dead person. A young boy's mind is full of many things, they feel lost sometimes, strong at others, but mostly they feel invinceable. Rob Reiner has directed a film about four young boys who discover life is quick, sometimes merciless, and magical. I've seen this film numerous times and it always seems better than the time before. This is a perfect little film. ", u'0.257602', u"Without a doubt this movie is probably the best coming of age flick around, it has terrific acting and an incredibly touching plot that keeps you going throughout the whole film. I think the reason I love this film so much is because, everyone in some way could relate to it. When you're a pre-teen and have a close group of friends and face something so intense together, there's that special bond that no matter how much you loose touch with each other, one day, you just think of them and that one incident.\n\nStand by Me is about 4 pre-teen boys whose summer is about to end and they are about to start junior high. They've obviously grown up together and are nervous of the world they are about to face, where they are no longer kids, but just about to become adults. When their friend, Vern, tells them about a kid their age that is missing that he found out by listening in on his brother where the kid's body is, the boys think it would be so cool to find the body and become the local town heroes. They have one problem though, there are these big tough guys who want to find the body first, it's a matter of who will reach it first. But of course, it's the bonding of the boys that really gets you into the film.\n\nThese are some of the best characters I have seen on film, we start with Gordy. Gordy is an intelligent writer who lost his big brother, his idol, in a car crash recently and can't get any love or respect from his father and it's obvious that he gets it from his friends. That's what keeps him going. Chris is the leader of the gang and Gordy's best friend, he comes from a very bad family and is dubbed the bad seed everywhere, he's the kid who you knew in school and just knew he'd turn out bad, but there's a deeper side to him. The speech that River Phoenix turned out for Chris was so beautifully dilvered as a child who's been disappointed so many times by an adult.\n\nTeddy is another bad kid sort of speak, he has a bad home life where his father is crazy and nearly killed him a few times. He has a quick temper, but you can tell that his friends keep him down to Earth and help him through the worst times. Then there's Vern, the funny fat kid who is pretty much scarred of everything, and in some ways is the 4th wheel. Still, Vern you can tell is a great friend and the other's appreciate him despite how he can hold them back.\n\nThe acting is just phenomenal. Now, the directing, Rob Reiner is without a doubt one of the best directors of all time, he took these young boys and pushed them to their limits, he was so smart about it as well. He said in an interview that he had to get pre-teen boys who were close to the personality of the character in the film, so it would come natural to the pre-teen actors, and you could tell that this film was his baby, he put so much thought and love into this film. That's what makes this film so special, nothing could ever compete with a coming of age film like Stand By Me.\n\n10/10", u'0.326882', u'Hands down this is my favorite movie. (With the Sandlot in second place). My mom got this movie for me when i was about 12. I saw it the first time and realized that i had friends like that. The movie is definitely one every teenage kid should see. I think it is more of a movie for boys but girls can get out of it the same as the boys can. But the movie overall is great because its just about a four friends who have no experience with the "real world". They find out about a dead body and go in search to find it. At first they just do it to be famous and get a reward. But the quest of the boys throughout the movie reveal things that even themselves didn\'t know about. After it all, the boys find out about reality, and how it isn\'t glamorous. They realize that the body could of been them and they respect that. In my opinion the point of the movie was not to have you think of when you were 12 and your good friends but to think of what you have now, and what you do with it. In the end Gordie tells us what happens to each and how each kind of go their separate ways. (Such as the last scene of the movie). This is definitely a movie to not only rent but buy. I tip my hat to Reiner.', u'0.248299', u'\nStephen King adaptations can be great. In my opinion the less horror pictures, and The Shining, are the best. Misery, The Shawshank Redemption, The Green Mile and this one. Stand by Me is a great film, you can say it is a drama with some thriller elements.\n\nFour boys hear the location of the dead body of a boy from their small town. The boys go on a trip to look for the body, about 30 miles away. There are some little problems on the way, including another gang with its leader Kiefer Sutherland. One of the boys thinks about his late brother because of the recent events, played by John Cusack. It seems to be a simple story but it is told perfect.\n\nThe performances the boys give, one of them is the late River Phoenix, are all extraordinary. I liked the way their friendship was shown. Just a great movie, see this. 9/10.', u'0.68691', u'I am as many are, a huge fan of Stephen\'s King Works. I have also been a fan of many of the films made from his books. Some I am not a fan of. I have not read as of yet and I\'m sure I will, The Body. I have seen Stand By Me several times and I am conflicted in many of the great portions of this film and the ideas behind the movie vs the fact that it just doesn\'t sit with me as entertaining.\n\nStand By Me is considered perhaps one of the forefront coming of age films and for good reason. It\'s the story of four best friends set in the fifties/sixties told through the eyes of the Gordie Lachance who has lost his role model best friend older brother to an accident. Haunted by the loss of his brother and the fact that everyone seems to have only cared about his older brother including his parents, he is compelled to encourage his group of friends to go on a trek across the county to find the dead body of a missing boy. Unfortunately the "bad kids" and "bullies" in town also discover that this body is nearby and they race to find it first. During their trek they discover more about each other, and they stand together to overcome their fears about their own lives.\n\nI do whole heartedly agree in the pure heart of this film, the coming of age, the different personalities of each boy in the film. It does aim to find a little something of everyone in each boy and it accomplishes that. The cast, especially for young actors is very good. Wil Wheaton as the lead character appears to be weaker than his best friend played by the late River Phoenix but in the end he is really who holds them altogether and overcomes the most of all of them. River Phoenix ironically plays the "bad boy" best friend who seems to have very little future but has taken Wheaton\'s character under his wing and encourages him to make something of himself. Corey Feldman fills in his usual role adequately. Jerry O\'Connell as the made fun of "fat kid" also plays his role well. Keifer Sutherland who can\'t help but look like a jerk and an evil fiend also plays well. The cast is basically The Brat Pack and yet for an eighties film it\'s quite darker than most Brat Pack films. Wholely realistic is the kids\' views on life, their fascination with death, cigarettes, adult things, and their adult language. Their trying to be as grown up as possible without any real adult role models.\n\nMy issue is that the film just doesn\'t hit me. It never satisfies me or entertains me. I find it entirely too short, very, very, predictable and without any real depth of plot. I know everyone sees this film as a classic and certainly it has it\'s strong points as I outlined but overall it just falls short for me. The soundtrack, and I absolutely love these songs feels forced like Reiner is trying to force the feeling of the era on us rather than create it all around them. In this case I don\'t expect anyone to believe my opinion because I am sorely outnumbered but I don\'t care for this film much at all.\n\n5/10', u'-0.102957', u"Stand By Me is probably the best film ever to come from a Stephen King story. (The Green Mile sucks, by the way.) The story is told from an adult writer's point of view as he recounts an adventure he shared with his three best friends in the waning moments of the summer before junior high school began. We see the four boys head out into the wilderness to see the dead body of a boy who was apparently hit by a train. The boys encounter bullies, other trains, leeches, vicious dogs, and many other things on their trip. And they have some pretty deep and emotional conversations along the way.\n\nThis is a very awkward age in the life of a young man. You can tell by listening to their conversation topics which range from boobs to whether or not Mighty Mouse can beat up Superman. The youngsters are portrayed flawlessly by four terrific young actors. Who would have thunk that Jerry O'Connell would turn out to be the most successful of them? At times they laugh, other times they pick on each other. Sometimes they seem on the verge of fighting, but when challenged by the older gang of bullies, they stick together. Richard Dreyfuss, who plays the adult writer, narrates the action as things move along. Their trip is full of surprises and emotional insight.\n\nStand By Me is not quite a classic in my book, but it is very memorable. The script is a little too pessimistic for my liking. Right down to when River Phoenix describes an incident where he's caught stealing milk money from school, and his teacher ends up keeping it for herself. There is also a complete lack of positive supporting characters during the scenes set back when they were kids. Only John Cusack, in a cameo role, is shown as a positive older character. No wonder these kids felt so unwanted! All the adults around them were jerks! The script uses more swear words than are actually necessary to convey the anger these kids sometimes feel. And you'd think any dead body that had been hit by a train would be more damaged than the one they find out in the woods. Wouldn't this kid have heard the train coming in time and jumped well out of the way? If he was trying to kill himself, then you'd think he would have stood in the way and been completely pulverized. I know these may seem like petty beefs, but they are enough to knock the review down a star or two.\n\nIt seems like the film is trying to portray the dead Brower boy as the death of these kids' innocence or something to that effect. As someone who's been their age, I can understand some of what they were feeling. And I totally agree that some of the people you thought were your best friends eventually just turn out to be faces in the crowd at school a few years later.\n\nDespite it's faults, this is a powerful film you aren't likely to forget. It's one of Reiner's best, and the outstanding cast does some wonderful work themselves.\n\n8 of 10 stars.\n\nThe Hound.", u'-0.116607', u'Stand By Me is without a doubt one of the finest pieces of film ever made in the history of humanity. A truly excellent movie that really strikes and affects you with all its glory. It leaves no one untouched whether you\'re 12 or 112 years old. Simply because it deals with life and friendship, and all that comes with it. Both the good and the bad.\n\nEveryone can relate to it and feel what the characters feel. Because we\'ve all been there. We have all done similar things to what they are doing, we have all been dealing with the same issues in life as they are faced with and we all still are.\n\nFew films are able do depict the theme of life and friendship as successfully as Stand By Me. In my opinion there are practically no flaws in this production, everything from the plot and the screenplay to the characters and the actors are top notch. Also the music is great.\n\nWatching the movie one feel everything from happiness and laughter to fear and grief. Laughter because we remember how fun it was being a child. With everything being new and exciting in life. And facing it all together with our friends. Fear and grief because of how hard it can be having to grow up and let go of the past. Let go of our old friends and our old life. \n\nOne can\'t help but to feel nostalgic. At least I do. It makes me think about life in a larger sense. Thinking about my childhood I realize how long ago it was or at least seems to be. The movie frees a lot of emotions and thoughts regarding both my own life and life in general.\n\nThis movie also has one of the best opening scenes in film history. I almost burst into tears every time I see it. It\'s as close to perfection as it gets. It\'s so beautiful and sad. Simply the perfect way to launch the rest of the movie. How the beautiful soft music first almost reaches out and touch you, while seeing the landscape. Then a close up on the car and the main character reading the chocking news of his dear old friend\'s death. Thereafter such a smooth passage back to his childhood with focus on the kids passing by on their bikes and the music still in the background. Excellent!\n\nTo conclude I have also one little flaw, or at least I think of it that way. It\'s regarding the whole "Lardass-scence". When I was little I could never figure out why it was in the film. I couldn\'t see the connection to the rest of the film. Being older and hopefully a little wiser :D I now see that it\'s a way of showing Gordies talent for making up stories, the talent that have him becoming a writer one day. However I feel this could have been illustrated in a better way. I\'ve always felt that scene is just a little bit over the top and I still do. Otherwise Stand By Me is close to a masterpiece. No one should go through life without seeing and experiencing this wonderful film.', u'0.169605', u"The movie Stand by Me is a story about four close twelve year old friends growing up in rural Oregon who are bitten by the curiosity bug. The main Character, Gordie (Wil Wheaton), and his three friends, Chris (River Pheonix), Teddy (Corey Feldman), and Vern (Jerry O'Connell) set out on an adventure to find the body of Ray Brower. They had heard of his whereabouts by Vern's older brother and they were determined to find him. They incur many setbacks during their journey. They are bullied by the older boys of the town who are also trying to find the body and get the fame, attacked by the junkyard dog Chopper, almost getting run down by a train, and attacked by the swamp leaches. The boys learn many lessons on their journey, but more importantly they learn about life. The actual goal of Rob Reiner, director of the film, was to show that growing up has its ups as well as downs. All four of the main characters have had some trouble in their life. He showed this when Gordie's athletic brother was tragically killed in a car accident. By doing this, Reiner elaborates to the audience that bad things do happen to the best people. Chris and Teddy also have very neglecting fathers at their homes. Even though it is all fun and games on the hunt for the body, they still have a troubled life lingering in the background that they can not get away from. And good old Vern has an older brother who wreaks havoc in his life. He is actually one of the older bullies also on the hunt for the body. Reiner cannot make his point much clearer. One of the things I really loved about this movie is how few rules the young twelve year old boys had. The first evident thing is when the movie opens and they are smoking in their tree house. These boys smoke, shoot handguns in town, and cuss like sailors throughout the movie and know one seems to notice. Wow, the times sure have changed since I was a young child.", u'-0.303279', u'"It happens sometimes. Friends come in and out of our lives, like busboys in a restaurant."\n\nStand By Me is Rob Reiner\'s love letter to friendship and nostalgic memories. It\'s ironic that Reiner\'s film looks at the past with such high regards because we can do the same with his filmography. His best films were all made in the 80\'s (and we can squeeze Misery and A Few Good Men into that list as well although they came out in 1990 and 1992 respectively), and despite not having directed many great films over the past few decades we can still look back at his early films and appreciate his classics. Stand By Me reminds us all of our early childhood and the friendships we made. It doesn\'t matter what decade we grew up in, we all cherish special memories of adventures we shared with our friends and how they helped shape us. That is what is so universal and appealing about Reiner\'s film; even though we may never have grown up in a small town or had similar outdoor adventures it still recalls us back to a time where we were discovering new things about the world and standing up for our friends when they were in trouble or running with them when we got caught playing in our neighbor\'s yards. Stand By Me focuses on these memories and it\'s not just about the adventure in itself but the bond these friends shared together. It\'s probably the go to movie when we are comparing or referencing other coming of age films, and in my opinion one of the best ever made considering how much I appreciate the genre. I\'m sure the film itself was a life changing experience for many who grew up watching it and dreaming of having similar adventures with their friends.\n\nBased on Stephen King\'s short story, "The Body," the screenplay for the film was adapted by Raynold Gideon and Bruce Evans. It takes place in 1959 and centers on four 12 year old friends from Castelrock, Oregon who overhear a conversation about the location of the body of a dead boy who had been missing for several days. The news about the disappearance of this boy had spread all over town, so these kids decide to embark on an adventure through the woods and bring back the missing body so they can be received as heroes. Since the journey would take more than a full day, they plan to tell their parents that they are staying at each other\'s home. Gordie (Will Wheaton) had recently lost his older brother (played by John Cusack in the flashback scenes) a few months prior to this in a car accident so he knew his mourning parents wouldn\'t even mind him being gone for a few days. His best friend, Chris (River Phoenix), came from a troublesome family and despite knowing he\'d get into trouble if they\'d discover his lie he didn\'t think it would be any different if he stayed with his drunk father. Teddy (Corey Feldman) still has the scars from the abuse he suffered from his mentally unstable father, and currently lives with his mother. Vern (Jerry O\'Connell), the clown of the group who isn\'t taken very seriously is the one who came up with the idea of looking for the body, but he also is the first to back down when it comes to it. The four finally decide to go ahead with their plan and begin their adventure, which will eventually shape who they are. The story is narrated by the grown up version of Gordie (played by Richard Dreyfuss) somewhere around 1985.\n\nThe strong performances in this film are one of the reasons why it continues to work today. River Phoenix was such a natural and is so charismatic that he steals every scene he\'s in. The chemistry he shares with Wheaton\'s character is strong and it reminds us all of that best friend we had in our childhood. Corey Feldman must have had the best agent because he starred in some of the best films that were released in the 80\'s (Gremlins, The Goonies, The Burbs, and The Lost Boys). Jerry O\'Connell is probably the one that has undergone the greatest physical transformation, but he was perfect for the role of Vern and he reminded us of that friend who always seemed to be the butt of every joke. These four young actors carry the film and despite not having the most exciting of adventures, the way the story is told is what makes it such a fascinating one. There are small moments like the one where they gather around the camp fire to listen to Gordie\'s story, or when they are crossing the pond and discover its full of leeches, that stand out. The film is told through Gordie\'s recollection of these events and each scene feels like an authentic memory someone would have of such a life changing experience. The 50\'s soundtrack also plays a key role in the film since it adds to the overall sense of nostalgia. Reiner\'s film reminds me how much I actually have enjoyed Stephen King\'s non-horror stories (this along with Shawshank Redemption and The Green Mile are my favorite film adaptations of his work). Since its 1986 release, all the coming of age films that have followed it seem to heavily borrow from it. Stand By Me is the measuring stick for films in this genre.\n\nhttp://estebueno10.blogspot.com/', u'0.383124'], u'tt2024544': [u'12 Years a Slave tells the true story of Solomon Northup, an educated and free black man living in New York during the 1840\'s who gets abducted, shipped to the south, and sold into slavery. It is a film that stimulates at both an emotional level and an intellectual one. \n\nChiwetel Ejiofor plays Solomon Northup. He\'s been a "that guy" actor for sometime \x96 film-goers may know his face but not his name. After this film his name will be known. He gives, quite simply, the best performance from a leading actor since Daniel Day Lewis in There Will Be Blood. Because of his character\'s position as a slave he is usually unable to speak his mind unless he is prepared to be beaten. As a result Ejiofor is forced to utilize body language and his eyes, which become enormous pools of emotion to express himself to the audience. He\'s forced to endure terrible things, but he always maintains a certain dignity and nobility that makes his plight even more affecting. It\'s a performance of incredible subtlety that may leave you speechless and in complete awe.\n\nMicheal Fassbender gives the best performance of his already extremely impressive career, even besting his previous high marks from the films Shame and Hunger (both directed by Steve McQueen, who also directed 12 Years a Slave). He plays Edwynn Epps, a vicious and demonic slaver and perhaps the most loathsome and disgusting character ever put on screen. If alive today, he\'d likely be a drunk with severe anger management issues. By turns pathetic and terrifying, he embodies the ultimate nightmare of a deeply flawed man given absolute power over other human beings, and through that absolute power finds only madness, which drives him to deeper cruelty. He\'s always a menacing and malignant presence even when not on screen, as his slaves must always be aware and prepared for his seemingly random bouts of sadism. \n\nOther actors give excellent performances as well. Paul Giamatti, Paul Dano, Benedict Cumberbatch, Sarah Paulson, Alfre Woodard are all great in relatively small roles. But in this film of titans it\'s the one you\'ve probably never heard of who perhaps stands above them all. In her first role in a feature film, Lupita Nyong\'o, playing the pretty young slave Patsey - the object of Edwynn Epps demented and horrifying affections and the emotional epicenter of the entire picture, gives one of the most devastating performances I have ever seen. A portrait of unbearable sadness, her character is a mirror image of Solomon. While Solomon is a man who refuses to break and give up the dignity which he\'s known since birth, she is one who has long since been broken, and who never knew dignity in the first place. Her life is a living hell, forced to endure the "love" of Edwyn Epps and the brutal jealousy of his wife, she\'s trapped in a terrible triangle that she can\'t escape. Despite that, she retains a level of innocence that only heightens the tragedy of her character. It actually gets to the point where simply looking at this character might be enough to bring you to tears. It\'s a shattering performance.\n\nStarting his career as a video artist before making full length films, Steve McQueen has an uncanny eye for imagery and contrast. He\'s also a very patient film maker, utilizing long, steady single shots to emphasize various things. In his prior films this has felt like a purely stylistic choice, here, it\'s a choice aimed directly at our heart. When the events on screen become their most horrifying and ugly is when his camera becomes the most unflinching. At times feeling perhaps like we\'re seeing out of the solemn eyes of the ghost of some murdered slave, watching in sorrow and rage. This is both McQueen\'s most accessible and artistically searing film yet. \n\nThere are also moments of stunning natural beauty that would make Terrence Malick proud. Alone, these shots would inspire wonder, but in the context of this film they make us feel more forlorn, as if the ugliness of man is encroaching on the natural beauty of the world.\n\nPerhaps the most noteworthy thing about 12 Years a Slave is the way that it portrays slavery itself. Instead of taking the easy way out and limiting his exploration of the topic solely to the slaves, Steve McQueen increases the scope and we see how it affects those who profited by it. Take Benedict Cumberbatch\'s character. A seemingly decent and caring man who treats his slaves with some semblance of respect and kindness. He comes off as a relatively good man who is trapped within the powerful confines of the institution of slavery. In 12 Years a Slave, slavery is shown as a horrifying and destructive social construct that drains the humanity from everyone it touches, turning good men into moral quandaries, turning flawed men into monsters, and turning an entire race of people into livestock and tools. \n\nTo watch 12 Years a Slave is to be confronted with the grim reality of slavery in a way that\'s never been done before. To say this is the best film ever made about slavery feels trivial, as slavery is a subject in film that has been shown with naive romanticism from films like Gone With the Wind or silly exploitation from something like Django Unchained. Both of which serve to make the topic digestible. To watch 12 Years a Slave is to experience a level of despair and misery that can become overwhelming. It\'s a film of such ugliness, such blunt emotional trauma, that it may haunt you for hours if not days after seeing it. So why should you watch a film that could leave you reeling and devastated? Because, it\'s also one of the greatest cinematic achievements of our time.', u'0.197118', u"chitchens fan \x95 2 hours ago \u25b3 \u25bd \n\n\u2212 \n\nWell, to begin, I cannot remember the last time I could not get up at the end of a movie. I literally could not rise up from my seat. My body felt as though it were being weighed down by something considerably larger and heavier than myself... History had it's way with me( I am an African American woman). Thank you Mr. McQueen, Mr. Ejiofor, Ms. Nyong'o, Ms. Paulson and others, and yes, even Mr. Fassbender. I am not a film critic nor a movie hobbyist, although I try to stay current, but what I am is a human being trying to understand the various problems and issues within our country. This movie is a potent reminder of why we are where we are as a society today. How man can be so unflinchingly cruel to his fellow man, especially if he looks, speaks or behaves differently, I will never understand.", u'0.190813', u'Read More @ The Awards Circuit (http://www.awardscircuit.com)\n\nOne of the things that have been thrown around for months now is the notion that awards season voting bodies won\'t respond to it because it\'s too "difficult" to sit through. Let\'s define difficult, shall we? Is it difficult to see the first openly gay politician gunned down by his closeted colleague? Is it difficult to see a reformed convict put to death by our country for his crimes? Is it difficult to see a mother choose which one of her children dies during the Holocaust? I\'d argue that these answers add up to a resounding yes. Yet, no one threw those phrases of "too difficult" around.\n\nI\'ve watched hundreds of films throughout my short 29-year history and I\'ve seen some difficult cinema. Steven Spielberg\'s "Schindler\'s List" can make anyone quiver in shame as it shows the despicable reality of the Holocaust. Paul Greengrass\' "United 93", which is almost an emotional biopic of America\'s darkest hour, makes me want to crawl up into a ball and cry. And finally, Mel Gibson\'s "The Passion of the Christ", one of the highest grossing films of all-time, shows the labor of our sins fleshed out into the beaten skin of an honest man. And still, no one threw these hyperbolic terms out saying, "it\'s too hard watch." Is it because this is an American tragedy, done by Americans? Is it the guilt of someone\'s ancestors manifesting it in your tear ducts? I can\'t answer that. Only the person who says it can. The structure of this country is built on the backs and blood of slaves. But slavery didn\'t just exist in America, it was everywhere. It was horrifying what occurred for over 200 years and believe it or not, still exists in some parts of the world TODAY.\n\nNow when approaching the powerful film by McQueen and distributed by Fox Searchlight Pictures, there is a resounding honesty that McQueen and screenwriter John Ridley inhabit. There are no tricks or gimmicks, no cheap takes on a side story or character that is put there for time filling or a life-lesson for Solomon to learn. Everything is genuine. Is the film heartbreaking? Oh my God yes. Did I cry for several minutes after the screening? Embarrassingly so. I was enamored the entire time, head to toe, moment to moment.\n\nI have long admired the talent that\'s been evident in the works of Chiwetel Ejiofor. I\'ve known he was capable of what he has accomplished as Solomon Northup and he hits it out of the park. He has the urgency, worry, and drive to get home to his family and executes every emotion flawlessly even when all hope seems to be lost. Where he shines incredibly are the small nuances that he takes as the story slows down, you notice aspects of Solomon that make him even more believable.\n\nAs Edwin Epps, Solomon\'s last owner, Michael Fassbender digs down deep into some evil territory. Acts as the "Amon Goeth" of our tale, he is exactly what you\'d expect a person who believes this should be a way of life to behave. He\'s vile and strikes fear into not only the people he interacts with but with the viewers who watch. As Mrs. Epps, Sarah Paulson is just as wretched. Abusive, conniving, entitled, and I loved every second of her.\n\nMark my words; Lupita Nyong\'o is the emotional epicenter of the entire film. The heartache, tears, and anger that will grow inside during the feature will have our beautiful "Patsey" at the core. She is the great find of our film year and will surely go on to more dynamic and passionate projects in the future. You\'re watching the birth of a star.\n\nHans Zimmer puts forth a very pronounced score, enriched with all the subtle ticks that strike the chords of tone. One thing that cannot be denied is the exquisite camera work of Sean Bobbit. Weaving through the parts of boat and then through the grassroots of a cotton field, he puts himself in the leagues of Roger Deakins and Seamus McGarvey as one of the most innovative and exciting DP\'s in the business. Especially following his work in "The Place Beyond the Pines" earlier this year. Simply marvelous.\n\nOscar chances, since I know many of you are wondering. Put the Oscar\'s in my hands, you have a dozen nominations reap for the taking. Best Picture, Director, Lead Actor, Supporting Actor, dual Supporting Actresses, Adapted Screenplay, Production Design, Cinematography, Costume Design, Film Editing, Makeup and Hairstyling, Original Score. There\'s also a strong and rich sound scope that is present. The sounds of nature as the slaves walk or as Solomon approaches his master\'s house is noticed. The big question is, can it win? I haven\'t seen everything yet so I cannot yet if it deserves it or not. I can say, if critics and audiences can get off this "difficult" watch nonsense and accept the cinematic endeavor as a look into our own history as told from a great auteur, there\'s no reason it can\'t top the night. I\'m very aware that seeing this film along with Steve McQueen crowned by Oscar is nearly erasing 85 years of history in the Academy. Are they willing and ready to begin looking into new realms and allowing someone not necessarily in their inner circles to make a bold statement as McQueen and Ridley take in "12 Years a Slave?" I remain hopeful.', u'0.0110897', u"I attended the premiere of 12 Years a Slave at the Toronto International Film Festival. Having no tickets, we had to wait close to 4 hours hoping they might let us in. I have to say it was definitely worth the wait and it is hands down the best film I've seen at the festival. \n\nThe film is based on the real story of Solomon Northup (played by Chiwetel Ejiofor), a free black man living in New York, who is abducted and sold into slavery in Louisiana. As the film begins, we are exposed to his talent as a musician (he plays the violin) and get a glimpse of the life he leads with his wife and two children. All is well until he meets two men who seem taken by his music and want to bring him along with them so he can play at various events. When Solomon wakes up in chains, his dark journey starts and the film never lets you take a break.\n\nIf you've seen McQueen's other works then you more or less know what kind of movie to expect (if you haven't then please stop reading and watch Hunger and Shame). 12 Years a Slave is dark and raw, it exposes everything, without sugarcoating it. It is definitely hard to watch; Several people walked out of the the theatre but in my opinion, it is not only worth watching but necessary. Films exploring themes of slavery are few and far in between and never has one been quite as exhaustive and effective as this one. Beautifully shot and edited, the film features moments of tension, heartbreak and a few laughs here and there. Steve McQueen has created another masterpiece.\n\nMost actors get very little screen time. Paul Giamatti and Sarah Paulson are seen for a few minutes but both are great as usual. Benedict Cumberbatch plays a plantation owner, who recognizes Solomon's talent and tries to help him to a certain extent. Despite being a slaver, he is presented in the film as being a good man. Cumberbatch was very good, though outshined by far by Michael Fassbender. He goes through every emotion and gives it his everything. In my opinion, this is his best performance to date. Paul Dano gets a few minutes of screen time as well but makes incredible use of it. As Benedict's worker, he despises slaves and the songs he sings to Solomon makes an incredibly powerful scene, one of the most disturbing in the film. Lupita Nyong'o's first appearance in a feature film is stunning, as she plays a heart breaking young slave. I hope she has a long career ahead of her, she certainly has the talent for it. The true star is definitely Chiwetel Ejiofor. His performance as Solomon is stunning and unforgettable, I truly hope he wins the Oscar for it this year.\n\nAll in all, if you get a chance to see 12 Years a Slave, don't miss it. Not everyone will be able to stomach it but it's an outstanding film that deserves and needs to be seen.", u'0.398651', u'Director Steve McQueen has gathered a talented cast, a compelling plot idea, and a wonderful cinematographer and then snuffed the life from them with his clinical, detached directing style that robs what should be the most affecting movie of the year and turns it into a plodding, emotionless, historical biopic.\n\nDespite the valiant efforts of Chiwetel Ejiofor and especially newcomer Lupta Nyong\'o, this drama about a musician who is duped, drugged and sold into slavery never manages to find an emotional chord.\n\nLike last year\'s Oscar-bait, "Les Miserables," the film is often told in long, steady pan shots or a continuous array of distracting close-ups of actors filled with angst or anger. And the film finds no rhythm in its editing to make these extremes work. Even the most harrowing scenes in "12 Years," and there a plenty of them to choose from, lack dramatic tension. One may as well be watching an accident filmed on a surveillance camera on the local news, because that\'s how detached McQueen\'s film style is (which also killed his over-praised "Shame," for me as well.)\n\nSome have likened "12 Years a Slave" to "Schindler\'s List," but for emotional wallop, there is no comparison. "Schindler\'s List" is in every way, from script to score, the vastly superior movie: not only shocking but truly emotional and with actual drama.\n\nJohn Ridley\'s screenplay has a few fine dynamics, but quite frankly in the end all the characters in the film end up being (literally) too black or white. Even the few characters (like Benedict Cumberbatch\'s Ford or Garrett Dillahunt\'s Armsby) who seem to have shades of gray, of course turn out to be turn-coats. Michael Fassbender and Sarah Paulson get two roles that feature them being evil incarnate, to the point you expect Fassbender to twirl his mustache at times. But again, any kind of shading the actors may have tried to play gets lost with McQueen\'s endless habit of sticking the camera repeatedly into the actor\'s faces.\n\n"12 Years" is by no means an awful movie, but I think hype surrounding it in the press will lead to disappointment in movie goers who are expecting an amazing visceral tale, and are deceived into getting a stagnant and clinical examination of some of the darkest days of American history. Members of the audience I saw the movie with began talking half-way through and some people were overheard saying, "How can they make this subject so dull?" as they headed for the exit.', u'-0.273936', u"Once again Hollywood waves its sanctimonious wand over history with this glossy movie about slavery in the United States. Like a self-righteous teetotaler telling off an alcoholic, it is a sentimental, holier-than-thou piece that challenges you to criticize it or 'you're a racist too'. Following in the footsteps of Django it uses the excuse of history and a worthy theme to justify gratuitous scenes of violence. The film begins in the home of the central character, Solomon Northop, a free black man, who lives a genteel life with his family in New York. The director is clearly eager to get to the gory bits though, and within the first ten minutes Solomon has been kidnapped, enslaved, and the audience is cringing under a close up of his contorted face during a twenty minute whipping scene; the first of many to come. \n\nThe film continues in this vein, as we follow Solomon's journey through an array of increasingly evil slave-owners. There is a segregation of personality in the film, with most of the black characters being good and moral and the white ones evil. Surely it is as patronizing and insulting to assume personality is dependent on colour as it is politically correct. At least the same cannot be said of gender, the white women are as evil as their male counterparts. However no film about slavery is complete without our token good white guy, and Brad Pitts rises to the occasion, strolling in bearded and ready to play, once again, the hero.\n\nOne does wonder why Solomon doesn't send a letter under his 'mistress'name on one of his frequent forays to the shop. (Of course, his one attempt to run away is thwarted when after two steps he stumbles on a lynching scene). Perhaps the point the director is trying to make is that Solomon is too broken and scared to do this. He is too proud, however, to pick the cotton quota demanded by the sadistic slave-owner. A necessary contradiction perhaps, as this allows more whipping scenes as he is punished daily.\n\nOr why, instead of trying and failing to write a letter with a blunt bamboo stick and watery juice, he doesn't simply use the candle end and stain the paper instead. But it is not a film for the details. Nor the historical overview.\n\nIt is two hours of increasing brutality, culminating with a horrendous scene where one girl is whipped until her flesh is exposed. Instead of taking one of the many examples of modern day slavery however, which could leave people feeling guilty at inaction, it is set far enough in the past that it allows the audience to do their cinema time, and leave feeling as worthy and sanctimonious as the director.", u'-0.308913', u"Solomon Northup suffered many degradations after being unlawfully forced into slavery in the American Deep South during the 1840s and 50s. He contributed to a ghost written book detailing his tragic experiences. This movie is based on that book.\n\nThe film is relentless in its depiction of the despicable white men and women that Soloman (renamed Platt Hamilton by his new 'owners') encounters as a slave. There is absolutely no let up. This does a disservice to Mr Northup's account of his tale. By his own account, William Ford was a decent man, though a product of the time he lived in, and his background. He was not portrayed as such in the movie - I'm guessing because this did not fit the screenwriter/directors literal black and white vision of his tribulations. Thelma and Louise suffered from the same type of problem, in it's depiction of 'all men are bastards' proclamation.\n\nI got bored after a half hour or so. Which should not have happened. It's a terrible story, filled with deeply tragic events. But I found myself, moving from... Jeez, that's terrible. The poor man.....to Oh God love her. That's unforgivable.... to I am so glad I was not born black in America during slavery... to OK, I get it. There weren't many sympathetic white people... to Sheesh, was EVERY white person SO irredeemably vicious? to Alright, ALREADY...I get it..White people treated black people worse than animals!! to Oh FFS, how was this written? With crayons? I also found myself thinking of Alex Haley's Roots. This told a not dissimilar story of enforced slavery on black people in America. But there was dark and light in the story. You rooted for the characters. You understood that the black slaves were quite often better people, all round, than their white owners. But you weren't beaten over the head with that thought.\n\n12 Years's depiction of Salomon and his companions existence did not let up for one second. I don't mean to underplay the hardships that they endured, which were terrible. But the relentless depiction of all of the black people as nothing other than victims reduced them to caricature.\n\nJust like a good horror movie will have light moments, which both relieve the tension and then make the horror more shocking, it would, for me, have been better served to show moments of light relief which were then snatched away by, for example, the loathsome Edwin Epps. In this way, we can better identify with Salomon's plight. But the incessant misery becomes almost expected after numerous representations, to the point where it ceases to shock. And that's what's wrong with the movie, for me. Something has gone seriously wrong when the depiction of merciless hardships by fellow human beings becomes boring. And I was bored. Not helped by too many lingering closeups, some extending to thirty seconds. The director is obviously a fan of Kurosowa.\n\nThe actors were all excellent, especially the lead character. It looked beautiful. And I will read the book now, where before I hadn't heard of it. But the movie didn't work for me. A good story badly told.", u'-0.326331', u'A random and encounter has led Solomon Northup from living freely in New York to being kidnapped and sold into slavery in Louisiana, getting handed over to various slave owners. There, Solomon witnesses numerous acts of cruelty that no man should ever face.\n\nAs I stared at the movie screen with full dread, I was reeling back at certain scenes I had just witnessed. There were good films and television shows about slavery before, and they had various nuances at how to tackle slavery. This film is part of said resurgence of the sub- genre, hot on the heels of "Django Unchained" and "The Butler". But while the former relinquishes on Spaghetti Western entertainment more than attempting to address the issue in a political light as the latter, Steve McQueen\'s "12 Years a Slave" shuts those two up, and perhaps the entire sub-genre, for good. I doubt any future slavery-themed film will be as harrowing as this one was.\n\nSteve McQueen is a fearless filmmaker, continuing his streak of unfiltered brutality within human depths. He frames his actors\' faces in extreme close-up, the eyes staring into despair, the nostrils fuming in aggression. Naked flesh are shown not because of erotic content, but rather because of desperation and futility. Long takes and wide shots are not uncommon in his films, and here they showcase a plethora of fantastic scenes and performances that work to discomfort the viewer as much as possible. McQueen doesn\'t just allow the audience to tackle slavery, he guts the audience and leaves them for the consequences. This is an extremely uncomfortable film to watch. Beautifully shot locations are placeholders for unsettling sequences before and after, contemplated by Hans Zimmer\'s poignant and at times horrifying score. This all works to create a nightmarish time and place where hell walks on Earth.\n\nCentral to all of this is the performance of Chiwetel Ejiofor as Solomon. Ejiofor showcases that he is a natural force to be reckoned with in this film, after a decade of mostly supporting characters. He spaces out in despair as the camera lingers onto him for solid minutes, not a word spoken. Another sequence shows him mourning the death of a fellow worker, in which the singing of the surrounding group compels him and shakes him down to tears. These scenes follow earlier ones where he is a classy, free man in the upper states, mingling happily with the crowd and partaking in fanciful music sessions. It is a tour-de-force performance.\n\nA fine ensemble of established and up-and-coming actors surround Ejiofor in his limelight - Paul Dano, Paul Giammati, Alfre Woodard, Sarah Paulson, even Brad Pitt and Benedict Cumberbatch, but none so ferociously as McQueen regular Michael Fassbender as the despicable, sadistic plantation owner Edwin Epps. So excellent and terrifying is Fassbender\'s portrayal of such a merciless and barbaric person, that the mere sight of him will either cause audience members unfamiliar to him to flinch.\n\nI was left speechless as the credits rolled. A lesser film would have added tacked-on sentimentality/exaggeration and politically influenced claptrap. Not this one. This is a movie to watch as a reminder of how powerful the human spirit can endeavor, and how lucky all of us have grown past that dreadful time in history. The full effect of it has not been felt in movies before, until now.', u'0.15741', u"I just saw this at LFF. It is a brilliant piece of cinema. Clearly it's central theme is slavery, and the depravity human nature can so easily reach; but it has many other small moments that trigger thoughts about wider issues - the role of religion being one for example. It is violent, and in some respects awful to watch, but this is the story of Solomon Northup told truthfully. There is nothing saccharine about the way Steve McQueen presents this and that is what makes it so astonishing. You cry because what you witness is truly terrible, not because the violins are out and the director's tugging on your heart strings. All the acting is first rate, as is the score by Hans Zimmer. This really should be essential viewing for everyone old enough to understand it.", u'0.534178', u"I can go on and on about how disappointing this movie really is, I am very upset I spent a full 2 hours and 14 minutes watching this overdrawn slavery documentary. I will start by saying I only gave this movie an overall rating of a 2 because of the acting, it would be a 1 without it, and would be a 3 if Brad Pitt didn't ruin it with his Inglorious Bastards accent(he honestly cant change it? and has to be the hero in a movie he produced, ridiculous).\n\nSo this movie is clearly just another slavery movie showing how bad slaves were mistreated, as if everyone doesn't already know. Yes you feel bad for Solomon throughout the movie but who cares, he had his freedom and then got it back!!! what about all the other slaves who suffered an entire lifetime, from birth until death, no, instead lets focus on one man because he wrote a book about his struggles. The director, Steve McQueen is in fact a Drama Queen. Seriously did we need that sad music as if we were watching the Titanic sink again. More than half of the movie are scenes of someones face(usually Solomons)With his glossy eyes and depressing music playing.\n\nI do not recommend this movie to anyone who has already learned or heard about slavery, yes it was wrong, yes it was brutal. But most everyone already knows that. It seems almost as if this movie was created to rile people up and again create hate, especially in the minds of younger viewers.", u'-0.458427', u'12 Years a Slave \x97 a biopic about a black fiddler in NY who somehow wound up a slave in Louisiana from 1841 until the law rescued him in 1853\x97is the nearly universally acclaimed front runner for the Best Picture Oscar. Yet it\'s built upon a fourth-rate screenplay that might have embarrassed Horatio Alger.\n\n12 Years a Slave is hailed by critics as a long-awaited breakthrough that finally dares to mention the subject of slavery after decades of the entertainment industry being controlled by the South.\n\nThe message behind the ongoing enshrinement of the rather amateurish 12 Years a Slave is that the cultural whippings of white folk for the sins of their long dead ancestors will stubbornly continue on until morale improves. The formula: Stoke it, package it, market it.\n\nSteve McQueen directs the film in a sort of minor league Passion of the Christ manner. Some of the appeal to critics is that Northern whites are shown as saints of racial sensitivity in the film\'s preposterous first 20 minutes.\n\n12 Years a Slave opens in 1841 with Northup being effusively admired by his white neighbors in Saratoga, NY. Northup is a model of ridiculous bourgeois respectability, always doffing his top hat to his white peers while out riding with his family in an elegant carriage.\n\nHow could he afford that? Well, actually, he didn\'t and couldn\'t. A glance at Northup\'s ghostwritten 1853 memoir makes clear that in 1841, rather than being a pillar of this Yankee community, he was an unemployed fiddler dragged down by his own "shiftlessness."\n\nIn McQueen\'s often baffling movie, this respectable family man suddenly decides to run off to join the circus with two fast-talking white men without even leaving a note for his wife. Later, while dining in an elegant Washington, DC restaurant with his new friends, he suddenly takes ill and wakes up in chains.\n\nIronically, his poor family never reported or even guessed that he\'d been kidnapped. They apparently assumed that vanishing was just the kind of thing he\'d do.\n\nWhen word of his kidnapping finally arrived home in 1853, top officials in both NY and Louisiana were dismayed by the trick played upon this freeborn citizen and worked together to quickly have him released.\n\nInterestingly, it was widely believed that Northup had conspired with his white cronies to defraud slave owners of their purchase price by attempting to pull a con on them. Reminiscent of the 1971 comedy Skin Game, starring James Garner and Louis Gossett, Jr. as traveling grifters in 1858 where Garner repeatedly sells Gossett into slavery and then helps him escape.\n\nNorthup\'s hometown newspaper, the Saratoga Press, surmised that Northup had been an accomplice in a scam gone awry:\n\n"\x85it is more than suspected that Northup was an accomplice in the sale, calculating to slip away and share the spoils, but that the purchaser was too sharp for him, and instead of getting the cash, he got something else."\n\nThis theory that Northup was a man of dubious character rather than the tediously upright one depicted in the movie might explain another puzzling aspect of his tale: how little help he got from his fellow slaves. In general, the other slaves as display remarkably little human warmth toward Northup. They mostly act completely indifferent whenever he is around.\n\nWhen Northup finally arrived home, an abolitionist politician hired David Wilson to be his ghostwriter. Wilson wrote Northup\'s story in his own style, and they hit it big in the slave-narrative craze that followed the 1852 publication of Uncle Tom\'s Cabin. Not many were sold, but more than enough to launch Northup on the abolitionist lecture circuit.\n\nPredictably, Northup disappeared from history four years later. Those who knew him best seem to have assumed that he had become a "worthless vagabond," as his wife\'s obituary bluntly phrased it. Almost all of this is left out of the movie as being far too interesting for Oscar Bait.\n\nI suppose Third-rate Victorian literature such as Wilson\'s version of Northup\'s memoir is tolerable today if the author understands his limitations. Most of the first-person narration is thankfully utilitarian. Only occasionally does Wilson have Northup reminisce in the grand Victorian manner: "Now had I approached within the shadow of the cloud, into the thick darkness whereof I was soon to disappear, thenceforward to be hidden from the eyes of all my kindred, and shut out from the sweet light of liberty, for many a weary year."\n\nIndeed, on the rare occasions when Wilson quotes Northup\'s utterances, the slave speaks in a more plausible fashion, such as, "There is nobody I want to write to, \'cause I ain\'t got no friends living as I know of."\n\nUnfortunately, Ridley\'s adaptation takes its inspiration for its made-up dialog from the worst prose in the book. Since it would be racist for Ridley to show slaves ending their sentences with prepositions, they instead orate pompous speeches toward each other, like Prime Minister Gladstone addressing Queen Victoria. As the hero, Ejiofor labors to bring life to these lines, with indifferent, if not comical success.\n\nHollywood has been waving its celluloid wand over history since its inception. Unfortunately, studio contrived "reality" usually wins the emotional battle over the truth --even for those with more than a tenuous understanding of the world around them. It\'s all part of the ongoing, and successful campaign keep all critical theory groups in their respective consensus trances; instilling grievance focused identities in blacks, and derivative guilt syndrome in whites. I suppose once all the altruistic white people who fall for sympathetic pleas of universal equality have been eliminated via natural selection, blacks will spontaneously adopt their innate, but perpetually oppressed Western sensibilities and go on to build flourishing, first world Utopias? \n\nComing soon to a theater near you!', u'-0.193173', u"Let me start off by saying that I like a good movie based on a true story like Schindler's List, The Butler, A Beautiful Mind, We Bought A Zoo, etc., etc. I'm also fully aware that not all events will be entirely factual so when I went into this movie I wasn't going in expecting accuracy in any form. What I did go in expecting was a good performance by great actors and I must say the acting was fantastic, but unfortunately the rest of the film was a complete train wreck. I felt it had potential at first and then that feeling quickly dissipated after watching the first beating commence and continued to diminish after seeing the attempted hanging where he walked around on his toes for at least a good twenty to thirty seconds and we had to sit and watch. I didn't think it was possible for the movie to get more boring but then they threw in yet another thirty second scene where we all proceeded to stare at the main character's face while he sat idle, occasionally moving his head from side to side. I wanted to feel emotion for these poor characters but every emotion that I had was quickly ruined by incredibly long, drawn out, and unnecessary scenes. Not only did I have to sit through the agonizing, stretched out scenes but whenever there was about to be a significant lapse of time within the main character's life they'd add in a bonus five to seven seconds where we stared at a bunch of trees. I'd like to say that I was moved by the movie or felt some sort of enjoyment in watching it but in truth the only touching moment I truly had was at the end of the film when I realized it was FINALLY over. I'd liken it's boringness to The Fifth Estate but honestly it was far worse. My advice to you would be to ignore the plethora of ten star reviews and think twice before you decide to pick it up for movie rental once it finally comes out on DVD.", u'-0.450117', u'I was hoping to really enjoy "12 Years a Slave" but wasn\'t expecting a 2 hr long movie of very long, ponderous slow camera shots of nature and hardly any compelling dialog or character development. This was then broken up seemingly every 10 minutes by a savage flogging or a vicious rape or some other sadistic cruelty being inflicted on the movie\'s hero, the hapless Solomon a freeman sold into slavery, and the other slaves. Except for Brad Pitt\'s Canadian abolitionist and a gentleman from Solomon\'s home town, virtually every white character in this movie is portrayed as the very embodiment of evil. No nuance, nothing but unremitting sadism.\n\nA lot of people seem to be comparing this movie to "Schindler\'s List" although I can\'t understand why. In "List" you had the compelling story of Schindler who, for reasons known only to himself, risks his life to save as many Jews as he can. The Jewish prisoners are depicted as full characters, people you know and care about. Even the Nazi played by Ralph Finnes is given some depth, a man whose cruelty has been unleashed and sanctioned by his Nazi bosses but, you suspect but for the war would be a man who might be interesting to be around---a lover of fine food, good wine and a roving eye for the women. But the slave masters in "12 Years a Slave" don\'t have the slightest hint of anything human about them, just treating people with cruelty for cruelty\'s sake.\n\nIf filmmakers really wanted to make a powerful movie about slavery, they might consider boldly making a new version of "Uncle Tom\'s Cabin" and hew closely to the story that Harriet Beecher Stowe wrote. It\'s a powerful book and it gets far deeper into the immorality of slavery than anything like "12 Years a Slave" does. The memoirs that "12" was based on came out soon after the huge success of "Uncle Tom\'s Cabin". The opening scene of the slave-traders benignly discussing their "wares" in "Uncle Tom\'s Cabin" was so chilling to read that I couldn\'t even bear to read it through in one sitting. "12" had a similar scene with the excellent Paul Giamatti as a slave-trader, but the movie never got any deeper.', u'-0.216628', u"Considering the social and economic importance of slavery in America's history, the scarcity of serious films depicting the daily life of slaves in the Confederate States is significant - especially since the after-effects from this shameful episode still echo through the culture. '12 Years a Slave' is based upon the memoirs of Solomon Northup, who endured a hellish period of enslavement in Louisiana, which is backed up by legal records.\n\nThe story begins with him living with wife and children in upstate New York as a free man and respected member of his community. After being lured to Washington by a couple of con-artists who promised him work, he was subsequently drugged, locked in chains, viciously beaten, stripped of his identity and shipped to New Orleans to be sold into slavery. Over the next twelve years, he was owned by two men who treated him in contrasting ways. The first was a relatively civilized fellow, but the plantation's half-witted manager was threatened by Northup's superior intelligence. Their mutual dislike produced a dangerously volatile situation, and unwilling to lose his investment, Northup's owner re-sold him to a neighbor. This unbalanced individual regarded his slaves as property to be used for pleasure and profit, which caused them to live in perpetual fear that his capricious moods would flare into sadistic lust or rage at any moment.\n\nIt's noteworthy that a British director has become one of the few filmmakers to delve deeply into this subject, and the combination of John Ridley's powerful script and McQueen's directorial skills has inspired exceptional performances from the entire cast. Their dramatization of Northup's experiences is both riveting and uncomfortable to watch, as the film depicts the perverse nature of a society that permitted such a barbaric system. Hopefully it will reach a large US audience, who will learn how a privileged Southern elite cruelly exploited their fellow humans in order to acquire greater wealth for themselves.", u'0.0132407', u"Where to begin? OK, by stating the simple facts. \n\nThe history here is distorted beyond all measure. 21st century sensibilities, seen through the lens of sterilized political correctness, make this film practically unwatchable from beginning to the (oh will it ever come?) end. Every white character is a one dimensional pastiche of evil while, conversely, it's only black people who possess anything approaching morality and basic human decency. It wears out and wears thin very rapidly indeed.\n\nSteve McQueen - a director whose previous work I admired - got this film all wrong. He needed to do many things to put this film on the right track from the get go. But, most of all, he needed to work with a script which had its roots in reality, not in this distorted, oddly perverse and, frankly, unworthy representation of antebellum America. It's a shame and a sham yet it could have been a great story. Truly awful, but I gave it 2 stars - the extra one because, thank heavens, Oprah is not in it.", u'-0.475629'], u'tt0075686': [u"\nThe film that bested Star Wars for the 1977 Best Picture Oscar, Annie Hall is a remarkable achievement in filmmaking that transcends its simple, romantic premise to create a stunning portrait of not only 70's pop culture, but of human nature cumulative.  Directed and co-written by Woody Allen, who has since directed other gems such as Hannah and Her Sisters and The Purple Rose of Cairo, Annie Hall also stars Allen as Alvy Singer, a neurotic, death-obsessed comedian who seems unlucky in love and life.  That is until he meets Annie, brilliantly played by Diane Keaton, who is beautiful, fashion-savvy, carefree (she likes using expressions like `la di da'), and a\nterrible driver.\n\nAnnie and Alvy's relationship is an unlikely one.  She's a Midwestern girl, straight out of white-bread Wisconsin; he's a life-long New York Jew who grew up (literally) under the Coney Island roller coaster.  He's been seeing a therapist for the past 16 years; she only `needs' one once she meets him. She's an extroverted aspiring singer; he's an introverted, world-despising imp.  Yet Allen and Keaton are so perfect in their roles, they improbably make this couple one of the most memorable ever.\n\nThe plot revolves around Alvy's chronicles of loves lost and a retrospective on his relationship with Annie, with whom he has since parted ways.  At the end of the film, we see Alvy try his hand at stage-writing-he writes a play about his relationship with Annie, but gives it a happy ending.  Yes, Annie and Alvy don't have a fairy tale ending to their relationship, but Alvy certainly wishes they had, even though he learns to live with the acknowledgment it has failed.\n\nThe best part of Annie Hall is its incredible screenplay-the best ever to be written.  Not a word is wasted nor a line unquotable.  Except here, while Allen's early films had thrived on streams of one-liners, Allen doesn't go for cheap laughs-each line is simultaneously hilarious and poignant. Everything is part of a greater whole.  We laugh because it's funny, but there's a greater dynamic at work in Annie Hall.  This is a story not exclusively about a relationship between two people, but also a musing on 70's politics, drugs, East Coast/West Coast rivalry, narcissism, religion, celebrity, and several other topics with which Allen deals with extraordinary ease.\n\nYet Annie Hall would not be among my favorite films of all-time if it were just Woody Allen ranting and raving about what he likes and dislikes. There are other Allen films that serve that purpose, i.e. Deconstructing Harry, and they're not nearly as good.  What separates Annie Hall is its grace, the believable chemistry between Keaton and Allen, the unique direction (ranging from split-screens to cartoon imagery to on-screen subtitles of what the actors are thinking), but mostly because it's the rare film to find a perfect balance between sheer entertainment, humor, and poignancy.\n\n\nWhen the dust had settled, Diane Keaton deservedly won an Academy Award for her performance, Allen took home Oscars for direction and writing, and the film beat out Star Wars for Best Picture, which most people consider a complete sham.  Evidently, those people didn't see Annie Hall, for if they had, they'd recognize that the acting, writing, and even the direction in Star Wars can't hold a candle to Annie Hall, one of the best films ever made.\n\n10/10\n", u'0.332825', u"\n`Annie Hall', long thought to be Woody Allen's opus, is perhaps a perfect romantic comedy because it not only shows the happy, touching moments of relationships, but also displays the reality of coupling \x96 the occasional waning of interest in one another, the hypercritical moments, etc.  It is absolutely brilliantly written; Woody Allen exhibits his usual dry humor and self-deprecation, but also his sensitive, passionate and romantic side.  It was because of this film that I fell in love with Woody Allen at the age of twelve (take your cheap shot here) and almost twenty years later he still is that intellectual, bookish and humorous ideal.  Diane Keaton was his muse and co-star for this film, and they are perfect counterparts \x96 so much so that their interaction onscreen doesn't seem like viewing two actors in a film, but is a much more voyeuristic experience.  Watching `Annie Hall' is like sitting at a bistro table and observing another couple a few tables away, and that is just one of the elements that make this film so endearing.  Most people can relate to at least some aspects of Alvy and Annie's relationship, which helps make this film a timeless one. \n\n\nHowever, `Annie Hall' is not just a good romantic comedy; it is a film that engages some unusual storytelling techniques.  Actors speak directly to the audience, characters interact with strangers on the street who just happen to know the answers to the personal questions posed, there is a brief animation scene, etc.  While none of these approaches were new in 1977, their execution was inspired.  `Annie Hall' is like a fond memory, or a favorite old song \x96 anytime I have discussed this film with others their smiling expressions are usually tinged with a hint of nostalgia, because one can look back on either their past or current relationship and do what precious few films allow us to do \x96 relate on a personal level.\n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.586421', u"\nWoody Allen never created a more enjoyable film.  Annie Hall is as innovative and clever as any movie has ever been.  What makes Annie Hall such a great film is Allen's carefree screenplay and direction, in which he breaks all of the rules, giving the viewer the sense that anything can happen.  Allen makes us characters into his story by talking to the camera, telling us jokes, and sharing his opinions with us.\n\nMany of Allen's once original tactics have become commonly used techniques. Woody Allen includes flashbacks, vignettes, voice-over commentary, animation, fantasy, putting himself and others into flashbacks, and subtitles, telling what the characters are thinking.  Much of Allen's other works has never been so full of priceless innovations and jokes.\n\nThe characters themselves are so well defined that they feel real to the viewer.  By the time the film ends, we can see exactly why Alvy Singer and Annie Hall broke up in the first place.  That's great filmmaking.\n\n", u'0.657716', u'\nWoody Allen\'s masterpiece will always be "Annie Hall."  What is most remarkable today about this film is the way Allen presents it.  It\'s a movie about a relationship.  But rather than taking a linear approach, Allen plays with time.  We see the middle, the begining, and the end. And not always in that order.  Allen also breaks the fourth wall a lot and has many dream sequences and asides which add to the complexity of the characters.  This is a highly autobiographical film and Allen pulls no punches.  This movie is not about romance in the way that "Breakfast at Tiffany\'s" is.  Rather, "Annie Hall" is a deconstruction of a romance.  At times it is funny and heartbreaking and always classic.  "Love fades," indeed.', u'0.558716', u"At the time, no one had done this: tell a story in the manner that Woody Allen did. Even though many films up until then were talky, with minimal action, with the exception of CITIZEN KANE, nothing of the sort prepared the audience at the time for what they were witnessing: scenes that introduced dialog between two actors much before they actually showed on screen. Scenes in which actors interacted with the past as if it were the present. Scenes in which actors who aren't in the same frame even when they are on screen talk to each other. Scenes in which what the characters are saying does not match their thought bubbles and we are privy to their thoughts. The discussion of an intellectual's work which suddenly produces the said individual, among many more.\n\nANNIE HALL is a unique film that still looks fresh, even when the style in itself is very 70s. This is a story of a breakup told in a non-linear pattern, showing how these two disparate yet similar people -- Alvy Singer and Annie Hall -- came together, shared their neuroses, went through hilarious times and then went into the slow plateau that became their eventual separation. This is not the kind of story that Hollywood likes to tell and it's quite admirable that Allen was able to not only get away with it but to walk away with the major awards (as well as give then girlfriend Diane Keaton her own Best Actress award) because this being such an intellectual film and not one where the actors all look glamorous, it broke new grounds for a novel way of presenting a film.\n\nGroundbreaking is the definite term here. Had there been no ANNIE HALL, there would have never been ALLY MACBEAL or SEX AND THE CITY, two successful sitcoms that features inner dialog, people talking directly to the camera (and therefore winking at the audience), fantasy sequences, and modern views of how people react to each other. Balancing slapstick with drama, it is also one of the saddest comedies to ever been made and anyone who has seen the final sequence -- which plays out what the film has mentioned all along, that this is their breakup -- knows the heartbreak that unfolds over Diane Keaton's haunting vocals. One of the ten most influential movies of all time.", u'0.171233', u'Woody Allen\'s seminal 1977 romantic comedy "Annie Hall" is not only laugh-out-loud funny (with some of the most quotable dialogue ever written for the screen...this is the "Casablanca" of comedies, folks) but also sweet and charming (due in large part because of Diane Keaton\'s smashing performance as the title character, the flighty singer from Wisconsin with a quirky fashion sense and "neat" outlook on life) without ever turning trite or sappy like so many romantic comedies tend to do. Allen wisely deconstructed the genre with his non-linear story-line (something that was later done to even greater effect with a more recent and profound look at relationships, "Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind") and charming little theatrical tricks like talking to the audience or pulling extras into the scene for their opinions on what\'s been going on. It keeps the viewer off guard and allows for a free flow of comedic and philosophical ideas that might otherwise not have found their way into a more traditional film.\n\nIn his latter years, Allen\'s best work has been when he is not part of the cast (my personal favorites being "Bulletts over Broadway," "Sweet and Lowdown," and the recent "Match Point"). "Annie Hall" was made in his heyday when he could still pull off playing a neurotic New York Jewish comedienne with charm and panache. There\'s something innocent and benign about his obsessions here, as this was long before the Woody/Soon-Yi fiasco and the days of grossly miscasting himself against younger female co-stars. Yes, Mr. Allen has been artsier (witness "Manhattan") and more satirical (witness "Zelig") but here, with Diane Keaton as his muse, he was never more charming or funnier.', u'0.405922', u'Sometimes I wish Woody Allen was cool and self confident, and not always nervous, unsure and geeky all the time. But you can\'t deny that he\'s a very intelligent person. His best film, the quiet and understated masterpiece "Annie Hall", is so full of jokes and inventive style it can make your head spin. Actually, this is one film I wish I had a script of so I could slowly read all those dialogs which are being said too fast. In 1978 "Annie Hall" beat "Star Wars" and won 4 Oscars ( Best picture, director, screenplay, actress Diane Keaton ) and one Golden Globe ( Best actress Diane Keaton ).\n\n-------- \n\nThe simple comedy about a romance between the New York comedian Alvy and Annie is enriched by tons of emotions and inventive film techniques which even Jean-Luc Godard would be jealous of. In one scene Alvy is talking to Annie about art while the subtitles are presenting his *real* words, about how he wants to take her out! In the other they are having intercourse in bed while Annie\'s ghost/mind is absent and sitting on a chair! Alvy is walking down the street and saying how he watched the animated movie "Snow White and the seven dwarfs" and fell in love with the witch and presto, in the next scene he is drawn in animation in the middle of that film, having an argument with his lover, the witch. The list goes on and on.\n\nI remember that I couldn\'t watch this film when I was a kid. I found it to be too boring. But today I completely understand it. You just have to think about it. Like when Alvy is so happy he says to Annie that he doesn\'t just love her, but that he "luurves her, loaves her and luuf\'s her." Also, some of the gags are simply quietly hilarious, like when the hero is narrating his society as a child, commenting on everything ( "Those who don\'t know nothing, teach. Those who don\'t know how to teach, teach gym. And those don\'t know even that, teach at our school." ).\n\nGrade: 10/10', u'0.170261', u"\nAnnie Hall is a movie about life.  In recent films, there are fairly predictable endings.  (i.e. guy gets girl after chase scene in Manhattan).  Annie Hall goes against the grain of movies.  There is definite chemistry between Allen and Keaton.  That is one of the main reasons this movie is successful.  Alvy and Annie do not have high wage jobs, they do not go clubbing, nor are they incredibly attractive.  Why does a movie character relationship have to be so extreme it's unconvincing?  These days movie producers create plots that are unbelievable.  They don't have any depth and usually have shallow intentions.  You can sense that the two leads care for each other.  The situations in this movie resemble real life and that is why it is so critically acclaimed and remembered. Sure Woody talked into the camera, but that, in a sense is real life as well.  It reminds me of my usual thought process and how when I think; I feel as though I'm presenting my thoughts to myself.  Only he is, presenting it to us.   This movie is clever and thought provoking.  If you're looking for the opposite of a yearly run of the mill movie, this is for you.  ", u'0.183', u"Woody is an intelligent man who worries about the issues of film-making. The primary concern, the very first problem, is always to decide what the relationships are among the audience, the camera, the narrator if any, and the characters.\n\nWoody was on his way to making a murder mystery, which is the purest form of messing about with these relationships. In a much studied decision, they decided to cut out all the mystery and just focus on the context. In this case, that context is a richly layered evocation of a relationship. I really wish I could see the original film to discover the mysteries Woody intended to hide in the folds.\n\nAnd the folds are as numerous and complex as they can get. We have a framing device where Woody speaks to us partly as a conversation which blends into a standup, which is mirrored as a part of the story. We have timeshifting where we move back and forth in time in a simple 'Tarantino' way; but we go way past: characters from the 'present' enter the past as Dickensian ghosts, then they talk to characters in the past. we have characters in different pasts talking to each other via split screen. We have a layering of Woody and Diane's relationship in real life, then the film, then TWO films within: a play which is part of the action and a cartoon which is the action itself.\n\nMore: we have Woody talking to the audience as if we were shifted into the play -- early in that play we are introduced to Bergman and Fellini: in both cases while they are waiting outside. These are the two inventors of folded narrative. Even more: while some bozo perfessor spouts off about Fellini and McLuhan, Woody enlists the audience to challenge him and drags out McLuhan himself! The joke of course is that McLuhan himself was a vapid weaver of lowbrow theories.\n\nAnd more and more with the constant weaving of 'analysis' and other film-like activities: singers, photographers, TeeVee stars, models...\n\nThis period was when he was first exposed to Wallace Shawn who was hanging out with Terrence Malick, two other innovators in narrative folding. All the 'New Yorker' stuff means more when you know Shawn's father was the long-time editor of that publication and defined the self-absorbed reflection that characterizes the city and this film.\n\nKeaton's manner was essential to pulling this off, someone who could pull off the story about her uncle dying while waiting for a Turkey. Watch her.. she is clued in to simultaneously being in herself (Keaton), herself (Hall), inside the story she is telling and inside the story Woody is telling. She shifts and guffaws just as if she were stoned and moving among realities, just as her character.\n\nJust amazing and intelligent. Will we ever see this the way it was written and shot? Or is that mystery too intelligent for us, who prefer to think of this as a funny, endearing love story.", u'0.240266', u'Alvy Singer (Woody Allen) is something of a hopeless romantic. A cynical, death-obsessed New York Jewish comedian, Singer has never been able to maintain a steady relationship with a woman. He has been married twice, and divorced twice. He broke up with one woman because of their disagreements over the "second shooter" conspiracy of John F. Kennedy\'s assassination, or perhaps that was just his excuse. To paraphrase Freud, possibly Groucho Marx, he simply "would never want to belong to any club that would accept someone like him for a member." He doesn\'t drive because he is paranoid about driving; he has been seeing a psychiatrist for the past fifteen years, though these appointments were long ago reduced to simple "whining" sessions. There is an inherent uncertainty in everything that Singer says \x96 as though he really knows what he\'s talking about, but he can\'t convince himself that he\'s got it right.\n\nWhen he accompanies a friend (Tony Roberts) to a tennis game, Singer\'s first and foremost concern is that the club will deny him entry because he\'s a Jew. However, that fateful game serves forth something so much more significant and life-changing \x96 he comes to meet the ditsy and exuberant Annie Hall (Diane Keaton). Despite clearly having very little in common, something clicks between the two eligibles, and they embark on a tumultuous years-long relationship that will inevitably fail to materialise into anything further. Erupting with clever dialogue and witty cultural references, \'Annie Hall\'s\' script is one of the best you\'ll ever see. Not only is the conversation entertaining to listen to, but \x96 even with all the talking to the camera and interacting with random extras \x96 it actually manages to seem startlingly realistic. This is no small thanks, of course, to the main actors, who embody their characters so perfectly that we\'re unsure if they are acting or merely playing themselves.\n\nThough he had previously released a few well-received, light-hearted affairs, it was \'Annie Hall\' that blasted writer/actor/director Woody Allen into the realms of super-stardom. In an uncharacteristic move for the Academy, Allen\'s film won four 1978 Oscars, including Best Actress (Keaton), Best Original Screenplay (Allen, Marshall Brickman), Best Director (Allen) and Best Picture \x96 not undeservedly, though millions of \'Star Wars\' fans would, I\'m sure, disagree. Having revisited \'Annie Hall\' for the first time in a year, having since enjoyed many of Allen\'s other films, I am genuinely amazed at his transition from silly comedian to insightful observer on human relationships. Of course, a noticeable evolution in his film-making style is evident in both the science-fiction \'Sleeper (1973)\' and the Russian historical spoof \'Love and Death (1975),\' but neither boasts the the intelligence nor the sophistication of this film, which wholly discards the Chaplin-like slapstick of Allen\'s previous films and adopts the Tracy-Hepburn screwball comedy of a decade later.\n\nOriginally slated \x96 and filmed, in fact \x96 as a New York murder mystery with a romantic sub-plot, \'Annie Hall\' was taken by editor Ralph Rosenbaum and cut down (massacred, if you will) into the modern, witty 1970s screwball comedy that we still enjoy today. It is truly amazing that such an extensive post-production reshaping had no obvious ill effects upon the general flow of the film, though the structure in itself is so hectic that we probably wouldn\'t notice it, anyway: Allen frequently cuts forwards and backwards in time, his modern characters are able to revisit and discuss the past, characters in split screens interact, Allen regularly breaks the "fourth wall" and addresses the audience directly. Some of the discarded murder mystery elements from \'Annie Hall\' were later incorporated into another Allen film, \'Manhattan Murder Mystery (1993),\' which also co-starred Keaton.\n\nAside from Allen and Keaton, numerous smaller roles provide a crucial framework for the overall structure of the film. Tony Roberts is Rob, Singer\'s old friend and confidant. Paul Simon (of Simon and Garfunkel) plays a record producer who takes a keen interest in both Annie and her singing. Shelley Duvall is a reporter for \'The Rolling Stone\' magazine, and a one-time girlfriend of Singer. There are also tiny early roles for Christopher Walken (as Annie\'s somewhat disturbed brother), Jeff Goldblum (who speaks one memorable line at a party \x96 "Hello? I forgot my mantra") and Sigourney Weaver (who can be briefly glimpsed as Singer\'s date outside a theatre). Two slightly more unusual cameos come from Truman Capote (as a Truman Capote-lookalike, no less) and scholar Marshall McLuhan (whom Singer suddenly procures from behind a movie poster to declare to a talkative film-goer that "you know nothing of my work!").\n\nEasily the most innovative and energetic of the films I\'ve so far seen from Woody Allen, \'Annie Hall\' is a spirited glimpse at the incompatibility of human beings, and a cynical yet bittersweet meditation on the falsity of the perfect romantic Hollywood ending. It is also a considerable comedic achievement, and Allen would repeatedly recycle his trademark neurotic New Yorker screen persona, most notably in \'Manhattan (1979),\' but never with more success than this premium outing in excellence. The engagingly-convoluted storyline moves with such briskness that you don\'t realise just how very little happens, and that, by the film\'s end, our characters are exactly where they were at the beginning. Nevertheless, Allen manages to say something significant about human relationships \x96 they\'re totally irrational, crazy and absurd, but we keep attempting them because of what they give us in return. Or, at least, what we think they give us.', u'0.105306', u'\n"Annie Hall" is a brilliant romantic comedy that could have only been made by Woody Allen (Oscar-winning in directing and writing, nominated in acting). Allen stars as a Jewish stand-up comic who falls in love with aspiring actress Diane Keaton (in a well-deserved Oscar-winning turn as the titled character). Their relationship is explored throughout the course of the film in a gentle and warm-hearted way. Allen\'s unique views and brand of humor are prevalent from start to finish and the film is clearly made in the 1970s as many issues from that time period are explored as the film progresses. "Annie Hall" is simple in many ways, but deals with romantic issues in complex ways and the film is just so intelligent that it is near impossible to dislike. Woody Allen is brilliant as he usually is. Diane Keaton hit super-stardom as well with her role. The supporting cast includes the likes of Carol Kane, Shelley Duvall, Tony Roberts, Christopher Walken and Colleen Dewhurst. Look for an unknown Jeff Goldblum as an extra during the Los Angeles sequence. 5 stars out of 5.', u'0.606', u'I had forgotten about how hilarious this film was, even though I had seen it as a teenager many times. Since Marshall Brickman wrote the script, it is brilliant; like the part where Diane Keaton orders a pastrami on white bread with mayonnaise, in a NY deli.\n\nWoody Allen\'s expressions and character studies are priceless, and at this point he was at the top of his game. Some of his films now are redundant "The Curse of the Jade Scorpion" seemed too contrived. But this film was a realistic comedy between him and Keaton, their analysis (no New Yorker in the 70\'s should be without an analyst!), and their eventual break-up when she relocates to L.A.\n\nPaul Simon and Jeff Goldblum portray other L.A. characters, and there is a bit part with Christopher Walken as Keaton\'s suicidal brother (excellent). Rent this film again if you haven\'t seen it in awhile; some scenes are classic, and one of the best is Christmas in L.A. as Tony Roberts drives Allen through Beverly Hills: Keaton: "Wow. It\'s so clean out here" Allen: "Yeah that\'s because they never throw out their garbage they just put it on TV".\n\nGreat...Woody Allen we need your humor again, please write something decent for American audiences with a brain.', u'0.212483', u'Annie Hall shows us the love story between Alvy Singer (Woody Allen) and Annie Hall (Diane Keaton). We watch Alvy as he matures and moves through several relationships set against the true love of his life: Annie Hall.\n\nAlvy helps Annie grow and come out of her shell as evinced by the growth of Annies blossoming singing career. Even the songs are a metaphor for their relationship. Her first song "It had to be you" when their relationship starts. Later she sings in a mature, sultry voice "Seems like old times." Set against snapshots of their romance.\n\nKeep your eye out for these young actors: Christopher Walken pre-Deer Hunter, as Annie\'s psycho brother "I dream of turning the wheel into the on coming lights." Alvy interrupts him "I have to get back to the planet earth." Jeff Goldblum pre-Big Chill, Jurassic Park, The Fly, In Tony Lacey\'s house calling his guru: "I forgot my mantra." Paul Simon as Tony Lacey a Californian music star. Carol Kane as Alvy\'s first wife whose relationship is influenced by Alvy\'s obsession with JFK\'s assassination conspiracy theories. Colleen Dewhurst, Annie\'s WASP mother, talking through the split screen to Alvy\'s mother. See if you can spot Sigourney Weaver as Alvy\'s date standing in front of the movie theater when Alvy meets Annie in NY at the end of the movie. Watch Gary Mule Deer in full afro when Alvy meets Annie in California. Now Gary tours with Johnny Mathis. Shelly Duvall as the transcendent Rolling Stone reporter. In a few years she will become Olive Oyl then Wendy of the famous "Here\'s Johnny" scene from the shining. My, how this movie hasn\'t aged at all. And that really is Truman Capote walking through the park when Alvy says, "And this guy gets the Truman Capote look-alike award." \n\nYou have got to like Tony Robbins, a square jawed ladies man in many of Woody Allen\'s movies (Radio Days, A midsummer nights sex comedy, Play it again Sam). You don\'t mind seeing Robbins type cast because you instantly know that he is going to be the perfect opposite of Allen\'s angst filled Alvy.\n\nAnother Woody Allen directing feature that I happen to like is his use of the split screen and the fixed screen. In both, the camera doesn\'t move thereby forcing you to get involved in the dialogue. These techniques work because Woody Allen has strong, tight dialogue and truly dramatic actors.\n\nMany of the scenes from the late 70\'s and early 80\'s are wonderful to watch because they reflect the matter of fact mores and fads of the time: Snorting cocaine was cool, the veggie-burger-tofu California scene, the liberal Columbia college satire.\n\nListen carefully to the background chatter during the California scene at Tony Lacey\'s house with swinging\' hip background music. Hysterical lines that you can use in your office today: "Right now it is only a notion, but I think I can get the money to make it into a concept then later turn it into an idea." Woody Allen has satirized and captured the language and mind set of the entire movie/music industries. \n\nA memorable scene is when Alvy pulls Marshall McLuhan out from behind a movie placard to refute some bombastic guy pontificating about McLuhan\'s poetry. You wish you could do the same.\n\nTruly a great movie that ages well and has a sweet message about romance.', u'0.182151', u"The movie is set in New York, as many of Woody Allen's movies. Alvy Singer is a comedian trying to maintain his relationship with his girlfriend Annie, who is a singer. The movie shows Annie's and Alvy's relationship over the years, and their ups and downs, as well as their similarities and differences.\n\n'Annie Hall' is considered a great movie and it won numerous awards. Being referred as one of Woody Allen's best movies, I personally don't agree with it, preferring many other movies made by this great director. The movie was not even close of what I expected it to be, and I am a fan of all types of movies and genres, from all different times and years. My question is: why this movie is a classic? I don't hate it, but I don't understand why it is considered to be SO good. The only thing really positive I have to say about this movie, is that it doesn't end in a ''cute'' and predictable way, since both Annie and Alvy stay apart.", u'0.5669', u"I trust that modern viewers will see this film for what it is; an exercise in narcissistic self obsession that gives the viewer nothing to appreciate but a glimpse into the world of a 70's icon grossly obsessed with his own self-image and self imposed sense of grandeur.\n\nIf you enjoy modern day indie circle jerking then you may appreciate this mind numbing marathon of boredom.\n\nThe screenplay consists of an endless loop of Allen's 'intellectual' bickering about modern living that has absolutely no pacing or narrative development, never mind its wafer thin intellectual depth and pseudo-psychology. Poor acting by both of the only two characters in this film make for a study of how to fail in engaging the audience.\n\nWatch this film to learn why the Oscars have no credibility.", u'-0.740776'], u'tt1895587': [u'Spotlight is a 2015 American biographical drama film directed by Tom McCarthy and written by McCarthy and Josh Singer. The film follows The Boston Globe\'s "Spotlight" team, the oldest continuously operating newspaper investigative unit in the United States, and its investigation into cases of widespread and systemic child sex abuse in the Boston area by numerous Roman Catholic priests. It is based on a series of stories by the real Spotlight Team that earned The Globe the 2003 Pulitzer Prize for Public Service. The film stars Mark Ruffalo, Michael Keaton, Rachel McAdams, John Slattery, Stanley Tucci, Brian d\'Arcy James, Liev Schreiber, and Billy Crudup.\n\nSpotlight was shown in the Out of Competition section of the 72nd Venice International Film Festival. It was also shown at the Telluride Film Festival and the Special Presentations section of the 2015 Toronto International Film Festival. The film was released on November 6, 2015, by Open Road Films. It won numerous guilds and critics\' association awards, and was named one of the finest films of 2015 by various publications. It is nominated for six Academy Awards including Best Film Editing, Best Supporting Actor: Mark Ruffalo, Best Supporting Actress: Rachel McAdams, Best Original Screenplay, Best Director, and Best Picture.\n\nIn 2001, The Boston Globe hires a new editor, Marty Baron. Baron meets Walter "Robby" Robinson, the editor of the Spotlight team, a small group of journalists writing investigative articles that take months to research and publish. After Baron reads a Globe column about a lawyer, Mitchell Garabedian, who says that Cardinal Law (the Archbishop of Boston) knew that the priest John Geoghan was sexually abusing children and did nothing to stop him, he urges the Spotlight team to investigate. Journalist Michael Rezendes contacts Garabedian, who initially declines interview. Though he is told not to, Rezendes reveals that he is on the Spotlight team, persuading Garabedian to talk.\n\nInitially believing that they are following the story of one priest who was moved around several times, the Spotlight team begin to uncover a pattern of sexual abuse of children by Catholic priests in Massachusetts, and an ongoing cover-up by the Boston Archdiocese. Through a man who heads a victim\'s rights organization, they widen their search to thirteen priests. They learn through an ex-priest who worked trying to rehabilitate pedophile priests that there should be approximately ninety abusive priests in Boston. Through their research, they develop a list of eighty-seven names, and begin to find their victims to back up their suspicions. When the September 11 attacks occur, the team is forced to deprioritize the story. They regain momentum when Rezendes learns from Garabedian that there are publicly available documents that confirm Cardinal Law was aware of the problem and ignored it. After The Boston Globe wins a case to have even more legal documents unsealed, the Spotlight Team finally begins to write the story, and plan to publish their findings in early 2002.\n\nAs they are about to go to print, Robinson confesses to the team that he was sent a list of twenty pedophile priests in 1993 in a story he never followed up on. Baron, nevertheless, tells Robinson and the team that the work they are doing is important. The story goes to print with a link leading to the documents that expose Cardinal Law, and a phone number requesting victims of pedophile priests to come forward. The following morning, the Spotlight team is inundated with phone calls from victims coming forward to tell their stories. The film closes with a list of places in the United States and around the world where the Catholic Church has been involved in concealing abuse by priests.', u'-0.00736713', u'Seconds after the credits for Tom McCarthy\'s "Spotlight" roll, an overwhelming feeling of changing your career takes over. Is film criticism really where I belong? What important, life-changing story am I not writing about? Truth is, quite a bit of classic films give off that same feeling. "Rocky" made a bunch of our fathers and older brothers go for a morning run and drink raw eggs. "Rudy" made us want to go out and play Notre Dame football. "Spotlight" makes you want to go down to your local courthouse and search the public records for clues. Then, get on the phone, with a pen and a pad, and start asking some really tough questions. Honestly speaking, "Spotlight" is the best investigative news drama this century. Matter of fact, behind "All the President\'s Men" and maybe "The Insider," it\'s among the best ever made.\n\n"Spotlight" tells the true story of how the Boston Globe uncovered the massive scandal of child molestation and cover-up within the local Catholic Archdiocese, shaking the entire Catholic Church to its core.\n\nWhere you must begin, with any praise for the film, is the audacious and fortifying script by Tom McCarthy and Josh Singer. The two create cinematic magic in their articulation of words, characters, and narrative storytelling. Each person feels authentic. Each scene feels rich and equally important as the last. And most of all, its the tightest, most satisfying film from beginning to end, seen this year. From minute one, you\'re hooked, up until the last second, where they decide the last words spoken should be, "Spotlight" is astonishingly crafted.\n\nI\'m still in shock and awe that Tom McCarthy is the one who made this. This is a writer/director who I\'ve appreciated but didn\'t have the "love" factor surrounding any of his films. Paired with an outstanding cast, co-writer Josh Singer, editor Tom McArdle, cinematographer Masanobu Takayanagi and composer Howard Shore, Tom McCarthy gets a chance to create his masterpiece\x85and succeeds. He makes brilliant artistic choices, such as letting a Mark Ruffalo letter reading play over a 2-minute taxi car ride back to the newspaper. McCarthy\'s direction is one of the best directorial efforts from any filmmaker this year thus far.\n\nAll the players performing are top-notch but walking away, best-in- show, is the performance of Academy Award nominee Mark Ruffalo. Ruffalo exhibits his best screen performance to date, and makes a stake in his claim for the Oscar this year. Weirdly reminiscent of Joaquin Phoenix\'s work in "The Master," Ruffalo builds his \'Mike\' from the feet up, giving him his own characteristics that I\'m not sure McCarthy and Singer set out to do. His expressions in words, mannerisms, all encapsulate the magnitude of his work, bookended by an explosive scene that brought tears to my eyes. Think back to Emma Stone\'s acclaimed work in "Birdman," and the scene that made everyone notice. I wanted to simply applaud.\n\nMichael Keaton and Rachel McAdams, who play "Robbie" and "Sacha" respectively, are attune with their characters and destinations. Each bring strong sensibilities and sensitivity to their roles that desperately call for them. Hotly worked into the story is Liev Schreiber as a newly appointed Editor, that in the little screen time he\'s given, makes a long-lasting impression. Stanley Tucci is also afforded the same opportunity, and gives one of the film\'s best monologues.\n\nIf there\'s a film this year that feels like an Oscar-winner, "Spotlight" sure does make a compelling case. Dramatic, heart- pounding, and necessarily made. It\'s one of the most important films this year and probably THE BEST PICTURE OF THE YEAR. The Telluride tradition may continue.', u'0.421994', u'... because by the time the credits roll and you start to breathe normally again, you will suddenly realize that this was not a horror film as such, this was a re-enactment of events that actually happened, with real victims and real perpetrators and real well-meaning third parties covering up the whole thing as fast as the body count kept piling up.\n\nAnd then you will once again have difficulty catching your breath.\n\nAs a film it is superb. McCarthy who did double duty as writer and director deserves acknowledgement. The cast is universally excellent. Ruffalo gives the performance of his career, Keaton is solid as a rock, and McAdams reaps overdue dividends from her decision to broaden her career into non-glamorous roles at a time when the only scripts they were sending her were for Diva parts. Smart lady.\n\nA reviewer is not supposed to interject personal feelings in a review but I will say without apology that I miss films like these -- films that speak for the injustice in society and offer solutions -- and wish there were more of them. It seems that when I was younger there was a lot more interest in doing the right thing merely because it was the right thing. This no longer seems to be the societal meme, and that troubles me.\n\nA must-see.', u'0.36015', u'In 2001, editor Marty Baron of The Boston Globe assigns a team of journalists to investigate allegations against John Geoghan, an unfrocked priest accused of molesting more than 80 boys. Led by editor Walter "Robby" Robinson (Michael Keaton), reporters Michael Rezendes (Mark Ruffalo), Matt Carroll and Sacha Pfeiffer interview victims and try to unseal sensitive documents. The reporters make it their mission to provide proof of a cover-up of sexual abuse within the Roman Catholic Church.\n\nThis is a great movie with real facts exposing the illicit incest and sexual abuse committed by Catholic priests against innocent children.\n\nThere is no explicit sex on this movie,it is Rated R for the pedophilia topic.\n\nYesterday this excellent movie won the Oscar for best movie of the year.\n\nThis movie has been banned in all Arabian countries where sex,gay and lesbian sex,pedophilia secretly happens in Arabian Countries.', u'-0.118048', u'Everything about this movie is outstanding -- the performances, the way the true events are handled, the cinematography. In this day of digital news, this movie makes us stand back and realize what we may lose in the way of investigative journalism as we slowly kill off print media.\n\nThe lengths the directors go to to achieve a sense of authenticity is remarkable. We are there in Boston in 2001-2002. We get to know enough about each character to make him or her real, but not enough to create side dramas. The focus remains the child abuse scandal in the archdiocese in Boston. That reflects the conflict the characters face and deal with when events make them rethink the focus of their article.\n\nThe movie is riveting, though we know the outcome.', u'0.152702', u'This movie undid something inside of me. It\'s that part of you that holds on to hope that people can be good, that there is hope for humanity. I knew the basics of it when I went to watch it: that it is about investigative reporters looking into a story of abuse in the catholic church. And it uncovered so much more than just that. Honestly, this movie should be seen by anyone who seeks the true face of the world. We don\'t live in a pink bubble of happiness. F*cked up things happen to people all the time; worst thing is when it happens to the innocent. The little ones who can\'t protect themselves. When they are robbed of their faith and their hope and their future. Sitting in the film theatre on the last row, I was brought to tears as in front of me a long list of places where victims spoke out was scrolling. I was both shocked and mad. I felt sorry that people can fail so miserably. "Mike Rezendes: They knew and they let it happen! It could\'ve been you, it could\'ve been me, it could\'ve been any of us." Indeed. When we witness darkness and we shut up and we don\'t do anything about it, that\'s when we fail. A poet once wrote, "You can join the millions talking in the dark. Or you can stand up and scream light, out into the night." So choose to stand up. In your profession choose to eradicate the oblivion of evil. This movie is a masterpiece. From the dedication of the actors to their roles, to the script, the director and the cinematography. The score? Fantastic. Howard Shore did it again!', u'-0.28628', u"I've rated almost a hundred movies and I've only ever given out six 10s on this website. I don't rave about many movies and I am tough to please when it comes to film, but this film is absolute brilliance. It is flawless. This one earns its 10 and it is one of the best films I have ever seen. \n\nEverything about this film is brilliant. The camera work is great and the score is underrated. However, what makes this film is an absolutely genius screenplay that is acted to perfection. This script will rock your world. I am not Catholic. I didn't grow up in a deeply Catholic area, but this film still affected me greatly. Everyone should see this movie for that reason. That is something that you have to see for yourself. \n\nHowever, I'd like to focus a little more on the technical aspects. Beyond the fact that the subject matter is heavy and extremely important to American and world culture, this movie does everything else right. The acting is absolutely phenomenal. This is particularly true for Ruffalo and McAdams. I adore the subtlety with which they both act. It is brilliant. There isn't much more to say. This film is pure brilliance from its opening frame to its closing moment. For both cinematic and cultural reasons, this is a film that every person should see.", u'0.413687', u'By no means movies awarded the best movie academy award are the best out there. That\'s for sure. Neither Miss Universe is the "most beautiful woman in the world" etc.\n\nI will probably fail to remember which movies won the Oscar the last 3 decades. Some of them are totally forgettable and makes you wonder if they were deserving a nomination in the first place. In my opinion "the best picture of the year" should be a game changing movie, that leaves you speechless while you are watching it and make a permanent imprint in your mind and soul.\n\nSpotlight won the Oscar for the best movie of 2016. Was it worth it? In my opinion faaaar from it. Was it a bad movie? Of course not. But it is far from being great. It has adequate performances from the well known leads. A bright photography, which for me is always a plus, but...\n\nOf course the premise touches a sensitive subject but it doesn\'t make an impact to the audience. You will hear: the number is not 13 it\'s more than that like 20 or even 90, and that is supposed to have an impact to the viewers, about the scale of child molestation from priests and a possible church cover-up, but it really hasn\'t. You hear 2-3 testimonies but you don\'t see the act, not even in the form of a flashback. So, for that, it is not effective.\n\nI read some reviews praising how "controlled" this movie is. In my opinion that was a mistake for that subject. The testimonies weren\'t enough to draw a picture about the problem. Also there is no actual heroes here. The reporters just doing their work and the paper had the opportunity to do something years ago but let it slide.\n\nOverall: I cannot understand how this movie is considered as the best of 2016. It is a mild ride. No surprises no heroes. A little bit on the boring side in its 2 hours 7 minutes duration. Nothing extraordinary. Just adequate as a film and far less than that as a statement against a serious problem of our societies.', u'-0.270103', u"Brilliantly acted, directed, and written, I just found this riveting and important film to be truly exceptional. Much of it is done in a low-key style, as layer after layer of the abuse by Catholic priests and subsequent cover-up by the Boston Archdiocese as well as other powerful interests, is uncovered by the Spotlight investigative team of the Boston Globe, in the early 2000's.\n\nI haven't yet seen all the movies nominated for the Best Picture Academy Award in 2016, but I can certainly see how this one won it, as well as winning Best Original Screenplay by Tom McCarthy (who also directed) and Josh Singer.\n\nOverall, just an outstanding motion picture that I would recommend highly.", u'0.831317', u"For me this film was beautifully tragic; by this I mean it was a fantastically acted film and gripping; but I'm disgusted and mortified that it actually happened.\n\nIt was good that the film focused on how the conspiracy into the abuse was covered up; for me it was a preference than focusing on the victims and bringing any more agony to them. It brought a tear to my eye to know the depths that this went on (and probably still does) and the number of victims that were involved. As someone who has a criminology degree with a focus on child abuse this film was particularly poignant. I was appalled at the end to see that the cardinal for Boston was moved to a high ranked job in the Vatican; when it was clear from scenes and evidence brought up in the film that he was aware. The end provides a list of places where it has been uncovered; this is heartbreaking. \n\nMark Ruffalo was fantastic in this film, however, for me the stand it performance was from Michael Keaton as the 'Spotlight' team editor. \n\nFor me it was first 10/10 of the year (2016)", u'-0.104338', u'In "All the President\'s Men", young reporters Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein uncovered a national political scandal when they, through their investigative journalism, revealed the White House under then President Richard Nixon was using campaign funding to finance dirty tricks of political enemies, nicknamed Watergate. In "Spotlight", a similar team of investigative reporters reveal a scandal of epic proportions which makes much of the Watergate scandal seem tame by comparison. They uncovered widespread sexual abuse of minors committed by priests of the Roman Catholic Church who, in turn, hid the crimes. Michael Rezendes (Mark Ruffalo), Walter V. Robinson (Michael Keaton), Sacha Pfeiffer (Rachel McAdams), Martin "Marty" Baron (Leiv Schreiber), Ben Bradlee Jr. (John Slattery), and Matt Carroll (Brian d\'Arcy James) work for a group of investigative reporters within the Boston Globe called "Spotlight" who succeed in finding the skeletons in the Boston Diocese proverbial closet. For many years prior to the sexual abuse scandal, Spotlight had investigated and reported on many other ground-breaking stories.\n\nThe story begins with a quick flash-back to 1976 when a priest is jailed for sexual abusing a minor. The film then cuts to 2001. Marty Baron (Schreiber), a Jewish Floridian, becomes the main editor for the Boston Globe. He meets the different editors and journalists, and learns of work by Spotlight. A Globe column reveals a lawyer, Mitchell Garabedian, claims Cardinal Law, then Archbishop of Boston, knew Father John Geoghan, a priest within Law\'s diocese, was sexually abusing children, and the bishop did not bring him to the attention of authorities. Baron urges the Spotlight team to investigate further to see whether the claim is true and an isolated incident, or if there is more to the story. The "seed" is similar to the break-in of the democratic headquarters at the Watergate Complex which eventually revealed the Nixon White House had been engaging in multiple plots against perceived political enemies.\n\nThe Spotlight team is headed by Walter "Robby" Robinson (Keaton), a no-nonsense fair but tough reporter/editor. They agree to Baron\'s wishes and begin researching deeper to see if there is a larger story. Their first lead is the attorney mentioned in the article, Mitchell Garabedian (Stanley Tucci). Rezendes (Ruffalo) peruses Garabedian who acted as negotiator between the Boston Archdiocese and victims of Father Geoghan. The reporter wishes the attorney to reveal names of the victims, but at first Garabedian declines. Eventually, Garabedian agrees to contact victims, who are now much older, and ask them if they are willing to speak with Rezendes without revealing their names. Eventually, interviews are set up at the attorney\'s offices. The question then becomes whether there were other priests who engaged in similar criminal behavior against minors.\n\nOn another front, other members of the team, including Sacha Pfeiffer (McAdams), begin discovering the unspeakable reality of other victims possibly at the hands of more priests, aside from Geoghan. Then a tip from a former rehabilitation counselor for priests informs the team that, based on statistics, there may be as many as 90 priests involved with sexual abuse of children in the Boston Area alone. The team then appropriates volumes of an American guide book of Roman Catholic priests, published once a year, which lists the whereabouts of every clergyman in the church in terms of dioceses and parishes. The investigators make a startling discovery. Certain names in the book over several years are listed as "on leave due to illness", "on administrative leave", or other designations of inactivity after only one to three years at a particular parish, leading the team to consider these may be priests who engaged in sexual misconduct with minors. If true, it would place blame not only on Cardinal Law as possibly covering up the church\'s indiscretions but the entire Roman Catholic Church, all the way to the Vatican.\n\nThis is a stunning film about the power of a small group of urban reporters to uncover wrongdoing by one of the oldest and far-reaching institutions in the world: The Roman Catholic Church. In particular high marks for Mark Ruffalo as Michael Rezendes, Rachel McAdams as Sacha Pfeiffer, and Michael Keaton as Robbie Robinson. So much of the story parallels the Watergate Scandal of several decades earlier. As horrible as the actual victimization of minors by the priests, often boys because they were less likely to "squeal" because of the shame, the cover-up by Law was nearly as criminal. Instead of taking the priests to justice, as he should have done, he tried to cover it up by offering settlements to the families, often when the victims were minors. Law and probably other church officials moved the priests to other parishes where they engaged in similar behavior, thus allowing widespread sexual abuse to continue. It was eventually revealed that not only did these sexual predators victimize children in other parts of the country, it was happening internationally.', u'-0.308119', u'In the past 5+ years, I\'ve read articles about the decline of cinema and the great successes of Television. There\'s no denying that there have been some wonderful TV/web series in recent years, but I think a film like Spotlight is the refresh button that moviegoers have been looking for. The story is compelling, the acting is unnoticeable, and the script seems to flow the way a real conversation would. The writers and director of this film are the "Spotlight" of filmmaking, opening up a sensitive story that people acknowledged but probably couldn\'t imagine on screen, and they brought it to us in a way where I felt all the emotions of someone finding out the truth for the first time. I watched Spotlight at the Z\xfcrich Film Festival and after 2 hours, thought it ended too soon. The only negative thing I could think of was that those French & German subtitles were really getting in the way. Maybe next time, the director could remove those ;)', u'-0.12474', u'It won best film, deservedly so. This is a film that resonated with me long after I watched it. The complicated tale of the investigation of paedophile priests in Boston and the publication of it is told in riveting fashion by Tom Macarthy who does not waste a frame or a scene to anything less than the plot or character development. I never felt the running time or in any way disbelieved any of the actors in their portrayals.\n\nKeaton seems to be on a total roll at the moment and he is excellent as the head of Spotlight but the whole ensemble seemed to put in a real shift. This felt like a documentary at times and I could feel the audience around me leaning forward as each new revelation is uttered. \n\nJust brilliant.', u'0.343857', u'Garnered awards and horrifying subject matter put aside, take a look at the movie poster for "Spotlight". It\'s a still image of the principal cast hovered over a cluttered desk in a small room. It\'s not flashy, but still an incredibly effective piece of advertising. You know in an instant that this is a journalism movie; die-hards in rolled-up shirtsleeves working all hours to unearth a national scandal. I am an absolute sucker for this.\n\nThe scandal herein is the systemic cover-up of pederasty within the Catholic Church. To that end (even though a lot of the dialogue in this movie is come-from-behind startling), one line in particular jumped out at me: "They say it\'s just physical abuse but it\'s more than that, this was spiritual abuse. You know why I went along with everything? Because priests are supposed to be the good guys." This isn\'t just a story about the crimes committed, but there\'s also sensitivity towards the victims themselves. I dunno, I just found that line deeply unnerving.\n\nBut when all is said and done, this movie runs on the grueling nuts-and-bolts detective work of investigative journalism; a uniformly excellent cast, great writing and tension that continues to build.\n\nAmazing stuff.\n\n9/10', u'-0.204345', u'In 2001, the Jewish editor Marty Baron (Liev Schreiber) is hired by The Boston Globe and he asks the Spotlight team to investigate the priest John Geoghan that was accused of abusing children and the lawyer Mitchell Garabedian (Stanley Tucci) that has told that Cardinal Law (Len Cariou) knew what his priest did. Walter \'Robby\' Robinson (Michael Keaton), Mike Rezendes (Mark Ruffalo), Sacha Pfeiffer (Rachel McAdams) and Matt Carroll (Brian d\'Arcy James) are fully supported by Baron and their leader Ben Bradlee, Jr. (John Slattery) to set in motion the investigation of the priest and they contact the initially reluctant Garabedian; the lawyer Eric Macleish (Billy Crudup) that has defended many victims; the leader of the victims\' rights organization Phil Saviano (Neal Huff); and several victims that accept to meet them. After one year investigation, they confirm the names of twenty pedophile priest in Boston and they publish the story showing that Cardinal Law had prior knowledge of the priests\' abuse of children.\n\n"Spotlight" is based on a true story about the infamous Boston scandal when dark secrets of the Catholic Church were disclosed forcing the church to take responsibility for the shameful acts of some of their priests. The story stops with the publication of the scandal with names and other victims contacting the newspaper team. The screenplay, direction and performances are top-notch. Just as curiosity, the following link (http://www.historyvshollywood.com/reelfaces/spotlight/) shows the real face of several "Spotlight" characters. My vote is eight.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Spotlight: Segredos Revelados" ("Spotlight: Secrets Disclosed")', u'-0.33418'], u'tt0032551': [u"This movie is so real..at least to this person, who lived these things that happened in the movie. I will tell a short version of my personal life to let you know how it affected me from my own experience of growing up in the Thirties\n\nI think their must have been more then one car because ours was full of stuff in the back seat, clear up almost to the roof. Frankie, Bill and me (my brothers) all was on top of the stuff in the back seat, had to stay lying down was not enough room to set up. What I remember most about the trip was it was awful hot when we went through Arizona and we had not much water, the water we had was in a canvas bag, hooked to the front bumper to help keep it cool. We did not get much because dad was saving it for the car when the car got to hot. Mom told us to suck on pebbles, and we did. It was a bad time every where. No jobs or anyway to make any money. \n\nWe were going to California because their was suppose to be some picking work their, after we got to California we saw miles of potatoes all loose piled up high my guess would be about six feet high, they had put lime or something that looked like lime it was a white powder to keep people from taking them to eat.\n\nWe found a place to pick plums that they used to make prunes and we lived in a Quonset hut made of corrugated metal setting on a concrete slab. The public toilets were near were we stayed, Joe and his wife (Family friends)had their own Hut\x85this was the time that dad & Joe would sell tickets for people to watch them box each other in a ring at the recreation hall on the property. Also they joined a baseball team and played baseball, dad played left field. We got to watch them play for free.\n\nSeems like Frankie and I played together a lot don't think Bill did because he was still a baby his self, Doris and Dorothy (my sisters) was still crawling so Bill could not have been very old at that time. Frank & I would go pick up plums off the ground and we would bring them home, Doris and Dorothy would set in the box and eat them. You can guess what they would look like when mom and dad got home, their was no air condition back then so they would take a hose and squirt water on the tin Quonset hut to try and cool it off some, I know when we went west we looked like those grapes of wrath folks in the movie.\n\nThat area was the first time I ever saw a frog walk, it was to hot for them to hop, when they tried to hop their bellies would touch the ground ( gravel) and would burn them, any way that's what we thought at that time. I saw the movie of Grapes of wrath a long time ago, and I remember it so well, I cried most of the time it was on because it reminded me of the hard time we all had back then, I was born in Oklahoma and it was just a terrible time in the late thirties I would love to see the movie again, its to me a history of my family, I am 71 1/2 years old now and still remember it very clearly.\n\nGene McDaniel", u'-0.190478', u"\nThe Grapes of Wrath is the story of the Joad family, who are run off of their land in Oklahoma because of drought and poverty. I think that one of the most striking elements of this movie is the black and white cinematography. Obviously, there wasn't a lot of variation on this particular subject in 1940, but especially today, the lack of color enhances the feelings of poverty and desperation and emptiness due to the family's loss of their home. In this way, because it would not be nearly as noticeable in 1940 as it is today, this time-enhanced effect of the black and white film stock has allowed for the film's impact to actually grow with time. \n\nHenry Fonda plays the part of Tom Joad, a young member of the family who is released from prison at the beginning of the film, only to find that his family has been driven from their home and is staying at his uncle's house until they can figure out what to do about their sudden homelessness. It is by pure coincidence that Tom was released early on good behavior, otherwise he may very well never have seen his family again. He finds them in a state of near desperation, as they begin more and more to realize the predicament that they are in. Their trek across half of the country, on their way to California to assume jobs that they've heard about, provides for a substantial portion of the plot and is extremely well-structured.\n\n\nThe family encounters every hardship imaginable on this journey, from family members dying to their struggle to feed themselves to their rickety old truck constantly breaking down. They run into disillusioned people who claim that they've been to California and there are really no jobs there, at least not nearly as many as there are people going to look for them. They are periodically and derogatorily referred to as `Okies,' a term which places them in a broad category of poor folks driven from there homes in middle America who are traveling to the coast to get jobs that aren't there. There is so much doubt and hardship presented that it is never really certain whether they really will find jobs. The audience is never able to assume a happy ending, because there is so much contrary foreshadowing throughout the film. \n\nThe struggles do not abate once the family reaches California and takes up shaky residence in residential areas that would be more accurately referred to as shanty towns, and the rest of the film is dominated by the family's efforts to survive in a new and unfamiliar place, while working for wages that are barely sufficient to prevent starvation. Ma Joad spends the majority of the film stressing the importance of keeping the family together, seeing it as the only thing that they really had left, but this is eventually set aside in favor of each member of the family not only surviving but also flourishing, which provides for one of the many powerful messages that the film delivers. \n\nThe Grapes of Wrath is not exactly an edge of your seat film, but it is a shockingly realistic portrayal of the suffering that so many people and families experienced during the Great Depression. The performances are flawless, and the experience is not only powerful and moving but also educational. It's no secret that most people do not watch movies to learn, but there comes a point, at least once in a great while, when a person should watch a film that requires a little mental thought processing, and in such cases, The Grapes of Wrath is an excellent choice.\n", u'-0.0224211', u'\nHenry Fonda\'s portrayal of Tom Joad captures perfectly the humanity and compassion of the Steinbeck character, an ex-con who breaks his parole conditions by joining his family in their epic journey across the southern US to a "better life" in California.\n\nThis is not the usual Hollywood fare. Tragedy and betrayal beset the Joad family from the outset. But it is nonetheless an uplifting movie. Spirit, compassion and tenderness mark them out. Fonda\'s role is particularly understated, and we see, as in Steinbeck\'s masterly epic, the maternally robust figure of Ma holding the family together.\n\nThe performances all round are wonderful, and Ford\'s direction and sense of space under the big sky of the Midwest is breathtaking.\n\nThis film is now largely a testament to the time in which it was set, but like the war movies that were soon to follow, a story that needed telling lest we forget. ', u'0.421124', u"John Ford's film of John Steinbeck's novel has deservedly a classic film mirroring the views of both men and the times the book was written and filmed. Ford won his second Oscar for Best Director and Jane Darwell was the Best Supporting Actress of 1940.\n\nFor most of America the Depression started with the stock market crash of 1929. But for the farmers it really began at the end of World War I. Those were good years for agriculture, the war in Europe was a boom for agriculture. But when farm prices dropped after the Armistice, a whole lot of family farms went belly up. Lots of people left the farms for the big city and industry jobs. The Depression years unhappily coincided with some of the worst drought ever seen in America.\n\nThis is what many families like the Joads were facing in 1939 when the book was written. The banks had foreclosed on land that had withered to dust in any event. Folks like the Joads picked up and moved elsewhere, like California on a rumor of prosperity and jobs. \n\nAmerica was still changing from an agricultural to an industrial society back then. That causes a lot of trouble for people unskilled in any industrial job training. As a country we're going through something similar today in many areas. We're moving from an industrial to an information based economy. Industry jobs are being lost to other nations and older and poorer workers are suffering for it. It's progress I guess, but it takes its toll.\n\nSome factory worker who has lost his job for any number of reasons can identify to some degree with the Joads, especially if they've lost a home they owned. For the Joads it was worse because they made their living off the land for many generations, identifying with it in a way that industrial workers could not.\n\nHenry Fonda got his first Oscar nomination for Tom Joad. To get the part which he knew he was so right for, he signed a studio contract with 20th Century Fox. That caused him many problems later on, but those are stories for another film review. \n\nTom Joad is a midwest country kid, a whole lot like Fonda himself. Part of the story of The Grapes of Wrath is Tom himself trying to figure out why these economic forces are crushing him and his family and the way of life he's known. In the end when he leaves the Joad family and hits the open road, he's not got all the answers, but he's asking the questions. Tom hasn't figured it out, but a lot of people with many letters after their names haven't either. He only knows that he's got to get in the fight for economic justice.\n\nJane Darwell was in films from the earliest silent films to Mary Poppins in 1965. This became her career part and the mother role of all time. She's what holds the Joad family together in good times and bad. That's what moms do and get little recognition for it. Except in this case by the Motion Picture Academy.\n\nJohn Carradine has his career part in this also. Another John Ford favorite, Carradine plays Casy the defrocked preacher who as he tells it disgraced himself with a female parishioner. After that preaching the gospel didn't seem quite right. When Fonda meets Carradine after Fonda's been released from prison, Carradine is asking a lot of questions about what is man's place in the metaphysical scheme of things. He's developing what we would now call situational ethics. Carradine's questions are on a higher plane, but he certainly inspires Fonda to ask for some answers himself.\n\nThe Grapes of Wrath illustrates that at least government can give first aid in a crisis. After being in privately run agricultural camps where they're treated like less than dirt, the Joads happen upon a camp run by the Department of Agriculture where at least they're treated like humans. As it turns out, the Secretary of Agriculture was one Henry A. Wallace who was running for Vice President that year with Franklin D. Roosevelt. I'll bet any number of people saw The Grapes of Wrath and saw a message of support for FDR and the New Deal.\n\nGiven some of the problems of the American economy today, The Grapes of Wrath though it appears dated isn't really all that much a relic of our past. It's both a timeless book and a timeless classic film.", u'-0.066602', u'It\'s difficult on a first viewing of "The Grapes of Wrath" not to be somewhat disappointed with it. So much of Steinbeck\'s beautiful novel is left out of the film, and it\'s hard to see his story and characters wedged into the "gee whizz" style of film-making so prevalent at the time. But once you get beyond a comparison of the movie to the book, you begin to realize that John Ford created a beautiful piece of work of his own, and the film inspires a great deal of admiration, and deserves credit for its gutsiness at tackling a story that wouldn\'t have gone down smoothly with film executives at the time.\n\nOf course the most controversial parts of the book are left out (like its final image, for example), but Ford still managed to work around the constraints forced upon him to fashion a hard-biting film. Henry Fonda is perfect casting for Tom Joad--never have his otherworldly eyes been used to greater effect. And Jane Darwell is pitch-perfect as Ma Joad--she captures the tough-as-nails dignity that the character has in the novel. The whole movie is lit by expert cinematographer Gregg Toland, who uses shadow and reflection to cast a ghostly pall over everything. Indeed, much of what Ford wasn\'t able to include in the film as words he communicates instead through images, and isn\'t that what a good book-to-film adaptation should do? One of those films that feels ahead of its time.\n\nGrade: A', u'0.147437', u'\nThey say that you should wait 20 or 30 years before attempting to capture an historical event on film.  That is why it was remarkable that Oliver Stone was able to capture the "feel" of Viet Nam (in "Platoon") so soon (13 years) after America\'s withdrawal.  Usually, an honest perspective takes more time to develop.\n\nBut, when you consider that John Steinbeck and John Ford needed less than ten years to bring the 1932 "dust bowl" to life, you really have to admire their magnificent achievement.    \n\nOf course, in 1940, Ford could not film much of the graphic squalor described in the novel.  For example, the film cannot show a starving hobo suckling at the breast of a young Rose of Sharon, who has milk to spare following the death of her baby.  But, far from degradation, Rose of Sharon\'s gesture is a reflection of the goodness that resides within her, and that quality is well illustrated in the character development seen on the screen.  Tom Joad may be an ex-con, but he is a good man.\n\n\nOne of the commentaries (below) uses this film to rant about the exploitation in today\'s society.  That completely misses the point.  Ford, who was as conservative as anyone in Hollywood, even more conservative than John Wayne, used this movie to show that Man can triumph, despite the natural and human barriers that are put in his way.   \n\n\nThis is ultimately a movie about hope and the human spirit.         \n\n\n', u'0.252966', u'One of the best movies Hollywood ever produced and yes it\'s true that "The Grapes of Wrath" is one of those movies which don\'t loose their lust in many years. Released in 1940 and till now this movie is as fresh as it can be. John Ford directorial version of John Steinbeck\'s finest work really worth a watch.As from the release of the book "Grapes of Wrath" has been seiged with controversies as the book was banned in many states but the book is great proponent of hardship. This movie mesmerizes you from the start as the characters are indulged with true humanitarian instincts, you won\'t feel any thing irrelevant.Henry Fonda is very much compelling in the role of young Todd and Jane Darwell won best supporting actress in magnificent portrayal of Mama Todd. All the other cast was fine and convincing in their roles .John Ford won another best director award from this and its no doubt the best deserving from his other achievements .In the end it\'s a treat and you wont be able to forget its impact for a long time.', u'0.668733', u'During most of the decade of the 30s, the United States lived under the shroud of the Great Depression, a decade of unemployment and high poverty that would changed the face of the country forever. While the entire country suffered the effects of the Depression, the inhabitants of the prairie lands had to face an extra difficulty: the Dust Bowl. The Dust Bowl was a terrible ecological disaster that destroyed many farms in the area of the Great Plains, and forced people to migrate looking for better working conditions. The difficulties and social problems that those migrants had to endure in this sad chapter of history became the inspiration for John Steinbeck\'s novel, "The Grapes of Wrath", a book that quickly became a classic due to its powerful depiction of the era. Soon after it\'s release, plans for a film adaptation began to be made, and the man who would bring the novel to the screen would be none other than John Ford.\n\nIn "The Grapes of Wrath", Henry Fonda plays Tom Joad, a young man recently paroled from prison who is traveling to his family home in Oklahoma. When he arrives, he discovers that the farm is deserted and the only person he can find is Jim Casy (John Carradine), the former preacher of his community. Together they decide to go to the house of Tom\'s uncle John (Frank Darien) looking for the Joads, and it\'s there where they find them packing their belongings as they get ready to move. The Joads explain Tom that the bank has foreclosed their farm, and that they are moving to California looking for work and a better life. While he is not supposed to leave the state by the conditions of his parole, Tom decides to join his family and convinces Jim to go with them in the long and arduous trip to California. However, things won\'t be as easy as they thought they would.\n\nAdapted to the screen by Nunnally Johnson, "The Grapes of Wrath" takes on the spirit of John Steinbeck\'s novel and delivers a harsh, crude and very realistic portrayal of poverty during the Dust Bowl. Despite not being an exactly faithful adaptation of the novel (changes were done due to censorship), the movie remains true to that powerful and very human essence that the novel had, and it could be said that Johnson distilled the themes of the novel and made an unabashed story free of any political compromises. While this kind of stories often suffer literary embellishments, "The Grapes of Wrath" avoids stereotypes and shows humanity as it is, with all their vices and virtues. It is the excellent development of the main characters what gives that very human touch to the story, as it really shows a real understanding not only of Steinbeck\'s novel, but also of the real social situations that inspired the book.\n\nIn 1939, John Ford was in one of the best periods of his career, having directed "Stagecoach", "Young Mr. Lincoln" and "Drums Along the Mohawk" in less than 12 months. "The Grapes of Wrath" would also be shot the same year, being the culminating work of that extraordinary series of masterpieces. While Ford was better known for his legendary westerns and larger-than-life heroes, "The Grapes of Wrath" was in many levels a very personal movie for him, so he basically took Steinbeck\'s novel and completely made the story his own. Framed by Gregg Toland\'s wonderful cinematography, Ford brings to life the Joads\' story in a way that mixes his own style with a focus so realistic that almost feels like a documentary. Without excessive sentimentalism, Ford tells in this movie a very human tale of survival, so universal that could easily be related to any group of people migrating due to poverty.\n\nWhile Ford and Toland deserve a lot of the credit, the movie wouldn\'t be the same without the extraordinary performances of the cast. Leading the cast is Henry Fonda as Tom Joad, delivering one of his best works of acting in his portrayal of the young man. Considering his performance in Ford\'s "Young Mr. Lincoln", one could say that Fonda\'s career reached legendary status under Ford\'s direction. While Fonda\'s work is worthy of praise, two actors actually manage to overshadow him in this movie: Jane Darwell and John Carradine. As the idealist preacher Jim Casy, Carradine makes a terrific job in what\'s probably the story\'s most interesting character, completely embodying Casy\'s persona in an atypical role for him. Like Carradine, Jane Darwell makes a wonderful job (probably her finest) as Ma Joad, and without a doubt she truly deserved that Academy award she received for her performance.\n\nAs written above, the movie has several considerable differences with the novel (specially the second half), so fans expecting a complete translation of the book will be a bit disappointed. However, Johnson and Ford did a wonderful job in the adaptation than while considerably different beasts, both the movie and the novel carry the same spirit and the message that Steinbeck tried to give in his book. Interestingly, producer Darryl F. Zanuck also saw the film as a personal project and certainly his involvement helped the movie to get away from censorship as most as possible. While the film has indeed some flaws (most famously the sudden and unexplained disappearance of a minor character), it\'s hard to diminish its value due to them, as the beauty of its craft is so big that they can be easily dismissed.\n\nWith a haunting atmosphere, a beautiful visual composition, and superb performances by his actors, Ford created one of the first masterpieces of the 40s and one of the finest American movies ever made. While already a celebrated director by the time of its release, this movie consolidated Ford as a master of his craft. Despite their differences, John Ford\'s "The Grapes of Wrath" truly carries the spirit of Steinbeck\'s novel, as well as the ghost of Tom Joad. 10/10', u'0.349161', u'\n"The Grapes of Wrath" was a huge novel so it only made sense to turn it into a feature motion picture. The result is one of the greatest films ever produced. Oscar-nominee Henry Fonda, his mother Jane Darwell (Oscar-winning) and their family have had it in the Dust Bowl. Thus they decide to leave the midwest of our nation\'s Great Depression and go to California. The film is an intensely dramatic affair that is first-rate in all cinematic departments. John Ford won his second Best Director Oscar with this movie and the landscape of the late-1920s and early-1930s has never been captured more fully. Excellent film-making. 5 stars out of 5. ', u'0.461875', u'This classic adaptation of "The Grapes of Wrath" features a fine cast as well as a skillful production headed by director John Ford. Henry Fonda and Jane Darwell are well-remembered for their roles, which are among the defining roles in their careers. The only limitations that it has come from the original novel, with its heartfelt but sometimes contrived story.\n\nBesides Fonda and Darwell, the supporting cast features plenty of good supporting players, including Charley Grapewin and John Carradine. All of them make their characters come alive believably. They also fit together well and complement one another\'s performances, which accentuates the themes involved in the struggles of the Joad family.\n\nFor all that the Steinbeck novel is so revered, and for all that his story is an often compelling depiction of its characters, with whom many in the era could identify, it would have been better if it had not been so heavy-handed. Even given that the times were bad, more balance in the characters outside of the family, and in the Joads\' experiences, would have made it an even better story. Certainly, this is barely even noticeable when compared with the stories in many present-day movies and novels, which often dispense with any attempts at plausibility.\n\nAnd that does not stop this adaptation from being a worthwhile and often moving film. Ford clearly appreciated the potential in the material, and he and the cast work together to make each character count, and to give meaning to each scene.', u'0.299122', u"Do I have your attention? Okay: Go out and watch this movie immediately because to not do so is, well, it's un-American. John Ford, with this nifty little film, made the greatest argument for populist/socialist politics in cinematic history. This movie understands the Depression and the Dust Bowl and the poor and the hungry and the starving and all those people that the sign at Ellis Island (or is it at the Statue of Liberty?) says that we'll take on and help. It understands those people better than anyone or anything else I know. Steinbeck's novel helps this movie get to where it needs to be, but, let's be honest, the Grapes of Wrath is all John Ford. \n\nThe sweeping vistas, the excellent editing and pacing, and the acting are of the highest caliber, as befits a John Ford film. I'm amazed every time I see this movie just how moving it is without straying into trite sentimentality. Tom Joad's speech at the end always makes me cry--his chilly delivery of the word homicide at the beginning continues to give me a prickly spine. Fonda was a great actor, and he is certainly at the top of his game here. Without him, interestingly, the film would have probably floundered. No one else could have possibly played Tom Joad; no one would have that charm and charisma and, most importantly, that voice. The rest of the cast is amazing, don't misunderstand, but Henry Fonda is Henry Fonda--an actor unto himself. There is no one like him and never will there be; he is the single most watchable actor of all time. \n\nAnd this isn't even my favorite John Ford movie! Nevertheless, it's a great film with a great message. Call me a pinko (it's been done before), but what's superb about this movie is its humanism. Yeah, the ideology promotes a type of socialism (ahem, I mean, let's not forget that that is basically what the New Deal was and if you think that system was a bad idea, then fine), but, really, the movie is about caring for people who don't have the resources to care for themselves. Grapes of Wrath is not a scathing indictment of anyone; it's a simple portrait of a family's struggles to overcome the Depression. It's uplifting and shows a real feeling for the downtrodden, and that's more than you can say about most American films that intend to deal with the poor and hungry.", u'0.152183', u"\nMa Joad was my mother. That is to say her and thousands like her out of the Dust Bowl of the '30s and '40's . I never got to ask ma about those days, she died before I knew that this movie and her life were the same. But my oldest sisters were born in transient camps just like the movie..people were alternately mean and kind just like the movie. When I watch the camp scenes they are as my sister's described them. The director (Ford) has nailed that episode of American history (or just a slice) deftly jumping from the hopeless to the hopeful that these folks lived through.    This is a social film true...but it is also a well told morality play with some of the finest words committed to celluloid.  Hard to beat Steinbeck . I have the newly restored Fox DVD...excellent quality. They did a faithful restoration. You should never pick up a head of lettuce or put on a cotton shirt without thinking of this film after viewing it.   Me....I just remember Ma.", u'0.307072', u'This is an extremely sentimental and worthwhile film that fans of Hollywood\'s Golden Age should see at least once. While I don\'t think it\'s director John Ford\'s best film (I preferred HOW GREEN WAS MY VALLEY, THE QUIET MAN and FORT APACHE), it is superb and well-crafted. Some of the acting (in particular Jane Darwell as "Ma") was terrific and very realistic, while occasionally it was a bit over the top (John Carradine as "the Preacher"). And the story itself was excellent and well-constructed--making an emotional and heart-felt appeal for justice and a more Socialist nation in response to the poverty of the Great Depression. You can\'t help but be sucked into the pitiful yet somehow hopeful lives of the Joad family. While some of the facts were definitely exaggerated in order to make this point (making it a one-dimensional fight between good and evil), the overall message of upheaval and loss was important and potent.\n\nI am a history teacher and so naturally I gravitate to films like THE GRAPES OF WRATH. It is an amazingly powerful film that is extremely touching and lovingly made--though historically, some of the film is pretty much fiction. While most web sites I checked praised the book, one presents a thoughtful and documented analysis of the actual Okie experience and compares it to the book and movie--coming up with many ways in which THE GRAPES OF WRATH isn\'t a totally accurate portrait of the times. Some examples cited were the general success the "Okies" had when they arrived in California, that the exodus to California from most of America PRE-DATED the Dust Bowl years and the Dust Bowl itself had very little actual impact on Oklahoma (though it DID affect Kansas and some other states considerably). This isn\'t to say that the film is completely fiction or it was a bad book or that Steinbeck was a Communist, but that Steinbeck wasn\'t always careful in his research and seemed to stretch facts to make his social and political statement. See for yourself--it makes interesting reading at: http://www.newcriterion.com/archive/20/jun02/steinbeck.htm', u'0.498736', u"Anytime you are tempted to feel down and out, watch this movie. I personally have seen it many times and are currently reading the book which I highly recommend. I cannot emphasize this enough. This is as down as you can get and still survive. We are taught to be grateful when watching this and to also consider the other guy, whoever he is and at the least, do not add to his burden. Actors are on their game as is the Director. Of course, none of this exists if it wasn't for John Steinbeck and his book. I thought about this movie during the recent Real Estate downturn and what the banks did in real life was indeed captured in this movie way back when. Indifferent, callous, and greedy while practicing their rights leaves one with a bad taste in the mouth and we bailed them out if that isn't the gall of galls. Have something to eat while watching to appreciate that you have food and the people in the movie do not, a tasty drink and a snack which is unheard of back during the depression days will help you connect more to the movie theme. There is humility, gratitude and lessons to be learned while being entertained. Its called a TEN thank you", u'0.0308023', u'John Steinbeck\'s "The Grapes of Wrath" undoubtedly ranks among the greatest works of American realist literature. It stands as a testament of the Great Depression era where tenant farmers of the dust bowls suffer under drought, then are brutally dispossessed and driven from their Oklahoma homes, forced to find their luck elsewhere. In the end all they have is themselves, as the trip to find the blessed land California demands a heavy toll, is accompanied by tragedies and setbacks and the outlook is bleak in the face of the greed that exploits honest workers to make a buck. John Ford tries the impossible - to go for an authentic rendition of the multilayered, detail packed, all around magnificently written Steinbeck material, and definitely succeeds in delivering an indispensable heart-wrenching film portraying the never ending struggle of the Joads. Any direct comparison between book and film however is moot, enjoy both for what they are. On board in this road movie of the existential kind are Henry Fonda as an ex-convict, John Carradine as a disillusioned preacher and the Oscar winning Jane Darwell as Ma Joad, all first-rate acting with strong support of an array of bit players who help the crude reality take shape. Highly recommendable! There are downsides, though. For one the two hours of screen time can barely correspond to the epic proportions of the novel. However, the entry is still much more complete than Kazan\'s adaption of Steinbeck\'s other epic drama "East of Eden", starring Jimmy Dean, which only shows a fraction of the story. The one real liability however is the diluted ending which was tucked on as a concession to the mass audience while Steinbeck\'s epic hits you with full force. Well, if you want the real thing, read the book. With the film you get a pretty good taste of it.', u'0.258635'], u'tt0118715': [u'\nThe Big Lebowski is the type of movie that is so funny, and so clever, you want nothing more but to meet the Coen brothers, congratulate them personally for their unique talent, and get inside their heads and find out what makes these two geniuses "tick".  The main characters are Jeff Bridges (who plays such broad roles like The Muse, The Contender, and Sea Biscuit), John Goodman (who should have won an oscar for best supporting actor for his character, Walter Sobchak)Juliane Moore (Maude Lebowski)and Steve Buscemi (who is unique in every Coen Brother movie).\n\nThe first time I saw this movie, I will admit that I enjoyed it, but did not fully appreciate its level of humor and raw talent.  I thought the middle section was a bit too depressing and long.  But trust me, this is a movie that gets more funny every time you see it, even if it\'s your thousandth time seeing it. Its level of comedy, action, brutality, and vulgarity become that much more evident and important.\n\nThe characters are brilliantly written by the coen brothers, and, likewise, are brilliantly portrayed by the actors.  The Big Lebowski is like no other film.  It will make you laugh and it will make you cry.  There is no other film such as TBL that is sharp and witty all the way through. One of the Joel and Ethan Coen\'s best, and one of the movie industry\'s best comedic film of all time.  You want to go see this flick.  ', u'0.410829', u"It's a travesty that most critics only read The Big Lebowski at its most superficial level and called it a modern take on a Raymond Chandler potboiler. I simply can't begin to perceive how one could sit down in front of this cinematic pop-poetry, as it plates gold on the silver screen, and not feel so incredibly alive. The dream sequence Busbee Berkley musical numbers are unique and awe-inspiring; the humor is rich, subtle, and clever in the way it satirizes politically correct arrogance; the free-flowing story avoids (even pokes fun at) nonessentials like plot points and pay-offs. But what really makes this film such a masterpiece, such a panacea, is the incredible humanism, the care that the Coen brothers put in developing The Dude (Jeff Bridges), Walter (John Goodman), Donnie (Steve Buscemi-tremendously endearing), and Brandt (magnificently played by Phillip Seymour Hoffman). Looking at the films use of Sam Elliott to play The Stranger, who constantly rambles about the many wonders of The Dude (among other things), it is clear that the film is an ode to a Dudist way of life. And in a time where so many film promise that they have the answer to the worlds problems and end up as slick, stylistic show-off films, what more could one ask for than a good-hearted film like this? Not to mention the performance by Jeff Bridges, which ranks among the best performances of the nineties; he has a relaxed slouch, a goofy smile, an enthusiastic dance, and his buttons can only be pushed by Walter, who John Goodman plays with charm and fury. The Coen brothers have always been considered 'cold' filmmakers, but there is nothing here but warmth and humanity (as is the case with the Coens' Fargo). What we have here is one of the greatest achievements in modern cinema and if you can't see that, grab a White Russian, hit the bowling ally, and find your inner-Dude as soon as possible.", u'0.459473', u'\nMy favourite Coen brothers movie changes over the years as I watch and rewatch their amazingly original and consistently surprising oeuvre. When I first saw \'The Big Lebowski\' on its original release I enjoyed it but thought it was a bit of a slight "fun" movie with less depth than many of their previous works. Now, a few years and several viewing later, I have come to realise just how accomplished a movie it is, and it has become one of my all time favourite movies. Other film makers have attempted to weave together various genres, styles and images in a similarly eclectic, postmodern fashion, but few do it as seamlessly and with such wit as Ethan and Joel Coen. \'The Big Lewboski\' is an extremely smart film, but it doesn\'t shout "look at me! Aren\'t I clever?". It sucks you in from the get go, and bottom line it is FUNNY, and as it is a comedy that\'s what counts the most! Everything about the movie is perfect, the script, the direction, set design, costumes, and the wonderful soundtrack (one of the most brilliant ever assembled, it includes lesser known Dylan and Elvis Costello numbers, Creedence classics, and songs from cult favourites like Yma Sumac, Captain Beefheart, Moondog, Esquivel and garage gods The Monks). Plus of course the actors, who are well cast and virtually flawless. Jeff Bridges (\'Fat City\', \'Starman\') IS The Dude, and it\'s impossible to think of anyone else acting the role. Coen regulars John Goodman, Steve Buscemi, John Turturro, Peter Stomare, and Jon Polito are all on board, as well as Julianne Moore (\'Boogie Nights\'), David Huddleston (\'Capricorn One\'), Philip Seymour Hoffman (\'Magnolia\') and Sam Elliot (\'Mask\'), even surprise cameos from Ben Gazzara (\'The Killing Of A Chinese Bookie\') and singer Jimmie Ray Gilmore. I can\'t fault \'The Big Lebowski\', it is one of the most original and entertaining comedies ever made and a genuine modern classic. It\'s movies like this that keep me watching despite the endless mountain of mindless garbage that Hollywood continually spews out. If only every movie in the box office Top Ten was as inspired and amusing as this one!', u'0.400244', u"With the combination of the writing of the Coen brothers and the Cinematography of Roger Deakins, they created a film as beautiful as it is funny. The Coen brothers consistently impress me with their ability to write an interesting story with fascinating yet quirky characters. Without resorting to gratuitous sexual scenes like many other writer/directors of R rated films the Coen brothers manage to add the right amount of language and violence that is necessary to the story without it becoming the only reason for watching. 'The Big Lebowski' has so many clever and hilarious lines that you have to watch it over and over again. \n\nNothing else needs to be said about it other than it is the greatest movie ever made.", u'0.716897', u'\nNo movie has entertained me more in the last year than this film. It\'s delightfully written, directed with poise and acted with extravagance and excellence. I do admit that this is a film that I had to see six times to get. Every time I watch it I learn something new. The genius of the film lies within a game I think the Coen brothers play with their audiences. There are the touches of the masters in many of their films. In "The Hudsucker Proxy," it was Preston Sturges and Frank Capra. In "Raising Arizona," I felt a touch of Sam Fuller. In this film, I felt many touches of greatness, but more specifically I felt John Sayles or even John Cassevettes in spots. The camera was manipulated beautifully and I felt a tinge of their talents lurking in at many a turn. The performances are astounding, especially Goodman as the deranged bowler still living deep within the jungles of the Vietcong. Huddleston is also quite wonderful as the title character. Turturro gives a fine cameo as "Jesus," coupled with a rousing and humurous version of the Eagles, "Hotel California," done in Espanol. I hope this is a film that is looked at with more seriousness. It is, once you dig deep, a fine piece of filmmaking.  ', u'0.497448', u'It\'s actually kind of hard to describe this movie (and what\'s so great about it) to people who don\'t already know it and love it; as with many cult films, The Big Lebowski will either speak to you (in which case you will become a fervent follower of His Dudeness and abide by his code for the rest of your life) or, if it doesn\'t, the film will either leave you completely indifferent or you\'ll even downright hate it.\n\nI believe it\'s a very funny film and I\'m sure it can be rightfully called a comedy, but don\'t expect punchlines, gags, jokes or slapstick - it\'s not that kind of comedy. If you want to enjoy this film, you have to meet Jeffery "The Dude" Lebowski by his terms, hang out with him and his bowling buddies and follow them at a their (perhaps somewhat leisurely) pace through this weird and unbelievable tale about nihilism, theft (of a car and, more importantly: a Creedence Clearwater Revival tape), kidnapping, abstract art, porn and - of course - bowling. \n\nThe story is actually kind of simple. You see, some no-good German nihilists urinated on The Dude\'s rug - and this kind of aggression just won\'t stand against The Dude. With the help of his bowling buddies, he will do everything in his power to get someone to pay for his rug - or possibly get a new one (because that rug really tied the room together). So he embarks on this worthy quest during which he will encounter many wondrous things and fascinating people (even Jesus - who is NOT the messiah but a very naughty man).\n\nWith Jeff Bridges in the leading role, the Coen brothers have found the perfect actor to incorporate one of the most iconic characters that has ever been created. But it\'s not just The Dude that makes this a winner; the whole film is such an inspired folly and simply inventive filmmaking at its finest (the hilarious dream sequence alone is worth the price of admission). The supporting cast is outstanding (J.Turturro, J.Goodman and S.Buscemi among many others), the song choices are perfect and the dialog is the funniest, most quotable in any comedy I\'ve ever seen. This - for me - is without a doubt the film with the highest rewatchability factor of all time. 10 stars out of 10.\n\nFavorite Films: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054200841/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/', u'0.370359', u'\nThe Coen brothers are up there with my very favorite filmmakers (Scorsese, Kubrick, Carpenter).  I am very fond of their work.  Throughout their irreverent career, they have explored different subjects and themes.  Their best stories evolve from  kidnapping schemes in films like "Raising Arizona " and "Fargo", one of my very favorites.  I thought that film was fervently free.  I was so ever wrong. It\'s as if the Coen Brothers have celebrated their complete breakthrough success (Academy Award winners), and now are willing to do whatever they please.  "The Big Lebowski" is a film so meandering, so wonderfully novel, that I found myself missing the many other sporadic jokes as I was heaving from laughter.  The film is basically about mistaken identity, eccentric characters, and a soiled rug.  This film extols the bowler, the allies, even the pins.  We experience an actual bowling ball POV, as the Dude (Jeff Bridges) hallucinates.  This film has nihilists, feminists, millionares, paedophiles, drugged out hippies, underachieving students, incompetent criminals, pornographers and \'Nam veterans.  This movie is open to anything , anything...   Some people are turned off by absurd looniness, because it\'s so grandiosely different.  Yet who couldn\'t chuckle, if not explode, when a bowler dressed in a tight purple suit licks a bowling ball\'s finger hole, and the camera pans down to reveal his name as Jesus!   I will disclose no more, but urgently recommend you to traverse to your nearest video abode and rent this true escapists\' feature. Abandon all solemn inhibitons, though!  One can not keep a straight face whilst watching.', u'-0.0673145', u"Acting is one of the most key elements to success or failure of a film. Some film types can survive without superb acting. These motion pictures can entertain the viewer with special effects or intense action scenes. A film based on heavy dialog and back-story can not survive with out excellent actors. One such movie that meets the dialog-based criterion is The Big Lebowski. The film follows Jeff 'The Dude' Lebowski (Jeff Bridges) and his two close friends through a not so normal chain of events. The story is augmented by the supporting characters Walter (John Goodman) and Donny (Steve Buscemi). Written by Joel and Ethan Coen, the creative forces behind Fargo, the intriguing story succeeds because of the actors' impeccable skill. \n\nAs with many other films by the Coen brothers The Big Lebowski is an odd array of out of the ordinary characters slapped right in the middle of an improbable situation. The Dude is an unlikely hero living in the city of Los Angeles who becomes embroiled in a botched kidnapping. This is not the average kidnapper comedy that has been seen a thousand times before. The Coen brothers take a fresh look at an old tired subject. The story they have created is intriguing and entertaining, but the true entertainment comes from the unique characters. Walter, played by John Goodman, is a Vietnam veteran who seems to have some parts of post traumatic stress syndrome. Donny, another one of The Dude's close friends, is a quiet unassuming character who often interjects into conversation, but no one pays close attention to what he says.\n\nAs well as these characters are written, they would not be as effective had they been played by other actors. This effectiveness of acting can be seen in the opening scene at the bowling alley where the supporting characters are first introduced. This scene is comprised of Donny, Walter, and The Dude sitting at their lane in the bowling alley discussing the attack on The Dude by some hired thugs (7min 25 sec). The Dude is approaching the situation in his usual lackadaisical way. Jeff Bridges conveys The Dude's overall demeanor in his laid back, sauntering, walk. Although being laid back, Bridges is direct in his speaking showing that The Dude is not the average confused old stoner. Bridges facial expressions during this scene show The Dude is distressed about the loss of his rug which 'tied the room together.'\n\nDonny seems to be an outside observer in this scene and throughout much of the film. Buscemi conveys his character's attention during discussion by following the flow of the conversation with his head. He looks from The Dude to Walter and from Walter to The Dude depending on who is talking. He may seem to be paying attention, but his asking of simple questions dispels this assumption. Another technique Buscemi uses is while he is observing the conversation he furrows his brow as if in deep thought and contemplation. This look of concentration is juxtaposed with the look of confused happiness, an empty smile, Buscemi uses when Donny makes a point in the conversation. These techniques which are introduced by Bridges and Buscemi early in the film are used throughout the entire picture. \n\nAlthough Bridges and Buscemi do an excellent job of introducing their characters traits to the viewer, Goodman superbly shows his character's inner traits. Throughout the conversation it is apparent due to dialog that Walter is becoming upset. Goodman conveys this anger with facial expressions and body movement. In the early part of the conversation Goodman puts on a stone face to show that Walter is firmly set in his position. The Dude begins to agitate Walter as the conversation continues. Goodman shows this agitation by furrowing his brow, leaning forward while talking, and turning progressively redder. As Goodman continues, his speaking becomes more staccato and flustered. When The Dude refers to one of the attackers as 'the china man,' Walter continues on his tirade momentarily then quietly addresses the non politically correct nature of The Dude's comment. Changing from this aggravated manner of speaking to a more politically correct and lower tone shows that Walter has some sudden mood swings and a short fuse, as he returns to his tirade quickly. \n\nThis scene exemplifies the acting skills of John Goodman, Jeff Bridges, and Steve Buscemi. The characters in this story have been given interesting and entertaining dialog by the writers, but it is up to the actors to make the characters exude a certain feeling or trait. In each of their roles the three main actors add a level of feeling to the characters that is lacking from many of the offerings of the dark comedy genre. Goodman's portrayal of Walter as the 'know it all' with a short fuse is downright hilarious. Jeff Bridges steps out of his usually serious persona to portray a character as laid back as they come, 'quite possibly the laziest in Los Angeles county.' Steve Buscemi is as entertaining as ever. His depiction of Donny, the character to rarely speak, adds depth to an otherwise bland side character. After viewing this film one can see why actors who can actually practice their craft are worth their weight in gold.", u'0.114143', u'\nThe Coen brothers (Joel and Ethan) are the most innovative and, perhaps, the best filmmakers working today. Or they at least rank along side the likes of Martin Scorsese and rising director star Quentin Tarantino. Think about it: "Blood Simple" was the best film of 1984; "Raising Arizona" was the best film of 1987; "Miller\'s Crossing" was the best movie of 1990; "Barton Fink" was the best movie of 1991; and "Fargo" was the best movie of 1996. Now comes their latest effort, "The Big Lebowski," which, while it isn\'t in quite the same league as the above films, is still one of the most thoroughly entertaining movies of 1998.\n\nIt tells the shambling story of a man named Jeff Lebowski, who calls himself The Dude (Jeff Bridges). The Dude\'s apartment gets broken into and a thief urinates on his rug. He finds out that the criminals were not looking for him, but looking for the OTHER Jeff Lebowski, the disabled millionaire (played by David Huddleston). That\'s all I can tell you. The rest is really too bizarre and complicated to put into words; but it\'s bizarre and complicated in the best ways of the words.\n\nStill, what I\'ll remember most about "The Big Lebowski" is the outstanding number of utterly terrific performances. Bridges delivers the best performance of his career and probably the best of the year as a bum lie-about who just wants to be left alone. John Goodman is the real comic gem here as the forever-loudmouthed Walter, The Dude\'s bowling partner and best friend. Steve Buscemi co-stars as the dimwitted, bug-eyed Donny, the third bowling partner; there\'s a small but interestingly offbeat spot for Julianne Moore; and John Torturro stops in, as Jesus the bowler, for what is probably the best walk-on performance in years. If you are a Coen brothers fan or like humor that is distinctly offbeat, you have found your movie. As a rather avid moviegoer, I found the film to be a great excersise in pointless extremeties and respectable raunch. Rated R. 117 minutes. 10 out of 10.', u'0.45271', u"\nI'd heard a lot of bad press about this movie. Not as good as Fargo, was a much used phrase. I wasn't overly impressed with Fargo, the atmosphere just didn't click for me, but anyway, that made me a little apprehensive about this.\n\nIt's easily better than Fargo, IMHO, and it's right up there with Barton Fink or Miller's Crossing. A true comedy classic with so many memorable lines and characters, but it's the movie's atmosphere which is so truly joyous, a wonderful celebration of basically doing nothing. Achieving one's goals is important, yes, but it's okay to set them low, is what I perceived this movie to be saying. As long as one is basically a good guy, then that's enough. Well, that's what it seemed like to me, and it was expressed so beautifully in the stunning cast of grotesques, lovely music ( although more Burwell would have been nice ), and the trippiest, funniest, most absurd dream sequences you've ever seen. Great stuff.", u'0.141417', u'\nThe Coen Brothers did it again! Just when I had lost my hope of seeing a new, GOOD, American movie, I went to see this. It absolutely blew my mind! Now I\'ve seen all the Coen-films, and I\'d have to say that this is one of the very best. It\'s about this guy, "The Dude", excellently played by Jeff Bridges, who gets an unexpected visit from two thugs who soil his carpet. This event triggers a kidnapping-drama, filled with black humor and crazy characters. I\'d recommend this film to everyone with an open mind and a twisted sense of humor. Perhaps thats why I liked it so much.', u'0.323315', u'the title sounded funny. Actors: Julianne Moore, Jeff bridges. OK, at first glance it looked promising. I really thought that I was going to have such a great time watching a comedy movie with great actors.\n\nThis movie has the great rating, the prominent actors that I much enjoy watch in many of their great performances... It seemed that it automatically was going to be a great comedy. so, I sat there waiting and waiting for the next great scene that never came up:-( I just felt that I wanted to laugh, but could not... needless to say, I did not get this movie...\n\nall the topics were funny but did not click together: the rug? The same name? The unusual nickname? The kidnapping of the girl? I mean... Jeff bridges and Julianne Moore can do way much better. I would not have waisted my time...', u'0.0682612', u"This film was supposed to be a comedy, and I admit that the very last scene was funny, but the rest of the film had no humor. The tremendous dependence on a single expletive and its many forms became dull and boring after the first five minutes during which it was used about 100 times. The two scenes in which a topless woman appeared were obviously inserted just so she could be shown, but there was no point other than that one. The scene in which a Corvette was destroyed was completely predictable, and it unfolded in a strange way, and then faded away.\n\nJulianna Moore was the best part of the film, and Joe Pesci's talents were wasted on a trivial part for which he clearly had no enthusiasm.\n\nJeff Bridges practiced in his role for his academy award as the character was identical.\n\nOnce again, Hollywood insists that all drug usage is good, lack of moral character is good, drinking is good, and being a bum is good if you have a heart of gold.\n\nThe film was long, too.", u'-0.373947', u'I like non-main stream flicks - Blue Velvet, Boxing Helena, and so on. I like comedy that is not dependent on stupid sight gags or scatological humor. This movie had been out for a few years before I watched it. It was, I had heard, a gem that was waiting for me. I had looked forward to it greatly.\n\nI didn\'t find any aspect of the movie funny, other than the enigma that it\'s well liked by many.\n\nI suppose this is where I differ from most - I don\'t find a guy walking around with a mixed drink all the time funny. I don\'t find Dan Conner overreaching as a guy who is a Vietnam vet freaking out about anything funny, particularly because that\'s been done before. I don\'t find the Italian guy acting fooling while bowling to be funny. I don\'t find referencing a guy as "the dude," with article obligatory, to be funny. And on and on. What\'s funny? Dennis Miller. He\'s funny. George Carlin. He\'s funny. The Big Lebowski - not funny.\n\nI really don\'t have any comment on the ins and outs of the movie. Just not funny, and, given that it\'s a comedy, that, to me, is a fatal mistake.', u'-0.0936261', u"This movie is not funny, it is not memorable, and it is not enjoyable. It's a story that reads like it was written by some pinhead with ADD who heavily self-medicates with marijuana; a ridiculous amount of random things happened for no damn discernible reason or even a more than tenuous connection between them. I am a charter member of the Jeff Bridges Fan Club and the way he was wasted was nearly criminal, and the same goes for Steve Buscemi. The movie needed a lot less John Goodman and a lot more John Turturro. It feels like some film student decided to ape the Coen brothers. If i hadn't rented this movie for free with a coupon, i would feel totally ripped off. Something about the movie made me dodge it when it came out, and all the years since, but i finally decided to fill in a gap in my Coen brothers movie track, and now i'm sorry. I blame all of you jerks.", u'-0.651467'], u'tt0266543': [u"\nI'll be totally honest and confirm to you that everything what they say about this movie is true. It's a brilliantly animated masterpiece with lots of humor that actually works and a plot that really brings tears to your eyes from time to time. The modern artists of Pixar never cease to amaze the audience in expanding their horizons. Finding Nemo is visually stunning and you can have nothing but respect for the people who created it.\n\n\nI was more or less skeptic about watching it, because it was so overhyped ! Two days before it got released in my country, the TV and press loudly announced that the DVD broke all records in the USA during its first release-day. That's usually a sign of being typically mainstream and fake...but Finding Nemo is not. I'm allergic to fake sentiment and pathetic feel-good movies but I was really touched by this one. The moral and valuable life lessons are always present, but they're not shoved down your throat or thrown in your face all the time. This movie really relativates itself and that's important for a good comedy. And it's hilarious !!! Every side character in Finding Nemo (and there are a LOT of them) is exceptional and worth a mention. And the voices are cast perfectly as well...like the voice of Willem Dafoe for Gill, for example...a perfect choice. The character of Dory ( speaks through the voice of Ellen DeGeneres ) steals the show. She's an adorable blue fish who suffers from amnesia. She forgets what she's doing or going to every five minutes and that really leads to hilarious situations. \n\nMovies like this aren't just being made for children exclusive... They're good for everyone to realize you have to entertain yourself from time to time and just to enjoy the little things in life. I recommend this to everyone in the world. No matter if you're 9 or 99 years old, Finding Nemo will bring a smile on your face and leave behind a warm feeling in your heart. ", u'0.344604', u'I have enjoyed most of the computer-animated films made so far, ranging from Pixar films like "Toy Story" and "The Incredibles" to DreamWorks films like "Shrek." But "Finding Nemo" is the one that remains unparalleled, not because of its comedy or creativity, both of which are equaled in the "Toy Story" movies and in "Monsters Inc.," but because it truly, more than any of the previous computer-animated features, reinvents the genre of the children\'s animated film.\n\nHumor in traditional animation is usually based on broad slapstick and physical exaggeration. There are occasional nods to this brand of humor in "Finding Nemo," as when a flock of seagulls ram into a boat and we see their beaks crowing on the other side of the sail. But such sequences only call attention to how far this movie generally departs from old cartoon conventions. Instead, the movie invests its world of sentient animals with a surprisingly scientific texture. All of the animals are based on real species. The fish tank is constructed out of real devices. There is a strong sense of locale, as Marlin (Albert Brooks) travels across the Pacific to Australia, where even the animals speak with an Australian accent. In a scene that I\'m sure Gary Larson of "Far Side" fame loved, a pelican discusses with a group of fish the intricate details of dentistry. The fact that the animals talk and understand what\'s going on is treated as though it were a natural feature of the world. The realism is so striking that by the end of the film, you\'ll almost believe it possible for fish to plot an escape from a tank.\n\nFar from making the film pedantic, this approach results in an intelligent but still entertaining picture. Most of the humor is based on parodies of human behavior: repentant sharks start a club that\'s like Alcoholics Anonymous, a school of fish act like obnoxious DJs while forming themselves into spectacular patterns, and a four-year-old girl behaves like most kids that age, oblivious and destructive. The manner in which Marlin finds his way to his son is so inventive that we can forgive the film for the number of coincidences involved.\n\nThe story employs the same basic formula used in "Toy Story," in which two characters, one uptight and the other clueless, are thrown together as they\'re forced to journey through a world populated by creatures that are a lot more knowing than the humans realize. This movie, however, creates a unique character in Dory (Ellen DeGeneres), a fish with short-term memory loss. To give a cartoon character a real human disorder is risky, to say the least, and I\'m glad the filmmakers didn\'t lose the nerve to include this ingenious device, which not only generates some of the film\'s biggest laughs, but reinforces the character interaction that is so central to the story. This is in fact the only Pixar film to feature true character development. In the course of his voyage, Marlin learns to be more adventurous, getting parenting tips from a surfer-dude turtle voiced by the film\'s director Andrew Stanton, while his son Nemo learns to be self-reliant.\n\nOf course, none of the sharks, jellyfish, whales, gulls, pelicans, lobsters, and humans that Marlin encounters along the way really mean any harm. They\'re just doing what they do. As Nigel the Pelican tells Nemo at one point, "Fish gotta swim, birds gotta eat." That\'s perhaps the film\'s most interesting insight, that there are no true villains, just creatures that act according to their nature, and a few that transcend it.', u'0.350193', u"\nOne of the best animated films I have ever seen. Great characters, amusing animation, and laugh-out-loud humor. Also, watch for the little skit shown after the credits. It's all great stuff that simply must be seen.", u'0.80836', u'\nPixar Studios have done it again. I have to say that these guys are totally good in computer animation, as well as in storytelling. Rarely do those qualities come together but here they are, delivering unto the audience once again something that one can only be drowned with wonder. Such is the marvel of Finding Nemo.\n\nThe story is about Nemo (voiced by Alexander Gould), a young clownfish who is fed up with his dad Marlin\'s (Albert Brooks) excessive paranoia over him. He swims to a place where his dad forbids him and ends up being captured by a scuba diver. He is then placed in a fish tank in a dental clinic somewhere along the harbors of Sydney. Thus the quest of Marlin, along with Dory (a hilarious forgetful blue tang voiced by Ellen DeGeneres) to find Nemo before it\'s too late.\n\nThe story is a simple one but where the film more than makes up is on the overwhelming sense of detail and rich, lavish colors and textures as if we aren\'t really watching an animated film at all. Scenes such as Marlin bringing Nemo to school while swimming through corals and anemones, to the aquarium where Nemo was taken to, are nothing short of breathtaking, and undoubtedbly one of the most outstanding animation ever to hit the screen.\n\nThe world of "Finding Nemo" is simply alive with lovable creatures swimming about their daily lives under the ocean, darting across the screen in playful manners. The viewer almost literally dives into another world for nearly two hours and one cannot help but be completely captivated.\n\n\nThe music and screenplay also blend very well with the visual feast that it produces such a high quality movie. From its basic storyline, to the father-and-son relationship theme, to the wonderful underwater world throughout, this is really an adventure through an ocean of stunning visuals and storytelling.\n\nGrade: A', u'0.623506', u"\nRemember back when you were little.you know, back when tall to you was about as high as a mailbox? In those days, Disney animated films (e.g. `Lion King' and `Beauty and the Beast') were some of the coolest things out there and were movies to watch over and over (much to your parents' chagrin). Now, animated movies aren't exactly the `coolest' things to see, but an exception can be made for the uber-hip Pixar movies, the most recent of which being `Finding Nemo'.\n\nAfter losing all but one of his brood, Marlin (Albert Brooks) an over-protective clown fish that strangely lacks a sense of humor, has resolved to protect his one (slightly disabled) `child' remaining, Nemo (Alexander Gould). But disaster strikes as Nemo is taken by a Sydney dentist and plopped into a fish tank where he is comforted by a host of other captive fish (William Dafoe, Vicki Lewis, Allison Janney, et al). But back in the big ocean Down Under, Marlin has resolved to search out his one remaining progeny.\n\nAlong the way on his quest, Marlin acquires a tag-along `friend', Dory (Ellen DeGeneres)-a fish with, well, the memory capacity of a fish. The two must surmount hurdles like a group of sharks (Eric Bana, Barry Humphries and Bruce Spence) that have (mostly) sworn off eating other fish, a nasty swarm of jellyfish, a bird-brained flock of seagulls, and others.\n\nThis is the bridge! Well, in a way. Back when I was younger, one of my favorite films was `The Incredible Mr. Limpet', which, for the uninitiated, combined live-action with under-the-sea fish animation. What Pixar has done here was bring back that film to my mind and start me thinking, because they have created a wondrous undersea environment (with `normal-looking' fish instead of 1960s animated fish).\n\nMy favorite feature in this movie chock-full of sweet treats must be the sharks. I have always been partial to the shark family, but what has been done in creating three humorous sharks (what a movie concept), just sent paroxysms of laughter through me. Another thing that (mostly) works is Ellen DeGeneres' fish (character?) that provides a fairly constant source of laughter with her antics (although a couple gags do wear on the viewer with time). On the whole though, there is not a single bit of shoddy voice-acting or animation in it.\n\nCompared to `Monsters Inc.', `Finding Nemo' is something of a revival for Pixar. I like how they have stepped up their efforts to make an altogether pleasing film without any big flaws. The thing that I did not like with `Monsters' was the inclusion of a single key (but EXTREMELY annoying) character. Director Andrew Stanton has done an excellent job at making the film work and be (basically) non-annoying to most of the general public (and this critic).\n\nI suppose life has come full circle-now that I am (relatively) old as a high school graduate, animation is cool again, thanks to high-powered computers, at any rate. `Finding Nemo' is one heckuva movie and a good one to take anyone you know to, trust me on this-nine out of ten.\n", u'0.1622', u"Those guys and girls at Disney/Pixar have done it again, they've created the perfect underwater world, full of fascinating Disney characters.\n\nA truly enchanting story of a father (Marlon) who loses his son (Nemo), and with help of his new found friend (Dory) ventures out into the ocean to try to find him. On this epic voyage he gets to battle sharks, surf with some turtle dudes, dice with some jellyfish and survive an encounter in a whales stomach.\n\nAll the characters are vibrant with Disney charm, but my favourite is Dory, the comic relief, probably one of the funniest Disney characters ever written and superbly voiced by Ellen DeGeneres, pure genius.\n\nAll in all this is another success for Disney and Pixar, It brings out the child in all of us.\n\nSolid family fun 8/10", u'0.660548', u"\nHas there ever been a better-looking feature-length animated film than `Finding Nemo'?  We doubt it.  With its shimmering underwater landscapes - be they in the vast immensity of a limitless ocean or the cramped confines of a dentist office aquarium - the film sports a look unlike anything we have ever seen before.  The fish tank setting, in particular, is a veritable wonderland of eye-popping, many-hued visual splendor.\n\nAlthough the script by Andrew Stanton doesn't scale the comedic heights of, say, `Aladdin,' `Shrek' or `Toy Story 2,' it still sparkles with enough wit and inventiveness to entrance youngsters and beguile the grownups who will be joining them in their viewing.  I hasten to point out that the screenplay is blessedly free of all the double entendres and off-color humor that have blighted so much alleged `kiddie' fare in recent years.  This is a film on e\ncan watch with one's children and grandchildren and not once have to blush or turn away in embarrassment while doing so.  Creators of children's films please take note (and take note, too, of its phenomenal box office take).\n\nLike many tales designed for the junior set (`Dumbo,' `Bambi' etc.), `Finding Nemo' taps into the fear all children have of being separated from their parents - and the concomitant fear all parents have of being separated from their children.  It is upon this common ground that members of both generations will meet in their emotional response to this film.  In this case, it is little Nemo, an adorable clownfish, who is plucked out of the ocean and plunked down into the saltwater aquarium of a dentist in Sydney, Australia.  The subject of the film's title is Marlin, Nemo's overprotective, worrywart dad who swims his way towards the continent to find and rescue his little tyke.  Along the way, this Nervous Nellie parent learns a little something about giving his son the freedom a boy needs to grow up and become a man, and Nemo, himself, learns a thing or two about just what kind of a fish his dad really is.\n\nAlbert Brooks and Ellen DeGeneres are brilliant as Marlin and Dory, respectively, the latter a befuddled, daffy and utterly good-natured fish who helps Marlin in his epic quest not only for his lost son but his own definition of filial love.  Those familiar with these two fine comedic talents in their live-action performances will actually be able to see many of their distinctive inflections and facial expressions reflected in the animated characters they are portraying.\n\nAs directed by Stanton and Lee Unkrich, and executed by an army of wonder-working animators and technicians, `Finding Nemo' takes PIXAR technology to its ultimate, final level of perfection - till the studio's next release, that is.\n\n\n", u'0.084783', u'"Finding Nemo" is a wonderful animated adventure movie that simply is irresistible for young as well as older persons.\n\nThe most excellent thing about "Finding Nemo" is the perfect timing, just like in "Monsters, Inc" the jokes are extremely well placed in a quick pace and are good for more then just a few laughs.\n\nThere are some very fun and great characters which brings me to the only problem I have with this movie. There are too many minor characters, I would have really loved to see some of the characters getting a bigger role with some more importance to the story instead of meeting character after character that are only on screen for no more than 5 minutes (such as the sharks). Sure it\'s good for the sense of adventure but it leaves some missed opportunities to make the story even more fun.\n\nI think it\'s pretty obvious that the story is inspired on the "Lord of the Rings" trilogy since it uses lot\'s of elements from it and it has the some feeling of adventure and excitement so it\'s really not a big thing that the story isn\'t very original, the original and fun way the story is told in compensates for this.\n\nThe voice cast as in many animated movies is impressive but the one that stood out was Ellen DeGeneres as Dory that you love to hate.\n\nIrresistible movie for the whole family with great jokes and lines and some memorable characters and situations. \n\nMine, mine, mine!\n\n9/10\n\nhttp://bobafett1138.blogspot.com/', u'0.359683', u'Pixar Animation Studios has a very good knack for making thoughtful, intelligent and humorous family films (note that I didn\'t say kid films). "Toy Story" 1 & 2 and "Monsters, Inc." are some of my favorite family films; "Finding Nemo" isn\'t one of my favorites, but it isn\'t disappointing like "A Bug\'s Life," and it is thoughtful, intelligent, humorous and incredibly watchable, just like the other Pixar films.\n\nAs always, Pixar takes a world of something and completely builds their story around it. In "Toy Story" they gave life to toys and created the world through their eyes. In "Monsters, Inc.," they showed us the monster world. In my review on "A Bug\'s Life," I said that the reason the film didn\'t work very much is because it was about bugs, and not about something mystical like toys or monsters that bring back childhood memories. Well, I guess I was sorta wrong, because "Finding Nemo" is all about fish, nothing too mystical about fish, and I still loved it.\n\nThis tale takes place underwater with the fish Marlin (voiced by Albert Brooks), whose spouse and baby fish eggs get eaten by a vicious shark in the beginning. All but one egg which Marlin names Nemo.\n\nYears later Nemo (voiced by Alexander Gould, Elliot\'s son?) is a bit older, and heading off to fish school for the first time. But haunted by the fact that his spouse and offspring were all killed years ago, Marlin is extremely over-protective of his one remaining family member. Nemo, sick of being treated like a baby, proves how brave he is by swimming near a fishing boat, only to be captured by a scuba-diving dentist. And so Marlin heads off to find Nemo, with the help of his newfound companion Dory (voice of Ellen DeGeneres), who has short-term memory loss and forgets things sooner than she can carry whatever she is doing out. (Like when she is showing Marlin the way towards a fishing boat and suddenly forgets why Marlin is following her.)\n\nPixar doesn\'t let down the audience on this film. There are a few things that one can always expect from Pixar films: They can expect something (such as toys) to be given their own world. They can expect that world to be given careful attention to detail. And they can expect humor.\n\n"Finding Nemo" gives fish their own world, and the underwater realm they live in is paid careful attention, painstakingly captured on film with computer graphics. And the humor is always there. All the characters are funny. I especially like the sequences from the inside of a fish tank in the dentist\'s office, with a bunch of fish including Gill (Willem Dafoe\'s vocal talents), who constantly tries to escape. By doing so, Gill has suffered major injuries, including landing on the dentist\'s tools and getting sliced up. This is, of course, a parody of escaping POWs. The fact that Willem Dafoe was in the great war movie "Platoon" might have something to do with that.\n\nThis is taken from my "Monsters, Inc." review: "Pixar once again not only expands our mind, but our very worlds. I respect their company and commitment values very much, as you can read in my \'Toy Story\' review. They stick to the values that made Disney films so family-friendly back in the fifties and sixties: Respect for the audience, respect for quality, and respect for the audience\'s INTELLIGENCE, something Disney, who has recently coughed up a bunch of lousy, thoughtless sequels, has forgotten. Now, I know that LEGALLY Disney is co-creator of \'Toy Story\' and \'Monsters, Inc.,\' but they really are not. They just give Pixar the money and get their name branded on the front box of the film. And even then, I have heard multiple claims that Disney is very mean-spirited towards Pixar (read into sequel trouble for \'Toy Story 3\') and gives them the bare minimum.\n\nWith "Finding Nemo," I still stick towards what I said. Pixar Animation Studios is probably the best family film company out there right now, I really hope they separate from Disney some day and form their own production company. They know what interests both kids and adults, and it\'s almost creepy how they can make their films so engaging and fun to watch. This is one to take the kids to, and afterwards, maybe even sneak back into again by yourself.', u'0.213908', u"Marlin, a nervous and neurotic clownfish is heavily overprotective of his son Nemo, who only wants to explore the sea in its entirety. When Nemo gets caught by a scuba diver and taken away, it is up to Marlin to swallow his own fears and find Nemo. The ensuing search and rescue organized by the him is a mass effort by swimming and flying creatures of all sizes and personalities, such as a threesome of vegetarian sharks, a fish with short term memory and an aged turtle, all helping him realise the error of his ways in restricting himself to just his home.\n\nAs charming as it is beautiful, Finding Nemo is a joy, both visually and cinematically. The characters are all so appealing and sweet that you want to hug each and every one of them, Nemo and Dory in particular. But the film transcends above just a generic animated film, for there are lessons to be learnt by it too. The film often tells a children's tale from an adult's point of view, with risky situations and emotional soul-searching putting stress on a disjointed family.\n\nThe sea is brought to us in such a memorable and unique way that there is brilliance and beauty in every frame. The animation is of all time high for Pixar, and the sound mixing and editing are also to be credited, as they capture the heart of the sea creditably. But perhaps the best thing about the film is the musical score by Thomas Newman. He creates the essence of the sea, as well as the emotions felt by the fish throughout. Note the masterwork that occurs as an upbeat, jovial number quickly escalates into something darker in a matter of minutes. In short, the music is superb.\n\nThe voice cast are capable and cannily chosen, from young Alexander Gould as the na\xefve Nemo, as well as Albert Brooks as the bumbling Marlin. But the star of the show is Ellen DeGeneres as Dory. As the forgetful but caring fish, she is sweet and soulful, and provides much of the comedy of the film. But the humour is also provided by the great script, which delivers a potentially dull story with wit and soul, and shies away from the sentimentality that could so easily arise of a Disney film. And the jokes, what jokes \x96 from satire, spoof and slapstick, they'll be a one-liner for everybody here.\n\nGorgeous to look at and utterly adorable, Finding Nemo sets the standard for how animated movies should being terms of entertainment value as well as story and themes \x96 ending with the touching, thought-provoking message of how too much protectiveness on the parent's side will repel, but, no matter how independent a child (or fish) believes themselves to be, they'll always need their parents.", u'0.197323', u"This is a good film but overrated. There, I said it.\n\nThis was just too reminiscent of when 'Shrek' first hit the screens, in 2001 \x96 the 3D animation everyone was going gaga over, repeatedly hailing as the greatest animated movie ever, and yet didn't really impress me all that much. Seemingly, I was the only person on the planet to feel that way. I didn't really 'get' 'Shrek', don't especially 'get' it even now, and for some reason I didn't quite manage to 'get' 'Finding Nemo' either, the next 3D film to get the 'greatest animated movie' ever proclamation, in spite of the fact that I was really, really determined to kick off my socks and enjoy this one. Well, it's cute and it's colourful, and the idea of a father clownfish (named Marlin) trekking the ocean to be reunited with his missing son (named, oddly enough, Nemo) is a nice one for sure, but there was just something about it which left me feeling strangely unsatisfied. All in all it's a worthy venture for the Pixar cabinet, visually gorgeous and with a handful of effective moments, but seriously, they have done better.\n\nThe main problem comes in the story structure, which is too rambling and disjointed to do it for me. I actually agree with another viewer who commented that it felt more like that of a multi-levelled video game than a movie. All it really involves is Marlin swimming along and avoiding getting chomped by dangerous sea-dwelling predator after sea-dwelling predator. We meet plenty of interesting characters along the way, but the nature of the story means that they're removed from the action within minutes. For example, the trio of sinister but slow-witted sharks struggling to go veggie, who have a lot less screen time than the promotional posters and trailers might imply and are never given the chance to amount to much more than a few time-filling wisecracks. Nigel the pelican, in spite of Geoffrey Rush's spunky voicing, is a mostly bland character whose motives for befriending and assisting the fish are left conveniently unspoken (after all, naturally he's another sea-dwelling predator himself), and I found the surfer turtles just a tad annoying (particularly the young ones \x96 call me heartless, but bleh!).\n\nAnother pretty nagging drawback is that neither protagonist, be it Marlin or Nemo, is nearly as sympathetic as past Pixar creations like Woody or Sulley. Marlin is too whiny to be truly likable, and Nemo doesn't really get the great deal of development you'd usually expect in a title character. The script is notably also less sharp than previous Pixar instalments. There was one scene in the dentist's waiting room which had me in stitches, but that was about it. It's mostly just movie in-jokes for most of the time. While in 'Toy Story' the various nods to other movies were little more than subtle extras for the sharp-eyed viewer to enjoy alongside a script brimming with plenty of witty gags of its own, they're pretty much integral to this screenplay. 'Finding Nemo' suffers from the same 'self-indulgent movie spoof' syndrome that you can find in most 3D animation from the Dreamworks stable, with a slew of constant parodies (that most of us have already seen at some point in 'the Simpsons') substituting for real humour. Usually, Pixar are always one step ahead of their rivals in this respect, but this time round even they were unable to resist succumbing to it.\n\nThere are certain aspects of 'Finding Nemo' that I liked. For example, Dory, the regal blue tang who trails Marlin insistently on his travels \x96 technically she's as 2D as everyone else in this flick, her whole character consisting of little more than the one-joke comedy gimmick that she suffers from short term memory loss and can never remember quite what she's doing. There's so much potential here to be annoying, but somehow she manages to pull through and, against the odds, prove a surprisingly charming character throughout. Perhaps it comes down to Ellen DeGenere's brilliant voice work. Also, I like it that the standard comic relief sidekick can finally be female, and that Marlin and Dory manage to maintain an entirely platonic relationship throughout (no token love interests here).\n\nBut the most interesting character by far is William Dafoe's hard-bitten Moorish idol, Gill \x96 he's given some hints of a personal history, yet it goes curiously understated throughout. Many of the 'Tank Gang' sequences seem pretty out of place (what does the welcome ritual have to add to the story, other than establishing the existence of that bubble volcano?), but nonetheless, some of the dialogue exchanged between Gill and Nemo is quite nice and add a sprinkling of depth to a film which I otherwise found to be just a little too\x85hollow?\n\nPlus, the sight of an angler fish caught up in a pair of diving goggles is unexpectedly alluring - still, the poor, poor creature ;)\n\n'Finding Nemo' isn't a bad film by any means. In fact, it's pretty darn good. But Pixar have made other movies which, ironically, could blow this clean out of the water. In short, it's sweet and pleasant but \x96 there's that word again - overrated.\n\nGrade: B", u'-0.141014', u"\nNever, and I mean, never, in my entire life, has a movie effect me the same way Finding Nemo did. It's the best movie I've EVER seen, and I know I say that about alot movie, but I actually mean it this time. Never, did I ever come out of a theater after seeing a movie smile for the rest of the night. The movie just completely blew me away. I knew it was going to be good, but I had no clue what was in store for me when I saw it opening night. This movie is a work of pure genius. The animation is just beautiful, acting is awesome, the music fit everything that was going on. I could go on and on with this list, but I think I'll stop there. What I liked mostly about this movie was that it didn't lack anything at all. There was just the right amount of comedy, drama, suspense/action, and even romance. And it all blended together beautifully. This is why I gave this movie a full 10. Believe, me if I could give it more, I would.", u'0.163547', u'\nSpoilers herein.\n\nSteve Jobs drags us all into higher awareness. He does so by grabbing our attention by  conventional means but does his real work subliminally.\n\nIn the computer world, what we see is a coherent, accessible approach with appealing  style. In the movie world we see the same, except the art of excellent character  development and storytelling is substituted for sheer functionality and ease of creativity.  In both, we all are pulled by this tractor into a more refined space.\n\nAnd space is what it is all about, in particular a notion of location in space coupled with a  higher degree of freedom within that space.\n\nThis has been a concern of intelligent filmmakers all along. Griffith merged the theatrical  space with grand vistas of mass movement and did so from a spot no human would  normally have. Welles and Kurosawa played with this, the first by working with  architecture, the other by flattening in deep focus. But until the eighties we always had to  deal with the reality of the ground -- and the horizon.\n\nThe real appeal of "Star Wars" wasn\'t the cowboy story or guns, nor the pseudo-religious  trappings, though we all thought it was. It was the freedom from that hard bottom, the  Earth which we interact with in as consistently as breath and blood. "Star Wars" -- and  "2001" before -- gave a thrill because our visual vocabulary was now expanded spatially  rather than ALWAYS being referenced to the floor.\n\nPixar\'s work has always been cognizant of this new frontier even when owned by Lucas.  Under Jobs, every film has become more and more dimensional until now. We don\'t honk  around with the camera as much as I would like, but we do set a new standard for  interacting space. Naturally, all else is well crafted but serves this notion of space ?  especially the fishtank business.\n\nTed?s Evaluation -- 3 of 4: Worth watching. ', u'0.206059', u"I loved this film, loved everything about it, it's colourful and entertaining and funny and sad and everything else you could wish for in an animated film. I myself am a collector of banned films, video nasties, so bad they're good films, gore-a-plenty etc etc, but I have watched Finding Nemo more than any other film I own. And I can TOTALLY relate to Dory :oD\n\nI loved this film, loved everything about it, it's colourful and entertaining and funny and sad and everything else you could wish for in an animated film. I myself am a collector of banned films, video nasties, so bad they're good films, gore-a-plenty etc etc, but I have watched Finding Nemo more than any other film I own. And I can TOTALLY relate to Dory :oD", u'0.198924', u'Can Pixar and Disney miss with a film? Both Toy Story\'s, A Bugs Life, Monster\'s Inc., Finding Nemo, and The Incredibles. These movies are instant classics.\n\nThe movie in focus is Finding Nemo, a story of a clown fish named Marlin (voiced by Albert Brooks), trying to find his son Nemo who was taken away by scuba divers. With the help of a fish named Dory (Ellen Degeneres)Marlin bumps into on his journey, they set out on finding Nemo. The only problem is that Dory suffers from short-term memory loss. She can\'t remember anything except her name. It\'s sad but brings a lot of comedy to the movie.\n\nAlong the way they meet some priceless characters like Crush (voiced by writer/director Andrew Stanton), the thrill seeking sea turtle. They also encounter a trio of friendly sharks, Bruce, Anchor, and Chum. They have sworn to never eat a fish again. They also run into some potentially deadly situations with an ugly deep sea fish, also a huge swarm of jellyfish, and a whale. Marlin and Dory must tough it out and make it to find Nemo.\n\nMeanwhile, Nemo is now the new addition to an Australian dentist\'s office aquarium. There he meets some interesting characters. Peach the starfish, Bloat the blowfish, and more sea dwellers. There Nemo tries to fit in, becoming a member of the tank named "Shark Bait". He tries to help out Gill (William Defoe) with his plan to escape from the tank and get everyone out. Nemo must come through in order to see his father ever again. A local pelican named Nigel (Geoffrey Rush) also tries to help out in the escape. Word has spread around the world of Marlin\'s trip to find his son, reaching Nigel.\n\nFInding Nemo is an instant classic. With great lines and unforgettable characters, this movie is a delight. The animation itself is remarkable. It\'s as though the fish are really swimming. You can even see particles floating in the water. Light shines through and currents make the fish and surrounding react. The animators have done their homework for this picture.\n\nThis movie is quite an experience. It is a film the whole family can enjoy for years to come. It is a timeless adventure that people can enjoy. Don\'t let this film drift out to sea...', u'0.202348'], u'tt0116282': [u'I\'ve always thought Fargo would make a great Shakesperean play; you could alter the modern elements and still have created a buzz 400 years ago in suburban England. Indeed, the plot is similar to Hamlet\'s, in that they both have characters we root for who create zany plans than end up spinning wildly out of control into bloodshed. Many people seem to like Fargo for its humorous qualities, its characterization of the Minnesotan culture and Frances McDormand- not me. I love Fargo for its brilliant writing, its tragic musical score, its tragic plot, William H Macy, Harve Presnell and Steve Buscemi, its ignorance of political correctness (how many movies can you remember when the only two minority characters were both revealed to be creeps).I want to draw attention to an overlooked reason why the film works so well - how well the music suits the visuals in this movie. Each murder scene is scored superbly, and other audio clues really add to the effect (for instance, notice how when the police officer asks Carl Showalter "What\'s this?" in reference to the abductee, a disquieting guitar sound is immediately played that has an instantaneous psychological effect on how you interpret the scene). I have seen this film over, well, an embarrassing number of times and have committed its screenplay, from start to finish, by memory. Fargo is the ultimate Coen Brothers movie, a brilliant tragedy, and restores my faith in Roger Ebert as he places this movie in as his fourth favorite movie of the \'90s.', u'0.109801', u'"What\'d this guy look like anyway?"\r \r\n"Oh, he was a little guy, kinda funny lookin\'."\r \r\n"Uh-huh. In what way?"\r \r\n"Just a general way."\r \r\nIn that interplay between a Brainerd, MN., police officer and a witness \r discussing a criminal investigation, you have one of your principal \r pieces of dialogue from what is considered by many to be Joel and Ethan \r Coen\'s finest film.\r \r\nOf course you can draw comparisons to others they\'ve made, such as \r Blood Simple, Raising Arizona, even Barton Fink and The Big Lebowski. \r But Fargo illustrates the Coen Brothers\' takes on plot, art and drama \r more succinctly and emotionally than any of those others. Here you have \r a set of memorable, if not always likable, characters in a plot that \r goes from clunky to chaotic in the most unspoiled manner, from Jerry \r Lundegaard\'s stilted conversation with Gaear and Carl in a bar in Fargo \r at the beginning of the movie - the only occasion in which the movie \r specifically shows you Fargo, N.D. - to Marge Gunderson\'s confrontation \r with Gaear and the wood-chipper.\r \r\nFrances McDormand deservedly won an Oscar for playing a well-balanced, \r intelligent, pregnant police officer placing her own straightforward \r methodology on to an investigation of bizarre goings-on. And William H. \r Macy gives a true one-two punch playing a frenetically-charged, fearful \r and, in the end, inept used car salesman trying in the most remarkable \r manner to make money. The two best scenes in the movie are the two \r occasions in which Marge questions Jerry about the Brainerd murders and \r a car from his lot being involved -- I couldn\'t imagine an actress \r doing a better job of seriously but comically exclaiming, "He\'s fleeing \r the interview!"\r \r\nNotable among the actors as well are Steve Buscemi and Peter Stormare \r playing Carl and Gaear, the two hit men hired by Jerry to help him con \r his father-in-law out of money. There\'s comic brilliance watching \r Stormare silently grimace at Buscemi\'s violent but gregarious behavior, \r and Buscemi shines being able to play the most out-of-control of all \r the characters in the movie. Kristin Rudr\xfcd also stands out playing \r Jean Lundegaard, Jerry\'s haplessly kidnapped wife.\r \r\nIf you can appreciate an intelligent look at not-always-so-intelligent \r life on this planet, you\'ll enjoy the little more than the hour and a \r half this movie has to show you.', u'0.358442', u'Boy, is this a good movie. In its bare bones it is a crime drama but the Coen brothers constantly undercut the seriousness with a quirky irony. The acting, the script, and the direction lift the movie light years above most of the movies of its decade.\n\nThe performances, for instance, everyone speaks with what passes for an upper Midwestern accent, a very pronounced accent, let\'s say. So when characters are doing wicked things on screen, it\'s rather like watching people dressed in clown suits do nasty things. It\'s utterly impossible to take it very seriously -- only just seriously enough for us to feel sorry for the victims and to disapprove of the bad guys, but no more than that.\n\nEveryone except the two killers are forced by their culture to speak and act cheerfully. They never swear either. "You\'re darn tootin\'," they say. The casting couldn\'t be better, with Frances McDormand, Steve Buscemi, and Bill Macy outstanding.\n\nThe script is likewise splendidly done. It\'s full of scenes that seem peripheral except that they add to our understanding of the characters and often lead to later payoffs. Without taking the space to describe them, I will simply mention the scene in the restaurant between MacDormand and her Japanese friend from high school. Why is it in there at all? (My God, those hotel restaurants are depressingly ugly.) Well -- among other things, such as establishing the kind of milieu these folks consider Ritzy, it tells us quite a bit about how MacDormand handles attempts to violate her inherent good nature. When the Japanese guy tries to sit next to her she tells him firmly that she\'d prefer it if he sat across the table so that she can see him more easily. When he breaks down in tears she whispers that it\'s all okay. She is polite, a little distant without being unfriendly, completely practical, and absolutely iron bound in her values. Nobody is going to take advantage of or discompose this hyper pregnant babe. Further, this scene is a set up for a later one. After MacDormand learns that the Japanese guy has told her a gaggle of lies, she wakes up to the fact that, yes, people can tell untruths -- and she returns to interview Macy a second time. \n\nIn another scene, when she\'s pressing one of the criminals during an interview, he excuses himself for a moment and she spots him taking off in his car. She exclaims, "Oh, for Pete\'s sake, he\'s FLEEIN\' THE INTERVIEW." It\'s impossible to improve on a line like that, or on MacDormand\'s delivery of it.\n\nThe third element of the film that makes it superior is the direction. The pauses come at the right times. A woman is sitting on her couch watching a soap opera on TV. Through the glass door of her apartment she sees a man approach. He\'s wearing a black ski mask and carrying a crowbar. He walks up to her door and shades his eyes while trying to peer inside. Now in an ordinary action movie, by this time the woman would be screeching and speeding down the hallway. Not here. The victim sits there staring at the intruder as he fiddles at the door, half horrified and half curious. "Who is this guy? He\'s not the meter reader, is he?" Coen the director has an eye for the suggestive picturesque too. Bill Macy has asked his father-in-law for a large loan for some sure-fire business proposition, but Dad offers him only a finder\'s fee. We see Macy\'s deflated face as his disappointment sets in. Cut. Now we\'re looking at a white screen punctuated by four or five bare trees equidistant from one another, and there is a tiny car in the middle of the whiteness. Then Macy\'s tiny figure trudges into the bottom of the shot and we realize we\'re looking at a snow-filled parking lot with only one ordinary-sized car in the center of it.\n\nWintery weather plays an important part in the movie. People die in it, drive off the road because of it, stand shivering in it. Two freezing people are conversing on the street while one shovels snow. The shoveler stops, gazes up at the sky, and remarks that it "ought to be really cold tomorrow." Cars and ambulances tend to drive in and out of white outs during blizzards and blowing snow. MacDormand is driving her murdering prisoner through a blank white landscape in which nothing much is visible and she is mildly remonstrating with him, saying something like, "Why did you do it, for a little bit of money? It\'s a perfect day, and here you are." (A perfect day!) There are seven murders in this movie. Only three take place on screen. The others either take place off screen or else the director has the good sense to cut at the moment the gun fires or the ax blade lands.\n\n"Fargo" is one of perhaps half a dozen movies from the 1990s that I would consider buying on DVD. It\'s an original and refreshingly adult picture. Don\'t miss it.', u'-0.0730158', u'\nWith all the sorry films these days it is good to see a movie as funny, wicked, dramatic, and utterly demented as "Fargo".  It\'s one of those films that you just have to see.  William H. Macy gives an Oscar-nominated performance as a car salesman who hires two thugs (one a know-it-all-know-nothing and the other a demented psychopath) to kidnap his wife so that he can keep half the ransom from her well-off father. Needless to say nothing goes right and Brainerd sheriff Frances McDormand (in an Oscar-winning role) comes in to save the day.  I won\'t give anything away because the material is too good to tell those who haven\'t seen this inventive film.  "Fargo" was ranked on the 100 Greatest Films list in 1996 and it was well-deserved.  In this age of by-the-numbers film making, this film was a refreshing flashback to the risk-taking style that made the 1970s such a great decade for movies.  5 stars out of 5. ', u'0.341298', u"If you haven't seen this movie, do yourself a favour and see it. It is very well put together and the plot is constantly evolving into a deeper shade of creepiness. At times scary (not in the horror movie sense) and quite rich in dark humour, this is one of those movies that gives you a weird felling inside even an hour after its over. The music is quite appropriate and unlike Scarface, is timeless. The camera work is usually quite basic but whoever directed the photography had the enjoyable habit of giving us interestingly artistic segways between scenes. This is the first film so far that I've given a 10 out of 10. I was going to give it a 9, but I couldn't think of a reason to take any points from perfect.", u'0.377974', u'An instant classic. I must admit what attracted me at first was the wood chipper incident I had heard about but by the time the movie gets there, I was in a totally in a different universe. While the movie does not have anything to keep you glued to the screen (a wicked script, lots of action) you can\'t prevent yourself from wanting to see what happens next. This is due to the wonderfully portrayed characters. Steve Buscemi\'s performance as Carl Showalter is fabulous. I love when he is confronted by Shep Proudfoot and tells him to "hey man, smoke a f***in peace-pipe", or any of his conversations with Jerry Lundegard are priceless - "I\'m not going to debate you Jerry, I\'m not going to DEBATE". My recent favorite is when he storms out of the hideout and says "and if you see Shep Proudfoot, tell him I\'m gonna nail his f***kin ass". The Jerry Lundegard character is such a beautiful loser, I don\'t know where to begin. I especially love his reappearing temper tantrums(slamming the phone book in his office, scraping the ice off the windshield, jumping up and down after his father in law leaves the house with the million dollars) and practicing the phone call to his father in law where he tells him his wife has been kidnapped - too funny. Marge Gunderson is the glue that holds it all together with a performance by Frances Mcdormand well deserved of an Oscar. I thought they might have overdid it a tiny bit with the scene with Marge and the two hookers (too many "Ya\'s" in it) but otherwise a wonderful, refreshing character in the middle of a bunch of losers. Her character is so honest and persistent, it makes me wonder why I cant find a woman like that - and then I realize, I\'m watching a movie and a brilliant one at that.', u'0.271172', u"Nobody seems to know that Fargo is first and foremost a beautiful and very simple love story about two ordinary rural small town American people and secondly a superbly acted crime murder mayhem movie, probably the best that has ever been filmed. Every character is genuine, believable, and Home, not Hollywood, spun. The suspense rolls in and out like a San Francisco fog. The side shows that are built in are amazing (sheriff's conversation at a bar with old acquaintance - stamp conversations - breakfast makings). The whole film is an American Shakesphere. I actually know frequent moviegoers who have not seen Fargo (and Sling Blade and Shine). I feel a special sorrow for them. Back to Fargo, every time I watch it I don't want it to ever end. I even sometimes find myself wishfully thinking I could move up there, it's a Lake Wobegone, and then the movie would never end. Fargo is as close to capturing and portraying real life as a director and bunch of actors can get. I wish IMDb had a just one time eleven so I could crown it emperor above all.", u'0.226394', u"\nWith no major stars or well-known names, the actors outshine many more  familiar personages.  The story is well thought out.  The criminals don't  try to ingratiate themselves with the audience which adds to its reality.   The acting is most convincing and the writing is excellent.  Even the cold  of a North Dakota winter comes across.  Every film course should make use  of this movie to demonstrate how to make a very good film without relying  on a bottomless budget.", u'0.0625024', u'I didn\'t see this in the theater but saw it the first week it was out for rental, and have enjoyed it ever since. In fact, I probably enjoy this more each time I view it. It\'s a sick movie, though, make no mistake about that. However, it holds a strange fascination, probably because of the odd characters.\n\nAbout the story: first, it is NOT a true story as indicated in the movie. That\'s a lie. It\'s a fictional kidnapping-turned into murder story with a few bloody scenes, lots of profanity (most of it by Steve Buscemi) and a comedy. Yup, this is pure "black comedy." It\'s dark humor mixed in with a parody about the way the Scandanavian people in the upper Midwest supposedly speak.\n\nBoth William H. Macy and Frances McDormand have some wonderful facial expressions along with their accents. Those two and Buscemi are the lead characters and all three "are a trip." Macy is hilarious; the best character in here, in my opinion. The more I watch this film, the funnier he gets. It\'s also the best role, I assume, ever for McDormand who was never a star before - or since - this movie. Her character in here, "Marge Gunderson," elevates this movie from just another modern-day sick crime movie, to an original. It\'s nice to see a wonderful husband-wife relationship, too, as is shown here with her and husband "Norm" (John Lynch).\n\nYou have this clean, old-fashioned lady cop (McDormand), a middle-of-the-road bungling car salesman (Macy) and two extreme low-life killers in "Carl Showalter" (Buscemi) and "Gaear Grimsrud" (Peter Stormare) all combining to make this story a mixture not only of people but genres. Other minor characters are strange, too, led by one of Marge\'s old high school acquaintances "Mike Yanagita" (Steve Park). Add to that some equally-bizarre music (slow violins) and you have this unusual story that brings out the morbid fascination in us viewers.\n\nSo, I guess what I am saying is this movie truly is an original, the best film the Coen Brothers have ever made and maybe the rest roles ever for the three main actors, McDormand, Macy and Buscemi.', u'0.238309', u'This should stand as the Coen brothers\' tour de force, although I found \r "The Big Lebowski" to be an even more satisfying film. I look at \r "Fargo", "The Big Lebowski", and "Brother, Where Art Thou?" as being \r the Coen\'s three best movies. I hope there is more from them in the \r future that can rival these three; though recent offerings such as \r "Intolerable Cruelty" and "The Ladykillers", could be proving their \r peak creativity is behind them.\r \r\n"Fargo" is beyond a doubt, their masterpiece. IMDb\'s ratings bear this \r out - 8.2 for "Fargo", 8.0 for "Lebowski", and 7.8 for "Brother". For \r sheer entertainment, "Lebowski" or should I call it, "The Dude" wins \r handsdown, but "Fargo" has all the elements of a true classic. Beyond a \r doubt, I have never seen such a dramatically-obvious portrayal of good \r vs. evil, and never, never, have I seen such gut-wrenching violence. \r Oh, the violence, beautifully believable, in it\'s grotesque way. This \r movie is proof that artistic freedom to portray such violence should \r never be denied. Steve Buscemi\'s bullet-grazed face becomes almost as \r painful for the watcher as it is for his character; Steve Buscemi\'s leg \r in the wood chipper is as horrific a scene as you are ever going to \r see. Enough to give Marge Gunderson morning sickness all over again.\r \r\nAnd the good vs evil thing: so obvious in the contrasts between Marge \r (the good), Buscemi and Stormare (the evil), and poor Jerry Lundegaard \r (William H. Macy) squeamishly caught in a trap in-between. I could only \r handle the violence because of Marge. She is the rock of normality, who \r continues trumpeting the virtuous life, when all hell is breaking loose \r around her. She knows all-to-well that "you know what" happens, but \r always knows "you know what" can be flushed down the toilet. Frances \r McDormand, as Marge, deserves every acting award she ever got for this \r role. Marge, to me, is the most perfect cop I\'ve ever encountered. She \r is polite, non-judgemental, yet able to ask the tough questions that \r gets her the information she needs. You can see how thoroughly she \r sizes up those she interviews: watching every nuance of their body \r language, and hearing ever inflection of their speech. Now here\'s a \r woman who can spot a lie when others can\'t. Unlike so many cops in \r movies, she doesn\'t have to beat information out of someone; she can \r charm it out of them, all the while appealing to their moral \r responsibility, no matter how immoral they may be.This is so well-shown \r in scenes such as talking to the two young hookers in the bar, and \r putting Jerry on the hotseat in the car dealership interrogations.\r \r\nI elected not to watch some of the scenes on my second viewing. \r Somewhat oddly, I skipped almost all the scenes involving Jean \r Lundegaard (the kidnapped one) - I couldn\'t bear to watch what was \r happening to this woman, knowing full well her fate. I felt so sorry \r for her; she was the true victim in this - the most innocent, yet the \r one who suffered the most. I guess a case could also be made that her \r son, Scotty, suffered equally, but most of what he went through was not \r presented on camera. Maybe he would suffer the most, for he had to live \r afterward. Even Marge would suffer from this catastrophe, but you know \r her suffering will be tempered by an unwavering belief that good \r triumphs over evil. As the last scene shows (Marge getting into bed \r with her husband): despite the horrors that might go on around us, we \r must seek solace in the everyday beauty of the things that are nearest \r and dearest to us all. And this message is conveyed to us all by the \r Coen brothers without any allusions to religion whatsoever. But I\'m \r getting into a personal bias of my own here - if you take solace in \r religion playing a part in morality, so be it.', u'-0.124834', u'Joel Coen the director of "Fargo", proves he is one of our best directors with this tale of deception and murder told in a style that takes humorous turns in the action. "Fargo" is one of the best American films of the nineties. Joel Coen working together with his brother, Ethan, have made pictures that will be viewed as classics, as time will tell. Their movies are always an excellent way to spend some time because they always manage to deliver, even in films that aren\'t popular with the public.\n\nA lot of what makes this film work is the amazing casting feat the Coen brothers achieved in giving Frances McDormand and William H. Macy, two of our best film actors, prominent presence in it. The Marge Gunderson of Ms. McDormand is one of the best creations the Coen brothers have produced. The same can be said of William H. Macy\'s take on the pathetic Jerry Lundergaard, the idiotic man who sets things in motion in the film. Ms. McDormand and Mr. Macy have only one scene together, yet one wouldn\'t even think about other actors playing these roles.\n\nThe supporting cast of "Fargo" is a joy to watch. Steve Buscemi and Peter Stormare make two of the most enjoyable bad guys in memory. These two scum bags are a joke. Anyone in his right mind wouldn\'t entrust either Carl or Gaer for a hit job. John Carroll Lynch plays Norm, the stoic man who is married to Marge. Harve Presnell is good as Wade Gustafson.\n\nThe atmosphere created by the Coens work well. We are constantly reminded of the deep winter seasons of the area where the action takes place. They have given their characters a local flavor and even to hear them talk would take us to that region of the country.\n\n"Fargo" is a joy to watch thanks to Joel and Ethan Coen.', u'0.368707', u"\nFARGO (1996) **** Frances McDormand, William H. Macy, Steve Buscemi, Harve Presnell, Peter Stormare.  Dark comic undertones and excellent character actor performances dominate this richly macabre crime story gone awry flick by the Coen brothers(Joel and Ethan) involving pathetic used car salesman Macy so hard up for money and respect (not necessarily in that order) that he hires a pair of dim-witted thugs to kidnap his wife for ransom from his father-in-law's vast wealth in a plot-line that unravels with nice little twists and snags.  McDormand (Best Actress) is perfect as a pregnant Midwestern sheriff on the case with a no-nonsense and homespun effect with her tactics of crime solving.  Great cinematography by Roger A. Deakins accentuates the bleak winterscape of unearthed uneasiness.  Nominated for Best Supporting Actor Macy, Best Director, Best Cinematography and Academy Award winner for Best Original Screenplay.", u'0.446655', u"What is it about these movies from the Coen brothers which appeals to so many people? How can anyone enjoy a slow paced, over-the-top acted borefest with an impressive collection of the most annoying personalities available. Movies which don't seem to go anywhere despite the fact that there is plenty of story to go about. It must be something masochistic which I don't get.\n\nFargo.\n\nSurely none of the characters are real life persons but yet I'm not watching a cartoon. None of the dialog seems to be of this Earth, yet I'm not watching a re-enactment of our planet by the inhabitants of Planet KzOrp. So I can only imagine that I'm watching a comedy or at least a movie with an attempt at humor. I mean, what else could it be? It's too preposterous to be a thriller and the characters and the screenplay are too bizarre to make it a drama. \n\nI must have been misinformed about this genre of film. Because it has always been my understanding that a comedy had something to do with laughter and amusement. A ridiculous situation could become quite funny, but truly not when the whole movie is ridiculous as well. Same goes for the abominable, hateful characters.\n\nIf the movie Groundhog Day, arguably amongst the best comedies ever made, was made by the Coen brothers, they would have had the entire village reliving the same day over and over again. And not only that, they would have made every character in that movie be twice as arrogant (Murray), dorky (Larry) and desirable (MacDowell) etc. Its result would be the a monstrosity of a caricature .\n\nThis movie lacks everything what Groundhog Day makes a good comedy; namely finesse, subtlety and something which makes the viewer not being alienated from the characters and above all, something actually funny going on. (Since when is a kidnapping and a lot of deaths a funny setting? Because Buscemi and Macy are in it?..give me a break, this is hardly Pulp Fiction)\n\nFor a crime/thriller based on actual fact, it lacks a seriousness and perhaps even respect to the events that have taken place. And the lack of means of time-travel aside, watching Fargo, I was expecting Jeff Bridges to walk onto the set looking for his stupid rug which would have been my longed for queue to press the eject button.\n\nSo all in all it is not a comedy, it is not a crime/drama/thriller but simply a Coen production. To me it's just an incredibly annoying in-between-genre film which cannot decide what it's supposed to be. Therefore it misses the mark on all counts which make the redeeming qualities of the production (and there are a lot) seem sadly wasted.\n\nBut it seems to be the minority opinion\x85the bandwagon ride is so comfy..", u'-0.438695', u'\nI can only classify this film as a missed opportunity. While it did have a good storyline, worthy of a film noir, and some very good performances, especially by William H. Macy (you can almost see him crumbling under the weight of not just his crimes, but his cover-ups as well), it is tainted by the Coen brothers\' directorial style.  What made it intolerable for me was the amount of "quirkiness" that was injected into every single character, scene, and situation. Taken alone, each little quirk is not a big deal, but after so many of them, one after another, it just gets too much to stomach.\n\nSome examples...\n\nThe title: The movie takes place mostly in Minneapolis (which isn\'t quirky enough -- that\'s where the Mary Tyler Moore Show took place, after all), and Brainerd (and nobody would go see a movie called "Brainerd"). About 5 minutes of screen time were set in Fargo, and Fargo has a quirky-enough sound.\n\n"True" story: Just because a story is true, does that make it a better story? There is both good and bad fiction and non-fiction. So, what is gained by lying about whether a story is true or not? Quirkiness! See, if you believe this story is true, then all this quirkiness must be true too!\n\nNames: Character names were given as Grimsrud, Lundegaard, Showalter and Gunderson. Apparently, Scandinavian-sounding names (especially with a double-a) are much quirkier than Pryce, Lopez, Rossi and Sheppard.\n\nThe weather: The snow and the cold serve no purpose but to make the characters put on parkas and snow boots, which make them look quirky. For instance, when the policeman was talking with the man shoveling his driveway, and had to put his hood up so far you couldn\'t see his face. Quirky! However, anyone who lives in a cold climate knows that when the sky is that grey and the snow is as wet as the stuff he was shoveling, it isn\'t all that cold...\n\nAccents: Whether or not people actually talk "like that", what\'s the point of everyone talking like some country bumpkin, even the ones in the fairly large city of Minneapolis? Accents: quirky. No accents: not quirky.\n\nPregnancy: Apart from making the lead character wobble when she walked, and to give her a convenient excuse to throw up every once in a while, what exactly was the point of making the police chief pregnant? Ah yes, another quirk.\n\nThe old friend: A cop meeting an old high school flame at a bar. Sounds kinda dull, right? Well, let\'s quirk it up a bit. Make the cop a woman -- no, wait: a pregnant woman. Make the guy Oriental. Make it totally unnecessary to the plot. Now we\'re talkin\' quirky!\n\nBy the time we get to the end, we\'re almost surprised that Macy\'s character sold plain old GM cars instead of Austin Minis or VW Beetles. The whole thing feels like the directors had no confidence in the subject matter, so they slathered on layer after layer of quirks in the hope the audience wouldn\'t notice.\n\nIn the end, it just becomes an exercise in frustration, as a movie that had everything going for it just turns you off after one wink and a poke in the ribs too many.', u'-0.170012', u'\n\nOkay, so I\'ve heard of the litany of accolades this movie has received.  I\'ve heard how this film is a "black comedy" by the Coen Brothers, who supposedly are geniuses in the film industry.  And I\'ve listened to friends discuss how creative and wonderful the film is.  But none of this, I repeat, NONE OF THIS, is apparent in this movie.  What I watched was a film confused at whether to be serious or comedic.  And in making up its mind, both elements are fused together in a twisted fashion with an out-of-place Canadian humor.  \n\nBasically the story is about a car salesman who needs cash...fast, so he pays a couple of guys to kidnap his wife so that her rich father will pay the ransom, thereby getting him the cash he needs.  Well, all goes to hell as the kidnappers end up on a killing spree with a cop questioning all possible leads, including the car salesman himself.\n\nIf in fact this film was based on a true story (as indicated at the beginning), I would be horrified if I were close to one of the victims.  The Coen brothers make a strange mockery out of the deaths of the victims portrayed and deter the audience from taking the film seriously, instead giving them a quasi-mental hypothermia with the serious/humorous dichotomy.  And even if this film is not based on a true story, it is so poorly directed that I just felt like I had wasted my time going around in circles.  But yet I\'ll walk out my front door and everyone will still be applauding this satirical trash.  Sigh.  What did I miss here?!', u'-0.346331'], u'tt0025316': [u"\nIt Happened One Night directed by Frank Capra was made and released in 1934 by Columbia Pictures as a small budget film that was not expected to do well at the box office. Yet, after its release the film gained many accolades and won the Academy Award for best picture in 1934. Due to the original small nature of the film, the leading man role was surprisingly filled by Clark Gable who was on loan from another studio. He stared opposite of Claudette Colbert. Capra's film was a combination of many ideals, emotions and social perceptions of the American society of the thirties but it was also a combination of many new and innovative filming techniques and sound advancements. The film unfolds the story in such a attention-grabbing and remarkable way that most of today's cinema use his style and ideals when producing and creating films. Capra used the idea of a moving camera, one that was not fixed upon a box, but on a moveable crane instead. This produced more sweeping shots, more angles for filming and fewer distance shots. It allowed for more movement of the actors as well as a more realistic and real life feeling to the movie. The film also incorporates back projection of images. This is were a scene is filmed previously and played in the background while the actors perform the scene in front of the projection. Back projection is used for car scenes to give the impression that the actors are driving but in reality they are in a sound stage. Capra also incorporated the use of a wipe in his film. The technique of moving left to right and fading in or out to change a scene or show elapsed time took the place of the traditional place cards in silent films and allowed for a more constant stream for the film. The film was also all talk, the new technology of a sound strip on the side of the film was used. The text cards of silent films were completely discarded. Another camera trick by Capra is to show a change in feelings within Clark Gable's character for Claudette Colbert's character by depicting her character in a different light. This happens two times within the film at key moments to the development of their relationship. Claudette Colbert is seen in a close up of softer light to emphasize Clark Gable's character seeing her in a `different light.' In this romantic comedy Capra not only showed new styles and techniques but also addressed social issues of the time. Through comedy he showed the outlandish nature of the rich (King arriving for his own wedding in a helicopter) and the nature of man being the controller in relationships as well as in society. The fighting and struggles between the two main characters showed the man taking care of the woman, the social norms of how men and woman should act around each other in that era. But the fighting and the banter also show a strong-minded and intelligent woman. The two strong-willed main characters balanced each other out.\n\nCapra's techniques for showing the social relationship between the rich and working classes as well as a relationship between man and woman in the 1930s captured film makers and film viewers for over 70 years. Films are now compared to his style of camera movement and his style of capturing the American ideals. When movies of today make a similar statement of achieving what one wants they are referred to as Capra-esc. Capra's imagination and style is one that changed the outlook of American films and introduced a new genre to film goers everywhere.\n", u'0.208406', u"\nFrank Capra's idealistic outlook on life is evident in his films. From It Happened One Night to It's a Wonderful Life, Capra has always had a tendency to let the little guy rise above it all and beat the odds. It is no small wonder that Capra enjoyed much of his success during the Depression, when movies were used to truly pull an audience out of the despair of the 1930s into a world where anything can happen, where being a nice person is all you need to succeed. While the fact that the country was in the middle of the Depression was not completely ignored, an overly optimistic view on life was taken to counter the despair of everyday life.\n\nThere were many points in It Happened One Night where the true state of the country was indicated. Homeless people hitching rides on trains seemed perfectly normal. Rather than regard them with apprehension and pity, you smile and wave at them. Another example is the hostile reaction proprietor Zeke's wife had to the fact that her husband had let Peter and Ellie stay the night with promises of being paid. Upon seeing Peter and Ellie's car missing, they rush to the cottage to see if Peter and Ellie are still there. They cannot afford freeloaders.\n\nIn another scene, a child's mother has passed out from hunger, because they have no money to buy food. Peter and Ellie have nearly depleted their funds, but decide that the mother and child need money more than they do and give some to them.\n\nDespite these instances, the movie was altogether cheerful in its depiction of the world. In the throes of the stock market crash, this movie signaled the birth of the screwball comedy. At a time when the country needed release, they could find that release and laughter in movies like It Happened One Night. Audiences were amused by scenes in the film, such as the segment in which Peter teaches Ellie how to dunk a donut. Or, when forced to share a room, Peter puts a blanket between his and Ellie's beds and calls it the `wall of Jericho,' which is revisited when the walls of Jericho come tumbling down after Peter and Ellie's marriage. Probably the most famous scene in the film is the hitchhiking sequence, which features Peter standing by the roadside trying to thumb a ride unsuccessfully, finally giving up after more than a dozen cars speed by without paying any heed to his attempts. After he gives up, beaten, Ellie simply lifts her skirt above her knee. The first car that passes stops, as we see extreme close-ups of a foot slamming down on the brakes and a hand applying the hand brake.\n\nA master in his profession, Capra left his mark on the films he directed. With an almost childlike cheerfulness, he maintains a sense of dignity and class. The viewer is left with a feeling of hope for humankind, even if its only that a person's ideals could be used to make such a film. Capra's films are still regarded as masterpieces. It Happened One Night arguably remains to this day unparalleled in screwball comedies. It was one of many movies made during the Depression, a sometimes sad and even lonely time in our history. It gave its audience a chance to escape and forget their troubles for a few moments in time.\n\n9 out of 10 stars", u'0.136537', u"In his autobiography, The Name's Above the Title, Frank Capra said that until It Happened One Night drama had four stock characters, the hero, the heroine, the comedian, and the villain.\n\nWhat Capra did and you might notice he followed that in a whole lot of his films, the characters of hero and comedian are combined. Not completely though because Claudette Colbert gets a few laughs herself, especially with that system all her own. But in doing what he did for Clark Gable's character, Capra created a whole new type of screen comedy, the classic screwball comedy and It Happened One Night surely set the mold.\n\nCapra's autobiography told the story of the making of It Happened One Night which in itself could be a movie. Capra worked for Columbia Pictures which at that time was a minor studio, along the lines of Republic or Monogram. As Capra tells it he had a vision about this story that Samuel Hopkins Adams wrote and persuaded Harry Cohn to buy it. \n\nCapra also had a stroke of good luck. Adolph Zukor at Paramount and Louis B. Mayer at MGM were looking to punish a couple of recalcitrant stars, Claudette Colbert and Clark Gable. The idea was to show these two what it was like to work in a small budget studio without all the perks of Paramount and MGM. In fact the description of Gable arriving to work at Columbia that first day, drunk as a skunk, is priceless. Capra dressed him down good and said that to his credit Gable came to work afterwards and couldn't have been more cooperative.\n\nAt some point Harry Cohn at Columbia was convinced that maybe Capra had something. He had in fact delivered for Columbia the previous year with Lady for a Day. So the publicity drums were beat.\n\nThe rest as they say is history. It Happened One Night won the first Oscar grand slam, Best Picture, Best Director, Best Actor, and Best Actress. It won the first Oscars Columbia Pictures ever got and lifted it right into the ranks of the major studios. And it set the standard for screwball comedy.\n\nThe film could never have gotten off the ground were it not for the chemistry of Gable and Colbert. They're together for most of the film so if it doesn't click between the two of them, you have people walking out in droves. Colbert had already played a wide variety of parts at Paramount, ranging from Poppaea and Cleopatra to comedies with Maurice Chevalier like The Big Pond. Gable had played a whole lot of tough guys on both sides of the law at MGM. It Happened One Night showed he had some real comic talent, a flair MGM exploited in his roles from then on in. \n\nGable and Colbert did only one other film together, Boom Town for MGM. You can't get much more different than those two films. Boom Town had a huge MGM budget, Spencer Tracy and Hedy Lamarr as well, and a lot of special effects involving the oil industry and hazards therein. It's also a great film, but it's not a classic like It Happened One Night.", u'0.148706', u'\nThis is a pleasant, funny classic that shows it age only slightly, and that has a lot of scenes you can look forward to each time that you see it.  Gable and Colbert each get roles that are nicely suited to them, and are well-remembered for their performances.  The supporting cast also rounds out the picture with some good character acting.\n\nThe cross-country trip on the bus and via other assorted methods is fun to watch, with several nice vignettes that complement the main story line.  (The atmosphere on the long bus trip is done especially well.)  The plot is of course not meant to be taken too seriously in itself, but it comes in very handy for setting up good characters and comedy.\n\nIt all comes across as effortlessly entertaining romantic comedy, with some classic scenes and characters you learn to care for in spite of their mistakes.', u'0.739255', u"IHON rightly earns it's place as one of the greatest romantic comedies in film history. A pioneer of the screwball comedy genre, it holds up very well 71 years after it was made.\n\nIt's a classic tale of the battle of sexes- something that is still so relevant today. We follow the story of spoiled heiress Ellie Andrews (Claudette Colbert), who jumps ship from her father's yacht (literally!) in Florida after an argument with said father (played by Walter Connolly) over her marrying wealthy playboy King Westley (Jameson Thomas) without her father's consent. Ellie is on a mission- to get to New York to King Westley. But how will she do it? That's how Peter Warne (played by a delightfully handsome Clark Gable) comes into the story. Recently fired from his newspaper job, Peter meets Ellie on the Night Bus to New York, and, realizing who she is (Her story is all over the news, after all!), offers to help her get to NY and Westley if she gives him an exclusive story- to win him back his job. And so the fun begins. Colbert and Gable have great chemistry as the mismatched couple thrown together after a series of unusual circumstances. The trip isn't a smooth one- and we are taken on a wild ride with Peter and Ellie, which gives us great scenes such as the doughnut-dunking lesson, Walls Of Jericho and the now-classic hitchhiking scene. The humour is still fresh and fast-paced over 70 years later. Oops, I almost forgot the classic 'no undershirt scene' where Gable sexily gives Colbert a lesson in how a man undresses, to reveal (shock horror!) no undershirt, but a bare chest! This had a bad effect on the sales of men's undershirts, which dropped dramatically after the film's release (One of the first examples of product placement in film). Great supporting characters, particularly the scene-stealing Oscar Shapeley (Roscoe Karns). Of course it has it's faults- all early talkies do. But any faults are outweighed by the great story. Technically, it was well-made for it's time.\n\nIHON won 5 Oscars- Best Picture, Best Director (Frank Capra), Best Actress and Best Actor for Colbert and Gable and Best Adaptation. It deserved all of them. Funnily enough, both Colbert and Gable didn&#8217;t want any part in the film at first- I bet they changed their viewpoint after the surprise success and the prestigious Academy Awards they gained for it. It's been said that a number of Disney characters like Bugs Bunny, Yosemite Sam and Pepe LePew were inspired by characters in this film. A classic, a must-see, a great movie.", u'0.583191', u"I have seen this movie a few times over the year and have just recently \r viewed it again twice on the DVD version. This is a highly recommended \r movie on several levels. First, it has to be seen because it won \r multiple academy awards during 1934. It has won at least best actor, best actress and best director. \r So it should be seen just for it's historical significance if you are \r into movies as an art form. However, if you are just looking for \r entertainment then it is simply a great classic romantic comedy. The \r set up is that Ellie (Claudette Colbert) is a rich, spoiled, \r independent woman who is running away from her father (in Florida) to \r join her husband (not quite a complete marriage) in New York City. She \r meets Peter (Clark Gable) on the bus who is a down & out reporter \r looking for a big story. They join forces in that he will help her to \r get to New York for an exclusive on her story. In essence it is the \r bratty socialite vs the hard nosed -know it all reporter - Can they \r achieve true love? Just watch the movie and figure it out for \r yourself.. There is the classical scene regarding the battle of the \r sexes which involves hitchhiking. There is some dated material because \r the movie was made in the 30's about the 30's. This may be both good \r and bad as a viewing experience. Gable is a bit too shallow as a \r desirable character. He lacks the sensitivity of a guy that would be in \r a modern romantic comedy. However, his portrayal of Peter is likely \r typical for the ideal man of the era in that he attempted to be \r competent and in charge at all times (the know it all guy). The \r character comes across as too simplistic by today's standards. However, \r when he gets the feedback on his rough edges from Ellie he shows his \r nice guy side. Claudette Colbert is great in this movie she had \r opportunities to display her acting craft as she responded to different \r situations. The scene in which she and Gable pretended to be basically \r 'white trash' was very funny. Her getting the best actress award is \r very evident even without having to see the performances of her \r rivalries for the Oscar in 1934. Overall this movie is rated a 9.0 and \r is highly recommended. A viewer may avoid older movies because they \r lack dept; however, hang in for this one. Once the screen chemistry \r starts between Colbert and Gable (their first scene together) the rest \r of the picture is just a joyride of entertainment in watching these two \r work their magic for the camera. Enjoy this movie it should be an \r awesome experience.", u'0.287538', u'\nIn my college film class we had begun watching "It happened one night". I was laughing my head off. But of course my professor stops the movie right when it was getting good. After that, I wanted to see this movie so badly. My father lucky enough had the movie. I watched it and it is one of the funniest movies I have ever seen. Clark Gable is histerical. He really does a great job in the film. I always did prefer the old comedies to today. Do you blame me? If you watch the flick, you will enjoy it. This is one of the first romantic comedies. It\'ll send all the others to the back of the bus. I would higly recommend this movie. It\'s a classic.\n\n10/10', u'0.302017', u'\nThis sweet comedy never loses its appeal.  Claudette Colbert is a spoiled young girl who meets a wordly, attractive newspaper reporter (Clark Gable). In the beginning, she treats him like a servant, but he never knuckles under to this behavior.  The interaction between these two is very romantic and humorous.  It is the classic portrayal of what may be called "sexual tension."  He takes care of her - does not take advantage of her - but makes her realize that her wealthy background cannot carry her through as a human being, she has to earn his respect by treating him with respect.  There is a\nscene in which the two of them are forced to hitchhike, and their "breakfast" is only a handful of carrots plucked from a garden they were lucky to find.  As Gable stands at the edge of the road and Colbert is perched atop a wooden fence, his wisecracking posture is said to be the inspiration for the beloved cartoon character Bugs Bunny.  This is a must-see for every one who loves old movies, and entertaining for all.', u'0.415274', u"\nI was inspired to think of other films with completely mystifying titles.  `The Phantom Menace', obviously.  Also: `The Shop Around the Corner' (around the corner from WHERE?), `The Empire Strikes Back' (it doesn't), `The Living Daylights', `True Lies', `Batman Forever', `Species', `The Life and Death of Colonel Blimp' ... if anyone has any more suggestions, please send them to me.\n\nIn this case, it happens over several nights, and I'm not sure which particular night is being referred to.  Probably one of the candidate nights is less unobvious than the rest; so I guess the title isn't COMPLETELY mystifying.  But actually, Capra gives us the feeling that everything is up in the air.  Everyone knows that the hero and heroine of romantic comedies are bound to get hitched in the end - in most cases it's simply a question of staying awake.  But Capra makes us feel the contingency of it all.  I, for one, was convinced that right up until the final moment, it could have gone either way.  How did Capra manage this?  Was it because he was a complete innocent; or was it because he was remarkably sophisticated?  I don't suppose it matters: it's results that count.\n\nI'm glad to see very little mention among the comments about the sexism of it all.  The characters have life; their words have life; and if such art as this could only be produced by a sexist society, it's almost worth creating a sexist society (and then dismantling it), in order to get the art.  In modern romances I get the feeling that the writers are wearily writing `feisty' lines for the heroine in an attempt to fool feminists, who, by and large, aren't so easily fooled.  Claudette Colbert isn't feisty.  When she DOES assert her independence, she means it.\n\n(And, of course, when Clark Gable asserts his dominance, HE means it.  You don't get sincerity like this these days.)\n\nAnyway, the ideology of a film, if there is one, is always beside the point, except inasmuch as the ideology is AESTHETICALLY attractive or unattractive.  This is an attractive film.  Two real individuals, a real story, some misunderstanding but no tiresome or pointless misunderstanding, constant wit - and, as I expressed amazement at earlier, constant suspense.  And if THAT isn't enough to get you to watch it, note that it was released in 1934.  The Hayes code didn't come into effect until 1935.  Not a moment too late.", u'0.147468', u'In Miami, the spoiled socialite Ellie Andrews (Claudette Colbert) is trapped in the yacht of her controller father, the Wall Street banker Andrews (Walter Connolly), who has just annulled her secret marriage with the snobbish aviator King Westley (Jameson Thomas). Out of the blue, Ellie jumps overboard and swims to the shore. Andrews hires a detective agency to find her and offers a 10,000 dollars reward for any information about his daughter. But Ellie pawns her watch, buys some clothing and a bus ticket to New York to meet her lover. She seats side- by-side with the cynical reporter Peter Warne (Clark Gable). However, when a thief steals her purse with her money in a bus stop and Ellie does not report to the police, Peter recognizes and blackmails Ellie, asking her to travel together with him. He promises to protect her and in return he would write her adventure to meet King Westley. Along their journey, Ellie falls in love for Peter; but when he vanishes from the motel where they are lodged and contacts her father later, she believes he was only interested in the reward. In the end, love triumphs and the wall of Jericho falls. \n\n"It Happened One Night" is another delightful and charming romantic comedy of Frank Capra. The romance of a cynical reporter with a spoiled young woman is very funny despite being naive and dated, with witty dialogs, and the chemistry between Claudette Colbert and Clark Gable is marvelous. The cinematography in black and white is wonderful with magnificent use of lighting to highlight the lead couple. Last time I saw this classic was on 29 January 2003 and this is the third time that I watch this film, now on DVD from Columbia Distributor, and I highly recommend it as one of the best romantic comedies ever. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Aconteceu Naquela Noite" ("It Happened that Night")', u'0.4474', u"\nIt Happened One Night is one of those films that is so classic, and on so many `must-see' lists that I actually assumed that I had seen it at one time or another.  It wasn't until I actually looked into the film when I in fact realized I hadn't.\n\nThe first film to sweep the major categories in an Oscar ceremony, It Happened One Night spins the story of a young spoiled heiress (Colbert) who marries a shallow, yet dashing aviator.  She is then swept off by her father who takes her on a cruise; convinced that time away from each other will cure her infatuation.  Instead, she escapes by jumping out of the boat and swimming to shore where she begins her journey from Miami to New York, where her husband awaits.  The film quickly turns into an `on the road' flick at this point when she meets up with Clark Gable, a down on his luck reporter who offers to help her for the exclusive rights to her story.  Mayhem inevitably ensues as one thing after another goes wrong during their adventure.\n\nI'm a little hesitant to completely agree with the general assessment that It Happened One Night is a screwball comedy.  Of course, there were certain moments that were hilarious and overdone (the scene when Gable and Colbert pose as husband and wife to share a cabin for the night is absolutely rich) but the majority of the remaining film is clever romantic comedy with fairly even performances by the principles.  Perhaps there is a sliding scale for screwball comedies, with It Happened One Night being a two and a film that I feel personifies the genre, Bringing up Baby, as a five.\n\n\nWhatever its classification, It Happened One Night is a charming film that backs up its merit as a multiple Oscar winner.  It is one of those films that may not be completely profound or deep, but is important nonetheless if anything, for its place in film history.\n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.482441', u'Released in 1934, Frank Capra\'s \'It Happened One Night\' ushered in a new era of Hollywood film-making \x96 the screwball comedy \x96 and made Academy Award history in the process. It became the first film to be awarded the top five awards on the night (Best Picture, Director, Actor, Actress and Screenplay), a feat that remained unequaled until \'One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest (1975)\' and \'The Silence of the Lambs (1991).\' As I watch more of his films, Frank Capra is fast becoming one of my most respected directors, with such classics as \'Mr. Smith Goes to Washington\' and \'It\'s a Wonderful Life\' ranking among my favourites of all time. This screwball comedy, however, posed a certain problem, since I\'ve never been a huge fan of the sub-genre. Whilst I had enjoyed such films as \'My Man Godfrey\' and \'His Girl Friday,\' they hadn\'t really offered anything other than comedy. This means that they did a good job of making us laugh, but never really inspired any other emotions \x96 which isn\'t necessarily a handicap, but doesn\'t appeal to my tastes.\n\nHappily, I\'m able to announce that \'It Happened One Night\' did surpass my expectations, and I found it to be a wonderfully-enjoyable, very touching romantic comedy. The first half had left me feeling a bit uncertain, since it reminded me of just about every other 1930s comedy I\'d seen, but then Frank Capra did what Frank Capra does best: he put a lot of heart into the film. After building towards a perfect fairytale ending, Capra suddenly snatches it away, slowly but surely stacking the odds against our hero. However, the director has never been one to leave us with a downbeat ending, and, when love finally prevails, it feels twice as triumphant. Of course, crucial to the film\'s success are the two lead performers: Claudette Colbert and Clarke Gable, playing characters of completely polar characters. As story runs its course, we slowly watch their relationship transform from completely dislike to acceptance to romance, and it never feels forced or artificial (despite a reportedly tense atmosphere onset).\n\nThe plot of the film was based on the story, "The Night Bus," by Samuel Hopkins Adams. Ellie Andrews (Colbert) is the arrogant, spoilt heiress of a wealthy father (Walter Connolly). After she marries the rich but unprincipled King Westley (Jameson Thomas) against her father\'s will, Ellie strikes off to New York to be with the man she loves, and her desperate father launches a state-wide attempt to retrieve her. It is on a night bus that Ellie strikes up a frictional relationship with fired journalist Peter Warne (Gable), whose only initial interest in the stranded girl is a good newspaper story. Probably one of the best "road movies" ever made, \'It Happened One Night\' also has a few twists in the usual formula which have guaranteed its enduring stature. For example, Ellie\'s father is revealed not to be an evil overbearing demon, but is, in fact, shown to be a very kind, reasonable and loving man, who is only trying to guarantee the best for his daughter by ensuring that she marries somebody with principles (King Westley later gives up the girl without a fuss, compensated by a tidy sum of money).\n\nMuch to my surprise, I\'d never seen a film starring Clarke Gable before, but he really was a revelation. Never taking any situation too seriously, and delivering every line with confidence and a hint of amusement, Gable is the laid-back every-man that the audience can relate to, a stark contrast to Colbert\'s conceited and ungrateful upper-class rich girl. My favourite scene took place after the night bus accidentally ran off the road, with the shifty passenger Oscar Shapeley (Roscoe Karns) threatening to reveal Ellie\'s true identity. Fearing that his exclusive story could leak into other hands, Peter Warne declares himself to be the gangster who kidnapped Ellie, threatens to harm Shapeley\'s family and then chases him into the night. Interestingly, I followed up my viewing of this film with a 1939 Lux Radio Theater broadcast of the story, introduced by Cecille B. DeMille and once again starring Gable and Colbert. This recording can be found, if you\'re lucky, as a special feature on the \'It Happened One Night\' DVD, and it\'s well worth a listen.', u'0.332958', u'IT HAPPENED ONE NIGHT (Columbia, 1934), directed by Frank Capra, based on a short story "Night Bus" by Samuel Hopkins Adams, ranks one of the best known and popular romantic comedies from the 1930s, thanks to the star chemistry of Clark Gable (on loan from Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer) and Claudette Colbert (on loan from Paramount), with fine direction by Frank Capra, witty screenplay by Robert Risken, and for being the very first motion picture to win all five major Academy Awards, including Best Actor (Gable); Best Actress (Colbert); Best Director (Capra); Best Screenplay and Best Picture. This might have been an "upset" in 1934, considering other top-rated films and performances of the year, but who would have imagined IT HAPPENED ONE NIGHT to still be as entertaining today as it was back in 1934?\n\nThis now well-known plot that\'s been remade twice by Columbia as EVE KNEW HER APPLES (1945) with Ann Miller and William Wright; and YOU CAN\'T RUN AWAY FROM IT (1956) with June Allyson and Jack Lemmon, opens in a yacht in Miami where Ellen "Ellie" Andrews (Claudette Colbert), spoiled daughter of a millionaire Wall Street banker, Alexander Andrews (Walter Connolly), who disapproves of her recent marriage to aviator King Westley (Jameson Thomas), making arrangements on having it annulled. Following a heated argument with her father, Ellie runs from her state room, jumps overboard and swims to shore. Eluding her father\'s hired detectives, Ellie, acquiring new clothes, purchases a night bus ticket bound for New York City where she plans to meet Westley. While on board, Ellen encounters Peter Warne (Clark Gable), a hot-headed reporter recently fired by his editor, Joe Gordon (Charles C. Wilson). With both disliking each other immensely, Warne, having discovered the "spoiled brat\'s" identity, becomes her constant traveling companion in order to get an exclusive story and his job back. Hours before reaching New York and taking a rest stop in an auto camp, misunderstandings occur as Ellen awakens to find both Peter and the car gone.\n\nA simple story playing like an overlong "B" movie, IT HAPPENED ONE NIGHT is a memorable bus trip of so many classic scenes that have been imitated by others but never duplicated. Highlights include the "Walls of Jericho" where Peter and Ellen share a room in auto camps where a blanket is tossed over a rope that separates the couple as they sleep for the night; Peter demonstrating to Ellen on how a man undresses, particularly one in which he removes his shirt to no undershirt underneath; Peter\'s correct method of dunking a dough-nut into a cup of coffee; and the classic hitchhiking scene where Peter fails to attract cars while Ellen comes up with a method all her own.\n\nAlthough IT HAPPENED ONE NIGHT is essentially a Claudette Colbert movie from start to finish (there\'s no secondary female character, quite rare for its time). Due to the strength of Gable\'s performance, this has been hailed to be his best comedic role. Gable\'s character is hot-headed and forceful, living by a moral code. Although he shares a cabin with a married woman, that\'s all he does. He even tells Colbert\'s Ellie when she asks if she\'ll ever see him again, he replies, "I make it a policy not to run around with married women." And when he\'s hungry, he takes a carrot from a farm rather than going through the method of panhandling. This is Gable, a role model. Director Frank Capra, whose subject matter is usually on people, captures the many extras, especially those on the bus and auto camps, to make them appear as important as leading players. Roscoe Karns is equally memorable, "believe you me!" as the gabby bus passenger, Oscar Shapeley from Orange, New Jersey; Ward Bond as the tough talking bus driver; the meek Arthur Hoyt and the nosy/ domineering Blanche Frederici as the auto camp owners; Georgie Breakston the poor boy traveling on the bus with his mother (Claire McDowell); along with other passengers gathered together and singing "The Man on the Flying Trapeze," to a player of a snoring fat and bald man who rests his head on Colbert\'s shoulder. During it\'s entire 106 minutes, there\'s seldom any underscoring. As for the costumes, with the exception of the final 15 minutes, both Gable and Colbert use the same clothing through most of their trip.\n\nWhile Gable and Colbert had challenging roles in their careers, plus their reunion in MGM\'s large-scale BOOM TOWN (1940), it\'s amazing how this likable little comedy was the only one to honor them Academy Awards. There\'s a scene where I feel Gable earned his statuette, the one where he tells Ellen the type of girl he would like to someday marry, saying that those kind of women don\'t exist anymore. Gable says this with frankness and sincerity. Colbert on the other hand earned hers from that same scene as she she listens and looks on lovingly at Gable with tears flowing down her cheek, coming to realize it happened one night.\n\nIT HAPPENED ONE NIGHT not only became a perennial favorite on late night television during the 1960s and 70s, but on cable TV as well, ranging from the Disney Channel (1980s), American Movie Classics (prior to 2001) to Turner Classic Movies, and availability on video cassette and finally DVD. While IT HAPPENED ONE NIGHT has aged in appearance, it\'s still timely screen entertainment. There\'ll never be another film like this again. (***1/2)', u'0.26355', u"Capra's 'It Happened One Night' is a fascinatingly shot romantic comedy. It has the 30's feel but at the same time I am surprised that such skill was used in the making of this movie during the 1930s. The camera-work is brilliant as it brings out both the spatial feel and the crowdiness. the long shots are effective and I liked how the scenes change in a sideways 'flip' mode. There's always something about the driving scenes of old classics that amuse me. Clearly the background was shot separately and then projected on to a screen during the shooting of the film while in the foreground the actors are just seated in a car pretending to drive. While the background scene changes, the viewer keeps tuned to the wonderful dialogue between the actors. Needless to add, the film's got fantastic dialogue.\n\nCapra also brilliantly gives us a glimpse of the 30's American society, especially focusing on gender and class status. The difference between the upper class rich people and the common ordinary man is shown by their use of language and their non-verbal behaviour. Yet, in a way the film is also ahead of its time. Ellie isn't just some clich\xe9d damsel of the 30s. She is strong-minded, stubborn and smart (albeit slightly naive). She is one who fights for what she wants rather than giving in easily. Perhaps this is also one quality of hers that attracts Peter but at the same time their funny quarrels also indicate that there is a an equality in gender status (which was something women were struggling with in those days).\n\nThe characters are very well etched. Peter and Ellie were a lot of fun but I also liked how Alexander Andrews (played excellently by Walter Connolly) was written as the rich father who's got all the money but all he wants for his daughter is her happiness. Clark Gable and Claudette Colbert are great together as they match wits and display warm chemistry.\n\n'It Happened One Night' has become an instant favourite, one that I definitely plan to revisit.", u'0.473082', u'Peter, a washed up journalist, accidentally bumps into Ellen Andrews, a spoiled daughter of a rich guy from whom she ran away, on a bus while taking a trip to New York. He offers to help her hide from her dad if she agrees to sell her story only to him. But on their way to New York they fall in love...\n\nThere are many old classic film that are excellent but leave you with a "Yeah, great...but I expected something else" feeling. But "It happened one night" is one of those films that leaves you amazed without any reservations. I was neither a Clark Gable, Claudette Colbert or a Frank Capra fan before I saw this road movie, which won 5 Oscars, but after I did I became of fan of them for life! The story here is so damn simple that you may at first think that everyone could be able to pull it of, but when you think about it you will realize that at the same time it\'s actually very clever, carefully written and touching.\n\n------------- \n\nTake this scene for instance. Ellen is looking in front of herself while a burglar steals her luggage behind her back. She doesn\'t notice anything but Peter sees this and runs after the burglar. Ellen, still not turning around, is wondering where he is running of to. After a while Peter, all tired, returns and says: "He got away...!" And Ellen not knowing what\'s going on replies: "I don\'t know what you are talking about!" That\'s a perfect example how someone is trying to be a gentleman and ends up as a fool. But this is actually a film more touching than funny. After a while the spoiled Ellen shows her gentle side and realizes that she loves Peter. She says this to her father in tears because she thinks that Peter doesn\'t love her. So incredibly magical and yet so simple. It\'s incredibly high grade of 9/10 on the site rotten-tomatoes.com is justified. Too bad almost all TV stations are keeping this jewel of air for decades! No wonder my generation is trapped in a vicious circle of violence, drugs and alcohol. They never got a glimpse of such previous generations with a soul and such raw, honest and touching beauty like "It happened one night" which exceeds the human mind.\n\nGrade: 10/10', u'0.0274416'], u'tt0469494': [u'The year I was born was the same year Predator and Robocop came out. When I was finally old enough to appreciate films, Little Nicky was in theaters. I know, believe me, I know; rocky start. And often I would watch older films, or specials on older films, and be dazzled. You know the ones. Remember when they made Spartacus? Remember sitting in the movies and watching Gregory Peck play Atticus Finch in To Kill A Mockingbird? Remember the first time you heard "I could\'ve been a contender" through theater speakers? Well I sure as hell don\'t. But I\'ll tell you what, now I feel somewhat caught up. Let\'s begin with the obvious. Daniel Day Lewis. No one\'s arguing about this. The man is a veritable God among ants on the screen. He takes his role by the reigns and I don\'t doubt him for a second. In fact, at times, I was downright afraid of the man. Lewis gives what is easily, EASILY the best performance of the past five years. But let\'s get serious about it. Lewis\' Daniel Plainview is the most convincing, awe-inspiring, and downright mortifying character to take the big screen that I can remember. Here, perfectly in his element and at his best, Lewis could go toe to toe with Brando and Kinski, playing a part that oozes enough skill and pathos to earn him a place among Hollywood\'s, and perhaps the world\'s, greatest performances of all time. He gives those of us who missed out on the craft, depth of character, and technique of classic cinema a chance to admire a tour de force portrayal of a memorable, identifiable, and completely despicable character, and it\'s so damned refreshing that I can\'t stop singing the man\'s praises. Paul Dano has been taking a lot of fire for this whole thing. People continue to spout their disapproval of the film\'s casting, saying that Dano has no business rivaling the seasoned Lewis on the screen. Listen, lay down your swords a minute and consider the obvious. The guy was cast opposite the performance of the decade, he\'s not going to outshine Lewis and you\'d be crazy to expect him to. In fact, I think that he and Lewis\' back-and-forths are the films highlights, as we see the juxtaposition not only in the characters themselves, but also in their acting techniques. And the cinematography? Welcome to the old days of film. The glory days of Hollywood. Anderson gives us one of the most beautifully shot and directed films in recent memory, truly at the top of his craft on this one. Every moment feels more epic than the last, until the film becomes such a towering cinematic spectacle that the end leaves the viewer exhausted. It\'s truly an experience not to be missed. Yeah, we missed out on A Street Car Named Desire. And Casablanca isn\'t gonna be in theaters again any time soon. But in the meantime, There Will Be Blood is just about as good, and will likely haunt our generation as much as the Hollywood studio epics of the past...', u'0.103873', u'PT Anderson delivers perhaps his best work with "There Will Be Blood". Unlike "Magnolia", the film\'s daunting runtime is not very daunting whilst watching it. All acting in the film was solid, even the work of the child actors. Daniel Day-Lewis in particular delivered a truly phenomenal performance, capturing the power of greed, fear, insanity, and comedy simultaneously, at many points throughout the film. At no point does the time period distract from the power of the film. Sometimes period pieces cannot be appreciated because they delve too deep into historical details -- turning the experience into more of a documentary than a narrative set in the past. This is not the case for "There Will Be Blood", as human interactions are the focus of the film. Johnny Greenwood\'s chilling score is very strong, benefiting from the elegant minimalism that he show\'s in the band Radiohead. The cinematography is also spectacular. Robert Elswit beautifully captures the essence of the environment and the tension amongst the characters. All in all, this is truly a perfectly crafted film.', u'0.384305', u"People did not like this movie for a simple reason: too negative. I can understand that this movie is so depressing in so may ways. \n\nWhat it shows that Big Fish eats Litte Fish and none of us want to think about that anymore than most of us experience it in our daily life. It shows the battle between the evangelicals and the corporate business man. Or maybe even the battle between evangelicals of today and the non-religious people or atheists of today. Even worse is that this movie shows that religious people, priests are or can be as bad as a corrupt oil man. Maybe why people did not like this movie is because it might have offended them. Especially Paul Dano playing the priest. Both Daniel Day Lewis and Paul Dano are wrong and too extreme on their opinions. People are able to accept this. What people cannot accept is though that these same extremities and same misguided opinions from both characters are very much true in that they are heavily believed still today. Not all Christains are like Paul Dano's character and not all business man are like Daniel Day Lewis's character but many are like them. That is the world we live in.\n\nNow is their any alternative or positive side? The answer is yes and that is H.W. the son of Daniel Plainview(Daniel Day Lewis). He epitomizes hope. He shows that despite being deaf and having a father who uses him as a ploy for better business he can still break free of the chains that he is being tied down by. What separates H.W. from the residents and evangelists of Little Boston? The difference is that he and his father are educated and they are not. That is how Daniel Plainview is able to manipulate and cheat them the Sunday family, even Eli Sunday(Paul Dano) the priest and preacher of Little Boston. From what H.W. sees and experiences he sees that much of what is around him is just wrong. He uses his experience that he had gained as a kid to break free of the corruption and chaos that could have taken over him. That is one aspect of the education I'am talking about: our experiences and understanding of what is happening around us. \n\nNow to get to the technical aspects of There Will Be Blood. It is just truly spectacular in every way. First off the acting was amazing. Daniel Day Lewis gave arguably the best performance of his career playing Daniel Plaiview or ever since movies began to be made. He freaked me out and probably shocked many people. His thirst for power and money was at such a high level that it made me wonder about what people are really capable of. The deceiving, the greed, the thirst for power and the every man for himself attitude actually looked more real than ever to me. Without Daniel Day Lewis I don't think this movie could have achieved what it has. Paul Dano gave a great performance as Eli Sunday though people tend to disagree. I think he gave a great portrayal of an extremist evangelical priest of how he himself had his own thirst for power and how he was more blasphemous then respectful and gracious to god then how you would expect a priest to be. How could people not be shocked by these two characters, I was myself.\n\nWhy was the music for this movie not liked. I thought this was among the top five musical scores I have ever heard. The music perfectly gave you the feeling of the corruption and deception setting into the movie. It perfectly intertwined with the rest of the movie as the movie itself was ever growingly becoming more and more chaotic and surreal. Probably too shocking though.\n\nPaul Thomas Anderson I believe gave the best directing job of the year. He was able to show the oil fields and its processes, the rise of an oil man, the way everyone can be bought even a priest and the hope that H.W. represented. This movie was never boring and it was as stunning of a directing job as Daniel Day Lewis gave as a performance for his role in this movie. The intensity of this movie was as high as a movie could possibly be and some of the credit for this has to go to the director. The cinematography and the music seemed to intertwine perfectly like the rest of the movie. It gave the sense of the time period and as said before the greed, deception, etc. The cinematography did not just give you a negative feeling but a feeling as if what you are watching is real.\n\nYou should not like this movie just because of the great technical achievements as you should not for any movie but for what it says and how it says it. I'm not even sure if you should enjoy this movie in general but you should not be blinded by your opinions. I applaud you whoever out there who can somewhat understand this movie and get past the lying and deceiving we do to ourselves. This movie really shows the humanity of human beings. Why is this rated-R?It has so many intense scenes that if you get inside this movie it is truly haunting. Now maybe this movie was too powerful for many people, it was probably even shocking for realists. Maybe though its not that surprising that so many people don't like this movie because the truth hurts. Not the truth about corruption or about people but the truth about ourselves.", u'-0.109188', u"This film raises the game for everyone out there. I have loved all of Paul Thomas Anderson's work, including his greatly underrated Punch-Drunk Love, but this is a huge leap from any of the previous movies into a realm, as others have said, inhabited by classics such as Treasure of the Sierra Madre - and then some. Every element of this film is astonishing, from the opening twenty minutes, which feature virtually no dialog, to Jonny Greenwood's score, which I have heard criticized as too imposing but which seems just about perfect to me (and brings to mind the non-Blue Danube elements of 2001 at its most experimental). Daniel Day-Lewis' performance is in a league of its own: his voice, his mannerisms, his physical movement, his stunted emotions, are flesh and blood, and hauntingly so, in a way that even Tommy Lee Jones in In The Valley of Elah (which I thought was a pretty staggering performance) can't quite attain. I will watch this film again and again simply to see something so raw and so moving and so gut-wrenching. This is why I love movies; this is what made me want to make movies when I was fourteen years old.", u'0.667585', u'With all of the hype surrounding Daniel Day-Lewis\' performance (he was, in fact, given a Best Actor nod from the San Diego Film Critics Society, for whatever that is worth) in the P.T. Anderson-directed tale of early American oil speculation, "There Will Be Blood," I can only relate my extreme disappointment.\n\nThis would have made an interesting 90-minute movie, but, unfortunately, it runs over 140-minutes, most of which is smeared with plasma and petroleum to the extent every character is sullied and unrecognizable as a human being.\n\nPerhaps Anderson wanted it that way, after all, it\'s really only Day-Lewis\xb9 character (the lubricious Daniel Plainview) that even comes close to developing; the others are simply there to keep him company and accept his violent tirades.\n\nYes, times were tough in the early hardscrabble years of the American West, but this guy makes Jonas Cord ("The Carpetbaggers") look like Mother Theresa.\n\nWe first meet Plainview in 1898 mining for silver in Arizona. After a nasty fall in which he breaks his ankle, he discovers oil in the shaft. After a few years, he has a crew and a few successful wells.\n\nOne day, a fellow worker \xad there with his infant son (for some reason) \xadis killed and Plainview adopts the boy, H. W. (Dillion Freasier) for no other reason than to have a cute face to show while he cons the public (see "Paper Moon").\n\nThese are some of the movie\'s best scenes, with Plainview - and H.W. in tow - visiting backwoods bergs and convincing a gullible populace into signing away land rights for a fraction of what they were worth. Plainview, with a sinister soft-spoken demeanor plays psychological games until the rubes are all but ready to GIVE him the oil rights in perpetuity. \n\nSeveral years later, a visitor tells Plainview about a ranch in California that is soaking in oil, so Pop and son head out there, under the pretense of hunting quail. There they meet the Sunday family, addled dad, Abel (David Willis), a few non-descript females and an Evangelist son, Eli (Paul Dano, "Little Miss Sunshine").\n\nPlainview and Eli do not hit it off at all, and this is the conflict that sets up the second act. It doesn\'t take much to finagle Abel out of the Sunday Ranch, as well as the surrounding property, but several tragedies cause many in the town \xad especially the young preacher \xad to wonder if they made the right move in letting Plainview into their midst.\n\nWhen H.W. is rendered deaf in an explosion and disastrous fire, we wonder if the whole enterprise is worth it.\n\nUp until this point, I was willing to go along with this film as not only a historical drama relating the days of the early oil industry, as well as a chronicle of rural religious fervor, sort of "Oklahoma Crude" meets "The Apostle."\n\nThe problem is, the picture does not continue to walk that thin line. We are now subjected to scene after scene of Plainview\xb9s descent into madness and murder \xad but with little or no motivation for either.\n\nFor example, he beats Eli severely and mocks his church; meets a man who claims he\xb9s his brother; abandons H.W. and generally spirals out of control.\n\nHe\'s business savvy, however, and plans to build a pipeline to transport his vast oil reserves to the coast (thus eliminating the cost of railroad shipping). To do this, though, he has to build through a local hermit\'s (Hans Howes, "Seabiscuit") land.\n\nThe only way to accomplish this is to humble himself before Eli and the congregation and be baptized, obviously a fate worse than death to Plainview who seems to have no morals, whatsoever.\n\nNow that he\xb9s joined the church and gotten his pipeline built, does he enjoy even one iota of his success? Absolutely not.\n\nIn one of Day-Lewis\' many monologues, he gives us his motivation for being such a bastard, "I do not just want to succeed, I do not want anyone else to succeed."\n\nStill, that does not explain his psychotic, murderous frenzy, and the longer the film goes on, the less cohesive it became.\n\nI can accept his tirades early on, and even a bit of his unmotivated violence near the middle of the film, but Anderson pushes things to the extreme limit. He\'s even admitted that he watched "Treasure of the Sierra Madre" before beginning to film "Blood" - yet he still did not learn anything about coherent film-making.\n\nFriends, this is by far one of the most depressing and oppressive films of the year. In fact, it makes "No Country For Old Men" look like "Mary Poppins." \n\nThen, at the conclusion, after watching more than two-plus hours of this evil, hateful man succeed over and over again, we\'re treated to another brutal, pointless murder -\xad this one coming out of nowhere.\n\nLike "The Last King of Scotland," in which Forrest Whittaker won the Best Actor award, this is another performance-driven, but deeply-flawed motion picture.\n\nDay-Lewis will certainly be nominated for this, and he may actually win, but that does not mean one will enjoy the experience of watching that performance.', u'-0.436451', u"What is evil? What is hate? How low can an individual go with one's actions and still be considered human....? These, quite possibly, are the biggest questions raised in There Will Be Blood.\n\nPaul Thomas Anderson and Daniel Day-Lewis, the tycoons at the helm of this dig for moral oil, tell a story that takes the archetypal anti-heroes of 'Citizen Kane' and Travis Bickle of 'Taxi Driver' to a whole new, 21st-century level. The film, using Lewis's character Daniel Plainview, walks through incredibly dangerous cinematic territory that questions religion, plays with the nature of greed and hate and evil, and with it all, draws terrifying parallels to the world we live in today. The film and its main character claw so deep through the limits of humanity and the landscape of hell, that you'll be thanking the Good Lord for the silver screen that divides you from this horrible world Paul Thomas Anderson has portrayed. But despite how safe you may seem in your cushy seat, you will undoubtedly walk out of the theater with all kinds of new demons and ghosts buzzing in your head and ripping away at your subconscious. In this way, Anderson has abandoned his primary previous influence of Robert Altman to take more of a Stanley Kubrick direction, creating moral allegories that creep into your psyche and don't ever leave. You should be scared. Very Scared.", u'-0.10261', u"PT Anderson's name already means something, or I should say something else. His self assuredness alone gives me shivers. A modern artist with such clear and severe vision of the world. Boogie Nights, Magnolia, even Punch Drunk Love have an Wellesian disregard for what's in or out. His films are landmarks that may infuriate some, confuse others and mesmerize the rest of us. Here, with the rigorous tale of an impervious oil man, PT Anderson outdoes himself. He has Daniel Day Lewis as his accomplice in a performance that would be as difficult to match as it is difficult to describe. There is a monstrous beauty here that not even a broken nose can disguise. The saga is filled with long silent moments of tension that take place in a cinematic canvas and an actor's head. PT Anderson must have known that this was going to be, not only not a mainstream opus but a hard pill to swallow. I for one stand up to applaud his daringness.", u'-0.202214', u"Who is Paul Thomas Anderson? There is something about him that does't belong to this earth. That could be a compliment or not, it's all up to us. That's what make his cinema so damn unique. At the end of the day it's all up to us. But the abrasive way in which he visits universes and throws his views to us is so powerful, so arrogant, so enthralling, so infuriating that the experience leaves you baffled and suspicious. but also enchanted, transformed. Here, Daniel's saga could very well be the saga of a Hollywood maverick. So little time for sentimentality. Daniel Day Lewis seems to understand it all and he adds his unmistakable humanity to another monster, after his butcher in Gangs Of New York. His performance goes beyond anything we've seen recently anywhere. From Upton Sinclair to Paul Thomas Anderson via Daniel Day Lewis an unmissable work of art.", u'0.270634', u'If Daniel Day-Lewis doesn\'t win an Oscar for this performance, there is something horribly wrong. His performance and this film were amazing. I don\'t give this kind of accolade out generously. I was at the screening at the Chelsea West. We waited outside in the cold and rain for a good two hours to get in there and get some good seats and I can honestly say, I would have waited double that amount of time. Enough of my rambling though. In regards to the film itself; it was very well done. The cinematography was amazing as well as the set design. As usual, PTA gives us a flawless script with terrifying, humorous, and compelling dialogue. All of the acting was spot on. Paul Dano played the role of a two-faced, maniacal, and power hungry preacher. The young man who plays H.W. Plainview was also very solid. As PTA stated during the Q&A last night, he seemed to know everything about the story and his character and seemed to be a natural. Daniel Day-Lewis. Need I say more? He was breathtaking in TWBB. Amazing is all i can say. You will need to see the film to see for yourself. Some may become bored with the film at times, which is what i gathered from the people sitting around me. I had no problem with the "slow" scenes, but the general public may have a problem grasping this film. If anything, this will be the reason if it gets snubbed at the Oscars.', u'0.0554022', u'I like Upton Sinclair and I like Daniel Day Lewis (DDL) (esp. impressed with Gangs of NY), but this movie is a flop in so many ways I can\'t recount them all here. Generally. it suffers from a deeply flawed screenplay and what I would presume to be the misdirection of DDLs considerable talent. In roughly 2.5 hours, the movie does almost nothing to either account for or reveal in any particularly interesting way the moral bankruptcy of Plainview. Insofar as DDL\'s performance is concerned, it is particularly overacted at the scene of his baptism, when his overt contempt for the proceeding could not be more apparent. While we can sympathize with his plight and laugh with his sarcastic murmurings, it is simply unbelievable that such a manipulative person in desperate need of the critical lease for his pipeline wouldn\'t at least fake the requisite sincerity, especially as we know the Plainview character is a capable performer and has a history of doing so. The 30 minute over-dramatized coda explains nothing and adds nothing and thus the movie\'s conclusion is abrupt and unsatisfying. We already knew that Plainview was brutish and that Eli Sunday was a fraud. Some better explanation for the distance between D Plainview and H.W. would have been welcome, but none was offered.\n\nA WEEK LATER: Everyone I speak with in NYC who has seen this movie agrees that it is weak and over-hyped. How is this rated the #28 best film ever made on IMDb, higher than Chinatown, Taxi Driver, M, Vertigo, The Third Man, Clockwork Orange, Raging Bull, Rashomon, etc... etc... ???? Are the voters here truly tasteless or just studio shills?\n\nTWO WEEKS THEREAFTER: With another 1000 votes in the tally, its clear that the IMDb audience thinks this is the 16th best film ever made -- which goes to show how very little great cinema they\'ve seen. Despite their rating, the film is no better than The Treasure of Sierra Madre where Bogart essentially gives DDL lessons in how to play the miner succumbed to greed -- a performance for which he didn\'t even grab a best actor nomination! (Admittedly, TWBB is perhaps more "true to life," and benefits from incredible staging (sets and rigs) but I take this to be a function of the present climate where audiences are willing to accept an overt "indictment" of capitalist speculation as opposed to the more restrictive clime of 1948 in which the subject had to be reduced to a comedy.) Interestingly, I just read on wikipedia that "(The treasure of Sierra Madre) is director Paul Thomas Anderson\'s favorite film. In fact, he watched it every night before bed while writing his film There Will Be Blood"', u'-0.42425', u'The idea that this film is one of the top 250 of all time (let alone top 25!) is preposterous. This is the first review I\'ve submitted, and I do so because I feel compelled to express my outrage that a movie such as this could garner such a high rating, and may by itself destroy whatever credibility the "250" list may have retained.\n\nCount me in the "Emperor Has No Clothes" crowd. Look, I loved "Boogie Nights" as much as anyone. It was a masterpiece, a work of genius. Nostalgia for that film is the only reasonable explanation I can construct to understand why so many have rated "Blood" so highly.\n\nDaniel Day-Lewis gives a fine performance, yes, but what else is new? Though well-acted, I found his character simple and uninteresting. I am stunned by those who seem to regard Plainview as a new and terrifying character, a soulless messenger of a new evil (I chuckled when the goat-ranching rube whom Plainview aims to exploit introduces himself as "Abel")"No Country For Old Men" and J. Bardem covered that territory far more effectively. Plainview seemed like a pretty straightforward sociopath to me.\n\nPaul Dano, who I think is a fine actor, is terribly miscast as the evangelical preacher. He lacks the charisma and presence to credibly portray a charlatan. He was shrieky, and bizarre, not smooth, charming,confident, or anything else that suckers people into falling for scams. He was utterly unbelievable in his role, and it was too large a part to make such a mistake, set, as it was, against the furnace that is Daniel Day-lewis.\n\nWhich leads me to the kid who played Plainview\'s adopted son for the greater part of the film. I am loath to criticize a child, but I can only assume this boy had the "look" as a prop desired by the director, b/c he displayed no ability as an actor. When called upon for dialog, his stilted performance is painful to behold. I cannot believe there wasn\'t another kid who could\'ve hit his cues more effectively, more naturally.\n\nI actually found the ending one of the few interesting, thought provoking aspects of the film, but by then it was far too late to breathe life into the bloated behemoth that had strewn itself out on the screen the previous 2+ hours.', u'-0.330884', u'First off, I\'d like to say that I have enjoyed most all of PTA\'s films. I loved Boogie Nights, thought Magnolia was an ambitious, but not great picture, and thoroughly enjoyed Punch- Drunk Love. I, like many others have eagerly awaited Paul Thomas Anderson\'s latest film, There Will Be Blood. In fact, I drove almost 120 miles and waited 2-3 hours in line to see it, as that was the closest showing of it. I bought into all the hype, read almost every review, watched any and all interviews of it that I could, expecting a "masterpiece" as so many IMDBers put it. People even had the audacity to say it\'s one of the best films of the decade. Some big words and shoes for a film to fit. \n\nNevertheless, after the wait, I found myself disappointed and terribly bored with this film. The movie\'s pacing and editing was SO slow and too long (nearly 3 hours), I felt that the editor should have had another much needed run in the cutting room. For instance, certain shots in a scene went on forever as the camera stays with a character for 5 min or more, never changing angles, creating a needlessly slow pace. There were many scenes with little to no dialog adding another dull layer. Now I appreciate films with silence that present cinematic art ( "3-Iron" and "Spring, Summer, Fall, Winter...And Spring", two movies that are nearly all silence) yet here it granted the film unevenness. People are claiming this film had beautiful cinematography, yet I fail to see what was so unique. Perhaps the theater I was at had an inexperienced projectionist, bad print or something, but the shots, lighting, and composition were rather dull and the camera movements uninteresting. I mean how hard is it to shoot wide-angle barren landscapes and campfire scenes and follow actors with steadicam/tracking scenes? Although this wasn\'t a stylized movie, rather an attempt to take you into the 19th century, I thought the cinematography was mediocre at best. I\'ve seen better work from Robert Elswit and other DPs. \n\nWorse than mediocre however, is the music/soundtrack, which was so obnoxious and used out of place, that it just may have worsened the viewing experience. The horror-like, intense and unnerving score that was mixed way too loud in the soundtrack, doesn\'t even seem to match the images or the story. The music isn\'t "bad", but it does not fit well. The music, which attempted to create tension among the characters exemplifying greed and corruption, seemed extremely forced and vexing. Here is this rather slowly cut/paced movie displaying an ugly landscape or early America undeveloped showcasing a man being SLOWLY corrupted, scored side-by-side with this imposing, experimental, enormous, horror-like score that was woefully out of sync with the film and apparently wanted to call attention to itself, not assist the story. \n\nActing... Well, although there is praise left and right for Daniel Day Lewis and Paul Dano, I felt both performances were lackluster, Paul Dano\'s being much worse. There were many times that I felt like Dano was just reading from a script and not embodying the character, for instance, the first time we are introduced to him, his lines are weak and artificial with strange speech pauses and insipid facial expressions. DDL was also nothing special. His accent was, well... certainly not mind-blowing, and didn\'t make me think of anything uniquely "American" as that was what he was supposedly trying to portray. In many scenes he was overacting and Dano was underacting, or vice versa. I couldn\'t get into the two personality types as they were undeveloped. Although the audience is supposed to dislike DD Lewis, I didn\'t care for any of the characters and completely lost interest in the film about 40 min to an hour into it. DD Lewis is a great actor and that may be an understatement, but he certainly did not shine in this picture. Yet at the same time, he may have been the only redeemable thing in this movie. \n\nI can only assume that since PTA is known for giving minimal direction and following his scripts closely (he has stated this during commentaries of his films) the acting was flawed and pulse nearly-dead, due to the weak script/adaptation. There were some major/minor holes in this film, but I didn\'t care. I was too bored, and couldn\'t care about any underlying tones of greed and religion since the characters neither really embodied either very well. Some characters appear, some disappear never to be seen again, certain scenes that were supposed to be climactic and intense came off as comedic (the audience I was with, laughed a great deal during these scenes) and I wondered if that was the way PT Anderson intended it, or it being the audience I sat with. I don\'t know. For example, during the final scene where DDL and Dano\'s "discussion" turns into a near fight, the scene comes off as if it were slapstick and had the audience busting out in laughs.\n\nIn summary, this film was a major let down for me as I had high hopes for it, and was a fan of all of PTA\'s films. The film\'s execution, writing, and direction was empty and flawed, resulting in an uneven, and painfully boring film. I suppose there are different strokes for different folks, but the film really stinks.', u'-0.376005', u'Hi. How\'s everybody doing? I just saw \'There Will Be Blood\' last night. I don\'t like the idea of spending my whole life on the internet on message boards discussing trivial aspects of pop culture, but I felt compelled to issue a warning about this film. Critics seem to like it. Oscar nomination folks gave it a nod. Even more so, the pseudo-critic/\'we derive personal validation of our innate human desire for creation and creativity by attaching ourselves to the works of others like leeches" folks really really liked it.\n\nThis movie is not good.\n\nIt may be compelling to a degree. The acting is fine. There isn\'t a story. Perhaps this lack of story is OK for the fact that regular life (at least based on my perspective created from my personal experiences) does not seem to have a nice little beginning/relevant conundrum/happy resolution format. I even applaud the director for trying to make a movie such as this and "stretch" our thinking. Its just that this movie failed at stretching anything other than my ability to believe people who review films and decide for us what is good.\n\nMy warning is for those who haven\'t seen this movie. Please go to the theater with an open mind. Make up your own mind. Decide for yourself whether or not you like this movie. Come back home. Sit at your computer for 30 minutes if you have to and think about the movie for yourself. THEN and only then, decide what it is that you think. Write it on this website. Tell the world what YOU think.\n\nAs a society, we have to get away from being sheep. If a movie makes an attempt at being art, then that is wonderful. If it fails, then that is fine. Good try. But, lets please not decide that something is good based on some sort of manufactured intellectualist solidarity. It hurts us all.\n\nFor me, I hope someday that i get my 3 hours back.', u'-0.201924', u"exhilarating, suspenseful, chilling and beautiful.\n\ni heard once that the reason people stand whenever the 'hallelujah chorus' is performed is because it was first performed for a king, and he was so moved by it, he simply stood up during the song. this movie is just like that.\n\ni'm happy to be alive and at an age where i can appreciate this sort of thing now, because 50 years from now, people will surely say, 'i wonder what it was like to see that movie in theaters when it had just been released.' \n\nwhen i say, 'you should go see this movie,' i don't mean it's really entertaining, a good way to spend a Saturday night, worth the price of admission or what have you. i mean it in the way that i think everyone should see the sistine chapel, read hemingway, listen to beethoven's 9th symphony and so on. it will certainly be remembered for generations to come as an important work of art.", u'0.925373', u"The world of cinema has seen and marveled a plethora of phenomenal performers, who over the years have entranced billions of viewers globally with their guile, grandeur, subtlety, eloquence and idiosyncrasy, but I dare say that none of their performances can match Daniel Day-Lewis' portrayal of Daniel Plainview in There Will Be Blood, for sheer ruthlessness, panache, eloquence and cheek. Being the chameleon that he truly is, Daniel Day-Lewis incredibly musters up all his prodigious talent as an actor to conjure up his misanthropic alter ego, Daniel Plainview, whose perpetually smirked face bolstered by his malice filled eyes makes him one of the strongest and the most fascinating characters ever caricatured on the silver screen. Daniel Day-Lewis is at the top of his game and virtually unstoppable as Daniel Plainview, a portrayal that not only resuscitated him as an actor, but also established him as someone who wouldn't leave a single stone unturned to bring his character to life and perhaps it is this very attribute that has helped him in his endeavor to be the absolute best at what he does. \n\nPaul Dano is absolutely brilliant as Eli Sunday and has complimented Daniel Day-Lewis in every sense of the word in spite of the fact that he barely had a week to prepare contrary to Daniel Day-Lewis, who had a whole year to prepare. Eli Sunday is ambitious, enigmatic, placid, pesky and pusillanimous and despite being highly contrasting to Daniel Plainview, ironically has many similarities to him, especially the uncanny demeanor that helped them both to inveigle others. It is the chemistry and the ever growing tension between them that makes the movie haunting and spectacular. \n\nThere Will Be Blood is a morbid tale of greed, betrayal and obsession adorned by some great performances, visually stunning cinematography and masterful direction. Plainview owns a mine with potential silver deposits and his assiduity finally pays off when he discovers a silver ore. He sells it to acquire a crew to help him with the subsequent diggings in the mine. After the mine runs out of silver, oil is discovered in it and hence begins Plainview's journey of insatiable greed and morbid obsession. In order to acquire more oilfields and to strike out further deals easily, he adopts a young boy and names him as H.W. to help build a facade of a benevolent family man for himself. It almost takes him a decade to establish himself as a minor oilman, but this moderate success further intensifies his avarice. Subsequently, a young man named Paul Sunday (Paul Dano) visits Plainview's camp and offers to sell information about his family's ranch, which he claims to have an ocean of oil underneath it. Plainview and H.W. travel to the Sunday Ranch pretending to be on quail hunting while hiding their ulterior motive of verifying Paul's claim. Being as perspicacious as he was, it didn't take him long to find the vestiges of oil in the cracks formed due to the recent earthquake. He tries to inveigle the Sunday patriarch (who almost cried with rapture on hearing the offer) to sell him the land at a moderate price (which he calls quail price and not oil price), but is stymied by owner's ambitious son, Eli Sunday (also played by Paul Dano), who asks him to pay an additional ten thousand dollars towards the building of the Church of Third Revelation. Plainview reluctantly pays him five thousand dollars as advance and promises to pay the remaining amount once the drilling starts. Plainview assembles his crew at the Sunday Ranch and builds the first derrick. He also buys almost all of the land surrounding the Sunday Ranch so he will have not only those drilling rights but also the right to build a pipeline to the ocean to circumvent the railroads and their shipping costs. Eli wants to bless the derrick before drilling begins but Plainview rebuffs him. Using the money given by Plainview, Eli builds his church projecting himself as a preacher, faith healer and prophet. Soon the church has many followers, most of whom are Plainview's workers. Eli's increasing influence on the people and his display of false divinity starts pestering Plainview, who is further flummoxed by congregation's frequent gatherings (the daily prayers prevented the workers from taking desired rest, thereby decreasing their efficiency). Plainview beseeches Eli to make them less frequent, but Eli dismisses him with disdain. Plainview's ruthless ego is badly jolted by Eli's stubbornness and he brutally assaults him and even threatens to kill him when Eli asks him for the remaining money. Eli returns home all covered with mud after Plainview's assault and takes out his frustration on his myopic father, blaming him for acquiescing to Plainview's naked ambition. H.W. is deafened during an oil rig incident and starts behaving as a brat. Disconcerted by the change in the mannerisms of his son, he sends him away. Eli soon gets his revenge when a fellow named Bandy forces Plainview to get baptized at the Church of the Third Revelation (as a penance for a murder that Plainview committed and of which only Bandy knew). While baptizing him, Eli humiliates him by repeatedly slapping him and calling him a sinner for abandoning his hapless child. This incident further intensifies the hatred in Plainview and sets the tone for a deeply haunting finale when they meet many years later. \n\nP.T Anderson once again proves his mettle as a director and manages to pack a punch with this poignant and a deeply disturbing masterpiece. The movie incredibly succeeds on every level and entertains immensely, while still delivering a strong message. It was undoubtedly the best picture of 2007 and one of the best of the decade. In fact, it was very remiss of the academy to keep up with its long earned notoriety and prefer a relatively mediocre 'No Country for Old Man' over this truly haunting masterpiece. \n\nP.S. 10/10", u'0.110331'], u'tt0079944': [u'\nSome have claimed that "Stalker" is not a science fiction film. I\'d say it\'s more of a science fiction film than most of what Hollywood passes off as part of the genre, most of which are simply action films with a sci-fi bent. Stalker is science fiction in the vein of the genres greatest writers like Phillip K. Dick and Stanislaw Lem.  It\'s pure science fiction, based on science, metaphysics and speculation, not some action fantasy or space opera that fits into the genre on the technicality that it takes place "in the future" or "a long, long time ago".   The film is slow...very slow but it has to be to put you into the mindset of the film.  After the opening 30 minutes the pacing actually draws you into the film in a more personal way more than any Cyborg-post-apocalyptic-hell crap Hollywood could spew out. This film is truly sci-fi, and truly great sci-fi.', u'0.437902', u'Andrei Tarkovsky is a rarity among filmmakers in that he creates films that resemble elaborate (and always smartly written, beautifully shot and superbly acted) puzzles. The pieces are always scattered, and Tarkovsky relies on his viewer to bring the final element of the puzzle along with him. SOLARIS explores the boundaries of consciousness and the sense of grief (and it uses the titular planet as a metaphor for God). ANDREI ROUBLEV is a multi-layered voyage into religious belief. STALKER, however, is far more spiritual and existential than both of them.\n\nA teacher and a scientist wish to go to a restricted patch of nature - the mythical conscious "Zone" - to make their wishes come true. To enter the area and survive its numerous danger, they hire a man sensible to the Zone\'s thoughts and actions, a Stalker. What they find there turns out to be very different from what they expected, as they come to discover who they truly are.\n\nThere\'s only so much you can say without getting drowned in details that would appear heavy-handed on paper but flow seamlessly on screen. Quite often, Tarkovsky reduces his characters to silence, letting their movements and eyes convey their thoughts and feelings and letting the viewer bring his own thoughts and beliefs to the film. One of STALKER\'s many treats is that it invites you to get carried away into your own thoughts, flowing with the images as it provides new questions to ponder... In that sense, the film is very much like a philosophical poem: a very simple surface covering innumerable layers of meaning. Yet the images Tarkovsky provides - whether filming landscapes or wide-shots or simply peering into his actors\' extraordinary faces - make this almost hypnotic.\n\nSTALKER is a treasure: an invitation to go on a mental ride with a poet and philosopher. A film that makes you wonder more about yourself yet without making you anxious. The few existing films like STALKER are the reason why cinema is called "art"!', u'0.475881', u"For me, it's, quite simply, the best film ever made; Don't you find you can pause any Tarkovsky film at any moment and the art on your screen is good enough to have as a poster on your wall for life ? With Stalker it is doubly true. The first time I experienced the tunnel scene my heart nearly stopped. This was in 1984 I watched the TV listings in England for 20 years waiting for a repeat - finally buying the DVD in 2004, though I couldn't really afford it. Proof that a SCI-FI film does not need tons of effects to work. In a science fiction film book I read years ago they rated Stalker as the only film ever made deserving full marks in all 3 sections. Imagine if Tarkovsky had made a film of one of PKD's novels ?! OK, I'm dreaming ?! We are lucky to have been blessed by his genius. The good die young. All the best, Rich (English, 38 yrs, Paris)", u'0.200158', u'\ni want to say somethings about the most poetic,philosophical and intuitive director, tarkovsky and his movies ,especially Stalker.\n\nfirst of all, we must all know that, tarkovsky is not for all. his poetic understanding of life and human and putting this understanding to his movies is unique in the world for my opinion. one of the most poetic and philosophical movies of him, Stalker is that kind of movie. it is like a poem written with objects. we must feel before we try to understand.\n\nopening sequence of film contains some kind of expressionist objects with related the moral and inner conditions of the people living in the town . the "dirty" black and white take gives the viewers ,the mood of people having nothing to live, nothing to believe and nothing to give others.and the aggressive green take in the "zone" gives another vision of the life. the camera moves very slow to make us to go into to film and feel the film. tarkovsky\'s usage of objects and colours is very different and that is why i think he was a cinema poet. on the other hand, in addition to this "poem written with objects", the film also has very deep philosophical content. what is life,what is human, what is goodness, what is selfishness, what is devotion, what are the bases of our civilizations etc. and people are made to think all these things, not mostly with dialogs but with objects and colours and complete vision. \n\nfor example, the three objects shown while the camera goes into the water ,but actually to the heart of human being and we see one cringe, one gun and one religious icon. and these are the metaphors of the human civilizations for my opinion. and all the journey into to the "zone" and finally "room" , actually done into the human being. into our selfishness,into our subconsciousness, our badness,our goodness, our weak and strong parts. actually i can feel that , the things searched in this movie are our lost innocence . the stalker is the only people who believes something and needs to believe .and actually the journey itself is a fake. to go to the truth,faith,justice, goodness are being related with innocence in that movie. the microcosms shown poetically in the water is another metaphor shows human being\'s selfish behaviour. because human, destroys the things,destroys the innocence, destroys the world living around them.our today\'s civilization broke our strong cooperation with nature and changed this relationship to a nature disaster. the movie gives the message of the need of mercy to all the living and even non-living things in our nature. because human being\'s salvation is only related with that.\n\nand the need of hope, need of believe is human being\'s basic needs. and our modern world destroyed all the hopes and believes. the movie contains metaphors making us to feel and think about those needs.and the most critical thing is felt in the film that self-denial is the basic need in our world.and unfortunately this value is lost and needed to be re-gain.\n\ni can tell about all the metaphors in the movie but no need. because every person understand those things different like kafka\'s novels. and we just need to watch the movie with no prejudice but with open heart.\n\ni recommend this film to all the cinema-lovers. i recommend also not to try to understand this film. only leave yourself to this great poem and it will give you all you need.\n', u'0.459361', u'It seems to me that I see Tarkovsky\' movies differently from many other people. For me this film is not "too long" or boring. For me this is one of the best movies ever made.\n\nWestern culture has a very long tradition of film-making. Usually typical western movie is focused on "story". (Of course - not always) The sharpness and tension of the movie are achieved by the big number of cuts or by the fast varying of shots or by the sudden varying of plans or by some surprising angle of camera etc. Tarkovsky don\'t like cuts. The number of cuts is minimal. His camera is moving like in dream (Bergman envied Tarkovsky for that), it has no angles at all. Colours are pale, "dirty", very tender, soft, almost black-and-white.\n\nIn a typical western movie dialog is followed by the camera. Picture is illustrating text and is subordinated to it. In Stalker text and visual image are coexisting, cooperating with each-other. Both are moving on their own ways but at the same time, somehow - harmonically. Text and picture are not subordinated, they are both independent.\n\nWhy is Tarkovsky using such a weird language? Surely not only because he wants to opposite the dogmas of western cinema. He has a positive message too. Audience of his films has to understand his films not only at the level of thinking or emotions, but at the level of much deeper consciousness. Therefore watching his movies means rather meditation than watching-TV-and-eating-popcorn. The purpose of Tarkovsky\'s films is to loose the mind of audiences, to wake it up to much deeper attention. So that audiences can simply watch and see.\n\nStalker is not an entertainment and is not supposed to be. It means there is no sense at all to watch Stalker, when you need some amusing entertainment. Stalker is a serious movie. It is very narrow-minded to evaluate movies on the assumption of entertainment only. Of course, we live in the world of movie-consumers, produced by powerful film-companies, demanding more and more and more exciting entertainment. Consumer doesn\'t understand this movie. For him it is big bore.', u'0.00269161', u"\nThe Region 2 Artificial Eye DVD includes interesting interviews with the cameraman and production designer.  The production designer reveals that the film was completed only to be destroyed because it had been shot on experimental Kodak and couldn't be developed - a whole year's work was ruined.  He proposes the possibility that the authorities of the time didn't want it to be developed.  The incident nearly destroyed Tarkovsky.  He was finally persuaded to go back and film a new Stalker, this time on a shoestring budget.\n\nWhat does the film mean?  Ask me again when I've watched it maybe ten times.\n\nCertainly the Zone means more to Stalker than the Room.  The Room is his living, but the Zone is an escape, a sanctuary from the noisy, industrial rusting slum where he lives (captured brilliantly in metallic sepia).  In the Zone everything eventually returns to nature - like a pastoral coral reef growing on a battleship lichen and mosses engulf factory buildings and tanks.  His first action on arriving there is to leave the other two occupied while he communes with the natural things growing in the zone, the grasses, the dew, the soil, the tiny worm that dances head-over-tail down his hand.\n\nA beautiful, great and puzzling film.  But then if it revealed all its secrets straight off then, apart from the beautiful visuals and the soundtrack it would be pointless watching it again.  Great art only leaches out its secrets gradually and only to those with the desire to learn them.", u'-0.118071', u'There have been some comments about this film\'s length. I am initially reminded of the scene in "Amedeus" where Mozart is told that his composition has "Too many notes" to this he replies "There are just enough..." This film offers great insight into the inner workings of not just the creative mind but the social will of mankind. If you are a viewer who enjoys film please disregard the whining of those who don\'t enjoy investigating thoroughly the possibility of a well thought out and concise perspective and please watch this masterpiece of modern film. The director leads the viewer through some profound aspects of humanity with such brilliance and in my opinion swiftness that to pass it by would be a shame.', u'0.688268', u'\nThe characters at the heart of Tarkovsky\'s "Stalker" are people who embark on an arduous journey only to discover that they had no idea what they wanted to gain from it. The central character is a "stalker," a man who makes a living by illegally escorting people through a restricted area to The Room, a place where their greatest wish will supposedly come true. Exactly why the area is restricted is never made perfectly clear; in the novel this film is partially based on, "The Roadside Picnic," it was a site where aliens briefly landed, and The Room was an object they left behind almost as if it were refuse. But Tarkovsky would rather not settle for such a flat explanation. To him, The Room is a place that means different things to the people who journey there, and the stark, ravished landscape they must journey through consists of the phobias and anxieties that they can hardly bear to face. The expedition the men experience is a long and often maddening one, and there are many scenes where the camera lingers on a beautifully composed shot so that the viewer can take time to understand how the characters fit into the settings and how those settings form both natural and supernatural obstacles.\n\nAndrei Tarkovsky was an artist who did not like giving solid answers to the questions his films posed. He sculpted his stories so that viewers who had the patience and self-discipline to stay attentive all the way through could draw their own conclusions. If there is any specific meaning to "Stalker," it is that we have to fully understand anything for which we are willing to alter our lives.\n', u'0.196018', u'\nTarkovsky\'s direction for this film is nearly flawless.\n\nThe film mainly focuses on three characters and their basic goodness of each other. The photographic colors are brilliantly choreographed to the mood of character and viewer. The visionary landscapes are mesmerizing beautiful. \n\nThe survival techniques the characters in the film achieve is unlike anything I\'ve seen in film. Much like Kubrick in terms of directive style and character study, Tarkovsky puts the viewer in a kaleidoscopic landscape of mood and emotion. No clich\xe9s here though. I have not read the story which the movie is based upon, but from what I understand the characters in the film all develop a healing understanding of each other. \n\nThat is when you know [as a viewer] that you will watch something unique and\n\nexceptional. If you are into complex, psychological science fiction in the same vain of say {The Andromeda Strain, Solaris, 2001:a space odyssey} than you shall enjoy "Stalker".\n', u'0.584102', u'Stalker (1979)***\xbd Stalker is rich, spiritual and contemplative journey through the fantastic inner world of human\'s hope, desire, disillusions and believes. Main characters, Writer (as incarnation of irrational, imaginative and emotional aspects of our nature or subconsciousness) and Scientist (rational, logic forces or consciousness) are guided by Stalker (symbolizing our desire, will and everlasting search of meaning) to the mysterious Zone (which may represent all our spiritual goals, meanings, struggles to achieve them and barriers in our path). Breathtaking and mesmerizing images and sounds, witty dialog and strong concept are the major virtues of this feature. Writer\'s monologues are among the most meaningful, thought-provoking and spiritual moments I ever experienced in any art. But the movie is overlong losing its powerful initial momentum and becoming inconsistent in it\'s final message (by final I don\'t mean last in chronology but overall). Tarkovsky\'s earlier SF drama "Solaris" is more structured and fully developed. Nevertheless, Stalker is an outstanding piece of art movie that puts its director among the few true cinema masters. Rating: 8.5/10', u'0.38867', u'This film is loosely based on Arkady and Boris Strugatsky\'s "Road Side Picnic," and Tarkovsky tried, as he did with his "Solaris" (1972), to downplay the science fiction aspect of "Stalker." Except for a brief explanation at the film\'s beginning, Tarkovsky chooses to ignore the speculations as to what could have created The Zone, and the changes within it.\n\nWith "Stalker," Tarkovsky marks the shift toward his later style, with the long takes throughout the film averaging one minute in length, with many four minutes or longer. These long scenes in turn rely heavily on the talent of the actors to sustain the mood, like Writer\'s long monologue in the sand mogul room. In "Stalker," Tarkovsky is definitively more systematic in his use of black-and-white (sepia) and color stocks than he had been in his previous works. In the swamp scene and Stalker\'s dream, Tarkovsky reverts to is more usual convention, where dreams are shown in black-and-white, and reality in color. However, the last scene is in color, implying a leakage of the powers of The Zone into the outside reality.\n\nAs always in Tarkovsky\'s films, the natural world is present. Water, which used to be the source of life, a redemptive force and a center of regeneration, is now mostly a symbol of decay and pollution. The only exception is in the dream scene in the swamp, where the water is somewhat restored to its positive symbols. In the last scene in The Zone, the men, resigned to their limitations and weakness, sit outside The Room, as the rain falls inside, gently blocking them from entering.\n\nThe wind is associated with the spiritual, and the earth is a positive force. Upon arriving in The Zone, Stalker\'s first act is to lie down and embrace it, and in the swamp, all three men lay on it. Like a miracle, there is the luxuriant, if dangerous, Nature ever present in the Zone, in contrast to the polluted outside world, where it is totally absent.\n\nAnd then there is the mysterious dog, which first appears in the swamp scene. Up to this point, the men felt totally alienated from their environment, outside and inside The Zone, and it is at the very moment when they start to meditate and remember, that the dog appears: The Zone is its territory. But at the end of the film, the dog has followed Stalker outside the Zone, showing that even there, the hope that the men were looking for inside The Zone must somehow also exist here, outside, as the dog establishes its own space even though it becomes domesticated in the process.\n\nAlthough Tarkovsky usually favors classics by such composers as Bach, Pergolesi, or Purcell, the musical score in "Stalker" consists almost exclusively of Eduard Artemiev\'s electronic music mixed with some folk melodies, contributing efficiently to the hypnotic atmosphere of the film.\n\nThe performances of Nikolia Grinko and Anatoly Solonitsyn, as two lost souls in search of an answer, are convincing. Aleksandr Kajdanovsky is outstanding in his role of a tormented and somewhat pathetic Stalker. Although Alisa Frejndlikh\'s appearance in the film is restricted to only few scenes, there are most powerful.\n\nIn "Stalker," Tarkovsky opposes a world in decline, polluted and sterile, to a verdant Zone, which has gotten the better of any human enterprises. He portrays a society which has severed all links with nature, with its own past, and lost its spiritual or moral bearings.\n\n"Stalker" explores the conflict between science, rationalism, materialism, and cynicism versus spirituality, faith, art, and love. The three men embody different philosophical principles. Professor is a rational being who tries to understand the world according to the law of physics. He justifies his going into The Zone as purely scientific curiosity. Writer belongs to those people who cannot accept the world as it is. He is well aware of humanity\'s decay and of his own as well, but he abhors science, which he does not understand, and would rather look for answers in the supernatural. Writer believes in the redemptive power of art, but he has lost his own inspiration.\n\nStalker is alone in showing an inclination toward faith. He knows The Zone and has total faith in it, speaking about it as if it were a living being. Stalker respects and fears The Zone at the same time, as he recognizes its potential to provide comfort to the wretched ones who, like himself, have lost all hope, but at the same time it punishes who so ever infringes its rules. This, of course, is how most religious people see their own Gods.\n\nThe redemptive power of love is personified by Stalker\'s wife. Her love and devotion is the final miracle which opposes cynicism and the emptiness of the modern world. All these ideas are clearly expressed at the film\'s end, as she addresses the audience in her heartfelt monologue.\n\nAs the three characters reach The Room, they can ask for their dearest wishes to be granted, but this would require a painful and searching self-examination, with the realization that what they thought they wanted was not exactly what they now really want. For Professor, his true aim was to destroy The Room, which was beyond his scientific understanding. Writer had said that the purpose of his journey was to regain his genius, his inspiration. However, on the threshold of The Room, he realizes that he may not worthy of accepting The Room\'s gift. As for Stalker, he asks for nothing of The Room, his only purpose to make the trip being to bring hope and happiness to those most retched than he.\n\n"Stalker" is certainly Tarkovsky\'s most complex and most beautiful film, and is worthy of many viewings to appreciate its aesthetic and depth. Unfortunately, the word limitation of this review does not allow one to explore all the intricacies of this extraordinary film and do it justice.', u'0.0417126', u'This movie is so strange. When i saw it, i realized that it was beautiful, that it was really good. but what really fascinates me is that some of the pictures and emotions i experienced in the movie keep reappearing afterwards. They haunt me so to say and i\'ve got an incredible urge to watch the movie again. I\'ve never experienced this so vividly and uncontrollable. Normally it\'s you who "summon" the pictures and feelings from the movie when you find cues (feelings/pictures) to it in your environment.\n\nBut this movie just keeps appearing without no obvious reason at all, filling you with feelings and beautiful images out of the blue.\n\nSee it and make up your own mind, could be i\'m just on the verge of going mad after all ;)', u'0.209659', u"My first Tarkovsky experience, and I'm overwhelmed by its imagery power. The film is pure joy, which, admittedly, requires some time and open mindness.\n\n'Stalker' begins when the camera navigates into a room as if we are entering an art gallery. In those images of introduction there is a strange tension between calm, peace, but also a threatening feeling of mysteriousness. It is a feeling which goes throughout the whole film, some sort of a basic flow or vibration which keep fantasy and thoughts of the viewer always busy. The picture of the three persons in the bed, the Stalker and his family, appears as a painting or a collage, showing primary luck and happiness but being now doomed to downfall. This extremely intense atmosphere is capturing and therefore very 'joyful' to watch and go through.\n\nI won't get into plot details. Just some things on the characters first: The three persons who enter the Zone are representing different kinds of human ideologies, coming along as a soul trip. We have the Stalker, the one who leads the other two into the forbidden area. He stands for individuality. He is an obsessive, a desperate who escapes his real life and believes he can only exist and unfold himself in the Zone. The writer, cynical and sarcastic, a quitter, embodies the nihilistic ideology of the civilization. The professor represents the scientific conscience.\n\nThe Zone sometimes appears to be as not real, but maybe also shows the inner cosmos of the three men. Tarkowsky kind of abolishes the difference between inner and outer world by permanently switching from monologues to dialogues, from black/white to color, from close-ups to totals and the other way round.\n\nThat's not it, not only a soul trip of three failed men (and in that respect of human conscience), but it's also the urge to get to the insight, the truth, the veracity of the damaging progressive human civilization. You see rotting industrial constructions and instruments, you see how the nature takes back what it has lost, captured in beautiful picture compositions (i.e. the fish in the river, surrounded by cans, a Christ figure, coins and oil).\n\nWhat makes the film quite intriguing is that it's not only an apocalyptic description, not only all negative. In the stunning imagery, especially the image of water, you see the miracle of life, something wonderful and esthetically very appealing.\n\nAt the end, the wife of the Stalker asks him 'What would be life without harm?' A life without harm would be also a life without happiness and hope. She, who didn't want him to go, welcomes him again and brings him to bed.\n\nHis daughter without legs (and that is the most powerful and enthralling shot I hardly have seen before in a film) sits at a table, we see her profile of the face, and she is silent. She looks at three cups, moves them with the power of telekinesis, one falls on the floor and breaks into pieces. Is that the will of God? The power of free will? The influence of the Zone? Do the three glasses represent the traveling men? Maybe this picture alone is the expression of the mystery of life, the question on how we effectuate, what we cause and what we shall effectuate in this world and in it's nature. Maybe it is the question on the ranking of love and passion when Stalker's wife doubts a life without harm and happiness and hope. Maybe Tarkowsky hits on his own society in the communist totalitarian Soviet Union. Maybe the film goes beyond that and doubts other promises of fortune of other societies. Maybe. Certainly.", u'0.0390182', u'Reading the reviews on IMDb has cemented what I have always felt about this film and about art in general. It is not always about a "product" that sums things up in a tidy sentence or a two hour film. \n\nIt is possible to criticize this film based on the conventions of the medium, but thats besides the point. Sure the stalker is the only fleshed out character, but the writer and the scientist are not even supposed to be characters to begin with. I think its fairly obvious they are archetypes that represent a conflict. Some people have said that the science versus religion thing is tired, this is missing the point completely!!!! Its the absurdity of trying to reduce any conflict to a duality to begin with. \n\nThe scene where we observe them sitting together makes it all very clear. We are observing them from the very room itself, where our innermost desires are laid bare and revealed. With this insight we can see that there is no duality to begin with, but only different ways to strive towards an understanding, the characters are joined together, their separation dissolves. \n\nSomeone mentioned that this film is "straining for deepness, and many a viewer will constantly feel this strain." They seemed a little confused because most films strain for this, as do most people!!!!! A successful film will always have this strain because that is part of our existence. Stalker evokes that yearning and allows us to feel it, and that is one of its best qualities I think. To actual visually embody the yearning for meaning, thats what A.T. has done here.\n\nStalker vs. Solaris: Another point of contention on IMDb, Most people seem to like a Solaris more...all I will say is this: Solaris is much more obvious and much more straightforward. I guess people find it easier, but in its supposed "humanism" its actually quite sterile, its clean. It presents human problems but through a haze of "greatness" that you will find with a lot of art. Its filmed from a further distance is what I am trying to say.\n\nStalker is the down and dirty, the swamp, the overgrowth, insects, water, rotting, rust. Its a much more dynamic world, just like our striving is much more dynamic than duality. Its dark, confusing, musty, a little frightening, but extremely beautiful. \n\nI would like to mention the use of the word pretentious. If you have you used the word pretentious in your review please read a dictionary and understand a word before you use it. That word is used constantly to instantly demonize something. It is the equivalent of calling someone an anti-semite. It is loaded and works against serious discussion and observation. \n\nTHIS FILM IS NOT PRETENTIOUS BECAUSE IT DOES NOT ATTEMPT TO IMPRESS OR HOLD ANY GREAT IMPORTANCE!!!!!!! It just exists as it does and its people afterwords that attach importance to it. A.T. refused to ever state clearly what this film is about. So you can discount everything that I just said and anyone else said about it. Like life, like existence itself there is no clear meaning.', u'-0.0734903', u'There could be many things to say about Tarkovsky and his films. The most important (which could be found in many comments ) is that he does not offer us a very clear interpretation , leaving us to guess, wonder and question ourselves.\n\nMy interpretation of this film is that the whole trip to the Zone and to its core, the Room its a metaphor for the dangerous trip the human soul takes in searching the redemption and finally the Kingdom of Heaven. Stalker (like Jesus) is the one who shows the way to this kingdom - and there are some arguments to this idea. First, before entering the dangerous Zone, he lies on the grass thinking (or praying?), just like Jesus did in the garden of Ghetsimani before being crucified. Stalker is the one who shows who could reach the final point of this trip: not the good or the bad, but the desperate ones. Stalker is the one who fights with the professor (another metaphor for the rational and logical part of our minds) who wants to destroy the Zone, and also Stalker is the one who in the end laments over the lack of will people have to enter the Zone and to believe in its powers.\n\nThere are so many powerful shots in this film and I choose only some who really got to me: 1. the destroyed tanks in the first part of the trip are for me the communist weapons who tried to destroy the faith and the church in Russia and in the other communist countries. They failed. 2. the objects shown in the water when the 3 heroes sleep near it, the money, the weapon, the tiles under the water describe the precarity of our material world. 3.the water in the film, from the beginning until the end - it is pure poetry. 4. one dialog between the writer an Stalker, the writer is saying: "who needs your room, i don\'t need your room" - it reminded me the dialog between Ivan Karamazov and Alexei Karamazov, the first saying to the other: "I don\'t need your God"\n\nBut this is only one interpretation, and if it would be the only one, we would not be talking about a great great film.', u'-0.0768132'], u'tt0060827': [u'Ingmar Bergman\'s mystifying masterpiece, Persona, opens with an image \r of light from the lamp of a film projector and then the film running \r through the spools. This is followed by a series of images that \r includes a spider, a montage from silent comedies, a spike being driven \r through a man\'s hand, and faces in a morgue. The film then cuts to an \r enigmatic picture of a young boy watching women\'s faces appear on a \r giant screen directly in front of him. Are these strange images \r reminding us that we are only observing a film, not reality? \r \r\nAs Persona begins, Sister Alma (Bibi Andersson), a nurse, is assigned \r to care for an actress, Elizabeth Vogler (Liv Ullman) who suddenly \r ceases to speak in the middle of a performance of Electra. Alma learns \r that there is nothing physically or psychologically wrong with \r Elizabeth. She just refuses to communicate verbally. Alma and Elizabeth \r retreat to the head physician\'s summer cottage on a small island to \r complete her recuperation. Although Alma is the only one who talks, the \r relationship grows and Alma is happy that she has found someone who \r will listen to her sympathetically. She begins to share with Elizabeth \r some of her most vulnerable moments. A high point in the film is Alma\'s \r detailed description of a sexual encounter she had with two teenage \r boys while sunbathing on a beach in the nude. Elizabeth appears to be \r an attentive listener who, by facial expression, encourages Alma to \r reveal more and more personal details. \r \r\nAlma, however, is deeply hurt when she opens Elizabeth\'s unsealed \r letter to her doctor. In the letter, Elizabeth reveals how she is using \r Alma as a "study" and finds her infatuation "charming". Feeling \r betrayed Alma lashes out in anger, first berating her patient, then \r begging for forgiveness. As soon as physical and emotional violence is \r depicted, Bergman stops the narrative and repeats images from the \r opening sequence, adding a close-up of an eye as if to remind us again \r that we are merely prying observers. The relationship of the two women \r now becomes a struggle of wills. Alma grows more desperate as Elizabeth \r gets stronger and more dominant. Sensing this new power, Elizabeth \r seems to transfer her personality to the weaker Alma. Every nuance of \r emotion is unforgettably conveyed in the facial expressions of these \r two remarkable actresses. \r \r\nPersona is filled with surreal images and dream sequences in which it \r is very difficult to distinguish between illusion and reality. In one \r scene, Alma sees Elizabeth entering her room at night, then exiting. \r When Alma asks her the next morning if she was in her room, Elizabeth \r shakes her head no. We do not know if she is simply not telling the \r truth, or the event did not occur. Bergman does not offer help. The \r same is true for scenes when Mr. Vogler appears or when Elizabeth looks \r at a picture of her son that she tore up at the beginning of the film. \r Being left on our own to make sense of these discontinuous elements, we \r are forced to discard thinking in traditional linear ways. \r \r\nI can\'t say that I fully understood Persona. It may be suggesting that \r the persona we assume is merely a mask to cover our fears and \r insecurities? It seems that Elizabeth is playing a role as actress, \r wife, and mother. She wants to abandon this inauthentic role by \r refusing to speak. Alma, on the other hand, acts like a dutiful wife \r and supportive nurse, but secretly yearns to be what she perceives \r Elizabeth to be: strong, independent, and self-reliant. In a memorable \r scene, the faces of the two women are morphed into one composite in a \r classic overlapping shot, an image that says to me that underneath the \r roles we play, we are all the same.\r \r\nAfter successive viewings, however, I realized that Persona\'s greatness \r does not lie in understanding, but in its unbearably intimate and \r poetically realized images, magnificently conveyed by cinematographer \r Sven Nykvist. The raw power of this film totally drew me in and allowed \r me to get in touch with my own feelings of hurt and desperation in \r trying to reach people in my own life who cannot or will not respond. \r Persona is not just a classic I objectively admired, but a very \r powerful personal experience.', u'0.109881', u'When talking of Bergman, critics and viewers usually name Wild Strawberries, The Seventh Seal, Cries and Whispers ahead of Persona. While those films are all amazing and stay very high on my list of all time favorites, for me, the truly unique and inspirational s \'Persona\' - Bergman\'s enigmatic masterpiece.\n\nThe story is seemingly simple: \n\n"A nurse, Alma (Bibi Andersson), has been assigned to care for a famous actress, Elizabeth (Liv Ullman), who suddenly stopped speaking during a performance of Electra and has remained silent ever since. When they go to stay in a seaside house owned by Alma\'s psychiatrist colleague, the apparently self-confident nurse gradually reveals more and more of herself in the face of Elizabeth\'s silence, and is shocked to read a letter the actress has written implying that Alma is an interesting case-study. The two women seem almost to exchange identities, or to become one (strikingly expressed visually in a famous shot); in a dream sequence (or perhaps fantasy), Elizabeth\'s husband comes to visit and seems to think that Alma is his wife. Finally Alma, back in her nurse\'s uniform, catches a bus to go home, leaving the almost-mute Elizabeth alone."\n\nWhether Alma was able to get her identity back remains one of the film\'s many questions. \n\nWhat is absolutely wonderful in the film \x96 performances from two actresses. Anderson is the one who has to carry almost the entire dialog, her voice is one of the film\'s priceless treasures while Ullman is equally powerful in expressing hundreds of emotions through her face and eyes. Sven Nykvist\'s camera, the third star of the film makes two stars shine so bright.\n\nEach scene in 81 minutes long film is memorable, some of them just unforgettable. For instance, the long scene where Alma reveals her most intimate memories of a sexual encounter with two boys while sunbathing nude with another girl on an empty beach, is infinitely more erotic to listen to than it would have been to see in flashback. \n\nThere is so much to think about in Persona. One major question concerns Elizabeth\'s silence: is it elective, as happens in Tarkovsky\'s "Andrei Rublyov" , or is it some kind of mental breakdown?. The documentaries about the war horrors that Elizabeth watches on TV suggest the former; the fact that it suddenly happens during a stage performance of "Electra" suggests the latter. I keep thinking about it. Why "Electra" of all plays? The story of the daughter who hated her mother and wanted her dead \x96 does it reflect the accusation brought up by Alma that Elizabeth did not love her deformed son and wanted him dead? Did Elizabeth become so overwhelmed by guilt realizing that her life reminded so much of Electra\'s story? We don\'t know for sure, and Bergman does not help. The identical monologue in which Alma is accusing Elizabeth is the film\'s resolution. We hear it twice: first time, camera is concentrating on Elizabeth\'s face, second time \x96 on Alma\'s. Is Alma talking about Elizabeth or herself or both? After that encounter on the beach, Alma became pregnant and had an abortion. The monologue may reflect her feelings of guilt and emptiness as well as Elizabeth\'s. Does it really happen? \n\nIs Elizabeth a vampire sucking the life out of her victims only to use them as characters for her acting roles? Is that the ultimate price the artist is paying for being a great artist? Does he need lives and souls of others to be able to create? Can he/she love the ones who utterly depend on them and need their love? This film and later Autumn Sonata (1978) with Ingrid Bergman as a concert pianist show famous stars as selfish women who can\'t and don\'t love their children. The same question was brought up also in the earlier "Through a Glass Darkly (1961)" - in the relationship of the writer and his daughter. \n\nThen there is the question of whether there are really two women at all; could the whole film be played out as a fantasy of one of them, or indeed of somebody else? Is there a sexual attraction between the two women? It might be or might be not. I believe, David Lynch has watched "Persona" very carefully, thought about it and used some of its ideas in his own "Mullholland Dr." \n\nThere are so many questions in this incredible film that are left unanswered. For almost forty years, viewers and filmmakers alike have been trying to find the answers. One thing is obvious \x96 this is one of the films you want to watch over and over again. I think it should be seen by any viewer. If you\'ve seen it already \x96 see it again. You\'ll learn something new. If you have not seen it \x96 you are in for a great experience. See it for Sven Nykvist\'s camera work, for Liv\'s face, for Bibi\'s voice, for the unique and mysterious world that is Ingmar Bergman\'s universe.', u'0.150003', u"PERSONA may well be Ingmar Bergman's most complex film--yet, like many Bergman films, the story it tells is superficially simple. Actress Elizabeth Volger has suddenly stopped speaking in what appears to be an effort to cease all communication with the external world. She is taken to a hospital, where nurse Alma is assigned to care for her. After some time, Elisabeth's doctor feels the hospital is of little use to her; the doctor accordingly lends her seaside home to Elisabeth, who goes there with Alma in attendance. Although Elisabeth remains silent, the relationship between the women is a pleasant one--until a rainy day, too much alcohol, and Elisabeth's silence drives Alma into a series of highly charged personal revelations.\n\nIt is at this point that the film, which has already be super-saturated with complex visual imagery, begins to create an unnerving and deeply existential portrait of how we interpret others, how others interpret us, and the impact that these interpretations have upon both us and them. What at first seemed fond glances and friendly gestures from the silent Elisabeth are now suddenly open to different interpretations, and Alma--feeling increasingly trapped by the silence--enters into a series of confrontations with her patient... but these confrontations have a dreamlike quality, and it becomes impossible to know if they are real or imagined--and if imagined, in which of the women's minds the fantasy occurs.\n\nUltimately, Bergman seems to be creating a situation in which we are forced to acknowledge that a great deal of what we believe we know about others rests largely upon what we ourselves project upon them. Elisabeth's face and its expressions become akin to a blank screen on which we see our own hopes, dreams, torments, and tragedies projected--while the person behind the face constantly eludes our understanding. In this respect, the theme is remarkably well-suited to its medium: the blankness of the cinema screen with its flickering, endless shifting images that can be interpreted in infinite ways.\n\nBergman is exceptionally fortunate in his actresses here: both Liv Ullman as the silent Elisabeth and Bibi Anderson as the increasingly distraught Alma offer incredible performances that seem to encompass both what we know from the obvious surface and what we can never know that exists behind their individual masks. Ullman has been justly praised for the power of her silence in this film, and it is difficult to imagine another actress who could carry off a role that must be performed entirely by ambiguous implications. Anderson is likewise remarkable, her increasing levels of emotional distress resounding like the waves upon the rocks at their seaside retreat. And Bergman and his celebrated cinematographer Sven Nykvist fill the screen with a dreamlike quality that is constantly interrupted by unexpected images ranging from glimpses of silent films to a moment at which the celluloid appears to burn to images that merge Ullman and Anderson's faces into one.\n\nAs in many of his films, Bergman seems to be stating that we cannot know another person, and that our inability to do is our greatest tragedy. But however the film is interpreted, it is a stunning and powerful achievement, one that will resonate with the viewer long after the film ends.\n\nGary F. Taylor, aka GFT, Amazon Reviewer", u'0.402911', u'When I viewed PERSONA recently, I didn\'t know what exactly to make of it: what was it telling me, what was its intentions, its ultimate meaning. Not being a conventional director by far, I felt that Bergman had deliberately left all this 81 minute of storytelling to me to figure out... and I may have been right, but I either wasn\'t getting it or this was too much of an abstract film to merit any analysis, so my review was at face value and even ended with the sentence "this is exactly how Bergman wants it." Seeing it later more emerges, and the deeper story takes place even if it still seems linear: Elisabeth Vogler (Liv Ullmann) loses her speech midway through Electra and will not speak again (except once throughout the entire film, and in an imagined sequence). There is no apparent reason as to why she has lost her speech, and the only hint is the horror she witnesses on the television as war, genocide, and destruction rage on. Other than that it is never alluded to, her muteness.\n\nInto the picture comes Alma (Bibi Andersson), the nurse who is put to her care by the suggestion of a psychiatrist. Both retreat to an isolated home. Seeing that Elisabeth will not talk, Alma fills space and time with her own erratic ramblings that take shape and form, a need to fill a void, and that void is of course, Elisabeth, who listens and listens and listens impassively yet with interest. Alma\'s stories are a form of confession: if Elisabeth is the mute who bears the scars of the world, Alma is the conveyor who purges inner traumas and erotic experiences, hurtful on a lesser scale. The fact she has been laid so naked to the woman she is trying to rehabilitate and the fact she learns this very woman considers her an interesting subject suddenly shocks her: from being caring, she turns vindictive. A shard of glass left deliberately to have Elisabeth step over is the catalyst: the images break, abstract images take place again, and the story re-starts. But one wonders, what if Elisabeth stepped over the glass with equal deliberateness? After all, she does need Alma. And she is an actress foremost. This moment is the one that amps up the tension between the women and even then they become closer, so close Elisabeth\'s husband thinks Alma is her as Elisabeth quietly allows this to happen. Is Elisabeth re-living some form of event through Alma? Is Alma the only way another secret involving Elisabeth\'s child can come through? Whatever the reason, Alma is clearly a conduit for Elisabeth to come forth and the merging of their similar faces is the culmination of this haunting psycho-drama that goes beyond its cinematic boundaries. No clear resolutions except the almost casual references that explain both women\'s return to their own sense of normalcy, but this somehow inconclusive ending is what gives it the weight of a great story and excellent Bergman. Reality here is what is so common to us: who we see ourselves as, how others see us, how self-identification becomes self-preservation through the experiences of others, good or bad or a combination of both. Pain and ecstasy are a part of our make-up, and PERSONA is the best example of the merging of the two.', u'-0.0414204', u'I\'ve studied Bergman\'s films and have seen all of them, yet Persona stands alone as his most brilliant and indeed, the most visually striking (thanks to the genius of Sven Nykvist).\n\nThe story concerns a cracked actress (Liv Ullmann-Bergman\'s long-time lover), in hospital for treatment under the guise of a rather insecure nurse (Bibi Andersson). As the tale of care- giver and patient plays out, the nurse, Sister Alma, fills the void left by Liv Ullmann\'s complete silence and regression by offering a series of confessions on her own life. These confessions, most poignantly, consist of Alma\'s infidelities to her husband, a secret abortion and a unwanted pregnancy to please her husband. Through the course of the movie, set mainly in a summer retreat, the two women, left in seclusion, seem to drift into one another\'s personae. However, Bergman\'s dialogue turns more to first person confessional and not a tale of two women. Eventually, the viewer comes to the realization that the two women are actually two sides of the same person. Liv Ullmann represents, in pop-Freudian terms, the superego as Bibi Andersson is the ego or in other words, the \'actress\' is actually the nurse and Liv Ullmann, the caretaker/observer.\n\nElisabet Vogler is actually Bibi Andersson\'s persona; the one who answers to the external world, whilst shutting out the sensitive, introspective and broken inner persona, Liv Ullmann. The movie comes to a sad conclusion, wherein the actress wins out over the delicate, fractured woman deep within. As the lines in the movie say, they agree to "nothing", keeping the facade intact to the rest of her reality and keeping distant from her older husband and abandoning any attempt to love her son, born to please her husband.\n\nA line in the movie states blatantly that everyone has two personae; the one external and the one internal. This movie is one of the greatest human dramas with a psychological force rarely, if ever, seen today. Along with Casavetes\' "A Woman on the Verge" and Lynch\'s "The Elephant Man", Bergman and Nykvist commit to film one of the most introspective studies of mortality, sanity and the human condition.\n\nA masterpiece.', u'0.0728724', u'\npersona n 1: an actor\'s portrayal of someone in a play; 2: Jungian psychology A personal facade one presents to the world, a public image is "as fragile as Humpty Dumpty"\n\npersonas pl: The role that one assumes or displays in public or society; one\'s public image or personality as distinguished from the inner self.\n\nThe above definitions help, at least a little, to understand or define the experience of Ingmar Bergmann\'s 1966 film "Persona".\n\n"Persona" is an experience. And "Persona" IS experience. Indescribable not because it wants to be, but indescribable because it is. Who are we? Who do we want to be? Who are we comfortable being? Who do we need to be? And why? Some of the overlapping questions in this reviewer\'s mind during and after this engrossing and occasionally haunting work include, just how does this event and that event happen?  Is it live, or is it memorex??  Most notably, Bergmann\'s skillful black-and-white film, which stars Bibi Andersson and Liv Ullmann, raises complex and interesting questions through the simplest images and minimum movement of camera and actor. The visual psychology is remarkable, powerful. Sven Nykvist\'s textured cinematography vividly brings the power (and subtlety) alive. Close-ups of the two lead actors\' faces, and their symmetry, blend to make strong suggestions about what is transpiring between the two characters.\n\nThe two characters, Alma the Nurse (Andersson) and Elisabet Vogel (Ullmann), a stage actress, share very little. Alternately, they might share quite a lot. Much more perhaps than they want to. Elisabet gives new meaning to the expression "silence is golden", and that expression serves the film perfectly.  "Persona" is "Fight Club" before "Fight Club" -- without the noise, dizzying effects and backgrounds of David Fincher\'s 1999 film. In "Persona", everything, from the very beginning to the very end, happen for a\nreason. The minimalist aspects, the editing, the continuous metaphor laden within dialogue, movement, time and space; the fact that the film is in Swedish language with English white-text subtitles, and with surrealism engulfing the viewer, makes Bergmann\'s "Persona" a pleasure personified (excuse the pun).   Indeed, "Persona" is explicit in feel, mood, tone, dialogue, revelation and imagery.\n\nTogether, Bergmann and Nykvist produce beautiful artistry. There are moments of deconstruction within the film to distance its audience, and this is an artistic statement designed to formulate questions in the viewer\'s mind, rather than to baffle the viewer. The moments of deconstruction of narrative/medium at the beginning, middle and end of "Persona" are what one might call psychological, not "special", effects, as audiences today are accustomed to. The black-and-white film stock of "Persona" symbolizes the gray areas residing around, within and between Alma and Elisabet. Seeing this film in a theater is a treat, and although it has been available on video for many years, it is amazing to experience on a big screen. With the artistry and visuals working to perfection to ingeniously challenge the audience, one is inclined to almost forget the great performances of Anderson and Ullmann.\n\nCinema, when articulated through films like "Persona", is never better.', u'0.530589', u'Writing from a hospital bed (as he did with Wild Strawberries, two of these being films strung out from anguish), Ingmar Bergman put down almost anything that was in his head to start with (the first five minutes- some of the most startling and thoroughly symbolic minutes he\'s ever directed), then transposed into a story of two women, or one. This was one of the landmark \'art-films\' of the 1960\'s, with hints of the horrors of war (in one memorable scene, Elisabeth looks at a television screen at images of death), introspection regarding sex and identity, existentialism, and what it means to be an actor. \n\nSome of the more famous directors in history have a kind of \'notorious\' film, by which many people who may not know the bulk of their works know them by one particular work (with Hitchcock it could be Psycho, Lucas\' Star Wars, Bunuel with Un chien Andalou, Breathless). This could, arguably, be the one for Bergman, despite a couple of others likely also holding claim to that title. In other words, this could be a good place to start with the director if you\'re not familiar with his films, or it might not be. But keep this in mind- it\'s one of his most unique departures as a filmmaker.\n\nTwo of his leading ladies (and, ahem, loves), Bibi Andersson and 25 year-old Liv Ullmann, star as a nurse and an actress, who for the bulk of the film are at a Doctor\'s cottage as the nurse tries to help and likely cure Elisabeth of her ailment (froze on stage, silent but incredibly observant). In the meantime, Alma the nurse, in a role that gives Andersson more talking-points than any other film she\'s been in, goes through some hurtful parts of her past, and just tries to understand her counter-part. At one point, a vein of existentialism is ruptured thoughtfully, when Alma gets Elisabeth to say "No, don\'t", when she threatens her. When I first saw this film, I knew this scene would come after reading Roger Ebert\'s review. But I had no idea it would hit me like it did. There is such a great, compelling tension between these two that Andersson and Ullmann convey that it is what makes the film work. Any lessor actresses might fumble up the whole lot of it.\n\nWhile it isn\'t my favorite Bergman film (though it is unfair to pick favorites sometimes when it comes to someone as huge in the cine-consciousness as him), there are many things that had me come back to it after being a little awe-struck on my first viewing last year. For one thing, there\'s Sven Nykvist, with one of the strongest, most varying eyes in all of European cinema. \n\nIn the first five minutes, of course, there is some fascinating stuff, but even in the scenes of long dialog and monologue (i.e. the unforgettable speech about being on the beach from Alma), where the lighting is so delicate and sharp with the shadows that you really feel like the weight of this situation is closing in on the characters. Or, of course, when the two actresses\' faces are super-imposed, which can be interpreted in more ways than one (either as a grand statement, or as pretension, or something else). I was also very moved by the pace of the film, how it fills each minute (it\'s not a long movie) in ways that some movies just float minutes by.\n\nNow, this is the kind of Bergman film that can\'t be turned on any time (not to make it sound un-watchable, it certainly isn\'t). But it does ask to be viewed when in a certain frame of mind- if you\'re looking for a movie to show off to your friends, like it\'s the Euro/avant-garde version of Fight Club minus the violence, look away. It poses a good many questions for a viewer, especially one who knows of Bergman\'s themes he\'s explored before and after this film\'s release. How do we feel, or know we\'re feeling? What keeps us closed in? Why do we hurt? And are we only one person at a time? \n\nIt\'s all the more puzzling that Bergman\'s climax isn\'t a very easy one (not as doomed as with Seventh Seal but not as cheerful as Fanny and Alexander), as Alma has another monologue with Elisabeth, about her son she hasn\'t seen in a long while- this famously seen from two different angles, one after the other. Furthermore, it is arguably Bergman\'s most self-conscious film to date (the commentary on the DVD carries it well), however it may not be as off-putting as with some of Godard.\n\nTo put it another way, there are two sides to the subject matter, the film, the director, and the audience.', u'-0.0179072', u"\nThere are few motion pictures that rely on bodily expression and imagery as most films depend too much on dialogue and speech.  Persona(1966) is one of those raw movies that succeeds almost on a metaphysical level.  Its about the relationship between an actress who broke down during a stage performance and the nurse who is assigned to take care of her.  Bergman's camera has a fascination with Ullmann's figure as most of the film's closeup shots are on her.  Liv Ullmann does an outstanding job in playing a character that hardly utters a line of dialogue.\n\n\nThere are a few scenes where the image dominates the screen in a manner that hasn't been done successfully since the silent film period.  The director, Ingmar Bergman did an excellent job in presenting powerful images with the use of natural sound.  Persona(1966) is a triumph of acting because both Bibi Andersson and Liv Ullmann are terrific in their perspective roles.  There is hardly any movie music and this adds to the tension between the two women.  Its a film that was deserving of a Oscar for Best Foreign Film in 1966.\n\n\nOne scene that was wonderful is when Alma describes her life to her patient.  Another excellent scene is when Mr. Vogler mistakes Alma for his wife(its as if he too has suffered a breakdown and has failed to recognize his own wife).  Finally, the sequence where Alma and Mrs. Vogler's image blends together to form one person.  Its an errie image because they cease to exist as individual people.  Persona(1966) would influence Robert Altman very greatly when he directed the film, Three Women(1977).", u'0.458019', u'In the early \'60s, Bergman\'s visual and narrative style became ever more austere in focusing on tormented souls seeking guidance and comfort from an empty heaven, thus paving the way for a stark foray into extreme close-up in the enigmatic "Persona." \n\nA modernist masterpiece, the film initiated an introspective trilogy about the ivory towers built by artists as a defense against the horror of existence\x85 It was Bergman\'s first completely innovative work, acknowledging itself as artifice through the regular insertion of non-narrative images such as projectors burning, film breaking, fragment of silent movies\x85 \n\n"Persona" depicts the vampiric relationship between a talkative nurse and an actress who refuses to speak or work after a traumatic realization of the futility of creation in a loveless world surrounded by war\x85 Psychology, philosophy and social comment are mixed to brilliant effect in a complex, clear interrogation both of filmic illusion and of the illusory values of modern life\x85', u'0.917328', u'Profound studie of the human psyche. Honest story about nooks of existence and vain hopes. Anatomy of helplessness and deep solitude. Life as convention, mask for feelings and expectations.\n\nAnother room of Bergman\'s universe. Same cruel instruments, game of flash-backs and dream sequences, visions and memories. Fight between two women as screen for interior struggle. Impact of consciences and lights of sin. Illness like armour against fake images and empty future. Confesions like way to be yourself. Like cries suffocates by silence of the other.\n\nStory about refuse and cages. About dreams and disillusions. About chaotic values and flavour of extinction. People as rabbits for experiments. The other like sign of salvation. And the question of soul.\n\n"Persona" is an act of confrontation between Ingmar Bergman and God. The silence, the cruelty of letters, the cries and the confessions of Alma are only guns in a strange and ambiguous war. So, any film of this great director is a religious personal answer to permanent subtle fear. In this case, the shadow of divine presence is the Liv Ulmann smile.', u'0.0181754', u'Persona is a commendable movie by Bergman. It\'s not a simple movie to be seen just one time. This film should be commented in many aspects: cinematography, acting, directing, and lightening besides the theme. In this film I could see so much about visual elements of film making. You can easily mute this film and understand the scenes without the monologues. On the other hand you can just listen to the monologues of the nurse (Bibi An.) without watching the movie and that is also admirable. Here I just try to focus on main theme of the movie.\n\nI have seen this movie for many times and after each time I changed my mind about the interpretation of this movie. Finally I found that Alma and Elizabeth are actually the same. Instead of considering two separate characters, Alma and Elizabeth, I saw Alma as the conscience of Elizabeth. The leading role of this movie is Elizabeth, even though Alma is the one who speaks during the whole movie. We know that Elizabeth has some kind of problems with herself. She is not sick because we know that she is mentally and physically normal. Her problem is the chasm between what she is to others and to herself. These two sides of her characteristics have been gathered in Alma. Therefore Alma is not a separate character from Elizabeth. She is Elizabeth\'s inside. Alma in the nursing dress is the good conscience of Elizabeth who tries to correct her, but Alma in other appearances is exactly Elizabeth\'s characteristic as it is shown to the others, mostly seen when they are in the summer place by the sea.\n\nTo support my notes I will refer you to some scenes of the movie; first of all, the scene that Elizabeth\'s husband comes to her but the one who encounters him is Alma, however he thinks that he is talking to his wife. We also see in a marvelous scene, where the husband is talking, the camera zooms to Elizabeth\'s face which gives the sense to viewers that Elizabeth is addressed by him. But we see that Alma is talking instead. Thirdly the scene in which Elizabeth takes Alma\'s hand to her husband\'s face and touches it, can also be considered as a support to my note. Another supportive gesture is the scene in which Alma imagines Elizabeth beside her when she is looking to the camera and then they put their heads on their shoulders. This scene has been repeated for three times during the whole movie. The scene in which Alma thinks that Elizabeth has said: "You should go to bed now, otherwise you\'ll fall asleep at the table." And the day after that Alma asks her these two questions:"Did you speak to me last night?"," Were you in my room last night? " \n\nDoctor in this movie is the one who knows everything. She wants to correct Elizabeth by the nurse which as we said earlier is Elizabeth\'s good conscience. Elizabeth remains at the hospital in the whole movie and she just imagines that she goes to that summer place. Actually the struggle between Elizabeth and the good conscience happens in her imagination.\n\nElizabeth gradually got closer and closer to her good side of conscience during the movie although she didn\'t show any tendency to it at the first scenes. And finally we see that she totally follows her good conscience when she repeats the word, nothing, said by Alma to her. This is where the mission of Alma is completed.\n\nIn my opinion there are some vague scenes in this movie which I will go through. I saw an erect penis, a spider, a sheep, a nail in a hand, an old woman, an old man and a little boy in the beginning of the movie which raise some questions, i.e. why did Bergman use these elements in the beginning of his movie? What is the relation between these elements and the whole story? I just can give my understanding about penis element. Elizabeth hated to have a baby. Since penis can be considered as the source of making baby therefore it is involved in the first part.\n\nI have seen some films directed by David Lynch, and I have found that Lynch\'s movies have many things in common with Bergman\'s, especially they both have taken scenes with seemingly irrelevant elements (such as a penis, a spider, a sheep, a nail, etc in this movie which we talked about them above) to the general trend of the movie. And also both tend to take surrealism, insanity and depression to pictures. It seems that Lynch has been affected by Bergman\'s movies, even stepped further.\n\nIt\'s important to notice that the movie starts in the view of the little boy. Elizabeth didn\'t want to have a child. While she is playing the Electra she decides to be silent. It seems that Elizabeth\'s silence is mainly caused by her problem with having child. So that\'s why Bergman depicts the boy in the beginning of his movie. The film starts with the boy watching and touching a picture of a woman which seems to be his mother in his imagination. The picture becomes clear by touching more and more. We have the same scene at the end of the movie, but at this time the picture vanishes (becomes white) when the boy touches it, and this means that the Elizabeth\'s problem is solved.\n\n"Shaveh Kaham"', u'0.0498501', u'From its opening, seemingly random B&W images, Ingmar Bergman\'s "Persona" screams intellectualism. The film is cold, clinical, and abstract. It induces deep, philosophical questions that lack answers, or questions that provide for a multiplicity of emotionally unsatisfying answers.\n\nAbout eight minutes into the film, the story begins. In a hospital, young Nurse Alma (Bibi Andersson) is assigned to care for Elisabeth Vogler (Liv Ullmann), an actress who, for no apparent reason, has ceased speaking. Concluding that there is nothing physically or mentally wrong with Elisabeth, the hospital exports her to a seaside cottage, where she is to be cared for by Nurse Alma. Most of the rest of the film is set at the cottage, where the two women get to know each other. But throughout, Elisabeth does not speak. She communicates only with facial expressions and body gestures.\n\nFor all of Elisabeth\'s silence, the film\'s script is remarkably talky. Nurse Alma talks in long monologues: asking, probing, recalling. She tries to build a relationship with Elisabeth, by vocalizing her own memories and emotional pains in life. Certainly, the film\'s curious narrative has a lot to "say" about the art, or rather the artificiality, of human communication.\n\nThe best element of the film is the artistic, B&W cinematography by Sven Nykvist. Lighting trends toward high contrast, with stark boundaries between light and darkness, a feature that contributes to the film\'s cold, intellectual tone. There are lots of close-up shots, even extreme close-ups, of the two women. The film\'s production design is ascetic, unadorned, austere. And this, too, enhances the analytic, abstract feel of the film.\n\nBergman conceived "Persona" while he was confined to a hospital. And I am inclined to think that the film is a cinematic expression of his own inward psychological struggles during that period of his life.\n\nIn other words, "Persona" communicates to us as much about Bergman\'s mindset, and his ideas of suffering and reality, as it does about any deep, universal questions in a post-modern world, although to some extent, the two dimensions intersect and overlap. Bergman is telling us that, ultimately, the film is not real. It is "nothing". It is an artificial human construct. That is, it is art, a perception that approximates, but does not replace, what we experience as reality.', u'0.0168524', u'Ingmar Bergman\'s \'Persona (1966)\' opens with a bewildering montage of sounds and images, a frenzied newsreel of sex, death, cinema and comedy. The sequence is so far removed from my previous experience with the director that its effect is jarring, shocking; I momentarily wondered if I\'d hit a wrong button and started playing Bu\xf1uel\'s \'Un chien andalou (1929)\' by mistake. I question Bergman\'s motives for including such an uncharacteristic opening, for it appears to have very little to do with the narrative that follows. Is this montage - an account of the sickening and concealed horrors and desires of society - a possible explanation for Elisabeth\'s continued silence? Even so, it all seems somewhat exploitative, as though Bergman was simply going for shock-value, obliterating any notions of subtlety with which I had begun to associate him {though I\'ll admit that the strength of \'The Seventh Seal (1957)\' arose from its not-so-subtle representation of Death}. The opening scene concludes with a young boy awakening in the morgue, his hand outstretched towards the vague image of a woman\'s face. Elisabeth\'s unloved child? Alma\'s aborted fetus?\n\nAn endless line of critics, it seems, have celebrated \'Persona\' as a masterpiece, and among the greatest films ever made. I\'d hate to be the lone voice of dissent, but the film is certainly the lesser of the three Bergmans I\'ve hitherto seen, if only due to the noticeable absence of the good-natured humour to be found in both \'The Seventh Seal (1957)\' and \'Wild Strawberries (1957)\'. If, indeed, I were to describe \'Persona\' as a masterpiece, it would be in regards to the visuals, which, photographed by long-time Bergman collaborator Sven Nykvist, are beyond description in their detail and intimacy. The film takes particular interest in the human face, and entire conversations of words and emotions are played out through the communication of the eyes, and the glimmering hint of a smile on the lips. There is one immortal moment in the film when Bergman juxtaposes the faces of each woman onto the screen, merging Elisabeth (Liv Ullmann) and Alma (Bibi Andersson) into a single entity.\n\nPersona also includes one of the most vivid depictions of sex that I\'ve ever seen. Though the film shows us nothing, Alma\'s whispered description of an intimate encounter on the beach is staggering in its effectiveness; her words allow the viewer to formulate their own visuals, every emotion and nuance perfectly incorporated from the rich story we are being told. Though I may exhaust hours spouting the merits of Ingmar Bergman\'s film, I can\'t escape the fact that watching \'Persona\' felt very much like a chore. The film boasts a relatively short running time, but it never seems to attain any comfortable sense of rhythm, and, by the film\'s end, I was left wondering just what the film was trying to get at. Bergman includes various allusions to Bertolt Brecht\'s "Verfremdungseffekt" effect \x96 highlighting the inherent artificiality of the cinematic medium \x96 with the film at one point appearing to burn; but, unlike in Fellini\'s \'8\xbd (1963),\' these self-referential flourishes seem to serve little foreseeable purpose. Am I looking too far into this film for meaning? Or am I not looking far enough? Even just hours afterwards, another layer of meaning has unfurled itself. Maybe it\'ll get better.', u'-0.0107254', u"What can I say? It is an absolute masterpiece in some aspects bringing reminiscences of antic tragedies (in terms of gestures mostly - vide Maria Callas in Pasolini's Medea). But most of all this movie, as almost all Bergman's movies, touches humanity of a man and asks us questions that hardly none of directors was able to present in such a clear manner. The story can be read in many ways, but for me the symbolic one is probably the most fruitful. Persona, the face, mask, in a physical meaning as used in Greek tragedies, the way to become someone else, depict and reenact myths. On higher level, symbolic meaning of persona in Jung's psychology together with all his theories about ego. Simply, a 100% must see for every thinking man.", u'0.449734', u'After my first viewing of \'Persona\' I was unsure what exactly to make of it. Even after a second viewing, it is still hard to say what exactly \'Persona\' is about. This is not a negative trait though, but rather a curious characteristic. In fact, the overall film is perhaps best described as "curious". I would not call \'Persona\' a flawless film, but regardless of whether Bergman\'s film is flawed or flawless, it stimulates one to think, and that is certainly a good quality. I will now provide some thoughts on the film, in light of having viewed it a second time. I do not know how valid all of my comments are - they are just some thoughts on the material. Unfortunately it is hard to discuss the film without possible spoilers, so be warned: my review may spoil a fresh experience of the movie.\n\nFirst and foremost, I would label \'Persona\' as a horror film. After my initial viewing of the film, I had it down as a psychological drama, but now I think that it not only has elements of horror, but that it is dominantly a horror film. I guess it depends a lot on how you view the twist. I have heard other discuss how the two characters, Alma and Elisabeth, share the same personality - that they are the same person, but represent two personae for which every person has: the outer self (Alma, who talks) and the inner self (Elisabeth, who listens). This is quite an interesting theory, and after discussing it with some others who had seen the film, I became convince of the theory that Alma and Elisabeth are in fact the same person the whole time through.\n\nNow, it does not quite seem so clear. Watching it again, I was on the lookout for clues. There are some hints in that direction - the way the two women interact when together at the seaside property, the way that they seem to be opposites, but yet share similar ideas. The whole time I could sense communication even though, for the most part, only Alma was talking. However, Bergman throws in a number of elements that violate the theory that they are both the same person. Often he forces us to take the third person, stopping us from entering into the minds of either character. There is a female doctor in the mix, who communicates with both Alma and Elisabeth as if they are different persons. Then, there is also some narration by a man when the two women arrive at the seaside home.\n\nYet, another theory comes into play, and a rather satisfying one. In one of their conversations, Alma tells Elisabeth that she feels that she could turn into her. She feels that they are so alike in subtle ways that they could easily become each other. Following the announcement of this idea, we hear Elisabeth finally say something that Alma ignores, but then repeats herself. Are they starting to become one another, like Alma had just talked about? It seems as if Elisabeth and Alma were separate persons, however something supernatural, for whatever reason, occurred and they suddenly either became one person or switched personalities.\n\nI still find it hard to work out what exactly Bergman is getting at, and his encouragement of the third person approach vexes me. I would not flaw the film too much for that though. Perhaps it was meant to be ambiguous. Bergman does a great job filming the material, and for skill this definitely gets top marks. The setting is excellent, and strangely reminiscent of \'The Seventh Seal\' (plus notice how Ullmann looks like Death at times!). The bleakness of the sets is captured perfectly in black and white, with many close-ups to show the intimacy of the story. There is also one brilliantly filmed shot, in which the camera pans for an unbroken half minute or more, as the two women run across the beach.\n\nBergman\'s vision of the material is startling good. When Mr. Vogler arrives on set, there is some triangular framing going on, with interesting shots positioning Elisabeth in a removed position from Alma and her husband, but yet with all three of them in frame. There is also the repeated segment in which we see the reaction of Elisabeth when Alma is talking to her, and then it switches to show the facial expressions of Alma. I would not praise all of Bergman\'s techniques here though. Some of his shots just go on from an incredibly long time without much reason, which could cause one to wonder whether he was just trying to buff up the short running time. There is a shot towards the beginning of the film in which Ullmann stares blankly for a whole minute or more, and there is another shot which focuses on an irrelevant task of cleaning up a broken pot. Some shots like those could have been cut shorter. The other part of Bergman\'s vision that I am not fond of is the beginning segment. While the child could possibly have meaning, some of the other images in the montage, such animal killings, crucifixions and cartoons, seem thrown in for the sake of it. The intermission, while rather chilling, annoys me a bit too. I am not sure if it was inserted in the best possible place, or how meaningful its images are. But that\'s all minor stuff.\n\nOne last thing to praise is of course the acting. It is the acting, not the dialogue, which makes the film so intense during its middle section. When Andersson was describing her rendezvous on the beach, I was concentrating on her face, and that was telling me more than the subtitles. Ullmann also has a very expressive face, perfect for her somewhat muted character. I wish I could say more here, but I don\'t set the word limit.', u'0.0704891'], u'tt2267998': [u'One of the most ridiculous spectacles of bad storytelling I have ever seen in my entire life.\n\n"Gone Girl" gets its title I think, from the fact that she was supposed to be done away with (murdered and disposed of) but is really "gone" psychologically\x97she is a pure psychopath.\n\nThe movie tries to tell you that she is highly intelligent, and meticulously plans to fake her own murder and frame her husband for it.\n\nHere\'s the pathetic execution of her plan:\n\n1. he leaves the house one morning, and she springs into action. \n\n2. she breaks the glass coffee table, pours about a half quart of her own blood in one puddle, in front of the kitchen sink. That much blood from a violent attack would be all over the room. \n\n3. she flees, leaving the front door open. \n\n4. A nosy neighbor notices the door ajar and calls the husband (somehow the neighbor knows exactly where he is.) But no one saw the wife leave.\n\n5. The husband comes home. He has not a scratch on him. \n\n6. he is totally co-operative with the police. \n\n7. They eventually find her diary In a wood stove at the husbands father\'s house. The wood stove door is ajar and the diary is only partially burned; it really makes you wonder how that played out\x97that the husband put the diary in there to burn but just left it singed, all that work, cleaning up the blood at home, but not to burn the book, as if he needed to make a special trip to his dad\'s house to dispose of a stupid book. and the only thing incriminating that she wrote was on one page which he could\'ve simply torn out. \n\n8. When the wife runs away, she only changes her appearance slightly and then, instead of secluding herself, she makes friends with some low-lifes, with whom she sits and watches her story unfold on TV. \n\n9. she murders the Neil Harris character in an attempt to switch the blame to him. That would then imply he was the one that drained so much blood from her back at her home, he cleaned it up and he put her diary in the wood stove (?!) \n\nHis car wasn\'t seen at her house. \n\nHe then kept her a prisoner, starved and raped her.Yet she found the opportunity and strength to kill him, but didn\'t call the police from his house to come rescue her. rather she jumps in his car and drives all the way home. \n\n10. upon returning home she has no wounds consistent with the bloodletting at her original house or at the hands of her alleged kidnapper. \n\n11. There is no visit to or investigation of the alleged kidnapping crime scene\x97house on the lake.\n\n12. The hospital sends her home in a nurses uniform, underneath which she is still caked in blood.\n\nThis movie is just about the lamest piece of S**** I have ever seen.', u'-0.536685', u"If this had been written and played as a straight-out dark comedy - and if it had been at least half an hour shorter - perhaps it would have passed as a run of the mill movie. But since it has been presented as a serious mystery, it has committed the cardinal sin of filmmaking - that of disrespecting the intelligence and/or perspicacity of the audience. For us, the film represents a significant achievement in that it contains more and larger plot holes than any other movie we have ever seen - and we've seen many! This was even worse than Babel! That said - and a warning that reading further will take you deep into spoiler territory - the following is by no means a comprehensive list of the major holes in the plot. So ladies and gentlemen, start your engines and drive your semis straight through an impressive array of plot stupidity: 1. Amy buys a car listed on Craigslist for cash so there's no record of the purchase. How about title and license? Where does she keep the car until she needs it? How does she get to it when she needs it without being seen? 2. Amy buys lots of tech toys and crams her sister-in-law's shed with them. How does she get into and out of the shed without her sister-in-law (who doesn't like her) noticing? 3. The shed is where her husband sometimes has liaisons with another woman. They don't notice the accumulating gadgets? 4. The gadgets are bought online. Who is signing for them? 5. When the gadgets are investigated, whose fingerprints will be all over them - if there are any? 6. Desi is supposed to have broken into the house, beat her bloody and kidnapped her. There's blood all over the kitchen, but none where she would have been dragged out of the house? 7. As he supposedly leaves the house with an at best barely conscious Amy, Desi picks up her diary, takes it to her father-in-law's place and attempts to burn it in the furnace. Why? 8. How does Desi know where Amy's father-in-law lives? 9. Several days elapse from the time of the supposed kidnapping until Amy winds up at Desi's lake house. Can nobody attest to Desi's being at home during the time he was supposed to be kidnapping Amy? 10. What will be made of the video cameras at the lake house not showing anyone there for the first several days? 11. Desi was supposed to be holding her prisoner. Did nobody at the casino notice them there - including the man who thought she looked familiar? 12. Where does Amy's car wind up? 13. Phone records I: Amy makes the anonymous phone call tipping the police off to the contents of the shed. No record of that? 14. Amy scores a hole in one at miniature golf and jumps up and down for joy - which causes her money belt to fall off. This apparently was an Acme money belt on loan from Wile E. Coyote. 15. A couple robs Amy of all her money. Being the psycho she is, are we to believe that she is going to let them get away with it? 16. Phone records II. What is going to be made of Amy's phone call to Desi? Sure it was from a pay phone, but isn't it going to raise any flags? 17. Amy self-inflicts wounds - supposedly in the bathroom out of sight of cameras - to make it seem as though she has been bound and raped. Yet wouldn't the cameras show her entering the bathroom without wounds and emerging with wounds? 18. Amy winds up in the hospital upon her return. They put wristbands on her and one guesses they examine her - but they don't bother to wash the blood off of her. 19. Do they also fail to notice that there is no evidence of the injuries that would have occurred had she lost copious amounts of blood at the initial kidnapping? 20. Nick knows that Amy tried to set him up for her murder, thus opening him up to a possible death sentence. He also knows that when her plan blows up, she elects to murder someone who has never wronged her (other than being male) in order to cover up her actions which, until that point, may have been criminal - but not capital - offenses. Why does Nick elect to live in the same county as this woman, let alone in the same house? I could go on, but I realized before the movie was halfway over that I had already wasted too much of my life on it.", u'-0.430488', u"Dark and twisted, David Fincher's stylish new mystery thriller was derived from Gillian Flynn's intriguingly slick tale from her complex and suspenseful novel. By far one of the best acting performances to have come from Ben Affleck, 'Gone Girl' boasts some strong yet disturbing portrayals from Rosamund Pike, Neil Patrick Harris, Tyler Perry and Affleck. Fincher has garnered fame and recognition as a mainstream director, that is not only able to engulf the audience within the picture, but actually make them part of the scenario. Fincher exercises upon his trademarks with the swift and stunning cinematography, the chilling score and tight editing, all of which makes 'Gone Girl' a movie full of great visual storytelling.", u'0.876208', u'Please do not waste your time or money on this nonsense. Oh boy where do I start. OK for me the worst thing is when she gets back and tells everyone that Neil Patrick Harris "kidnapped" her (Rosamund). He did this by bludgeoning her and she lost a large amount of blood which he cleaned up. Then he takes her diary to her husbands fathers house to burn!!!!! (how does he even know of this location)?????? But he makes such a p!$$ poor attempt to burn it which would take 5 min to do properly as opposed to the 30+ to clean the blood. and no one questions this even once!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! No one even looks for any wounds or asks about her wellbeing and she is not treated for any wounds. Oh and the hospital sends her home covered I mean a copious amount blood. No flipping way, the hospital would clean her looking for wounds especially with this much blood.I could go on and on but just read the other truthful reviews they will point out most of the other glaring mistakes and downright intelligence insulting nonsense. I really wish IMDb would have a 0 or negative review number as this does not even rank a 1. I give this -5 for utter bull$h1*.', u'-0.539486', u"Just seen the film Gone Girl. \n\nI really struggled with the book and found it incredulous so never finished it but the film was getting good reviews so I thought I'd give it a go.\n\nWhat a pile of crap!\n\nTwo and a half hours of my life wasted. The story is just unbelievable. Neither character makes you like them or hate them. They are just bland and, well, unbelievable. \n\nBy the end I just wanted someone to firebomb the house and kill the pair of them. I would have stood up and cheered. As it happened it has a really lame ending.\n\nA waste of my life. Utter tripe!", u'-0.645427', u"I have NEVER wrote a review in my life. EVER. But I feel compelled to do so for this film. I'm utterly shocked, just shocked this movie has an 8.4 rating. What on earth are people thinking? Seriously? I could go on and on about how the plot is a complete joke. But I'll just point out the MOST obvious of all that TOTALLY shatters any believably that this film ever had. Okay Amy said Desi came to her house and kidnapped her that morning. HUH? She had no clue what he was really doing that morning. NONE! What if he had a meeting with ten other people that could account for him not being at her house? What if he was having breakfast with someone that morning? OK next. Now how about the diary? So did Desi kidnap her then grab the diary and bring it to a house he had no clue even existed and burn only about 20% of it? Next! When she pretends to be screaming with blood on her dress against the window so the surveillance cameras would see her. Seriously? What about ALL the other footage those cameras captured? For example, her and Desi sitting together on a couch watching TV. Oh she deleted that footage? Well what the hell is her explanation for ALL the footage being erased except the 20 seconds of her screaming. This is not me nitpicking the film and looking super hard to try and find problems. I get it, a lot of movies have plot holes here and there and I'm okay with that. But people! These are HUUUUGE holes in the story. Plot holes are in tons of movies all the time. But not usually a major motion picture with a major director and a major movie star. And please! don't tell me shes nuts and that's why she didn't cover her tracks worth a damn. I am talking about the fact that she gets away with it to all the law enforcement. This belongs on Lifetime, those movies you can just shrug off. What baffles me and actually really upsets me is the fact it has a rating of 8.4. So please people, help me understand this. What on Earth gives this such a high rating? What were people thinking? What?", u'-0.483306', u'I really cannot figure out why this movie is so highly reviewed. Everything it sells itself as is a lie. For starters, it is portrayed as this suspenseful thriller where there are constant twists and turns and you never really know what is truly happening. Well, that is a total lie. There is no suspense, there are no serious or intelligent twists, just a litany of idiotic contrived absurdities.\n\nSpoilers below: \n\nYou clearly see what is happening in very beginning with Nick (Ben Affleck) and you pretty much know he did not kill his wife 30 minutes in. Your initial sense is that she is not dead and he did not kill her, and you are right. There are no more "twists. "The "twist" is that she is insane, and the movie descends into 2 more hours of ever increasing idiocy and farcical garbage. Amy (Rosamund Pike) goes off into a series of illogical and irrational behaviors, including consorting with some random trash at a trailer park, despite having faked her own death and being the subject of a massive manhunt. The story just gets more and more absurd, with more illogical stupidity and unbelievable actions by other characters, which include police getting a search warrant on a house based on an "anonymous tip," Nick and his sister being apparently the dumbest people on Earth who would not move any of the loot out of the shed before the cops find it, the police engaging in the largest manhunt ever for a missing person after about 6 hours, etc. The movie starts out decent but gets continually worse as it goes on, and just starts getting worse and worse at a faster rate as it continues.\n\nThe acting is decent to middling, with Affleck probably giving one of the better performances overall, and Tyler Perry actually being an enjoyable aside. The other characters are largely unlikeable, unbelievable or just stilted caricatures.\n\nThe last 30 minutes are, as others have noted, unbelievably ridiculous and moronic. The woman who so carefully plans out her own death with a massive amount of preplanning, somehow commits a savage crime of passion, which is a story FILLED with holes, but somehow is supposed to have gotten away with it. Also, apparently even though she plotted all along to have her husband executed, she somehow had the presence of mind to save the sperm sample, keep it, then AFTER he is exonerated and she has to alter her plans to return to him last minute after murdering someone else, has the means to get it successfully implanted in herself. Oh, she is an absolute psychic apparently.\n\nThe ending is ludicrous, the characters are unrealistic farces that only someone who desperately wants to love this movie would believe, the story is overrun with artificial plot devices and deus ex machinas that serve only to advance nonsensical story lines, and the movie is in no way a twisting, changing thriller. Its just a predictable drama where the only "unexpected" things are unexpected because they are absolute nonsense that are make about as much sense as random dog running on stage and relieving itself. One of the worst movies I have seen in years.', u'-0.409598', u"i got pulled in at the start it turned out like any other mystery, action movie all the clues and other attributes etc...\n\nbut there was so many thing that just are so IDIOTIC that it pisses me off. \n\nI have had so much tension on this from the book thinking it will be amazing but it all went away half way through the movie.\n\nSpoilers: The part when she actually tries to make up the part of rape and when she puts wine on her skirt and whatever was so STUPID, WHAT ABOUT THE BLOODY CAMERAS YOU IDIOTS. And if you're going to say she disabled them, the what about the actual fake rape scene. she sucked his dick and was wearing lingerie for gods sake who wears lingerie randomly. if they looked at the cameras to watch the rape then what about the dick sucking and shirt tearing and pulling him in on you, then pulling a knife out from under the pillow. \n\nBut what finished it for me was the ending. WHAT MAN LIKE HIM IN THEIR OWN MIND WOULD STAY WITH A MURDERING BITCH LIKE THAT AND STILL LOVE HER. \n\nThis was my opinion you don't have to agree but i just found it so stupid.", u'-0.746876', u"Actually a good well acted movie till the end. Ben Affleck was excellent and Rosamund Pike had me 100% convinced she was evil incarnate. Carrie Coon as Ben's twin sister and Kim Dickens as the lead detective also gave excellent performances. As for the story, I can deal with sad endings where the hero dies like Braveheart, Cool Hand Luke, and endless others. When the credits came up on Gone Girl, I could only regret spending over 2 hrs to watch a movie that left me that angry. I would have preferred she had just killed Ben Affleck and gotten away with it. Assuming the book had the same ending I would have thrown it across the room upon finishing it. I enjoyed the movie up till the end but that completely ruined it for me.", u'-0.0658082', u'How on earth is this film attracting so much criticism?! This is one of the best films of 2014 and people are labelling it "utter tripe", "an enormous heap of illogic and nonsense", "wish I had missed it". Are these people serious? Can we no longer appreciate - or even identify - a great film?!\n\nGone Girl is a peerless plot-driven story about a wife who goes missing. Seems pretty ordinary, right? Well it\'s not. And it doesn\'t take very long at all for any sane viewer to recognise this. \n\nYou start watching and - as you do with any mystery - you start collecting the clues and piecing together an explanation for the events which have taken place. But no sooner than you have formed the perfect explanation in your mind is it immediately swept away in the most overwhelming twist of the year. \n\nAnd it only gets better from there.\n\nGone Girl is a roller-coaster; only you\'re riding it in the dark. You don\'t know where the next turn is, you can\'t see where you\'re headed, and you have no idea how many more ups and downs you\'re going to experience before it\'s all over. \n\nIt\'s a film that keeps you guessing and just as you\'re beginning to (once again) think you\'ve got it all figured out, the game changes and it\'s all up in the air once more. \n\nThe diary-exposition format is also very clever and was executed perfectly. Many films fall victim to losing the viewer when jumping back and forth between past and present, yet Gone Girl - you guessed it - does it just right.\n\nThis film ranks high in the mystery/thriller genre. It is just as compelling and perplexing as Shutter Island - if not then moreso. \n\nAnd let\'s not forget: the acting. Ben Affleck and Rosamund Pike do a phenomenal job in their roles as husband and wife. Not a line feels out of place and both seem as though they were born to play Nick and Amy Dunne. By the end of the film I felt so immersed in their story that I found it hard to believe it was just a film. \n\nAll in all, I for one am thoroughly pleased with Gone Girl. I knew from watching the trailer it would be something I would like, I just never imagined it could thrill me this much.\n\nA very underrated and overwhelming story that should be enjoyed by all.', u'0.0983197', u"Gone Girl marks Fincher's tenth feature film and his most mature work since Fight Club. Centering on Nick Dunne, a husband desperately trying to find his wife all while having police and media accuse him of murder. The story sounds straight out of the Scott Peterson case and the film looks unlike any film I've seen in recent years. Lead by an all star cast featuring Ben Affleck, Rosamund Pike, Tyler Perry and Neil Patrick Harris, Gone Girl rises above the pack with smart storytelling, phenomenal pacing and perfect performances. What Gone Girl does so brilliantly is taps into the audience's psyche regarding marriage and the ideology behind a sanctioned union that is corrupt. It is really heavy stuff when the story really gets to the meat and bones of it all. With plenty of twists and turns, Gone Girl keeps you, not only second guessing the whole idea of marriage, but the intentions of every character in the film. It is truly one of the most twisted films adapted from an even sicker and twisted book that's out there right now. Gillian Flynn does wonders with her adaption from her own novel. The dialog is crisp, the characters are multi-layered, it truly is a pitch perfect script that doesn't have one false moment in it. Ben Affleck and Rosamund Pike are EXCELLENT in this film. This is a different Affleck, a very human and realized Affleck. Nick Dunne is a wonderful role for him and captivates just how good he can be with a terrific director. Harris and Perry give well rounded performances as well but are nothing compared to Affleck and Pike. David Fincher and his long time collaborator and cinematographer, Jeff Cronenweth create a dreary, horrific tone for Gone Girl that makes every twist and turn that much more gut wrenching. Every shot is meticulously planned, showing each shot as if it were a still frame that spoke a thousand words. It is truly gorgeous filmmaking. And now for the score...Trent Reznor and Atticus Finch deliver a perfect score, besting their Social Network and Girl with the Dragon Tattoo score. If Reznor won for Social Network, I fully expect not only a nomination but a win for this film. Overall, this is a mesmerizing film that demands multiple viewings to truly get the full experience. It is impeccably made, beautifully acted and an all around near perfect film.", u'0.392511', u"Thought this would be a good thriller, but ultimately it was draining and depressing. Would think any man who sees this film would never want to have sex again......it portrayed woman/women as being monstrous and men as passive, sex-crazed zombies. The story had so many loose ends and unbelievable scenes, such as where she returns home covered in blood.....then she's at the hospital - there had to be an exam, then giving an interview to detectives, then comes home still covered in blood....how much time elapsed during these scenes, and who would allow her to drive around, carry on, covered in blood for all that time? With great emphasis on crass words for women, violent sex scenes, and a score that sounded like a synthesizer importing screeches from an airport runway, this was one depressing film. The only place it was believable was in its depiction of the media and how they revel in tragedy and perversion. If this becomes our prime form of entertainment we are in big trouble. Need to watch a pre-1960 film or musical now.", u'-0.467338', u'I\'m only writing this review because I noticed this appears in the top 3 of IMDb\'s "Top Movies of 2014" at the time of writing. This in itself was enough to make me p*ss my trousers, but I then went on to read some of the reviews, after which I completely soiled myself.\n\nI\'m all for suspension of disbelief, especially when watching Hollywood fare, but how is anyone buying this bullsh*t - and people are making comparisons with Alfred Hitchcock!? \n\nIt\'s as if the second half of the movie forgets the first half had happened. Let\'s look at what unfolds:\n\nPsycho woman fakes own murder and plants enough clues around to implicate her husband. All the clues are so contrived that, for a short while, even the detective suspects all is not what it seems.\n\nMeanwhile psycho wife has skipped out of town and disguised herself by dying her hair slightly less blonde and smacking herself in the cheek with a hammer, presumably to look like some trailer trash victim of domestic abuse and consequently giving her an excuse to wear Jackie Onasis sunglasses. All of this is keenly noted by the perceptive woman she moves next door to, yet despite watching her story on the news every day, her actual identity completely illudes the observant neighbour.\n\nDespite psycho woman\'s meticulous planning and care, everything unravels when she accidentally drops a money belt (how does this happen?) with all of her cash in it, whilst, wait for it, playing crazy golf thus tempting said woman next door to rob her, which she does with the aid of her hick boyfriend. Calculating psycho woman sits by and does nothing at this stage. Instead choosing to call up an ex boyfriend and potentially throwing her entire plan to the wall. Luckily (phew!) her ex boyfriend is so obsessed with her (no-one knows why at this stage, or even cares) that he puts her up in his lake house with security cameras everywhere for her safety. He is quite happy for an innocent man to be sentenced to death it appears, despite having a visit from the guy in which he implies that there may be more to his wife than meets the eye. He does have very expensive sheets though.\n\nMeanwhile, despite their best efforts, animators fail to make the Ben Affleck model appear in any way emotional or human. Not even CGI has any effect, so they just give up an go home. By now, no-one in the audience cares and Ben is replaced with a peace of plasticine that was left over when Tony Heart created Morph. Nobody, not even the supporting actors, notice.\n\nJust when you think things couldn\'t become more contrived, psycho wife ties a ribbon round her ankle and throws some wine down her top to emulate the fact that she has been raped (?), or had a miscarriage, or just, I don\'t know, "Was that her favourite top she threw wine over, because she looks very upset in front of the porch camera." \n\nShe then has what clearly appears to be (for the sake of the cameras), consensual sex with her ex, before cutting his throat with a box cutter and making a dramatic return to her husband, without so much as a call to the police. Falling into her play-doh spouses arms, she is then rushed to hospital, where she convinces local detectives and the FBI that she was abducted and held as a prisoner, by her ex, this whole time. Detectives and FBI suddenly suffer from complete amnesia and forget entirely about the murder set up. If she was abducted by her ex storming into the house and whacking her with a club, why does she have no injuries, is she some kind of self healing salamander. She\'d only been gone for just over a week. Why did no\'one notice this altercation, or the ex-boyfriend appearing in the middle of the day - after all, the neighbour noticed the door was open? Where did the several pints of blood come from on the kitchen floor? Why was the lounge area staged? Did the ex-boyfriend leave a slightly charred copy of her diary in her husband\'s father\'s oven? Even window-putty Nick has the sense to ask "Erm, how did she cut his throat if she was tied up all the time as she claims?" "To which the uninquisitive police response is, wait for it, "Can\'t you just be happy your wife is home?"\n\n"Yes, of course, we should invite Bundy, Manson and the Wests around and celebrate"\n\nIt\'s good to know that all you need to do, to hoodwink the FBI is act like a damsel in distress, wrap some rope around your wrists too tightly, and re-enact a scene from Big Brother using a champagne bottle for them to forget any evidence that may implicate you in murder or conspiracy to pervert the course of justice. \n\nI\'m sorry but even as some sort of metaphor about domestic bliss or mass media, this film fails on so many levels. \n\nTotal sh*t.', u'-0.52589', u'The basic premise is as old as the movies.\n\nAn abduction leads to a media-circus. \n\nNick Dunne (Ben Affleck) comes home one day to find his wife Amy (Rosamund Pike) missing. The ensuing search and all the subsequent events, which shall not be revealed here, draw the viewer closer and closer into a complex world of everyday suburban reality and everyday suburban horror.\n\nAs if it needed to be pointed out, this balance of reality and horror, or horrendous reality, is the domain of Mr. Fincher. In his clear-cut no-nonsense style he has fashioned a powerful mystery-thriller that lands somewhere between Hitchcock, Lynch, Bergman and Chabrol. Although vastly different directors, they have shared an interest in dissecting reality and human nature. \n\nProfiting from two exceptional lead actors (doubts about Mr. Affleck\'s acting abilities will hopefully be dispelled), it is Ms. Pike, who reveals herself as an immensely versatile and unpredictable force in this movie. Over more than ten years Ms. Pike has played big parts in small movies, or small parts in big movies (such as \x84Pride & Prejudice", \x84Wrath of the Titans" or \x84Jack Reacher"). Under the guise of Mr. Fincher she excels in every aspect and if any contenders for awards are to be named so early in the season, hers would be one of the first names (next to the outstanding cast of Richard Linklaters \x84Boyhood") to be written down. \n\nVisually stunning as one would expect from Fincher, with an immersive soundtrack by Trent Reznor & Atticus Ross and an editing rhythm that cuts like a knife through the tissue of the story and its characters, \x84Gone Girl" leaves no doubt about its craft and the deceptive nature of its source novel by Gillian Flynn. The author adapted her book into a tightly wound screenplay, that adds fuel to an already burning analysis of modern marriage and human frailty.\n\nThe themes are familiar to Fincher, but he assembles them in an expertly fashion. And we are left wondering, amidst the suspense, about many of the so called estimable American values of the 20th century, that have now come crashing down under the weight of an economic, political and spiritual crisis.', u'0.135005', u'Two movies for the price of one. \n\nThat\'s a fairly glib start to a review of a movie that I really liked, but it is true. The first half of Gone Girl is a fairly standard "did he or didn\'t he" mystery thriller. Then, about an hour in, the perspective shifts entirely and suddenly you realise that you\'re watching \x96 perhaps \x96 the most pitch-black comedy that you\'ve ever seen. \n\nDespite the abrupt shift, I still think that Gone Girl holds together extremely well as one whole movie. Ben Affleck\'s Nick manages to inspire sympathy without ever being truly likable while Rosamund Pike\'s Amy (the star of the show in my opinion) is brilliant, terrifying, hilarious and despicable in various combinations and occasionally all at the same time.\n\nDavid Fincher\'s direction is both classy and clever (as usual) and several scenes are particularly outstanding due at least as much to his brilliance as that of the actors involved in them. My one complaint would be over the length \x96 it really didn\'t need to be two and a quarter hours long. There were certainly a few moments, particularly in the first half, when I wished that the movie would hurry up and get to the point just a little more quickly.\n\nGone Girl is a movie unlike any that I\'ve ever seen before and as such largely defies further description. I would recommend this movie to all (with a warning that the adult rating is well earned) but especially those with a dark sense of humour. The darker the better.', u'0.119224'], u'tt0033870': [u"\n\n\n\tHumphrey Bogart died nearly fifty years ago, but polls still put him at the top of all-time Hollywood stars. What turns a man into a legend?  The man himself wasn't much: a slight build, not too tall, no Stallone muscles to swell his suit.  What he had in classic films like `The Maltese Falcon' was a voice that cut through a script like a knife. \t`The Maltese Falcon,' directed by John Huston in 1941, reprised Dashiell Hammett's thriller. (It had been filmed before.) Hammett practically invented the tough guy so deep in cynicism nobody could hope to put anything past him. The novel, thick with plot, wasn't easy for director John Huston to untangle. Few people who cherish this film can summarize its story in a sentence or two. I'll try. San Francisco private eye Sam Spade (Bogart) is pulled into the search for a fabulously valuable statue by a woman who seeks his help. First, his partner is killed, then Spade pushes through her lies to uncover connections to an effete foreigner (Peter Lorre) and a mysterious kingpin (Sydney Greenstreet). The story unfolds like a crumpled paper. But the whodunit becomes less important than how we respond to the strong screen presence of Bogart and his co-stars.   \tThat's what makes `The Maltese Falcon' a classic. We see more and appreciate more each time we watch it. The art of Huston and Bogart doesn't come across until a second or third viewing. Huston invented what the French called film noir, in honor of Hollywood films (often `B' movies, cheap to make, second movies in double features) that took no-name stars into city streets to pit tough guys, often with a vulnerable streak, against dangerous dames. Audiences knew that when the tough guy said, `I'm wise to you, babe,' he'd be dead within a reel or two.  \tBogart was luckier than most noir heroes, but it cost. Struggling to maintain his own independence \x96 against the claims of love or his own penchant towards dishonesty \x96 the Bogart hero can do little better than surrender, with a rueful shrug, to the irony his survival depends on. The climax of `The Maltese Falcon' ranks with the last scene of `Casablanca,' another Bogart vehicle, in showing how the tough guy has to put himself back together after his emotions almost get the better of him. That assertion of strength, bowed but not broken, defines the enduring quality of Bogart on screen. \tFor Huston, telling this story posed a different problem. Telling it straight wasn't possible \x96 too many twists. Huston chose to focus on characters. One way to appreciate Huston's choices is to LISTEN to the movie. Hear the voices. Notice how in long sequences narrating back story, Huston relies on the exotic accents of his characters to keep us interested. Could we endure the scene in which Greenstreet explains the history of the Maltese falcon unless his clipped, somewhat prissy English accent held our attention? Also, we watch Bogart slip into drug-induced sleep while Greenstreet drones on. Has any director thought of a better way to keep us interested during a long narrative interlude? And is there a bit of wit in our watching Bogart nod off during a scene which, if told straight, would make US doze? \tAll of this leads to the ending, minutes of screen time in which more goes on, gesture by gesture, than a million words could summarize. He loves her, maybe, but he won't be a sucker. The cops come in, and the emotional color shifts to gray, the color of film noir heroes like Bogart. Bars on the elevator door as Brigid descends in police custody foreshadow her fate in the last image of Huston's film. But after the film, we're left with Spade, whom we like and loathe, a man whose sense of justice squares, just this once, with our own, maybe. Black and white morality prevails in a black and white movie, but Sam Spade remains gray \x96 and so does our response to this film classic.\n", u'-0.058337', u'Bogart. The coolest guy to ever live?\n\nHave you ever wondered what makes someone possess an essence that\'s defined as being "cool"? They seem to have that combination between imagery and soul that few people truly have. Is it in the style of clothes you wear or one\'s knowledge of independence? Is it the way you comb your hair or your unkempt humility for everything out there? It could be in your talk or how you walk, but maybe it\'s more about what you say and where you\'re going. In a sense it\'s an attitude that seeks to define character and break the mold of control. It\'s the fine line between knowing when to speak up and when saying less means more. So is Bogart the coolest guy to ever live? In a single word, absolutely.\n\nThe Maltese Falcon is basically a showcase for Bogart. A role that seems to be made for him, even with two previous attempts at the film. He is and always was born to play Sam Spade. The tough guy private investigator, who always has the right things to say. More likely to fire a witty comeback than a gun. Able to fall in love, even if only for the moment, and then send her to the gallows. All in the name of doing the right thing. It\'s not an emotional business.\n\nThe movie itself wrote the book of the crime and mystery drama story. Probably the best written plot in it\'s genre. No doubt that Bogart makes the character come alive, with that infectious voice and his uncompromising demeanor. But the movie itself is, to say the least, very good. The ending just does it for me. The last couple of lines are some of the best in film history.\n\nAlthough it took me a while to finally see this film, I realize that it\'s one of Bogart\'s triumphs and has all the main reasons why I love the guy so much. Please, see this film and remember Bogart as he was.\n\n"Heavy. What is it? The, uh, stuff that dreams are made of."', u'0.221061', u'The Forties were the years when Hollywood decided that the mystery thriller deserved big-budget, big-star treatment, threw up a new kind of hero who was exactly right for his time: they were the fabulous years which established the private eye adventure as the irremovable all-time favorite in the whole field of suspense\x85 The field was so rich, the choice so lavish in that decade, that it was difficult to know where memory should stop and call "Encore".\n\nAs the author of the screenplay, Huston made every effort to do justice, and remain faithful, to Dashiell Hammett\'s novel\x85 But in remaining faithful, the newest version asked audiences to accept the complicated plot at its full strength and that is where the film\'s main flaw occurs\x85 Names, murders, and intrigues turn up so quickly that it is extremely difficult to understand exactly what is happening in this tale of an assortment of characters in search of a fabulous jewel-encrusted statue\x85 \n\nProbably in no other film will a viewer find a gallery of such diverse human beings whose perfect1y constructed portrayals remain permanently locked in one\'s memory\x85 \n\nMary Astor\'s Brigid O\'Shaughnessy is a striking picture of feminine deceit and betrayal\x85 Able to shed tears on command, she is a confirmed liar who can be as deadly as she is beautiful; she can make passionate love to Bogart, but wouldn\'t hesitate a moment to kill him if it suited her plan\x85 Her performance is surely one of the screen\'s most brilliant portrayals of duplicity masked with fascination\x85 \n\nSydney Greenstreet, in his movie debut, was equally memorable as the menacingly mountainous man behind the search for the elusive black bird, and almost stole the picture\x85 Cunning, determined, appreciative of the fine arts, Greenstreet\x97who seemed to get more dangerous as he got more imperturbably polite\x97is a man who would devote his entire life to a single quest if need be\x85 \n\nPeter Lorre\'s Joel Cairo was a resolute picture of classic villainy\x85 With curled hair and impeccably clean dress, he is an unpredictable accomplice of Greenstreet, difficult to deal with\x85 \n\nBut it is Bogart\'s portrayal of Sam Spade that remains classic in its construction\x85 Obviously cynical, he still maintains his own code of ethics which he adheres to faithfully\x85 He is doubtful, but not foolhardy\x85 He is courageous, but not without fear\x85 Spade uses everyone he comes in contact with\x85 He wins not because he\'s smarter than his enemies, but because he is the only character in a central position\x85 Spade is every bit as ruthless as the crooks who try to use him\x85 His tactics in dealing with them, however, are necessary for his survival...\n\nHis treatment of the two women in the film seems equally as harsh, but neither is a wide eyed innocent and both attempt to deceive him in one manner or another\x85 His exchanges with Brigid O\'Shaughnessy are electric... Their mutual attraction is undeniable... But Spade will play the fool for no woman\x85 He is a loner, but he has contacts, and knows where to go for what he wants\x85 Even with very little money, he is totally incorruptible\x85 He has no apparent friends\x85 He is laconic, but he can throw a wisecrack as fast as he can throw a punch...\n\n"The Maltese Falcon" molded the image we remember of Bogart all through the early years of the Forties\x97an image elaborated upon and reinforced in "Casablanca," and the one which all Bogart fans remember with great affection and admiration\x85', u'0.0846023', u'\n"The Maltese Falcon", scripted and directed by Hollywood first-timer John Huston (from Dashiell Hammett\'s novel), would go on to become an American film classic.  Humphrey Bogart chews the scenery in his star-making turn as acid-tongued private eye Sam Spade, whose association with the beautiful and aloof Brigid O\'Shaughnessy (Mary Astor), neurotic Joel Cairo (Peter Lorre), and morbidly obese Kasper Gutman (Sydney Greenstreet, in his Oscar-nominated screen debut) over the recovery of the title object, sets in motion a movie experience that is as much crackling as it is dazzling.  While much of the action and dialogue is considerably dated by modern standards, the film\'s essential power to mystify and entrance remains undiminished despite its age.  While this was the third adaptation of Hammett\'s story (the first was made in 1931 and the second was "Satan Met a Lady" (1936)), this is also the best remembered and most praised, due largely in part to Bogart\'s seemingly effortless portrayal of the tough but softhearted, world-weary hero. Mary Astor and Lee Patrick were, respectively, the definitive femme fatale and girl Friday, and the villianous roles of Cairo, Gutman and Wilmer (Elisha Cook Jr.) were equally remarkable.  What may not be wholly obvious is the fact that these three men have homosexual tendencies (as given in the novel), but just look at what\'s given: Cairo\'s delicate speech and manner, Wilmer\'s questionable quick tempered attitude towards Spade (could this be covering up the fact that he finds Spade attractive?) and Gutman\'s clutching of Spade\'s arm when Sam arrives at his hotel room.  A polished film noir that gave rise to Bogart\'s mounting popularity.  (Sidenote: The character of Sam Spade was originally offered to George Raft, who turned it down. Raft also turned down "Casablanca" (1942), "High Sierra" (1941) and William Wyler\'s "Dead End" (1937), all of which went to Bogart and helped to boost his star status.  Bogart had Raft to thank for his enduring popularity.) A\nmust-see masterpiece.  ****', u'0.402503', u'The Maltese Falcon has a totally atypical Hollywood history. After two previous filmings of Dashiell Hammett\'s novel, the third time a classic film was achieved. Usually the original is best and the remakes are the inferior product.\n\nThese characters that John Huston wrote and breathed life into with his direction are so vital and alive even 65 years after the premiere of The Maltese Falcon. You can watch this one fifty times and still be entertained by it.\n\nI\'m not sure how the code let this one slip through. Humphrey Bogart as Sam Spade is partners with Jerome Cowan in a detective agency Spade and Archer. Client Mary Astor comes into their office requesting help in getting rid of a man who\'s intruding in on her life. Jerome Cowan as Miles Archer eagerly takes the assignment and gets himself bumped off for his troubles.\n\nCowan is quite the skirt chaser and he certainly isn\'t the first or the last man to think with his hormones. That\'s OK because Bogart\'s been fooling around with his wife, Gladys George. That gives the police, Barton MacLane and Ward Bond, motive enough to suspect Bogart might have had a hand in Cowan\'s death.\n\nAs fans of The Maltese Falcon are well aware, there\'s quite a bit more to the story than that. Bogart\'s investigation leads him to a crew of adventurous crooks, Sydney Greenstreet, Peter Lorre, and Elisha Cook, Jr. who are in pursuit of a statue of a Falcon that is said to be encrusted in gold and precious jewels. \n\nThe Maltese Falcon is a milestone film role for Humphrey Bogart. It is the first time that Bogey was ever first billed in an A picture while he was at Warner Brothers. In fact this is also John Huston\'s first film as a director. He had previously just been a screenwriter and in fact got an Oscar nomination for the screenplay he wrote here. There are some who will argue that this first film is Huston\'s best work and I\'d be hard up to dispute that.\n\nAfter a long career on stage The Maltese Falcon was the screen debut of Sydney Greenstreet. Greenstreet may be orally flatulent here, but there\'s no doubt to the menace he exudes while he\'s on screen. Greenstreet got an Oscar nomination for Best Supporting Actor, but lost to Donald Crisp for How Green Was My Valley. Greenstreet created quite a gallery of characters for the next ten years, mostly for Warner Brothers.\n\nA favorite character of mine in The Maltese Falcon has always been Lee Patrick as Effie, the secretary at Spade&Archer. She\'s loyal, efficient and crushing out on Bogey big time. This and the part of Mrs. Topper in the television series Topper are Lee Patrick\'s career roles. I never watch The Maltese Falcon without hoping that Bogey will recognize how really "precious" Effie is.\n\nThe Maltese Falcon will be entertaining people hundreds of years from now. And please no more remakes of this one.', u'0.151064', u"Private detectives Sam Spade and Miles Archer are hired to follow a man called Thursby for a woman. When Archer is murdered and Thursby gunned down, the police and Spade are keen to get answers. When the woman reveals she was lying about her motivations and her identity (she is really Bridget O'Shaughnessy), Sam finds out that she and Thursby were hiding a valuable statute of a falcon. The situation gets more complex when Bridget and Sam come under pressure form other sources that also want the falcon for themselves - namely the pompous Kasper Gutman and the weasely Joel Cairo.\n\nThe fact that this film is considered a classic almost makes it difficult to come to this with an objective view, but I did the best I could when I came to see it again for the first time in quite a few years. The film is pretty much a classic that deserves it reputation and stands out as a great bit of hardboiled detective stories from the period. The plot is a little complex at the start as the characters are introduced, but it quickly settles down to be a film with a solid plot that is enjoyable despite the fact that it falls down occasionally. The plot details are too often blurred or just forgotten about - giving the impression of a plot that is more complex than it actually is. However this isn't a problem as the film has enough pace and tough energy to cover these weaknesses and never let you linger for very long on them. The direction from Huston is very good, using almost totally interior shots to increase the tension and the feeling - amazingly this was his first film as director, but you wouldn't know it to watch it. Of course, needless to say, the writing (both source and screenplay) is top notch and is one of the big selling points of the film.\n\nThe dialogue is really tough and full of memorable lines, 'When you're slapped you'll take it and like it' probably being the one that everybody remembers. A big reason that the dialogue works as well as it does is down to the fantastic performances from all the cast, although having said that it is dominated by the lead. Bogart summed up his most famous roles for future generations in this one film. He is a complex guy who we're never sure is straight of crooked, he is tough and violent - sleeping with his partner's wife and unafraid of anything. The dialogue fits him like a glove and this is one of my favourite of his performances as it is the one of the ones where he seems to have got everything bang on. Astor is good because, for me, she doesn't fit into the usual role of femme fatale - she is quite needy and demur and that is even more dangerous than the women who are overtly sexual and manipulative, as they were frequently in the later noirs. Lorre is the wonderful, weedy, snivelling character than he does so well and is remembered for. Likewise Greenstreet is a great actor and manages to be overblown without being silly. Cook has a small role but shows his talents in little ways - his reaction when he realises how expendable he is to Gutman is great.\n\nOverall this is a classic film that will please all fans of detective stories and the noir genre. It has a flawed plot but it's dialogue and tough energy cover those up enough to keep things moving all the time. The characters are complex, none more so than Spade himself who is as smart as he is gullible and as cold as he is loving , and they are brought to life by a series of great performances. On top of all this, the film is dominated by a Bogart performance that acts as a perfect example of his most famous work.", u'0.372083', u'\nWith a fine combination of cast, characters, story, and atmosphere, this classic is one of the most entertaining films of its kind, enjoyable even after several viewings.  It gets you right into the action and introduces you to a list of interesting personalities, who mesh together nicely and who are also matched well with the cast members.  Beyond that, it\'s also effective as a character study involving greed, trust and distrust, and conflicting ethics.  \n\nSam Spade is an ideal role for Bogart, giving him plenty to work with and some very good dialogue as well.  Peter Lorre and Sydney Greenstreet are very entertaining, providing suitable foils for Bogart, and they really take the film up a notch.  The rest of the cast also works well (worth mentioning is Elisha Cook, Jr., whose character doesn\'t do a lot, but who provides Bogart with some very amusing moments at his expense).  The story is nicely adapted from the novel, and each scene is constructed well, with everything moving along nicely from start to finish.\n\nIf you are a fan of either film noir or mysteries, make this a must-see.  There are very few films that work as well as "The Maltese Falcon".\n', u'0.9018', u'While there are films that are considered classic for their technical achievements and classics that resound with audiences for a feel-good emotion, The Maltese Falcon stands in that group that is a classic for every aspect of its creative makeup. With a brilliant script, talented direction and some outstanding performances, The Maltese Falcon stands up today as well as it did upon release.\n\nWhen Sam Spade -- played brilliantly by Humphrey Bogart -- and his partner Archer are hired to tail a rich eccentric by a woman who claims her sister is being unwittingly kept separated from her by the rich eccentric, it seems like just another case. But when Archer and the eccentric are gunned down and all fingers point to Sam Spade for conflicting yet damning reasons, Spade is thrown into a whirlwind of deceptions that all point in one direction: a Maltese statue of a falcon.\n\nBogart demonstrates clearly why he is one of the great classic actors of the 20th century, and indeed one of the most natural screen actors ever. His charisma, charm and intense masculine looks give him a presence that simply dominates the screen. With a host of other great talents to fill the screen, there is not a moment of wasted performance. The direction is tight and driving and the pacing never lets up. And the script demonstrates why there are less and less truly great films being released in present day: the writers and directors of the golden age of cinema knew that subtlety works ten times more effectively than the modern in-your-face all-the-time works.\n\nThe Maltese Falcon is a timeless work that deserves its place in the list of greatest films ever made.', u'0.38389', u'Seven decades have passed but the suspense and thrill of The Maltese Falcon still reign supreme. The movie, despite being in black & white, appears strikingly refreshing both to the eyes and the intellect. Primarily remembered as John Huston\'s directorial debut, the movie played a decisive role in giving Film-Noire its true identity as a genre. The Maltese Falcon also gave Humphrey Bogart his highly deserved super-stardom that had hitherto eluded him. Huston creates an environment of suspicion, doubt and uncertainty that is so convoluted that even Hitchcock would be proud of it. The movie has multiple layers of mystery and suspense that keeps the viewer engaged throughout. \n\nSam Spade is a private detective who runs an agency with his partner Miles Archer. An ostensibly naive lady, Miss Wanderly offers them a task to pursue a man, Floyd Thursby, who has allegedly run off with her younger sister. The over-simplicity of task arouses Spade\'s suspicion, but Wanderly\'s lucrative offer makes the duo overlook it initially. Miles is killed during the pursuit and the police inform Spade of the mishap. Spade only discreetly tells the police that Miles was after a man named Thursby without disclosing anything about Miss Wandely. The police soon find Thursby dead as well and suspect Spade for killing him in an act of revenge. Soon Miles Archer\'s widow shows up at Spade\'s office and insinuates of her romantic involvement with Spade, who shuns her away after she tries to incriminate him for the murder. The police come across an anonymous lead and begin suspecting Spade for killing his partner, Miles. The plot thickens with the entry a couple of obscure characters including Joel Cairo, who happens be an acquaintance of Miss Wanderly. He is in pursuit of a highly precious, antique, gold statuette of Maltese Falcon and offers Spade five grands to help him find it. A game of cat and mouse soon ensues, between the various stake holders, which becomes deadlier as the stakes are raised. \n\nHumphrey Bogart perfectly fits into the shoes of Spade\x97a sleek and sharp sleuth\x97and makes it his own in a manner that only someone of his grit and caliber could. Bogart is in top form right from the inception to the finale, stealing the spotlight in almost every scene that is he is part of. Bogart could only demonstrate his prodigious talent and acting prowess in short bursts during his long "B movie" stint in which he was mostly type-casted as a gangster. The Maltese Falcon was Bogart\'s big break after years of anticipation and he didn\'t leave a single stone unturned to prove his mettle. Bogart shows his class and stamps his authority as a performer during the portrayal of Spade: he is ever so quick-witted thanks to his sublime articulacy and his prowess at repartee seems unparalleled; the inherent cynicism in Spade and the perspicacity with which he operates soon became Bogart\'s trademark and catapulted him to super-stardom. Many regard Bogart\'s performance in Casablanca as his absolute best, but I rate his portrayal of Spade second only to his supernal portrayal of Dobbs in The Treasure of Sierre Madre, where he took acting to hitherto unattainable and unforeseeable heights. \n\nJohn Huston uses the Midas touch he had as a screenwriter to strike all the right cords in his directorial debut. Almost everyone in the supporting cast gives a memorable performance with special mention of Peter Lorre as the deceptive Joel Cairo, Sydney Greenstreet as the witty yet dangerous Kasper Gutman and Mary Astor as the scheming Brigid O\' Shaughnessy. The taut plot of the movie, which is masterfully adapted from the novel of the same name by Huston himself, is well complemented by the impressively written dialogs that are delivered with an equal prowess. Amidst the everlasting suspense the movie has an obvious undertone of dark humor that adds great value to the movie. The cinematography undoubtedly features amongst the best works of the time.\n\nThe Maltese Falcon is not merely a Noire masterpiece but also a testament to the true spirit of cinema that has kept itself alive despite decades of relentless mutilation and sabotage in the name of commercial movie-making. Despite being devoid of modern-day gimmicks the movie is incredibly high on suspense and holds the viewer in a vice-like grip throughout its runtime. It\'s a real shame that movies like these are seldom made these days. The tone of the movie is such that it makes suspense thrillers of today appear like kids cartoon. \n\nPS. The movie is an ode to Bogart, Huston and all those who made it a reality. It\'s suspense cinema at its absolute best with a completely different treatment to themes propagated by the likes of Hitchcock. It\'s a must for all the Bogart fans worldwide, and absolutely essential for all those who have a penchant for Film-Noire as a genre. 10/10\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/', u'0.170251', u'Considered by many film historians as the very first noir film, "The Maltese Falcon" is cinematically important also for making Humphrey Bogart into a Hollywood star, and for being the debut of John Huston as film Director.\n\nThe film\'s story is complex and convoluted, typical of detective films of that era, and involves a valuable statuette. The plot stalls and meanders throughout most of the film, as we encounter an assortment of strange characters and side issues. But this is not a plot-driven film. It is character-driven.\n\nAnd the main character, of course, is PI Sam Spade (Bogart). He\'s not a particularly nice guy. He comes across as overconfident and egotistic. He smirks a lot. But he\'s tough as nails. And he knows how to nail the bad guys. A big part of the film is Spade\'s relationship to femme fatale Brigid (Mary Astor). They engage each other in a battle of wits. And there\'s more than a hint of romantic involvement between the two. But Brigid is the one who propels Spade into the deceiving and double-crossing world of bad guys who yearn with greed for the priceless Maltese Falcon.\n\nEnter Kasper Gutman, that thoroughly rotund and intimidating (in a gentlemanly sort of way) king of greed, portrayed with verve and panache by the inimitable Sydney Greenstreet. Gutman, AKA the "Fat Man", is nothing if not erudite and self-assured. In one scene, Sam Spade makes a bold offer. Gutman responds articulately: "That\'s an attitude sir that calls for the most delicate judgment on both sides, because as you know sir, in the heat of action, men are likely to forget where their best interests lie ...".\n\nAnd Peter Lorre is a hoot as Gutman\'s mischievous elf, Joel Cairo, who tries, without success, to threaten Sam Spade, but only succeeds at getting on Sam\'s nerves.\n\nThe film\'s high contrast B&W lighting renders an effective noir look and feel, one that would be copied in films for years to come. Acting varies from very good to overly melodramatic. The script is very talky. For the most part, the film is just a series of conversations that take place in interior sets.\n\nStylistic and cinematically innovative, "The Maltese Falcon" has endured as a film classic. I suspect the main reason for its continued popularity is the continued popularity of Bogart. But I personally prefer the performance of Sydney Greenstreet, the enticing fat man. Yet, together they would reappear in later films, one of which would follow, in 1942, as the classic of all classics.', u'-0.00218995', u'I love this movie. I didn\'t love it until I\'d watched it a couple of times.\n\nAnd I didn\'t love it quite so much until I\'d read Harvey Greenberg\'s "Movies on Your Mind." \n\nBut I now think that, within the strictures of its budget, it\'s about as good as it can get. Sam Spade is a marvelous character in this film. He gives practically nothing away, while gathering information from others simply by letting them talk, kind of like a shrink.\n\nAnd it\'s hard to believe that they could have found a cast that fit the templates of the novel so perfectly. Sidney Greenstreet IS the "fat man." Peter Lorre IS the queer. My nomination for best scene: When Greenstreet attempts to peel off the black enamel from the captured bird and finds that it\'s nothing but lead and begins to hack away at it, as if it were alive and he were trying to kill it. Nothing is more amusing than a fat man lipid with rage.\n\nIf you see this one, and I hope you do, make note of the phenomenal black and white photography. (I hope you have a good connection.) Watch, for instance, the glissade of the camera when Bogart says, "You have brains. Yes, you do." \n\nIn case you\'re worried about this being too sophisticated for enjoyment by an ordinary audience, I should mention that I showed this (in one connection or another, I forget) to a class of Marines at Camp Lejeune. They enjoyed the hell out of it, especially the scene in which Mary Astor kicks Peter Lorre in the shins.\n\nDon\'t miss it.', u'-0.0127585', u'\n\'The Maltese Falcon\' is the granddaddy of the modern detective movie, as well as the first of the \'film noir\' genre, which should impress any film buff looking for an \'essential\' film for his collection...But even if you\'re not, I\'d STRONGLY recommend this film, as a terrific mystery with a first-rate cast!\n\nHollywood legend has it that George Raft had been cast as detective Sam Spade, in this third version of the Dashiell Hammett novel (it had been filmed 10 years earlier, with Ricardo Cortez as Spade, and a few years later, with Bette Davis in the Astor role). Raft refused to work with novice director John Huston, however, and Humphrey Bogart, fresh from his breakthrough success in \'High Sierra\', inherited the role...and a legendary team was formed! Huston was a master of sharp, witty dialogue and character, and nobody could play a loner with a code of honor better than Bogart; together, they were unbeatable!\n\nThe premise involves a statue of a falcon said to have a fortune in jewels under the lead paint covering it, but this is really a tale of greed, betrayal, and murder. The cast of characters is unforgettable; in addition to Bogart\'s Spade, there is the beautiful and mysterious Brigid O\'Shaughnessy (Mary Astor), slickly effeminate Joel Cairo (Peter Lorre), gregarious and self-centered Kasper Gutman (Sidney Greenstreet, in his finest role), and Gutman\'s young, psychotic hitman (Elisha Cook, Jr.). Even the minor characters are indelibly etched, with great performances by Lee Patrick, Jerome Cowan, Barton Maclaine, and Ward Bond.\n\nWe follow Spade, as he journeys deeper and deeper into a web of deception, hunting for the statue and investigating his partner\'s murder, while becoming romantically involved with O\'Shaughnessy. The film never loses momentum, and the climax has the kind of irony that became a John Huston trademark!\n\n\'The Maltese Falcon\' is a tale that never gets old, and if you have never seen it, check it out! It truly is "the stuff that dreams are made of".\n', u'0.361277', u'"The Maltese Falcon" would be nothing without the muscular, cynical, and very entertaining lead performance from Humphrey Bogart. Well, \'nothing\' maybe a bit of an overstatement- the film is inventive and interesting otherwise but Bogart\'s performance makes the film. This film established his career, helping him escape the dozens of cheap crime films he was in prior to this film. It\'s easy to see why audiences were impressed with his charismatic portrayal of no-nonsense tough guy Sam Spade. I wasn\'t overly impressed with Mary Astor\'s performance in the film; she wasn\'t a compelling love interest and failed to live up to the script\'s strong characterization. Sydney Greenstreet and Peter Lorre, however, completely make up for Astor\'s performance.\n\nThis film was John Huston\'s debut film, and it doesn\'t really feel like a debut film. It\'s quite accomplished, actually. The film is heavily stylized, perhaps more than any other film before it. It is also unflinching in its moral ambiguity (it was named the first film in the \'film-noir\' genre by French critic Nino Frank, though I think other films qualify such as Howard Hawks\' "Scarface") portraying harsh, cruel, cold individuals. Sam Spade is a realistic character, stylized perhaps, but realistic. He is not the perfect John Wayne all-American hero; he is harsh, cold, and even capable of murder. When his partner is killed Spade does not feel much of anything, reacting indifferently to the death and even kissing his widow during their first meeting after he hears the news. John Huston wanted this film to be more character-based and less plot-based than the two previous adaptations of the novel (which he called \'wretched pictures\'). The care taken to provide good characterization in the script is clear to the audience. Indeed, "The Maltese Falcon" has a fairly complicated plot and it\'s easy to understand how a film can get bogged down in the plot and fail to entertain the audience or even tell a good story. Huston made a wise choice in reducing the plot to the background and focusing on the characters and dialogue.\n\nHuston also pays close attention to visual composition of shots, painstakingly recreating the sleazy underbelly of San Francisco. San Francisco is traditionally used in film as a romantic setting, and it is remarkable how drastically different Huston\'s portrayal of the city is from the norm and how effective it is. Huston, after writing the very fun and smart script, storyboarded every scene in the film and the attention to detail is clear to those viewing the film. Often such meticulous planning carries over to the screen and interrupts the dramatic flow, but not in this case. The film flows exceptionally well and feels much shorter than its 100 minute running time. The result of all the care that went into the film is, by all accounts, excellent entertainment. It\'s smart, stylish, generally well-acted, and always captivating. "The Maltese Falcon" is surely one of the most promising debut films in history, promise and potential which Huston most certainly delivered on later in his career.\n\n****/4', u'0.303576', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nThere are films which shuffle the vocabulary of past films, and then there are the few films which add to that vocabulary. This is one such, and all the more remarkable because it was Huston's first.\n\nHis vision was shocking and established a new genre. The conventional filmmaking skills are pretty poor on this. The photography is soso, the editing poor, the women's acting atrocious. But the manipulation of the narrative in this way was new to film.\n\nUntil this point in Hollywood product, the camera was the surrogate of the theater audience-goer. You could trust it. The convention was that you (the camera) would know more than the characters you see. And everything would make sense.\n\nHere, some new things are introduced:\n\n-- the world is against the characters; everyone's life is bleak; no happy ending is in sight\n\nMany people think this defines noir. (Later, the photography would be bleak as well.) but there is another innovation here:\n\n-- the world is against you the viewer to the same extent as the characters. You get no special breaks.\n\nThis was a big deal. The same year, Orson Welles would break the position of the camera. No longer would it be bound to where a human would be naturally placed. But here, the very soul of the viewer was compromised: you are swept up in the rules of the created world.\n\nThat created world itself wasn't so novel to the book writers, but the notion of a mystery gave a special scaffold. The whole game there is to establish a detective in the world. Then there is a game among you, the detective and the author to see who can outguess whom. It was a great invention in narrative.\n\nHere, you still have three players, all trying to trick one another, but the author gets in the first trick -- declaring that you do not have the safety of your seat, your perspective, your own world: you have to live in the created world, the same as Spade.\n\nThe Malta business was built into the book to add some notion of the ancient supernatural as an excuse to disrupt the reader. They got it all historically wrong (they meant the Knights Templar, the same folks who hid Indiana Jones' ark), and in any case glossed over that element in the translation from book to film. \n\nI think Huston was smart enough to know what he was doing. I don't think the actors were. Fortunately, Bogart was effectively mean. But for my money Sidney Greenstreet is the genius here. He is the one around whom this noir world is created, so with Huston can be considered the co-inventors of the genre.\n\nAs with Huston, this was Greenstreet's first film. Imagine that.\n", u'0.00567707', u'The Maltese Falcon (1941)\n\nWhat makes Bogart so cool? And what makes The Maltese Falcon with its ludicrous plot and foamcore characters so untouchable? Three things, in, uh, spades: pace, script, and archetype. All of these make for a stylized film--no gritty realism, no method acting, no penetration. No social commentary. No innovation. Nothing really but a beautiful sprint that leaves you breathless, but not tired. \n\nThe film is about style, and coolness (not to be mistaken for hipness--cool as in chilled, unflappable). It has aura, and clever detachment. Even the characters are detached. They are pulled by the events but never, except when the fat man gets out his pocket knife at the end, swept away. One by one, these really great actors get to sharpen the edges of their two- dimensional selves, and it\'s really amazing to watch.\n\nThis is John Huston\'s first film, and like that little first film by Orson Welles released just six months earlier, it has a scary mastery to it. But if Huston, like Welles, rode the talents of many studio professionals at their peak, he pulled the film away from cinematic excess into what almost feels almost like a fast, and highly distilled, adaptation of a theater production. (It\'s based, of course, on the detective novel by Dashiell Hammett.) The movie talks a lot because there isn\'t much to show--nothing physical really happens beyond a couple of fisticuffs--but such talk! When Sydney Greenstreet as Kasper Gutman first meets Bogart\'s Sam Spade and they share a drink, sit, and light up cigars, Greenstreet (also in his first film) bobs and feints through some fabulous wordplay, ending, with the camera low to make his size only larger: "I\'ll tell you right out, I\'m a man who likes talking to a man who likes to talk."\n\nBogart says, "Swell," and he talks without giving an inch. He really is "cool" in that way Bogart, through most of his movie roles, still defines for us decades later. Huston must have felt the transcendent power of the still rising star (Casablanca was still a year away) because, ultimately, the film is a vehicle for Bogart being Bogart, in the face of three or four counterparts who are each at their archetypal best. And gosh, Bogie sure knows how to take a gun away from hapless bodyguard played by Elisha Cook, Jr.\n\nThe film is no empty exercise in expertise. It creates a fictional world we can understand top to bottom because it\'s so simple. We enjoy all the principals so much, we happily tag along on the unfolding trail of this improbable "black bird" and its sudden arrival toward the end for the sake of soaking up the characters, as characters. And look how even Bogart at one point looks jittery compared to Greenstreet, whose ponderous ease and guffaws in the face of trauma won him an Oscar nomination. Peter Lorre, plausibly uncertain and almost tender (and who\'s to say whether homosexual, too, in an wan, period stereotype) in his attempt at badness, is a marvel, someone you talk about later, someone who can parody himself in Capra\'s 1944 Arsenic and Old Lace (which shares a screenwriter with another Lorre film, Casablanca).\n\nSpade\'s cynicism, his wariness, his occasional up-and-up certitude (he gives the money back!), and his willingness to laugh at it all, above all, overcome weakness like his so-called romance with the Mary Astor femme fatale. The end actually falls a little flat because we don\'t believe in their love, but we\'re not sure he did either. And did we ever believe her? In fact, isn\'t that part of the trick here, not believing anyone, ever?', u'-0.024475'], u'tt0892769': [u"I watched How to Train Your Dragon about 5 times now, and it never gets boring. It actually keeps on getting better and better with with more and more views. This is a huge accomplishment for DreamWorks Animation, it might actually be its Best Animated Feauture it yet. It is an amazing experience to watch this film in Cinema. The 3D is amazing and at times Breathtaking. I may of had the most fun that I've ever had in Cinema watching How to Train Your Dragon.\n\nThe script is really good and is has a lot of dramatic depth. This movie is for everyone. Adults and Kids will enjoy it equally and will love it at the end. This movie will probably become a series like Shrek. But I'm hoping this film doesn't get bad sequels like Shrek 3 and Shrek Forever After. Anyways this film will be most recognized for its beautiful animation.\n\n10/10 Highly Recommended", u'0.646345', u"incredible! certainly the front runner for the best animated film of the year. from the first to the last frame this film is as good as an animated film gets on almost every level. beautifully written, designed and executed. though an incredible movie, it's not quite perfection - probably due to time and budget limitations (is there ever enough of either?). that said, the problems i had are far too few to mention. if dragon doesn't absolutely slay at the box office i'll lose faith in middle America. \n\ncongrats to the filmmakers - you've made a masterpiece and you made me feel like a kid again. thank you.", u'0.98541', u'HTTYD is the latest in a run of animated 3D films to hit the family market. One might be forgiven for feeling a little weary of this genre as the big production studios churn out one "action-packed film with a cute central character and some pretty effects" after another. But wait...\n\nHTTYD stands apart from these other attempts for a number of reasons. First, the 3D (Odeon digital in this screening) is moving more toward the subtle with fewer "gratuitous" 3D moments than in movies like Bolt and Coraline. As 3D becomes a staple of high street cinema, directors seem to be finding 3D to be more about adding depth rather than a brief focal-point. That\'s not to say that there isn\'t effective use of the 3D wow-factor here; it\'s just not all the film has to hold attention.\n\nSecond, a cast of voice talent that does not demand too much consideration of the man/woman behind the microphone is refreshing. Baruchel is not over-playing the sugar or the heroics and, as much as an animated character can be, he is believable and as three-dimensional as the visuals. Butler is not greatly stretched here but manages to stay just the right side of a Mike Myers impression so as not to annoy. How many kids will now think the Vikings were a fearsome race of Americans and Scots? Oh, well! \n\nThird, the plot and dialogue. You may not know the plot and I won\'t spoil it now. It is straightforward stuff but the pace keeps it interesting for kids and the grown-ups. Younger children may be upset at times and I heard a sob or two at the emotional moments. Nothing too heavy here though, it\'s just a well-written script with as many actual laughs as I have seen in a kids\' film.\n\nThis is one of the best films so far in this prolific genre and it has been made with passion rather than thrown together to cash-in on the thirst for these films, right now. I would urge all ages to see this film in 3D as the textures are extraordinary and you can\'t help but be charmed by it all.', u'0.279499', u'If this is done following the same old beat up formula that Hollywood sticks to with regards to animation, then the dragons will be yakking non-stop. Thank goodness that this film, directed by Dean DeBlois and Chris Sanders, avoids this like the plague, and \n\nJay Baruchel voices Hiccup, a viking kid who happens to be more brains than brawn, more scrawny than buffed, and this of course sets him apart from the rest of his warrior clan folks, who are battle scarred from the constant defense of the village pests - dragons who come from afar to plunder their livestock and setting their houses on fire, so much so that every house on the block is relatively brand new. Wanting to help out in any way he can, he\'s deemed more of a liability than an asset, especially when even his dad Stoick (Gerard Butler) cannot appreciate his unique, technical talent.\n\nIn a stroke of uncanny luck, Hiccup downs a flying dragon in the heat of battle, and his compassion meant to set the dragon free, rather than trying to prove himself to be a worthy viking man by killing it. And it\'s a rare specimen of a dragon too, which would have brought him instant glory. So a bond between man and mythical beast gets struck, and christened as Toothless, this is one pest who slowly grows into a pet, with Hiccup\'s secret rendezvous resulting in growing appreciation for the species, despite what the knowledge that his kinsman had compiled into a Dragon compendium which details facts all ending with an advisory on compulsory annihilation.\n\nThe story here is the strength of the film, being witty, smart but never condescending nor insulting the intelligence of the audience. While most characters are caricatures, especially Hiccup\'s peers, a lot of effort have been put into creating the leads as multi-dimensional and full of heart, and I enjoyed how the characters are so open to their emotions, that it becomes a lot more real than the photo realistic 3D animation and effects. Sure there\'s the usual father-son misunderstanding and expectations, and how a zero turns to hero, or even the theme of fearing something that we don\'t fully comprehend, but it\'s the manner in which the usual got delivered, that made all the difference. Especially so for its anti-war stance, that all it takes is a little step back from the common battle-cry, and instead seek to be understood, by holding out an olive branch, and to understand first.\n\nFor those who enjoy the mythology of the dragon creature, there are a number of ideas thrown up in the film that would make you nod in appreciation how these got conjured up for the film, and they worked wonders, even though they may be a tad predictable plot wise. And I\'m betting that a lot of folks out there will take to Toothless, thanks to its "stitch"-ish design similar to Lilo and Stitch (since it\'s co-director Chris Sander\'s previous work) and huge saucer like eyes, plus a lovable demeanour built into the character that\'s always apprehensive, and mischievous. Being the creature that has no track record also helped, since it ropes you into a journey of friendship, bonding and discovery with Hiccup as to how powerful his new found friend can be, not to mention how symbiotic their relationship will evolve into as well.\n\nAction junkies will find the action sequences in the film faultless, and the 3D got specifically crafted for certain set action pieces that really had me ducking for cover, for once. Fights are incredible, and always accompanied either by humour that worked without the feeling that it was deliberate nor just tried too hard, coupled with the comedic voice talents such as Jonah Hill and Christopher Mintz-Plasse.\n\nHow to Train Your Dragon is similar to last year\'s Cloudy With a Chance of Meatballs - Long titles, great story, beautiful animation and a total delight. Highly recommended, and it goes into my list as contenders for best films of this year!', u'0.338217', u"I am not at all interested in dragons and all such fantasy creatures. I don't like children movies with all their stupid messages. I saw this movie rather just to pass the time than to watch it for its sake. And Whoa! I was drawn in this river in first 5 minutes. And what a experience it has been! Right from the start as the narrator describes his world, you are immediately there. You feel yourself in the characters place. The movie does that for you. This is very uncommon movie and it has set a milestone for 3D, not because of its technical aspects, but because of the Depth this movie has. This movie is as much for a 7 year old as it is for an old man who has seen a lot of life. This movie will entertain each viewer in his own way. This is a masterpiece! This movie isn't what it sounds on the surface. It has layers of meanings attached to it. Look at just the title: How to train your Dragon!. If you see it carefully you will notice that there is more to it than meets the eye. Watch the movie and you will know what i mean. This movie cleverly comments on Human Fear, War, Friendship, prejudices, courage, Love. ........................... Don't miss this movie or you will miss one of the few periods when you really LIVE. Note: Just remember to carry your heart with you when you see this movie. It will fill your heart with nothing but what should truly belong there. 10/10.", u'0.264008', u"I saw the trailer and I enjoyed it but I was afraid that all the good parts from the movie will be there and that will be all, like it was with many films lately. That was certainly not the case. There are way better parts that were left to be discovered and I definitely congratulate the choice.\n\nI didn't read the book, so I don't know the story, witch might have suffered, as stories usually do from books to picture, but I think a writer couldn't hope for a better image, better portraits of characters, especially the black dragon who one definitely falls in love with - the mimic and the gestures and the face expressions, so complex and real. \n\nI agree it's not the kind of movie that makes you keep thinking too much once it's finished bot it's not meant to be. It's just lovely, from the beginning to the end, I really laughed and I was anxious for the characters when they suffered (and I'm 22). The film wasn't too long, it didn't have stupid lines whatsoever and it put to silence the annoying child behind me from the first five minutes or so, which I believe says it all.\n\nI don't know if I will actually go to the cinema but I definitely want to see it again. \n\nGreat special effects and, again, a very lovely dragon.", u'0.208966', u'I saw this film in early March, of 2010 in Indianapolis. I am one of the judges for the Heartland Truly Moving Picture Award. A Truly Moving Picture "\x85explores the human journey by artistically expressing hope and respect for the positive values of life." Heartland gave that award to this film.\n\nIt\'s in 3-D and it\'s gorgeous animation. But what really matters is the story. And it\'s a good one. At first it seems the main story is about a Viking colony equally distant from nowhere, which is being constantly attacked by a wide variety of marauding dragons. It\'s a full time job trying to keep the dragons at bay and the Viking warriors are often out on their boats hunting their wily and ferocious opponents.\n\nBut really the story is about a father and chief of the Vikings who has a young son, Hiccup, who is small and who is a slick, sarcastic talker and who doesn\'t take orders well, but still seeks respect from his impressive father. At first, his Father will not let his son be a warrior Viking, but later relents to have Hiccup train with the other youngsters. But the young boy gets sidetracked and instead of wanting to kill dragons, the boy befriends them and seeks to understand them.\n\nA young and inexperienced son seeking approval of a strong father is an often-told tale. Sons often act foolishly trying to impress their fathers. And fathers often ignore the strivings of their sons. In this case, there is honor and courage on all sides and it is inspiring to watch the father and son wrestle with their relationship.\n\nAnd yes, about the dragons \x96 they ARE ferocious and talented and aggressive warriors. But their motivations are a mystery that unfolds slowly. And that\'s the fun of this film.\n\nFYI \x96 There is a Truly Moving Pictures web site where there is a listing of past Truly Moving Picture Award winners that are now either at the theater or available on video.', u'0.235397', u'Hiccup a young Viking befriends Toothless, a young dragon. This is the best movie I\'ve seen since the "Lord of the Rings" trilogy. Virtually everything about it is wonderful. Rarely have I been so drawn in to an animated movie. The 3D aspects are thrilling and the movie has a great story, amazing animation, non stop action and a positive and constructive message. It made me want to go out and get a pet dragon. This movie is perfect for people of all ages. Now I know what a feel good movie is. This movie will make everyone feel good. Congratulations to all who contributed to this amazing film. It will make toy dragons a popular gift item. Hope to see it again and again. 3D at it\'s best.', u'0.553182', u"This has to be one of the best films I've seen with my family.\n\nThe characters came to life and was instantly hooked.\n\nI've young children and they hardly flinched throughout. The draw to the screen was virtually magnetic.\n\nA definite must see for all the family, and the 3d version bought it to life, totally!!\n\nThe story was well written, even though I must admit the start was a bit slow, but all in all well done dream-works. You've another winner on your hands here.\n\np.s. can't stop talking about it, and its been a week since I've seen it- I can see Oscars in the not too distant future.", u'0.304587', u"With a somewhat unwieldy tile and the lack of the winning Pixar storyline that has dominated the Oscars for a decade, Dreamworks animations latest could have been a clunker. Not only is How to Train Your Dragon the best film of the year so far, but it even eclipses the quality of last years duel academy award winner Up.\n\nThe latest 3-D film to fly into theatres in so many weeks is also the best of its format (story wise), making Burton's overblown misfire Alice in Wonderland look even more pitiful. Dragon will no doubt enamour kids (excuse the clich\xe9) of all ages while keeping parents not only awake but equally enthralled. This movie is sure to tug the hearts of anyone who has ever loved a pet and will undoubtedly draw tears from those who are so inclined.\n\nThe texture that can be created from today's CG technology never ceases to amaze. Consider a beautiful tracking shot of a downed dragon where the twisted wing that protrudes towards the screen is actually out of focus, as if you yourself were staring awestruck at the giant lizard that lay before you in real, tangible life. I did not have the pleasure to viewing How to Train Your Dragon in 3-D but I have heard great things and even without having paid a surcharge the film does in no way suffer as a result. The narrative, visuals, writing and voicework is ample reason to seek out Dragon and frankly is the real heart of the movie anyways.\n\nOn the Island of Berk, the Viking community that lives there does not fear a rival tribe, the weather or disease but rather a much more toothy threat: dragons. Nightly raids by the winged beasts have forged a great hatred upon the tribe and led by the aptly named Stoik the Vast (Gerard Butler) they wage war with the intent to rid themselves of dragons once and for all. This is not a feeling shared by Stoik's scrawny son Hiccup (Jay Baruchel) who favours non-lethal tactics as much as he does blacksmithing. Much to Hiccup's surprise, during one of the aforementioned raids he is able to down a dragon with one of his contraptions. Intent on proving his manhood to Stoik, he seeks out to find the dragon know as a Night Fury but finds himself unable to slay his scaly foe. So begins an unlikely and forbidden friendship with the later named Toothless that follows a time-tested but absolutely rewarding arc that is as enthralling as it is touching.\n\nJoining Butler and Baruchel, both of whom give excellent performances (with Butler recapturing some of his 300 mojo), are the likes of Craig Fergusson as the Viking blacksmith, America Ferrera as the feisty object of Hiccup's affections and a whole slice of the Apatow gang including Kristen Wiig, Christopher Mintz-Plasse and Jonah Hill as other young warriors. Much like WALL-E, Toothless exhibits oodles of personality and is endlessly endearing. To achieve this level of depth is perhaps even more impressive due to the fact that he never utters a word and must emote through non-verbal means.\n\nAlong with Kung Fu Panda this movie represents the highest ilk of the Dreamworks repertoire and that is not a backhanded compliment by any means. Like Panda, there are thrilling and well choreographed action sequences to compliment the heart, and plenty of humour to keep this from becoming too much of a dramatic slog for younger theatre goers. Teenager or adult, fan or animation or not if you like truly good cinema, you will not be unsatisfied by How to Train Your Dragon.\n\nRead all my reviews at simonsaysmovies.blogspot.com", u'0.154297', u"An animated feast for the eyes is a brilliant description for this film. From the jaw-dropping visuals beautifully rendered in 3D, to the flawless animation of the characters and dragons, this was one film that didn't disappoint.\n\nOur protagonist is Hiccup, a boy viking who doesn't possess much in common with his dragon slaying dad. However, when he finds a new friend in Toothless, the most feared dragon of its species, he learns that dragons are not the fearful creatures he was brought up to believe.\n\nWhat I enjoyed the most was the relationship between Hiccup and Toothless the dragon. This was dealt with wonderfully and we see their relationship develop over a series of scenes which were done with great humour and action.\n\nThe 3D holds its own in every sense, and I would go as far as saying that some scenes rival the groundbreaking Avatar. The scenes that especially stood out were the flying segments where the dragon soars over crystal clear sea's and jaw-dropping backdrops.\n\nWhilst this is a film that may seem as if it's solely directed at the younger generation, its stunning visuals and well-told story means that it will keep any adult satisfied.", u'0.516427', u'Here\'s an animated movie that has everything it should have, an inspired, but simple story without jokes intended for the adult parents who have to sit with their kids in the theater. In "How to train a dragon", it is the majestic artwork that keeps the viewer engaged, with a mix of funny, colored characters and a less heavy handed screenplay than those of pixar. In some ways that should detract from the movie, but somehow it all works into great fun that takes a grown man back to the fun of childhood.\n\nSimple, beautiful and a lot of fun.\n\n8/10', u'0.833848', u'This was one of the moments, when you feel so overwhelmed by a movie, that you want to see it again immediately.And when i think of how the whole movie-going began-a theater, full of annoying, noisy kids, 3-th graders mostly.\n\nBut in the end, you realize you haven\'t spent any time listening to them, because you are so fascinated by the movie.You feel you are alone in the otherwise overcrowded theater.This feeling is very precious and when you realize it, you know you loved it.\n\nThe whole idea is very interesting-alternate Dragon-fighting times, an era of vikings and so many kinds of winged creatures.The main character, Hiccup, is the son of a mighty Dragon fighter-Stoick, who is the vikings chief as well.He wants to teach his son the Dragon fighting ways of the vikings, but the boy befriends one of the Dragons, a very rare kind, almost impossible to find.He names it Toothless and they are in for a lot of adventures.\n\nThe movie is very fresh, but solid and strong as well.And considering it is an animation, the voice performances are very good.That is also important.But the truly strongest sides of the movie are the heart of the movie-it is really a moving picture, but i think, that the level of maturity of the movie is higher, than DreamWorks\'s previous efforts like "Shrek".It is more meaningful, and although it is a Dragon-fighting story it is more real than most of the studio\'s previous tries in this genre and definitely a step up in animation.The feelings, the emotions, that were expressed throughout made this animation such a memorable experience, and i\'m sure, i won\'t be able to forget it, at least not soon.\n\n"How to Train Your Dragon" is a new, fresh, different start in the animation genre, with a lot of heart and emotions.I think, that\'s one of the best animations ever made.I recommend it to everyone-from parents with children to more experienced moviegoers and for the more mature audiences as well.\n\n"How to Train Your Dragon" is the best movie this year so far, and a honestly moving picture.An animation masterpiece!\n\n*****/*****', u'0.382996', u"There are a lot of excellent reviews out there, I will just discuss a single point. What got to me the most in this movie is the message I got out of it, I got it from a single line uttered by the hero and it just burned in my memory, it's about how when we look deep in the eyes of our enemies -the ones we fear the most- we will see that they are afraid of us just as we are afraid of them, we might realize their humanity and that they are not what we thought, monsters.\n\nThis is definitely one of the best 2 animation movies this year, with Toy Story 3 being the other one, tough job for the academy awards this year, and hope this is the case every year.\n\nIt's nice to see beautiful animation movies challenging Pixar's, it definitely benefits the viewer the most. How to train your dragon - Highly Recommended.", u'0.531085', u'It\'s far better then all those Shrecks, Toy stories, Ratatoulies, Puss in boots, Mega-minds and other "renewing" concepts. Why? It\'s simple and honest. This movie doesn\'t TRY to be funny, modern, super-wise, and "for all". It\'s not one of those "hey-let\'s-make-a-movie-about-cat-who-is-a-super-spy" concepts. This movie JUST tells the simple yet very good story in the most proper way.\n\nI have seen a lot of 3D animated movies - American, European, Asian. This one hits 10 in my opinion, because it\'s by far the most complete vision enclosed in a 3D animated form. But - in addition - it\'s a pure fairy tale in the core. And I mean PURE - from the cores of fairy-telling, which is the most polite, elegant way of TEACHING important stuff. I think that 3D movie is not only craftsmanship behind creating artificial environment, animating believably, lighting sets with care, etc., etc. Like any other movie - it should be a well told story, which will left you ...CHANGED a bit (that\'s what fairy tales do, right?) Only those kind of stories will matter in your life. Rest is just "fun".\n\n\'How to train your dragon\' is a modern fairy tale. It\'s modern because - like other mainstream 3D movies - it\'s excellently crafted. We have here great animation (Toothless, the dragon is "made of life", so to speak - you actually just want to HAVE one), lighting and cinematography (splendid flight scenes, which take your breath away, and make you climb your chair), effects, etc.... But it\'s a fairy tale because - above all that - we have here a master degree directing by Dean DeBlois and Chris Sanders too. All those decisions made by them - from very basic (like the look of Toothless and other characters, or editing), to more important (like balancing the amounts of fear, sadness, seriousness and fun tones in the story) are marks of wisdom. And those decisions made a difference between this movie and "the rest". Those decisions crafted a SOUL in it. And achieving this "soul level" should be a goal of every director.\n\nSumming up: great movie in at least two aspects. Technically (character design, animation, cinematography, editing) and emotionally (great simple story with surprisingly \'non-hollywoodish\' wise moral, fantastic heart-touching score by John Powell, and mature directing which guide you to be changed a bit after watching).\n\nBest achievement in 3D storytelling since Euclide :)', u'0.566376'], u'tt0074958': [u'This movie came out when I was nine years old, and I saw it on network TV the following year, lured by the brouhaha that surrounded the use of the "barnyard epithet" during prime time. I loved this movie before I understood it, and I worship it now. Like "Elmer Gantry" or "1984," it\'s a work of didactic art that only fails on an imaginative level -- Sinclair Lewis couldn\'t grasp how debased evangelism would become, Orwell couldn\'t foresee the excesses of Mao or Pol Pot, and Chayevsky couldn\'t envision the absolute decline of television from a vast wasteland to a malevolent sewer. Fox News, reality TV, even the OJ chase, "Network" anticipates every vile bit of it.\n\nNow, it\'s ridiculously overwritten -- NO ONE is as articulate as the characters in this film, and most certainly, no one who works in television is as literate as Diana Christensen (the Faye Dunaway character). I doubt that poet laureates or even Eminem could spew as witty an aside as "muttering mutilated Marxism." But damn if that isn\'t part of its charm. Plus, outside of Max Schumacher (William Holden), the characters are pretty much archetypes instead of real people (the Robert Duvall character might as well wear a black cape and top hat), but their two-dimensionality works as a good metaphor for Max\'s seduction into the "shrieking nothingness" or television. Plus the actors are so superb they make screeching caricatures into almost-sympathetic characters: Duvall is a credible and charismatic villain, Finch is a fine mad prophet and Faye Dunaway manages to make a shrill, manipulative, soulless neurotic so damn cute and sexy you\'ll want to leave your wife for her, too, just as long as she promises to keep sitting cross-legged on your desk and hitching up her skirt. (Therein lies the real eroticism, forget the intentionally mechanical, unerotic coupling later in the flick). Anyway, this is complex, high art masquerading as popular entertainment, go rent it now.', u'-0.323268', u'Groundbreaking is the term for this movie...It is considered one of the hundred best movies ever made and for very good reason...Director Sidney Lummet has a reputation for the director of the non-conventional!!...A cogency for making the absolute truth a guileless villain, a rude awakening for television viewers, and a stubborn scripture for facts is what purports a film like Network as a masterpiece for the prolific and intellectual!! You could not ask for better acting!! The acting in this movie is second to none!! Robert Duvall, William Holden, Faye Dunaway, Peter Finch, Ned Beatty and a whole list of others...Perhaps the best acting in any film made whatsoever!! It starts with Howard Beale (Peter Finch) a victim of his own human pitfalls...Ossified and dejected from his declining years going from bad to worse, he becomes isolated, desultory ,morbid and morose and feels his life has no meaning, he threatens suicide on live television and is discarded as being a wacko!!...At first!!..but guess what!! he\'s a hit!!...So the ratings crazed cutthroats make him an instant success by labeling him "The Angry Prophet Denouncing the Hypocracies of Our Time"...As long as we\'ve gone this far, let\'s break all of the rules...Bring on the terrorists, the soothsayers, the insurectionaries, the financial gurus, the faith healers, and the para military radicals, to reduce the severity of hard bitten news to a side show of carnival freaks!!! William Holden plays the old school business man with "primal doubts" about his life in general..."male menopause" with "defineable features" He is happily married yet after being bombarded from all sides in the autumn of his years, he is frightened that the new generation is impervious to basic tenets of human morality such as ethics and compassion...The woman with whom he gets involved, is callous not because she is vindictive, but because she is emotionless!! This woman (Faye Dunaway) is the "Television Incarnate" Ice Queen who reduces time and space to "split seconds and instant replays" the daily business of life is a "corrupt comedy" and the only redeeming quality to modern marvels and a "radiant eruption of Democracy" is that it gets a 32 share!!...This acting performance is perhaps the best acting performance I have ever seen...The type of person Dianna Christensen was supposed to be was played out perfectly...The delivery of the elaborated monologues and diatribes were absolutely remarkable....She was ideologically explosive yet person-ably obtuse. You knew why she wasn\'t the drinking type...she was too emotionally detached...In the thick of women\'s liberation, whereby a woman wanted to be just like a man, this movie portrayed how being just like a man had it\'s drawbacks!! "Arousing quickly, consummating prematurely" and suffering from the cumbersome fate of being crippled by ineptitude at everything else but your work, made Dianna Christensen perennially wistful of testosterone laden aggression!! Aggregately, she invoked societal demise through channels of deductive reasoning!! Director, Sidney Lummet, was insistent that Dianna Christensen be utterly devoid of vulnerability!! Mr Hackett (Robert Duvall) played the hatchet man for the CCA...A rough around the edges errand boy for Mr Jensen (Ned Beatty) who viewed this network as his big chance and that whatever worked worked ..Scruples were never an issue, and ratings were pending exchange!! Howard Beale (Peter Finch) the "Angry prophet denouncing the hypocrisies of our time" surprised even himself with his charismatic clout with the naive television audience!!! He was the UBS star-lighted "Mad Prophet of the airways"...He could arouse anger and counter-culture overzealousness just by appearing crazy!!! One speech Mr Jensen (Ned Beatty) was a bit role but incredibly powerful in his delivery of the basic concept that ideology is for sale and that television is the ultimate vehicle for manipulation!! Paddy Chayefsky is pioneer with this film as an acrimonious depiction for making world phenomena such as the fall of Communism and landing man on the moon to be minimized to a market share!!!..The terms entertainment and egalitarianism now became pejorative!!!! The movie audience is hit with the terrifying reality that a societal caprice will induce the avaricious to capitulate to human catastrophe...Give Paddy Chayefsky and Sidney Lummet credit for unveiling the revelation that ratings and the dollar take precedence over humanity!!! Howard Beale, the decrepit alcoholic, euphemistically transformed to the prescient paragon of intuitiveness, was alright so long as his innocuous chastisements did not disrupt worldwide pecuniary acquisitions!! Once they did, he was quelled, and thus deemed a total ratings chart disaster!! Ultimately, Howard Beale, the once disheveled dipsomania-cal curmudgeon, turned Messianic Savonarola, becomes the typification of the corporate guinea pig!!!!\n\nThis movie is avant-garde in it\'s ability to convey the message of greed first democracy second, or third, depending on the sponsors of the Howard Beale Show... An incident was determined traumatic or not traumatic by it\'s lucrative marketability potential!! Terrorism is not terrorism if it means ratings!!! The character assassination of all the people in this movie was at the grass roots level!! Their avoidable flaws were entrenched as irreconcilable!! Any people with any conscience whatsoever (William Holden & his wife) were decimated by reveille with selfishness, now it is imperative that they pick up the pieces!! How many imitations of this movie have there been...thousands!! Network however was the first movie of it\'s kind to effectively portray the concept of "dying Democracy and dehumanization" probably the best movie of it\'s kind as well... This is an illustration of how heinous tragedy has to be stomached by the television audience, their response to clinical trauma transcends the impact suffered by the actual victims involved!! It is a proverbial case of ratings eclipsing reality!! The film "Network" resonates itself to a point whereby the American people are reduced to meager by-products of the Fortune 500!! I wish there could be a movie of this caliber made again!! I am angry that there has not been a sensationalistic masterpiece to come around for some time, and I\'m as mad as hell and I\'m not going to take it anymore!!!', u'-0.0351442', u'\n"Network". If there was ever a film that foreshadowed to events of the future it would be "Network". Much like "Midnight Cowboy" seven years earlier, "Network" was hailed because it took risks and it was like nothing that the cinema had ever experienced before. Both films were great when they were initially released, but few great films become so much better with time like "Midnight Cowboy" and "Network". The fictional fourth network of 1976 is UBS. Ratings are bad and the network desperately needs some new show to give them a boost to challenge NBC, CBS, and ABC. Enter the network\'s national news anchorman (Peter Finch in his posthumous Oscar-winning role). He, like the network, is going through a crossroads. His wife has just passed away, he is about to be fired, and he is slowly losing his mind. The firing is imminent and he decides that he will announce to the world that he will commit suicide on his last evening news broadcast. Of course a national frenzy starts, but Finch surprises all by showing just how crazy he is. Instead of committing suicide, he goes on the air and becomes a modern-day Moses to some with crazed ravings and outlandish statements that really are just the ramblings of a man slowly spinning out-of-control. Faye Dunaway (Oscar-winning) and Robert Duvall are the key people at the network who find a way to market Finch and boost anemic ratings. Finch is given a variety show which could be best described as "The Tonight Show" gone stark-raving mad. He gets on stage and basically says whatever is on his mind and the crowds love it. Co-worker and close personal friend William Holden (Oscar-nominated) knows that Finch is out of control, but cannot do anything and eventually is let go due to his disapproval and interference. Holden though has fallen in love, or lust, with the unfeeling Dunaway. Wife Beatrice Straight (in an Oscar-winning performance in which she has less than 10 minutes of screen-time) learns of what is going on and more trouble ensues for Holden on the home-front. Finch meanwhile continues his ravings as he hears voices in his head telling him what he must do each time he is asked to perform. Soon his act grows stale as the public tires of his antics and the network must always defend speeches that they themselves do not really understand. Finch\'s "15 minutes" of fame eventually come to an end, but not in the conventional way that one may think. "Network" is a cinematic masterpiece because it is so strong in the major elements of the industry. The acting is exceptional. There were five performing nominations from this film (Ned Beatty was the fifth) and three wins. The only other film to accomplish that was "A Streetcar Named Desire" from 1951. Sidney Lumet was great before this film, but he became even greater afterwards. This is arguably his greatest directing job. The screenplay by Paddy Chayefsky is one of the smartest ever written. It is insightful and has a real depth to it. "Network" was looked upon as a sort of "far-fetched black comedy" in 1976. However, "Network" is a film that is all too realistic 25 years later. In many ways the fictional UBS station is much like the FOX station which came on the air in the late-1980s and stole audiences with wild shows that were quite different from the other three networks. Reality television, perverted talk shows, and other types of variety programming run wild today. "Network" did not have much to do with all this occurring, but it is like those who worked on the film had a crystal ball into the future. A great movie that becomes greater as time passes. 5 stars out of 5.   \n', u'0.0808055', u'Thirty years after its release to public praise and multiple Oscar wins, Network is one of those films that instead of dating badly or becoming a product of its time has actually grown and become even more relevant today, and if it were re-released in 2006 for its actual thirtieth anniversary not on film but on national television right at the beginning of the fall season (complete with the most lurid reality TV shows and inane TV pleasers), it would only become more justified in its story.\n\nThe story of the failing network that didn\'t have a show on the Nielsen Top 20 and resorted to extreme measures to ensure that this changed seems so today: we see how channels that once had failing ratings churned out shock television right smack in the daytime while still applying Standard and Practices to other "prime-time" shows that could be taken the "wrong" way. Jerry Springer, Maury Povich, Rikki Lake, Oprah, Mark Burnett, MTV -- they\'re all here under different guises, all competing to have their voices heard on television, all eventually becoming as ratings-hungry and establishment-friendly as the CEOs running the show.\n\nToday we don\'t quite have Howard Beales ranting and raving about the ills of society on national TV (although they do "tell" us how we should feel, when we should laugh if we\'re too stupid to get the joke, who to vote for, the "truth" about the tobacco industry). Today media is all the rage and televises even a fart if it deems it interesting and guarantees more viewers. Today shows like "20/20" or "60 Minutes" bring us \'exclusives\' even if it\'s at the cost of journalistic integrity. And now, with \'reality TV\' still the dominating novel trend even in little-seen cable channels, creating stereotypes in leaps and bounds while claiming authenticity of the events depicted, there hasn\'t yet been a need to create a lunatic who could sermonize everything and make us Mad as Hell. On this aspect alone NETWORK has dated: the 70s were all about counterculture, anti-establishment, revolution, leftists, Patty Hearsts, Lennon and Yoko, "Nova", the Mansons, the hippies, the Earth-lovers, the militants. Nowadays, buff bodies parade themselves in shows containing outlandish competitions where eating the most grotesque concoctions are the norm, or enduring a barrage of extreme insults has become entertainment (i. e. "American Idol") and the very concept of dignity flies out the window. Of course, after signing an extensive release form in which they free the network of all responsibilities if something goes wrong because we all know networks can\'t be held liable for any faux pas. In short, nowadays people from all over try to become the next It person and outlast their 15 minutes of fame. Nowadays, everyone has their own reality TV show depicting their 24 hour day activities. I wonder if Diana Christensen isn\'t alive and well and exerting absolute control over the networks in general, bringing anything and everything that can garner a little bit of shock value (Boy Meets Boy, or any reality TV self-made "villain/villainess") and eventual ratings, taking over actual scripted shows with real actors.\n\nNETWORK is a powerful movie of which I can\'t praise enough about even if its screenplay, by Paddy Chayefsky is a little too verbose. No one talks the way he makes his characters talk, using impassioned speeches with big, even archaic, words, and more than once the script makes the characters go completely over the top but even then it makes its point. Of the actors, William Holden\'s quiet portrayal of a former television exec, Max Schumacher, who has a conscience, but still feels some attraction to danger and risks his own family to experience is who is at the heart of this crazy story who was ahead of its time. Peter Finch\'s Howard Beale never comes through enough as a real human being: just someone who was pushed too hard and decided to shut down for the remainder of his life. But Holden holds the moral glue of the story, and interestingly enough, is wise to know that his affair, perfectly scripted as he even states, will end on a high note -- he\'ll return to his sanity and his wife, and Diana Christensen will bask in her own executive madness, since this is all she knows and holds dear. In her last words -- "Let\'s kill the son of a bitch." -- she informs us this is all she is about without so much as batting an eye. Who comes, who goes, is irrelevant to her, as long as the network can be number one. And that is the inhuman reality of television -- a media directed to entertain humans.', u'-0.335634', u'I can\'t put it more perfectly than Turner Classic Movies\' Robert Osborne who said "What was originally a satire is a stinging mirror of television news today." I strain to think of a film that is a more brilliant take on society, and all of the flaws it has. It\'s obedience and entertainment by those who rebel, no matter how insane they are. The exploitation of those in peril for any kind of economic profit. And the fact that everything Beale preaches is completely true and completely bashes the people who are producing him. I was amazed by how much he sells out while continuing to rant about how terrible the people he works for are, and the fact that they just keep him on the air because they want ratings.\n\nIt couldn\'t be more related to today. Turn on the news and you see videos of how horrific the war on terror is and how horrific American society has become, but it stays on the air because people don\'t want to see the good things in life. They care about the bad and the corrupt. People must have laughed it off back then, but it was such a foreshadow to the near future. The performances are just as brilliant as the social commentary. Each actor becomes so absorbed into their characters that you can\'t even tell they\'re acting. It feels like you\'re watching these people in their daily lives, interacting and becoming more and more corrupt. Finch and Dunaway easily give two of the greatest performances of all time. I could write 20 more pages about it\'s brilliance, but I\'ll stop now to keep me from rating. I just have to say that it\'s so rare to find a film as incredibly flawless as this.', u'-0.0539733', u'I just finished watching this movie and was blown away. Sidney Lumet\'s satire shows the hollowness of television and the mindless generation that is produced from an excess of it. This film is shocking and eye-opening also showing executives\' mad quest for ratings.\n\nThe acting in this film is superb. Peter finch stars as the TV anchor who becomes an "angry prophet who denounces the hypocrisies of our time." We gradually see how he first preaches to the common everyman, but is then exploited by the slick executives to achieve their one goal: Ratings. Faye Dunaway also shines as the Vice President in charge of programming who finds herself becoming less aware of the difference between television and reality. William Holden also lends fine support.\n\nAs the acting and directing in this film are exquisite, the message it portrays is a very strong one. This scathing indictment of TV is necessary for everyone to see.', u'0.349271', u'It is the only word I can come up with to describe this masterfully savage satire, and IMHO, it\'s the only word that need be used.\n\nOnce I had seen ALTERED STATES and read the novel, I was hungry to find out more about the late novelist/playwright/screenwriter Paddy Chayefsky, and sought out this movie. It blew me away years ago, but I find it even more stunning now. Not just because of the writing, Sidney Lumet\'s taut direction or the Oscar-caliber performances by everyone involved, all of which are almost beyond being lauded with superlatives.\n\nBut what knocks me out is how Chayefsky seemed less to be writing from the power of his imagination, than channeling Our Times Now. As if he was capable of some form of mental time travel; able to look into the Nineties and beyond to see the coming of SURVIVOR, or Maury Povich, Jerry Springer, Bill O\'Reilly and Paris Hilton. Even HE probably didn\'t know how he knew, but he sure as hell felt it and wrote it down for us to marvel over today.\n\nSure, there are political and cultural analogies throughout the picture that are dated. But the core of his vision remains startlingly clear and eerily prophetic. As for Howard Beale, there is not one single "celebrity" who mirrors that character today, but maybe he is a composite of several different personalities with whom we have become all too familiar in the world of "news-fo-tainment." Or maybe he simply hasn\'t materialized yet. Maybe that is just how far ahead of its time NETWORK really was.\n\nAfter all, being "mad as hell" nowadays has so many more layers of meaning than it did nearly thirty years ago...', u'-0.107693', u"To think that this blackest of black comedies was made in 1976 could only means two things: 1) Nothing has changed or 2) Paddy Chayefsky was seeing the future with the most disturbing clarity. I endorse the later of the two because I believe things have changed since 1974 - I wasn't born yet, but I know because of my parents, the movies, literature, etc, etc, etc. Peter Finch as the mad prophet of the airwaves gives Chayefsky a riveting and powerful voice. The scenes between old chums Finch and William Holden are some of the best written scenes in any American movie until the Coen brothers emerged. Finch is superb, superb! and Holden, at the end of a legendary career, gives a performance of such ferocious sincerity that I rediscovered the man, the actor and felt the need to revisit some of his opus. From Golden Boy to Sunset Boulevard, Holden was a man who carried his own discomfort as a weapon. Extraordinary! However, the most alarming character in the whole thing is Faye Dunaway's. She is magnificent in her thin, nervous, bra-less attitude. She is a monster of commercial amorality. Everything in this incredible movie moves with the precision of an inspired clairvoyant's vision. Duvall's executive, Beatrice Straight's betrayed wife and Ned Beatty's god like big shot makes this one of the most frightening, entertaining, funniest, remarkable film from the 70's. Sidney Lumet proves once more that he's as good as his material. Here he is at his zenith.", u'0.364967', u"#1 Best Film of 1976\n\n'Network' is Paddy Chafesky's riveting and grim tale of the sleaze surrounding the American television industry. Winner of the Academy Award for Best Original Screenplay, 'Network' is without a doubt one of the most powerful, influential and meaningful films ever made. One of the reasons 'Network' was so well received by both film critics and movie-going audiences was because it possessed a certain quality that most films unfortunately lack -- intricate and involving characters in realistic situations. 'Network' definitely makes my list of the top 10 films of the 70s, and it's an absolute shame it didn't pick up the well-deserved 'Best Picture' Oscar at the Academy Awards ceremony in 1976.\n\nThe film follows a low-rated television network trying to keep it's head above water. The network, UBS, has decided to fire an aging veteran news anchor, Howard Beale (Peter Finch), in an act of desperation to boost ratings. Beale is given a two-week notice, and instead of going out with his tale between his legs, Beale announces on live television he was fired and is going to kill himself. This raises panic and chaos at UBS, until they get the memo that Beale's crazed rant just bumped the ratings significantly. The UBS execs, Diana Christensen (Faye Dunaway) and Frank Hackett (Robert Duvall) decide to give Beale his own show where he complains and screams bout the problems with the world, while Beale's best friend (William Holden) feels it's inappropriate for the network to take advantage of a mentally-ill man. Besides exploiting a mentally unstable man, the company execs also work out a weekly program with a anti-establishment African-American communist, Laureen Hobbs (Marlene Warfield) following political terrorists and their violent outbursts.The film also stars Beatrice Straight as Schumacher's boring wife, Conchetta Ferrell was an assistant working for the network and Ned Beatty who plays the sinister boss of the UBS television network who always gets what he wants.\n\n'Network' boasts one of the finest and most intricate screenplays ever written that rightfully earned Paddy Chafesky the Oscar for Best Screenplay. Sidney Lumet's directing is absolutely incendiary and the movie has an incredibly strong cast. Faye Dunaway gives what is perhaps her very best screen performance as the cutthroat Network executive, while Robert Duvall is just as brilliant as the ruthless Frank Hackett (which should have earned him an Oscar nomination, period!) Beatrice Straight is solid in her role (not quite Oscar-worthy if you ask me, though) and Marlene Warfield is just as great as the sassy pinko sistah (excuse me for that phrasing). The two performers who really steal the show however are William Holden and Peter Finch. Both nominated for Best Actor in a Leading Role at the Academy Awards in 1977, Peter Finch gives a startling and powerful performance as the 'mad-as-hell' (not to mention crazy-as-hell) Howard Beale, while William Holden gives a subtle but none-the-less outstanding performance as the conflicted Max Schumacher. It's hard to say who was better, but if I absolutely had to decide I'd choose Holden's non-Oscar-winning performance slightly over Finch's sympathy Oscar-winning performance (he still was extraordinary,m though). I honestly believe if Finch hadn't died just after the film, Holden would have taken home the Oscar gold for Best Leading Actor, both were still magnificent though. The only player in the cast that I felt wasn't that great was Ned Beatty. In a role far-deserving from an Oscar nomination (which he for some odd reason received), Beatty plays the angry little man role he always does. Besides Beatty's performance and marginal pacing problems towards the middle (you are gonna get that in any 70s film that isn't a Kubrick film), the movie is utterly perfect.\n\nI can't recommend you seeing 'Network' highly enough. If you want a carefully made motion picture that makes you think and reflect on how cutthroat our society has become (especially TV broadcasting), 'Network' is a absolute must. What are you waiting for, go out and rent 'Network'! It might just alter your perspective on things. Grade: A-\n\nMADE MY TOP 300 LIST AT #46", u'0.324509', u"This is one of those wonderful films where everything comes together. The acting and the writing is by far the most impressive elements of this film. William Holden and Peter Finch should have both received Oscars for their performances, instead of just Peter Finch. Faye Dunaway pulls of the most dynamic and emotional characters she has ever played.\n\nThe true brilliance of this film is that all elements of it fade appropriately behind the actors and their messages. The film is completely a work of storytelling and, at least for the writer, stunning clarity of message and purpose. Political films come and go but few remain in the annals of film because of their effectiveness at their own message. \n\nThe cinematography, editing, sound, costume design, art direction and production design are all quite simplistic. In some scenes the film can be accused of being almost ugly. However this all lends to the back-washing of the film so as to allow the message to ring loudest. In my opinion, Sidney Lumet took this just a little too far and thus I give it a 9 instead of a 10.\n\nThis is certainly a film for the history books. Every connoisseur of film should be exposed to this movie at some point in their life. If you happen to be cynical, then you will love every minute of this movie as its stark view of life in the 1970's (and onward) touches the hard of even the hardest of cynics. For those educators out there, GREAT film for classes on Media and Politics.", u'0.164654', u"\nEngrossing satire from Paddy Chayefsky and Sidney Lumet about sensationalism and the almighty dollar in television. All the performances astound, especially Beatty as the tycoon who tells Peter Finch his ideal America and his ideal philosophy on where America is heading. The film is a\nfine mix of black comedy and drama, brought to life by Chayefsky's incredible script and Lumet's superb direction. Dunaway won a much deserved Oscar for her performance. It's a performance that makes your jaw drop to the floor from start to finish. She makes being a bitch look so darn good. ", u'0.194517', u'Now, here is a film that everyone needs to see, especially today.\n\nChildren should be raised on the truth instead of fiction.\n\nTelevision seduces, entertains, divides, desensitizes, and corrupts not just kids but adults as well. It\'s gotten so bad over the years it\'s like some kind of a disease now. Most people believe everything they see, read, and hear. Fortunately for me, I\'m not most people. There are things that I question and there are things that I know are very wrong. Lying to the American people in every possible way is very, very wrong.\n\nI\'ve never seen anyone open up their window and stick out their head and yell that they\'re as mad as hell and they\'re not gonna take this anymore. I\'ve never seen anyone say that they were a human being and that their life had value. We\'re so screwed up in the head we don\'t even deserve to be called human beings. We\'re like pre-programmed, numbered, clones enslaved from the cradle to the grave; clones that are programmed and structured to obey authority of all kinds.\n\n"Network" deserved the Best Picture Oscar for \'76, but it lost to "Rocky". How the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences allowed that to happen is beyond me.\n\nThat\'s all I have to say about that.', u'-0.360412', u'\nWhen this movie came out in \'76 I didn\'t bother seeing it because I rejected the premise as implausible; the very idea that a network anchor would go nuts on the air and become a hook for ratings seemed ridiculous on its face.\n\n\nWould that it were so.\n\nToday we have Jerry Springer, Maury Povich, Howard Stern, etc. etc. etc. At the beginning of the movie a drunken Max Schumacher (William Holden) fantasizes about a show called "the Death Hour" comprised of films of car crashes, suicides, train wrecks, and so forth, to be put on Sunday night in prime time. "It\'ll blow Disney outta the f------g water!" he laughs. A few years back some network put exactly such a show - "Eye Witness Videos" - on the air. On Sunday night. In prime time. In short, as most everyone here has commented, "Network"\'s horrifying vision - brilliantly written by the incredibly prescient Paddy Chayevsky -  has been truly and frighteningly prophetic, and rings absolutely true today.\n\nThe movie is a veritable feast of tour-de-force acting from all involved. In particular  William Holden\'s wrenching performance as the burned-out but still sensitive Max is drop-jaw stunning. I feel he, not Finch, should have gotten the Oscar, though Finch\'s work is not exactly chopped liver either. And what a brilliant device on Chayevsky\'s part to make the lunatic Howard Beale the only one of the bunch with clarity of vision.\n\n\nThat the film is intended to be a satire and a comedy is clear from the narration, especially the final comment about Beale becoming the first man to be killed because of lousy ratings. But it is without doubt the blackest black comedy ever filmed.\n\n A lasting legend of filmmaking art. ', u'0.0989389', u"Spoilers Ahead;\n\nYes, Beale is great the first half of the movie then he becomes a dreadful bore. Diana is a cartoon characterization that has utterly no resemblance to any real life woman. She keeps babbling about ratings during coitus? Please, this is one of the main flaws of the movie. It is too literary; the dialog is so esoteric with words only intellectuals use. Do you really believe television people speak this intellectually? It gives the film such a sense of unreality about it. Yes, Beale's great scenes at the beginning are why I gave it six stars. But please, after the first half when Jensen turns him into a corporate stooge it is solid boredom until he turns on the Network. By this point, we are all asleep. Duvall as Hackett is also a caricature that seems completely contrived and unrelentingly hostile to everybody. It really is two movies in one. The first half is a nine star movie though Holden grosses us out with that reprise of his later Breezy. Please, we do not want to see him having sex with the stunning Dunaway. Yes, I know, she is using him, it is symbiosis, but hey not on camera while I am eating. Gross Out. The film starts wandering after Jensen takes over Beale. It slows way, way, down; the part with the commies fighting over the royalties is strained and not funny.\n\nThe believability of Diana still lusting after Max after he has been thrown out and served his purpose is absurd. Paddy had him living with her in her apartment. Why? Does anyone believe such a mercenary, cruel manipulator like Diana would have given him a moment of her time? What, she covets the money from his memoirs? The fatal flaw of the movie is simply stated. The characters are contrived and unreal; the dialog sounds like we are reading a book. Who talks like this? You think practical people putting bread on the table speak in ten syllable words to each other, give me a break: how phony!! Satire is great, but the ending of the movie is beyond the realm of satire into insanity. Yes, let's hire the commies to gun Howard down. Yes, it is funny but it drains what little credibility the overrated behemoth had left in it. If I hear Max tell that crappy joke about the guy and the George Washington bridge, one more time: How many times did they think it would still be funny? \n\nWe have all kinds of confusion about what tone the film wants to strike. When Max is thrown out by his wife, it is deadly serious she almost has a breakdown. Later, when Max leaves Diana the scene is played for laughs. He mocks how their relationship could be a television program. Yet, and this is the irony, the scene plays exactly like the one he is mocking. Pick a tone! Satire all the way or serious all the way; the elements are so juxtaposed, and interpolated that you get a potato salad with serious and comic elements all blended incoherently together. Who doesn't hate television? If you are going to mock it, try not to become the image of your target. The movie is the very essence of what Carl Jung meant by we become what we hate. Do what I do, watch the film until Ned Beatty shows up about halfway through, then get up and turn it off. The first half was excellent; the second half stinks.", u'-0.491381', u'"Network" is the satirical movie written by Paddy Chayefsky, and directed by Sidney Lumet. The main character, Howard Beele, was a respected news anchor who hit a slump. When he\'s fired from his desk, he finally snaps. His ravings reveal the truth, and he is soon dubbed "The Mad Prophet of the Airwaves." Today, in the age of trash TV, "Network" still has significance. There are several aspects of the story that ring true today with TV news: the sacrifice of journalistic integrity in the scramble for ratings, and media bias fueled by sweetheart deals by rich special interests. Knowing that this exists in the world is enough to make anyone mad as hell.', u'-0.127706'], u'tt0266697': [u'A lot of people have come up to me and said "How can you love Quentin that much, he is just too extreme!" or "Oh come on, Kill Bill is just SO not realistic.." Yes. No.\n\nMr. Quentin Tarantino is rather extreme, yes, and it\'s lovely! And No. Kill Bill is not realistic, but it\'s not meant to be realistic! Just like... Lord of the Rings, that\'s not realistic either! But because it has clear unreal elements, like wizards, it\'s acceptable?\n\nYou don\'t go to see Kill Bill, or any other Q.T-film to see "Stepmom", in the same way you don\'t go to a Marilyn Manson concert hoping that they will play some Spice Girls..\n\nKill Bill, both volume 1 and 2, is absolutely gorgeous! The art direction is beautiful! The camera angles are perfect... just Gorgeous! The lighting, the sound, the dialogs... and of course, the details! No one works with small details the way Quentin does. I must also say that the soundtrack is brilliant and the whole film is just so well casted! Uma Thurman is perfect in the leading role, Darryl Hannah has never been this good before, ever! And Chiaki Kuriyama, even though she has a quite small role, is excellent, even better than she is in "Battle Royale". David Carradine is painfully perfect, Michael Madsen is ALWAYS excellent, but never as good as when he works with Tarantino. I must also say that Sonny Chiba was great. I\'ve never been a big fan of Vivica A Fox until now, and I used to think that Lucy Liu was just your average actor but she turned out to be fierce. Pretty much everyone who is in this film is ten times better than they\'ve ever been.\n\nBut above all things, Kill Bill is artistic, beautiful... Perfect colors, perfect everything... gotta love it.', u'0.277301', u"I know it's a couple years late, but I had to write a review for some of the few people that haven't seen one of my favorite and refreshing I've seen over the last few years. Kill Bill Vol. 1 is yet another quality film of Tarantino's short, but distinguished list.\n\nKill Bill involves a nameless woman (Uma Thurman) who is slowing seeking revenge on her former hit squad the Viper Squad and her boss Bill (David Caradine.) Her former hit squad wronged her by gunning down her closest friends and family during her wedding and putting her into a coma while being pregnant. A few years later she awakens in a hospital, without child, and tries to track down each member of the squad. As the story progresses (through this film and the sequel), you find out who she really, why Bill wanted her dead and the fate of her daughter.\n\nThe movie is really a combination of Tarantino's love for the 70's over-dramatized Kung-Fu movie era and story of revenge with rich dialog. Yes, this movie is violent, but in a cheesy way. This created some controversy and really had audiences stirred up, failing to realize it was supposed to be over the top without no sense of realism. Like I said, it was supposed to be a tribute more so than a gruesome action flick. With all cheesiness aside, I can understand how some people could feel a little woozy after seeing someone lose an arm and having 4 gallons of Kool-Aid red blood shoot out of the body like a whale's blow hole. What really makes this movie is Tarantino ability to make bad to mediocre actors seem like good ones, a smart and hilarious dialog and a good storyline. Of course, this is what he does in pretty much in all of his movies.\n\nThere are various plot holes in the story, but we are really meant to ignore them unlike most movies. Just like the gory scenes, come to grips to the fact that the most of the implausibilities are there just to fill in the gaps of the movie. The movie also features a couple of classic Tarantino showdowns, including an unforgettable one with the Japanese infamous crime lord, O-Ren Ishii (Lucy Lui.) Once again, Tarantino puts his imagination at work again in his story telling by using some of his old techniques like jumping timelines and some new ones like adding Japanese animation for character backgrounds.\n\nI wouldn't really recommend this film to someone who is really not from the Pulp Fiction era. This film is really just homage to flicks that frequently appear on Sunday Samurai Showcase, revenge and Tarantino's continuous fascination with Uma Thurman. This film contains extreme violence and sometimes strange dialog coupled with some pretty good acting and directing. If you're not a fan of Tarantino's films, you should pass on this one because it is doesn't stray to far from his other stuff. If you like his other works, this is a must see due to its originality and quality. And, if you just don't like Tarantino himself, and find him annoying like everybody else, I don't blame you but it's still worth your while seeing.", u'0.0449227', u"Having seen Tarantino's 3 previous films, going into the cinema, my expectations for 'Kill Bill' were already over the roof. However, regardless of my high hopes for quality entertainment, I was not prepared for this film. I was dumbfounded. I was blown away. I had quite simply never seen anything even remotely like it.\n\nIn 'Kill Bill', the revenge plot serves only as a larger story arc, thus allowing Tarantino to play with as many different genres as he likes, and boy - what a mix he dishes out! With complete disregard for the conventions of filmmaking, he paints an expressionistic masterpiece in his own unique style, the likes of which the world has never seen before. Cinema rarely gets this exciting. With 'Kill Bill', Tarantino proved once and for all that all the hype around his persona is justified: he IS the most daring, original - and entertaining! - filmmaker of his generation. Simply amazing: 10 stars out of 10.\n\nLesser-Known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget And B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nAll-Time Favorite Films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/", u'0.354453', u'Man, what a film. As a fan of 70\'s martial arts movies, it was great to see all of the references. I also thought the use of B&W throughout was extremely effective. The cartoon sequences seemed a bit much, but did fit in with the overall feel of the film. I have seen many people posting about the sheer amount of blood and guts, but you have to remember this was Tarantino\'s homage to Bruce Lee-era action pictures. In those movies, the stories were very similar epics of revenge, and they never had much of a budget for good "gore" effects. It was more or less "throw some fake blood on the guy who just got killed" type of effects, which were duplicated accurately by some of the deaths in this movie. The plot also followed closely the plot of most 70\'s Kung Fu movies; something despicable happens to the weak hero (whole village razed, family slaughtered, etc..) and the hero goes away for years to learn the secrets of a particular style of Kung Fu. All of these movies contained the "secret move" which the master normally does not teach, except of course, in this rare instance. That move, as depicted in Kill Bill Vol. 2, is always used on the evil leader of the clan whom had brought death and chaos to the hero.\n\nKill Bill was a terrific modern take on those movies which were always set in ancient China. I was very impressed with Uma Thurman\'s swordplay, at no point did I feel that it looked scripted or fake. Even when fighting against more than 50 Crazy 8\'s, it replicated admirably the incredibly one-sided fights from some of the best martial arts movies made 30 years ago.\n\nAll in all, a great and original film! R.', u'0.296147', u"\nI just finished watching this movie... and I don't have any sympathy for this movie what so ever. And for all the high ratings that people seem to have given it... it's the emperors new clothes. If this was Tarantino's first movie, it would have flopped and been forgotten. But somehow, since it's Tarantino, and since it's Uma Thurman, people are willing to rate it high.\n\nIn my eyes it's got nothing good in it at all. \n\nI'd rather see Bridges of Madison County 100 times than to see this movie one more time.", u'-0.193546', u"Do I think this movie is absolutely brilliant? Yes. Do I think this is the all time greatest movie ever, or even a top 50? Nope. I find the dichotomy between people who hate this movie and those that think it's the greatest film ever made is interesting. Even more interesting is the apparent split between fans of Volumes 1 and 2. Like the thread says, I think most of it's a matter of those who prefer style to substance. For my past, Volume 1 destroys Volume 2, but I concede that everyone has their own tastes and experiences and that no one pinion has any more weight than the other. Two scenes in particular really make this movie brilliant in my opinion, and both are fairly subtle in their portrayal but fascinating by their tone and the cinematic elements that come together to carry them off:\n\n1.) The scene where Oren and the Crazy 88 enter the House of the Blue Leaves. Absolutely magical. The score, the pacing, the atmosphere....simply magnificent. The slow motion pull away and the obvious hierarchy of characters, Lucy Liu was absolutely made for that part and that part was made for that scene. The beautiful and menacing Gogo Yubari and the goofy 88s trailing behind. You can also feel the tension the owners feel at having such esteemed guests but one's who admittedly exude as much fear as they do respect. Add to this the nameless, faceless people dancing who are oblivious to the regality (and lethality) of Oren's entourage. \n\n2.) Oren is called out by Kiddo who subsequently whacks off Sophie's arm in a highly symbolic gesture. Words can't describe how moving that scene is. The score is superb and the timing is nothing short of perfect. I especially love the way the crowd pauses after the arm slicing...like they're all stunned or still convincing themselves it rally happened...then all rush out screaming. Kiddo makes a slow, deliberate plod through the panicked crowd, a march to destiny filmed from several perspectives that combine holistically to give the segment a life of it's own.\n\nOne aspect of this movie that puzzles me is the emphasis it's critics make of the gore. For my part the gore was so outlandish it's hard for me to see how anyone could take it seriously, and that was part of the appeal. Buckets of blood spraying 15 feet in the air is so beyond the realm of reality how could you possibly take it seriously? For my part it was borderline comical and really brought out the flavor of the scenes, rather than being their focus. And regardless of what you think of Tarrentino as a director, the man is bar none the best at matching musical scores to a scene in the business. A few other noteworthy scenes...\n\n*The end-fight between Oren and Kiddo....marvelous stuff. The backdrop of the snow and the water, the smooth silence interrupted by the fountain, again, a great accompanying score. Fine piece of film craftsmanship.\n\n*Kiddo's overhead film shot while walking to the bathroom of the House of the Blue Leaves. Simply amazing. 5,6,7,8s performing live is just quirky yet proper enough to really add some depth and the unique filming make this a scene to behold.", u'0.164885', u"\n***MILD SPOILERS***\n\nWhat a dissappointment, especially after the awesome trailer.  I had several problems with this film:\n\n1)  I didn't care about any of the characters.  There was no introduction to any of them (apart from the super-violent anime section introducing Lucy Liu), so I did not understand or care about their  motivation.  Why was any of this happening?\n\n2)  It lacked the dark humour of Tarantino's earlier films, especially in terms of the sparkling character dialogue (e.g. Samuel L Jackson & John Travolta in Pulp Fiction), of which there was none.  The dark moments (e.g. the rapist hospital worker) were humour free and quite sickening.\n\n3)  Swapping the timelines around is an old Tarantino trick that worked brilliantly in Pulp Fiction, but added nothing to this movie except you knew the ending about 5 minutes into the film.\n\n4)  I got bored.  The final battle lasts forever and becomes dull after the first few people get their limbs removed.  The scenes where Uma Thurman convinces Sonny Chiba to make her a sword add nothing but minutes to the movie.\n\nWhy wasn't it edited down and made into a single, complete, BETTER movie?  So dissappointed.\n\n", u'-0.523153', u"\n`The fourth film by Quinton Tarantino', as the credits shamelessly explain, is yet another bankable classic from a director who's already changed the art with `Reservoir Dogs', `Pulp Fiction' and `Jackie Brown'.\n\nFrom `Kill Bill's first surprising gunshot to its monumental cliffhanger ending (right up there with `Luke, I am your father'),  the movie is relentlessly intense, tearing an audience between wanting more action and wanting a cigarette to calm frayed nerves. We follow the tale of `The Bride' (played to convincing, vengeful perfection by Uma Thurman) as she sets out to murder her former colleagues, members of the `Deadly Viper Assassination Squad', and their leader, the enigmatic, faceless Bill. After attempting to leave the group of assassins for a normal life, the Bride is tracked down on her wedding day and witnesses the murder of her wedding party, right before Bill puts her in a coma. Four years later, a very angry Bride wakes up.\n\nTarantino pulls no punches, creating, as one critic put it, `The most violent film ever released by an American film distributor'. Squirting blood and flying limbs abound, but the director does it all with a breathtaking sense of style. We witness one sword-dance in silhouette, one in black and white, one over a beautifully filmed snow-covered Japanese garden, and even a sequence in Anime. `KB's story is minimal, but Tarantino's aim is style: Sergio Leone, Cheh Chang and Bruce Lee are all paid homage, and then gracefully outdone.\n\nThe soundtrack, primarily Japanese artists performing American styles, is haunting: Tarantino breaks form by not using well-known American classic rock (who could forget being `Stuck in the Middle' of Mr. Blonde and a helpless cop?), but by doing so sets the perfect mood of the film. They're songs we've never heard before, but feel strangely connected to.\n\nYes, the movie is in two volumes. However, the end feels right, coming after an epic battle that puts `Reloaded's `Burly Brawl' to shame. `Kill Bill' is a testament to Tarantino's ability to take the craft of his idols and make it his own, mixing classic cult film style and mixing it with his own wicked sense of Cool. Not for the faint of heart or anyone looking for a\n`feel-good' film, but `Kill Bill' is at the very least an instant classic.\n", u'0.135612', u'\n  Do you have to be a film student to enjoy this movie?  I will be the first to admit that the movie shows exceptional directorial skills.  However, The film lacks one thing that I consider crucial for a great movie-plot.  Let me get this straight.  Uma Thurman\'s character was shot on her wedding day by "Bill" and presumed dead.  However, she survives and goes on a mission to kill those that were involved in her attempted assassination.  Now, to me-this sounds like the plot for a B-action flick.  I understand that he\'s paying homage or whatnot, but does that make it a great movie?  When I first walked out of the film, I thought it was a spoof.   Another element I found extremely lacking that was prevalent in Tarantino\'s previous films was dialogue.  Pulp Fiction is one of the most quotable movies I\'ve ever seen which makes it incredibly cool.  The dialogue in Kill Bill is cheesy and overdone (paying homage to old samurai movies again?).     There was very little done to make me identify with the main character, and there was absolutely no way I could contain my laughter when the volcano of blood shot out of the recently decapitated body.     I am not posting this to offend anyone that enjoyed this movie.  I seriously want to know what it was that I missed that makes this movie so awesome.  ', u'-0.165861', u"\nSPOILERS!! Kill Bill is the fourth film by Quentin Tarantino.  In case you were unaware of this vital fact, the opening credits include the legend, `The fourth film by Quentin Tarantino'.  This is a trend that needs to be nipped in the bud right now.  The heart sinks at the thought of reading, `The thirty-ninth film by Steven Spielberg' or `The twentieth film by Ron Howard' or (especially) `The second film by Stephen Fry'. Kill Bill (Quentin Tarantino's fourth full-length feature film) is only half a film. Its full title is Kill Bill vol. 1.  At least it's not Kill Bill: Episode One: Attack of the Kung Fu Fighting Babes: The Special Edition. Tarantino, after hectoring from his producers, `decided' to split his epic action movie into two parts, thus enabling his beloved fans to appreciate fully the fruits of his artistic genius without having to nip to the toilet halfway through.  They probably did us all a favour: One three-hour movie consisting of nothing but fighting and sassy dialogue?  Hard work.  Two ninety-minute movies consisting of nothing but fighting and sassy dialogue? A walk in the park.  Two walks in the park. Tarantino, after the `mature' (i.e. `dull') Jackie Brown (The third film by Quentin Tarantino) has decided to play to his strengths here.  So we get lots of violence and great music and wide-screen close-ups and brilliant action, but not so many celebrity cameos or people sitting around talking and smoking dope.  Despite all the critical praise that was heaped on him for Jackie Brown, it's clear that that film saw him working on auto-pilot, cruising along happily enough with all his showbiz chums.  It's not a film that anyone needs to see more than once.  Unlike Reservoir Dogs (The first film by Quentin Tarantino) which demands repeat viewings, and works its magic on you like a drug.  That film remains his finest moment, no matter what the Academy or anyone else said about Pulp Fiction (The second film by Quentin Tarantino).   True, it was Pulp Fiction that cemented the man's reputation as a purveyor of brilliantly-made, hysterical B-movies, but Reservoir Dogs is more than just a lurid heist thriller. It would have been interesting to see Tarantino develop in the noir directions it hinted at rather than giving in to his basic instincts, stepping on the gas, shaking the ketchup bottle, and piling up the pop-culture references until we're all blue in the face.  And, while Jackie Brown was praised for its `maturity', at least one viewer found it interminably and unforgivably lacklustre.\n\nSo we can be forgiven for approaching Kill Bill vol. 1 with some trepidation. Early signs are not good: in-joke references to old movies (`Our feature presentation', `Shaw Scope') fail to raise a smile.  As the man himself might say, `har-di-f**kin-har'. And then. Uma Thurman draws a square in the air with her finger and the square doesn't appear on screen, thus immediately banishing all memories of that hideous moment in Pulp Fiction, when it does. Indeed, for all its wild and crazy action this is a surprisingly traditional and old-fashioned film.  There are no computer-generated effects.  There are none of the ludicrous and clich\xe9d fights that we have become so used to over recent years.  What we get instead is blood, sweat and tears.  People fight and get injured and exhausted and some of them (quite a lot of them, actually) even die.  Blood spurts all over the place.  But there also startlingly beautiful moments of silence amid the carnage, such as the snow-bound night-time shot of Uma and Lucy facing off in the garden, as a water clock tips over and clicks back into place.  Like a peasant in a Bruegel painting, it takes centre stage while momentous events happen in the background. But never mind all that - what about the plot?  What actually happens in this movie? Well.Uma has been treated badly (beaten up, shot in the head, that sort of thing) but somehow is still alive.  Waking from her coma she swears revenge. She gets a guy to make her a sword, and then she goes to kill people. Not necessarily in that order.  Along the way there are: a truly great cartoon flashback, colour-coded subtitles (why don't more films do this?), Daryl Hannah whistling and wearing an eye-patch, and Lucy Liu getting scalped. Again, not necessarily in that order. And that's about it.  Yes, I think we can honestly say that Quentin has made going to the cinema fun again.  It's just a shame he had to split his film into two, thus turning it into a `saga', and thus grouping it with all those other horrible, portentous, humourless, endless sagas currently polluting the culture.  Let the geeks have their Rings and Potter and Matrix Retarded. The rest of us can wallow in the guilty pleasure of a wide-screen extravaganza that shows Mr. Tarantino at the very top of his game.  Of course only a lunatic would want all movies to be like this one; a bit of depth and subtlety is always welcome now and then.  But, in a time when so much Hollywood mainstream product is artistically and imaginatively redundant, it comes as a very pleasant surprise to find we need Quentin Tarantino more than ever.\n", u'-0.145531', u'\nTarantino\'s latest movie is pure crap. Should we blame the relentless Americanization of culture or simply Tarantino\'s burn-out? Martial arts are neither martial nor arts anymore. Just a big, boring, and sickening Rambo-like Grand Guignol. Ironically, when American directors realised that bullets killed too fast they resorted to ju-jitsu, karate, and Japanese swords and strung out the killing thing. The sheer silliness of yakuza hitmen using a katana instead of guns or of a\nChinese-American woman as their "godfather" do not seem to bother Tarantino. What really matters is chopping off as many heads and limbs as possible and disembowel a fair amount of people. The underlying philosophy of martial arts is completely lost but the Schwarzeneggerian nature of modern politics is finely exposed: shameless, gratuitous violence and blood-shed. I am ashamed of those 20 people or so who applauded while I am glad nobody else in the theatre followed their example. Outrageous is that Tarantino claimed he took inspiration from Sergio Leone, a remarkable Italian director who by now must be spinning in his grave with shame and embarrassment. But after all, you know, it was ironic! I\'m actually still laughing.\n\nahahahahahahahahahahahahah\n\nStrawberries in the Supermarket by Emir Kusturica, that\'s irony.\n', u'-0.582316', u'There is no doubt that Quentin Tarrantino is an extremely talented director in terms of editing, cinematography and the overall look of a film. Just take the extraordinary scene in Kill Bill, amazingly choreographed, where Uma Thurman dispatches over a hundred swordsman in a matter of minutes. It\'s simply incredible! What\'s more Tarrantino as one of the masters of film history, takes his knowledge of film genres and improves on each one of them. He mixes all kinds of styles including Kung Fu, Japanese Samurai and Anime, Italian Spaghetti Westerns and the Black Exploitation films of the 70s and comes up with his own inventive hybrid.\n\nDespite the sheer inventiveness of Kill Bill, Vol. 1, it\'s really an exercise in style over substance. Tarrantino is more interested in creating an homage to these various genres as opposed to a parody. And I think that\'s the problem. Notice there are virtually no laughs in Kill Bill (unless you consider all the exaggerated decapitations and limbs being chopped off to be funny). Tarrantino actually takes delight in these Grade C gorefests of yesteryear and attempts to elevate these pictures to high art. Instead of trying to emulate a great master like Ingmar Bergman, Tarrantino chooses to revel in the mindless violence of Samurai swordsman and Kung Fu fighters. Most of it is harmless stuff, the kind of mindless action scenes that most adolescents will take delight in. But occasionally Tarrantino crosses the line into the netherworld of bad taste. I\'m thinking of that wholly inappropriate scene toward the beginning of the picture when Uma Thurman kills one of her rivals with a young child watching.\n\nIt\'s quite clear from the outset that character motivation is virtually ignored in Kill Bill, Vol. 1. As Uma Thurman\'s \'Bride\' dispatches members and underlings of the \'Deadly Viper Assassination Squad\', we come to learn that she has taken revenge on the associates of "Bill" after he betrays her at her own wedding. We never learn the circumstances as to why the Bride is betrayed. Occasionally Tarrantino serves up a few surprises such as when the orderly allows \'customers\' to rape the comatose Uma or Matsumoto\'s pedophilia (the crime lord who Lucy Liu does in). But overall there are few surprises in \'Volume 1\'; we move from one revenge killing to another--all the frenzied killing scenes tend to bleed (no pun intended) into one another.\n\nVol. 2 supposedly provides the back story but what we\'re left with in Volume 1 are comic book characters who we simply cannot care about. Everyone is fearless as they try to do one another in. In Tarrantino\'s comic book world, the guardians of morality are powerless\x97that\'s why law enforcement only makes the briefest of appearances at the beginning of the film.\n\nWhen The Bride travels to Okinawa and meets her mentor, Hattori Hanzo, I found that all the pious pronouncements about the spirituality of the Samurai to be pretentious and out of place in a film that places the highest value on dismemberment for its own sake. What\'s more, all the serious pseudo-spirituality slows the pacing of the film down considerably.\n\nTarrantino represents the embodiment of the American cinema today. He\'s exciting, technically savvy with a healthy respect for the history of film. But at the same time, his films only offer up a superficial and seductive examination of evil in the world today. If Tarrantino was a comedian, he best could be likened to the Three Stooges\x97his adroitly choreographed gorefests are akin to the Stooges\' pie-in-the-face slapstick routines. Tarrantino is the perennial adolescent continually caught with his hand in the cookie jar. Kill Bill, Vol. 1 is nice to look at but is much easier on the eyes than on the mind.', u'-0.163749', u"Erm, this is pretty bad actually. I like R Dogs, P Fiction and J Brown but this and its sequel have none of the imagination or style of those other films. Uma is good as usual and there are a couple of good shots but the plot is awful, no characterisation, the fight scenes (they aison d'etre of the film surely) are feeble compared to Crouching Tiger (the actors just aren't up to the physicality of it all - even the Matrix had better fights) and the dialogue is dull as well. Basically QT thinks he's such a genius he can do anything and no one around him will dare to tell him otherwise. A pretty pointless way to spend a couple of hours in all.", u'-0.663969', u"All this because a woman wanted to start a new life with a guy who owned a record store? So she wanted to have his baby, is that so bad? Why the endless praise, I will never understand.\n\nThis is merely Tarantinos' constant glorification of killing.\n\nHatchets flying through the air, hands, heads, arms being removed. No one with a gun? She kills a hundred people and no one ever thought to just shoot her? This movie is complete bunk. No better example of why there soon will be no real film industry.\n\nCatch the top job performance by old trooper Michael Parks. Then he may have a different part in volume 2?\n\nHey, this is a decent movie to just watch, but no Hollywood 'masterpiece.' \n\nThe single best part of this movie is listening to those great old songs. They were made to fit in perfectly with the killing.", u'-0.282178', u'I am surprised with the glowing reviews that this film is getting.It definitely is a highly overrated movie.I must say i was disappointed with the movie.I had anticipated to see some outstanding action scenes and martial art fights in this movie,but it was a big let down.The action sequences were mediocre at best.There is lot of bloodshed in this movie which largely looks fake and artificial.The acting is also not overly remarkable.There is no deeper meaning in this movie.It also lacks emotional appeal.Also there is too much brutal violence just for the sake of it.This movie is different than usual Hollywood action movies but that does not make it a better movie.', u'-0.82773'], u'tt0032976': [u'Alfred Hitchcock was and is still the undisputed Master of Suspense, and there is a lot of that here in his foray into Gothic horror, as the mystery surrounding the unseen yet omnipresent Rebecca will engage the viewer from its dreamy start to its bleak conclusion. This is exactly what atmospheric is supposed to be about, and in black and white, it shines. This is also what Gothic horror is in essence, and many have imitated yet come up short, most notably M. Night Shyamalan who, in trying to go for a shock twist and purported "atmosphere" only creates a bad aftertaste and a hangover the size of Mount Everest. This is, essentially, Hitchcock\'s first true masterpiece.\n\nNot one performance rings false, not to the novel or to their respective interpretations. Lawrence Olivier, quite possibly one of the greatest actors that ever lived, portrays a broken man who still lives haunted by the past as he himself were still living in that unending hell. Judith Anderson embodies one of the most coldly sadistic figures in cinema history, her smooth and elegant truculence only exceeded by Anthony Hopkins\' rendition of Dr. Hannibal Lecter. One can\'t seem to understand the way she wallows in her dead mistresses\' clearly perverse nature, but that exactly she does, right down to her own end. George Sanders does what he does best: sneer, smirk, and spit line after line of practiced venom, and would be honored 10 years later in ALL ABOUT EVE. Gladys Cooper, still striking in her 50s, plays into her casual cattiness which means no harm, although her rendition of Beatrice Lacy is a little subdued from the novel\'s version.\n\nAnd then there is Joan Fontaine. Not one of the best actresses on film, yet here, playing a role that evolves beautifully from a frightened, weak girl who is put into a situation she does not understand and who turns right at the point of losing it into a much more mature, strong woman capable of holding her own, she carries the weight of the entire drama and comes forth with flying colors. While I would have preferred Anne Baxter who would have been the exact right age for this role, Fontaine exudes so much restraint and nervousness about her character (partially to blame Olivier\'s treatment of her and Hitchcock\'s telling her the entire cast hated her), it\'s almost a relief when she finally decides to confront Olivier about what it the secret of Manderley. Not many roles require such a change and not many actresses would sink her teeth into a part that requires being put-upon until she can\'t stand no more, and this is one beautiful performance.\n\nA movie that should have won more Oscars that year, REBECCA has since grown in stature and proved that a film need not trophies to be Timeless and Great.', u'0.139455', u'\nHitchcock felt \'Rebecca\', his first Hollywood film, was a compromise, but as a viewer I just can\'t fault it. It\'s a masterpiece in my opinion, full of suspense, mystery and brooding atmosphere. It\'s also one of the most romantic movies I\'ve ever seen. I\'ve watched it several times over the years, and even now that I know all the plot twists and turns (quite shocking on your first viewing), it never fails to hook me in. One of the reasons it really works is the flawless casting. I\'m not much of an Olivier fan but he\'s superb as de Winter, with just the right mixture of charm and coldness. And Joan Fontaine is just perfect as de Winter\'s new bride. I can\'t spot an unconvincing moment in her performance and can\'t imagine any other actress in the role. Hitchcock subsequently used her in \'Suspicion\' with Cary Grant. She was also excellent in that but \'Rebecca\' is a much stronger movie. The supporting cast also includes some brilliant performances, especially Judith Anderson (\'Laura\') as the extremely creepy Mrs. Danvers, George Sanders who plays Rebecca\'s slimy cousin, and Nigel Bruce in a typical role as de Winter\'s bumbling brother-in-law Major Lacy. Sanders subsequently worked again with Hitchcock in \'Foreign Correspondent\', and Bruce played Cary Grant\'s lovable pal "Beaky" in \'Suspicion\'. I sometimes think that Hitchcock\'s 1940s movies are overlooked by many because they are regarded as being too "old fashioned", but for me movies like \'Suspicion\', \'Saboteur\', \'Lifeboat\' and \'Spellbound\' are some of the most entertaining movies Hitchcock ever made, and \'Rebecca\' is the best of the lot. If you want to be totally enthralled for two hours just watch \'Rebecca\'!', u'0.384435', u"I spent the majority of this film thinking about how lucky M. Olivier really was. To be able to wrap his arms around Joan Fontaine and kiss her. Oh my. She's one of the most beautiful women I've ever seen (almost, but not quite as beautiful as Veronica Lake). She's also absolutely perfect in the role of the second Mrs. DeWinter, taking a character that could have become a cloying bore in less capable hands and transforming her into a sympathetic and interesting figure.\n\nThe movie, on the whole, is similarly amazing, capturing the spirit and the tone of those great Gothic romances. Watching Rebecca, I was reminded (pleasantly) of Wuthering Heights; I do not mean to suggest that in some way this film re-tells the tale of Cathy and Heathcliff, but rather that Rebecca has the feel of Bronte's novel (I am most certainly not talking about the William Wyler adaptation a few years before the release of Rebecca. That's a terrible film that somehow manages to mis-interpret the novel).\n\nI must assume that the guiding hand of Hitchcock played no small role in recreating the feel of a Gothic romance. There are very few that would be able to take a love story, infuse it with such gloom, with such a sense of foreboding, and still manage to create something that ends happily without it feeling like a cop-out. I'd also like to draw everyone's attention to the incredibly moving section of the film that occurs between the arrival of the second Mrs. DeWinter at Mandalay and the masqued ball. The emotional strain on the Joan Fontaine character is so palpable, so absolutely taxing, that it actually pains me to watch. I hurt along with her. Few other movies affect me so emotionally - one of them is Vertigo.\n\nAll in all, this is a fantastic piece of film-making from Hollywood's golden age. Laurence Olivier is in top-form, as he plays the quiet, sad Maxim and George Sanders is positively hateful.\n\n10/10 - a visceral masterpiece", u'0.190029', u"\nThis is one of my favorite movies of all time. Definitely my favorite classic. There are some that come close, such as Citizen Kane, Spellbound, and Psycho, but none quite compare to this amazing movie.\n\nThe first thing that you notice is the outstanding cinematography. You have to remember that this movie was made in 1940, when they didn't have the technology we have now. But that first shot of the water beating up against the rocks grabs you and for one split second you wonder if maybe this isn't part of the movie but rather something filmed just recently. But then you see the familiar face of Laurence Olivier, reminding you that this was made 60 years ago, a fact that forever amazes me. The only oscar it won besides Best Picture was well deserved.\n\nAnother thing that makes it such a wonderful film is the acting. I have debated on whether Laurence Olivier's character, the tortured Maxim de Winter, is the pitiable character or if his second wife played by Joan Fontaine is really the one to feel sorry for. Every time I watch it I see it from a different point of view. Joan Fontaine is excellent. Laurence Olivier is wonderful, but that's no surprise. The only thing that bugs me is that it seems in every movie he's in (well, at least, everything I've seen him in), he always plays the same type of character.  But he's extremely good at it, so I suppose it doesn't matter.\n\nBut although Joan Fontaine and Laurence Olivier are wonderful, Judith Anderson steals the show! The first time I watched the movie, I was immediately grabbed by her stunning performance as the sinister Mrs. Danvers. You hardly notice the other characters when she's in the scene. She acted the part so well that it's strange to imagine that she was any different in real life.\n\nWith a wonderful storyline, and a very surprising ending, Rebecca well deserves the title as the only of Hitchcock's films to win the oscar for Best Picture. Although it may not be the most famous of all his films, it is without a doubt the greatest", u'0.295029', u'\n"Rebecca" was the first Hitchcock film I ever saw, and I was mesmerized by it from the start, convinced that I had to see more of the director\'s work.  It richly deserved the Oscar it received, but it\'s a real puzzle that the Academy saw fit to withhold a best director award for Hitch.  Would one possibly give an award to a work by Picasso and not to Picasso himself?\n\n"Rebecca" was the first of the director\'s American-made films, and it shows.  It\'s quite different from his earlier British-made films, such as "Young and Innocent" and even "The Lady Vanishes," which somehow seem more amateurish by comparison.  (I know little of the British cinema of that era, but it\'s difficult not to conclude that Hollywood was better at producing more sophisticated efforts.)  I would even judge "Rebecca" the best of his films of the early 1940s, with the possible exception of "Shadow of a Doubt."  It is true, of course, that much of this film has become clich\xe9 (remember the spoofs on the old "Carol Burnette Show"!), but it still weathers the decades very well.  The acting is uniformly excellent.  Olivier is the hardened Maxim de Winter, untitled lord of Manderly, trying to forget the past and given to unexpected bouts of anger and coldheartedness.  Fontaine is perfect as the unnamed mousy heroine, innocent yet deeply in love, still carrying with her the aura of an awkward schoolgirl.  Even character actor Nigel Bruce, best known for his role in the Sherlock Holmes films, makes an appearance and plays, in effect, Nigel Bruce!\n\nBut it is Judith Anderson\'s role as Mrs. Danvers that viewers are likely to remember best.  Her presence is as dark and foreboding as that of the deceased Rebecca herself, and Fontaine is evidently cowed by her icy stare and unnervingly formal manner.  The dynamics between the two actresses are wonderful.  Who could fail to empathize with Fontaine\'s unenviable position as, in effect, the new employer of such an intimidating personage?  On the other hand, Olivier seems quite unfearful of Anderson, despite her representing so much of the past he is trying to block out.  This part of the plot (even in the book) never made much sense to me and is unconvincing.\n\nAs far as I know, this film marked Hitch\'s first collaboration with composer Franz Waxman, whose haunting score makes it all the more memorable.  Waxman\'s scores are perhaps less obviously cinematic than those of the incomparable Bernard Herrmann, who would score Hitch\'s films from 1955 to 1966.  Contrast the score for "Rebecca" to Herrmann\'s music for "Citizen Kane" the following year, and you\'ll immediately hear the difference.  Waxman\'s is more symphonic in the central European style reflective of his own birth and upbringing.  Yet it is worth recalling that scoring films was still a new art at this time, and both Waxman and Herrmann were pioneers.\n\nFinally, one has to mention the cinematography, which is magnificent. Technically "Rebecca" might have been filmed in colour, which was newly available in 1940.  ("Gone with the Wind" was filmed entirely in colour the previous year, while "The Wizzard of Oz" and "The Women" had colour scenes.)  But colour would have diminished its impact.  The suspense and the ominous sense of impending doom could only have been communicated through the medium of black-and-white and the deft use of light and shade which it affords.\n\nIn one respect, of course, "Rebecca" is not a typical Hitchcock film.  There is no fleeing innocent trying to clear his name of a crime he did not commit.  Surprisingly, there isn\'t even a murder, although its absence was apparently imposed by the Hayes Code and is certainly foreign to Daphne du Maurier\'s original novel.  Some have said that there is more Selznick than Hitchcock in this film, and perhaps there\'s something to that.  Still, if the collaborative effort between the two was not exactly amiable, it was nevertheless successful.\n\nIn short, this is the first in a string of Hitchcock masterpieces.', u'0.272318', u'\nIn a line-up of great motion pictures, "Rebecca" stands as one of the giants. It is arguably Hitchcock\'s greatest film effort, replete with jolting, slap-in-the-face plot twists and gothic sets. Dark and moody, the film boasts Sir Laurence Olivier and Joan Fontaine in slam-dunk, dead on performances, George Sanders as the deliciously despicable Jack Favell, and Judith Anderson nearly stealing the show as the eerie, obsessed housekeeper, Mrs. Danvers. A perfect "10".', u'0.794741', u'his movie is a 10 from the very beginning. The casting is brilliant, the story is hauntingly beautiful, the performances are the best of what Hollywood once was, and the sets are of quality design and architecture. The direction is awesome, but it\'s Hitchcock, and I expect nothing less from his productions.\n\nRebecca is a glamorous, beautiful socialite who has won the hearts of all who knew her. Well, almost all. But a year after her untimely death, her grieving husband near his wit\'s end, has grown seemingly suicidal and aloof.\n\nHe engages his grief while on a trip to Monte Carlo, and meets the beautiful personal secretary and maid of a long-time friend, Mrs. Edythe Van Hopper. She is young, naive, and completely unprepared for the life which is awaiting her; all qualities which George Fortescu Maximillian \'Maxim\' de Winter finds endearing.\n\nI won\'t detail the events in this movie, as the story itself is quite haunting, with surprises around every turn.\n\nThis is a definite "must have" in any suspense / horror / Hitchcock / classics movie collection, and a mandatory must see for all fans of all movies.\n\nIt rates a 10/10 for its absolute perfection, from...\n\nthe Fiend :.', u'0.597873', u"\nIt seems almost superfluous to add to the many laudatory comments this movie has received on this site, but I feel a need to lay some tribute at the altar of this wonderful piece of classic cinema.\n\nIf you haven't seen the movie, there may be a couple of SPOILERS in this review, but hopefully also some new insights in compensation.\n\nAs many have noted, the cast is uniformly excellent: the annoying social snob Edith Van Hopper(Florence Bates), Gladys Cooper's kind, sisterly Beatrice, the eerie Mrs. Danvers of Judith Anderson, Olivier's distracted yet explosive Maxim, George Sanders' snide, oily Favell and especially the oft-times underrated second (but unnamed) Mrs. DeWinter of Joan Fontaine.\n\nAlthough not entirely faithful to the Daphne Du Maurier novel, the screen adaptation preserves the haunting ambiance of Du Maurier's work. Rebecca, though never seen, is clearly the central character, but we learn about her all through indirection in the dialogue of the other characters. We are allowed to create her piece by piece in our own minds, which just adds to the engrossing, I-can't-stop-watching, thrust of the movie.\n\nThe character who actually tells us the most about the real Rebecca is Mrs. Danvers. The erotic attachment of this character to Rebecca is subtle, yet unmistakable. The wonderful scene in which Judith Anderson shows Rebecca's bedroom to Joan Fontaine is breathtaking in its suggestiveness. The West Wing, 'the only room that looks down across the lawn to the sea' has become Mrs. Danvers' private temple to Rebecca. Her loving preservation of Rebecca's possessions, her sensual handling of Rebecca's underclothes, of her diaphanous negligee, of her glamorous furs and then Anderson's almost hypnotic miming of brushing Rebecca's hair as Fontaine sits at Rebecca's dressing table all make this scene an unforgettable sequence. Anderson's acting is absolutely miraculous. She achieves her character with hardly ever a change in her affect, except where a very slight contrasting up tick in energy transforms her in the West Wing scene and in the scene where she coolly suggests that Fontaine leave-by means of a precipitous drop out of the window onto the rocks. It is a performance which I doubt could ever be duplicated.\n\nAs we later learn of Rebecca's moral character, it also seems that Mrs. Danvers was as much in love with Rebecca's corruption as she was with the woman herself. 'Danny' in a way becomes the embodiment of Rebecca's cold malevolence which still lingers in the mansion.\n\nJoan Fontaine could hardly have been better. She, of all the characters, evolves through the movie. She moves in a seamless line from the pitiful, beleaguered companion of Mrs. Van Hopper to her drowned rat arrival at Manderley to the self-assured and supportive wife Maxim wanted and needed. What I found fascinating about this transformation is the imaginative skill of the costume designer. At the beginning, Fontaine's shy little character is dressed like she made terrible selections at a Macy's basement sale. Later as she tries to fill the role of the 'great lady' she believed Rebecca to have been, her clothes always appear too big and totally out of character. Note the black evening dress with the absurdly large flowers across the front and especially the overwhelmingly outsized Garden Party gown she tries to wear to the costume ball. After she learns the truth about Rebecca from Maxim, discovering that he actually loves her as much as he hated Rebecca, Fontaine's costumes become trim, conservative and tasteful, befitting the genuine, grown-up woman she has become.\n\nFittingly, the final scene belongs to Anderson-the frustrated woman robbed of her goddess--who brings the movie to a thundering operatic finish. \n\nAlthough Selznick and Hitchcock repeatedly clashed over this move, it remains a deathless tribute to both men. This movie never loses its fascination and bears repeated watching, each time weaving its wonderful spell anew. It is a must-see, again and again, classic.\n", u'0.399816', u'\nThe only Alfred Hitchcock (Oscar-nominated for directing) film to win the Best Picture Oscar, "Rebecca" is one of those typical films from the amazing director that chills, entertains and puts you on the edge of your seat each time you watch it. Joan Fontaine (Oscar-nominated) has just married the very wealthy Laurence Olivier (also Oscar-nominated), but she is haunted by his mysterious housekeeper (a show-stopping Oscar-nominated performance by Judith Anderson) and the memory of the film\'s titled character (Olivier\'s late wife). Hitchcock, noted for his subtle sexual under-tones in films spares none of that here as Anderson\'s character and the late titled character\'s relationship seemed to go much further than employee-employer. Anderson slowly tries to drive Fontaine to insanity and the end she may accomplish her devious goal. Hitchcock\'s first real major U.S. debut stunned the Academy and audiences alike and would lead to the coveted Best Picture Oscar. It is not the best film the legendary director ever worked on, but it is still an amazingly good production that works on many cinematic levels. 4.5 out of 5 stars. ', u'0.686762', u'A stylishly directed and photographed film that examines a number of themes, such a deception, death and depression, and explores well the emotions of its characters. It is rare to find a film like this, as it tackles various genres, ranging from being a romance to a mystery to a drama to even a comedy at times, and all without seeming pretentious. The cast is truly magnificent. Judith Anderson is a stunner is a quiet but sinister role, and George Sanders is even more impressive in lively but also sinister performance. Laurence Olivier and Joan Fontaine are perfect for their roles too. The film won Academy Awards for Best Picture and Best Cinematography quite deservingly \x96 this is one of the best films Hollywood has ever produced.', u'0.883554', u'\nIn his long career, Alfred Hitchcock directed many great films. Rebecca ranks as one of the greatest. It was the only Hitchcock movie to win a Best Picture Oscar and it was his first Hollywood film after leaving England. This was also the first film in which he adapted someone else\'s work, the famous novel by de Maurier.\n\nThis film features all the twists and strange characters you would expect from Hitchcock along with the trademark unexpected ending. Sir Laurence Olivier is great, as usual, as Maximillian de Winter. The stunning Joan Fontaine is wonderful as "the Second Mrs. de Winter". Rebecca is an entertaining thriller by one of the masters of film.\n\n', u'0.748946', u'\nThis fine classic combines a great director, a great story, and a great cast.  Any one of those would have made for a good movie, but all three make it an excellent one.  Hitchcock\'s style and eye for detail combine very well with a story (from a novel that is extremely good in its own right) filled with psychological fear and settings that are interesting and suggestive.\n\nMost of the time the story itself moves fairly slowly, allowing the focus to be on the characters, but there are also a couple of very good plot twists, which can be very surprising if you\'ve not seen the movie or read the novel.  So if you happen not to know the story, it\'s a good idea to see the film before reading a lot of comments about it.  Laurence Olivier, Joan Fontaine, Judith Anderson, and George Sanders are all perfectly cast and do a wonderful job bringing their characters to life, and making you feel a part of the story.\n\n"Rebecca" should be satisfying not only to any Hitchcock fan, but to anyone who likes classic movies.  Whether you like romance, suspense, or drama, they\'re all here, and put together by a director and cast that are masters of their art.\n', u'0.813331', u"This movie is very close to the actual book, written by Daphne du Maurier. I read the book after I first saw the movie. The similarities are amazing. When I first saw this movie I fell in love with it. I never really liked black and white movies but this one caught my attention right off the bat. The love story is amazing. Alfred Hitchcock is an amazing man. I don't want to spoil the movie. It is a must see!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Laurence Olivier, Joan Fontaine and Judith Anderson are well paired. The ending of the movie is definitely a surprise! It was a pleasure to visually experience the early way movies where put together and the difference between the 1930 to the present.", u'0.527824', u'Rebecca is directed by Alfred Hitchcock and adapted to screen play from the Daphne du Maurier novel of the same name. It stars Laurence Olvier, Joan Fontaine and Judith Anderson. Cinematography is by George Barnes and music scored by Franz Waxman.\n\nAfter meeting and marrying \'Maxim\' de Winter (Olivier), the Second Mrs. de Winter (Fontaine), finds life at his English estate, Manderley, far from comfortable because the servants and the house serve to remind her of the first Mrs. de Winter, whose death remains a source of mystery. What did happen to the first lady of the house? Can this newly married couple survive the oppressive cloud that looms large over the mansion?\n\nA Gothic emotional near masterpiece, Alfred Hitchcock\'s first American film may seem a bit too serviceable at times, something he was also aware of himself, but the production values are high and the story is played out supremely well. Within the story we can find Hitchcock\'s now famous trait of mistrusting Women, but in the main it stays the tragic tale of one young woman living in the ominous shadow of the previous Mrs. De Winter. Mood is often set as foreboding, with the director understanding the psychological pangs of the source material once the action switches to the de Winter home of Manderley. It arguably is a touch too long, and the restraint of Hitchcock, down to producer David O. Selznick overseeing things, stops it being a bit more unnerving than it should be.\n\nFor Manderley the mansion here is one of the finest put on the screen, this is because Hitchcock and brilliant cinematographer George Barnes manage to make it bold & beautiful one minute, and then the next scene it comes off as a monolithic nightmare. It\'s wonderful case of the surroundings playing the extra character for maximum effect. Laurence Olivier is impressive, even if we would learn later on that this is the sort of performance he could do in his sleep. The supporting cast do great work as well, especially as regards the cold and terrifying turn from Judith Anderson as Mrs. Danvers. However, to me this will always be Joan Fontaine\'s show, she nails it perfectly, the new Mrs. De Winter wants to do right but can\'t seem to so for doing wrong, she infuriates at times, yet the next minute you just want to hold her, for she\'s so vulnerable, but beautifully so, it\'s a brilliant performance in a brilliant film. \n\nThe ending is a switheroo from the novel, and it almost derails the success the film has achieved up to that point. And looking at it now it\'s hard not to curse the Production Code for enforcing a big change to what was revealed in du Maurier\'s wonderful novel. But the film has survived the "appeasing" ending to stand the test of time for all the ages. It won the Academy Award for Best Picture, and Barnes also won for Best Black & White Cinematography, it was nominated for a further nine awards, including Best Director, Best Actor, Best Actress and Best Supporting Actress. No nomination for Waxman, sadly, but his score is worthy of a mention for the evocative strains that sit nicely with the tone of the story. Rebecca, a hauntingly beautiful picture that\'s acted and produced with consummate skill. 9.5/10', u'0.679112', u"This is a Daphne Du Maurier's story (from a best-seller novel) concerning a prominent widower (Laurence Olivier) called Maxim De Winter who finds a gorgeous and timid young girl (Joan Fontaine) who is serving to an old Mistress (Florence Bates) . They are married and head to Manderley , the familiar mansion (in the exterior actually is a scale model). But Maxim is haunted by the ghost first wife , an enigmatic Rebecca , who died in mysterious circumstances . There works as a servant the creepy and obsessive housekeeper , Mrs Danvers (Judith Anderson,a famous stage actress in her most important role) and sh meets a cynic gentleman (George Sanders).\n\nThis film has suspense , romance , unlimited tension , full of lingering images and with the typical touches Hitchcock . Besides , a literately and thoughtful dialog signed by Joan Harrison (Hitchcock's usual screenwriter) though lacking humor . After \xa839 steps\xa8and \xa8Jamaica Inn\xa8 , Hitch was encouraged to go to America and promptly shot his first work in Hollywood hired by the great producer David O'Selznick . Fine performance by Laurence Olivier , he married Vivien Leigh and he wished to her as protagonist but Hitch hired Joan Fontaine who took seven rehearsal sessions until the engaging . Joan Fontaine as a shy bride young is superb and enjoyable . Judith Anderson as a spooky and cold house keeper is top-notch, her role as obsessed person by the glamorous Rebecca is unforgotten and immortal . Atmospheric and perceptible music by Franz Waxman and sensational visual style by the cameraman George Barnes . The picture won Academy Awards for Best film and cinematography . The movie was brilliantly directed by the Master of Suspense . It's remade in inferior versions for Television, the 1980 adaptation with Jeremy Brett as Maxim and 1996 rendition with Charles Dance and Emilie Fox . The motion picture is indispensable watching for Hithcock lovers achieving the maximum impact on his audience.", u'0.672726'], u'tt3011894': [u'Watched last night at the theater with my girlfriend.\n\nIt\'s a compilations of 6 tales, but they don\'t have the same type of lenght, humor or darkness. Each one is unique.\n\n1) Airplane tale: fantastic, hilarating and surrealistic story to open the series.\n\n2) Coffee shop tale: shorter, but dark and makes you wonder what\'s "freedom" for some people.\n\n3) Road tale: excellent. A really LOT of violence and a little bit of humor makes this one of the best tales in the movie.\n\n4) Human limit tale: a man that\'s having a couple of really bad days explode when he runs out of patiente. Great acting.\n\n5) Accident tale: 90% darkness. And the fact that could be a very possible story makes it even darker. Shocking finale.\n\n6) Wedding tale: almost impossible to qualify. Hilarious for the most part, but at the end, it will make you wonder to whom you are spending your whole life with.\n\nSeeing this compilation in a theater for the price of one, its a damn good deal if you ask me.\n\nGo watch it.', u'0.203522', u"The movie is actually 6 short films, all related by brutal violence motivated by different situations. Family. Society. Government. It works very well like that, lasting over 120 minutes that go by quickly. It feels very fluid. Szifr\xf3n's eye is very precise. You can tell everything was very well thought. I wouldn't say this is a philosophical film, but it is clever entertainment, that makes you think if this wild tales are actually that wild... Even though this stories are taken to the extreme, everything feels somehow possible when you look back. \n\nDarkly humorous. Watch it.", u'0.234231', u'6 Stories - 6 masterpieces! They perfectly combine thriller, drama, humor and the common topic is the violence.\n\nEach tale is independent from the other, but all of them have something special that makes you really enjoy.\n\nThe situations introduced in each story are actually based on real life, of course the are intentionally exaggerated with a sense of satire and irony that really makes you laugh.\n\nThe picture is the best I have seen in an Argentina movie and the music "made \u200b\u200bin" Santaolalla is sublime.\n\nThe actors/actresses are amazing (specially the bride - Erica Rivas) In my opinion it is one of the best non-English Language movies ever.', u'0.52617', u"Revenge is a dish best served cold indeed! Wild Tales has one of the most electrifying openings I've seen and is a very funny, clever, brutal and thrilling film. Director/Writer Dami\xe1n Szifr\xf3n puts together six different stories that all have revenge as their common theme. While some might be more engaging then others, they all have a lot of dark humor and take unpredictable turns. Wild Tales would certainly make Quentin Tarantino proud with its excellent blend of stylized violence and sharp comedy. This is undoubtedly the most fun I had watching a movie this year and I cannot recommend it highly enough!\n\n8.7/10", u'0.49227', u'I went to see this movie hoping to get a brake from Hollywood production. And I did. It was amazing, one of the best movies I\'ve seen on big screen in 2 or 3 years.\n\nPlot consists of different stories which all have one thing in common: they are about revenge. Every single story starts rather boring. At the very beginning I was thinking "What\'s so wild about it? It is just lame" and by the end of the intro I was like "Holy God! No, they did not just twist it like that! OMG!"\n\nAnd it gets better. A true masterpiece. I am from Russia so for me it was rather interesting and surprising that Latin America is so similar to Russia. The views, the behaviour of the people, the insanity - all like at home.\n\nYou won\'t regret seeing this movie. Don\'t take your kid or your grandmother though.', u'-0.00325151', u"This Argentinian movie was released in my country (Chile) on last Thursday, and since i heard very good comments about the movie i decided to go to a Cinema at Parque Arauco in Chile and this is what i wrote about it:\n\nThe film is split into six unconnected stories, watching each story is around 20-30 minutes long and you feel like you're watching a live action short film. What do they have in common? All of them are a mix between drama and comedy. The script is hilarious, even if the lines are sad, it's so full of black comedy, that there were people rolling on the floor laughing at the Cinema. \n\nI'd write much more about this film, but i think i might be spoiling it, so i prefer to tell you that i can't wait to watch it again. So please do NOT miss it.", u'0.101402', u"Wild Tales (Relatos Salvajes) is perhaps the darkest and funniest movie I saw in years; but is it really a comedy ?. No it is not. Six tales about human that are obviously related to the Argentinian reality (abusive government, corruption, people indifference) but certainly can be applied to many other countries in the world; USA included.\n\nTelling about each tale will cut the impact and somewhat surprise of each one. Let's just say that the outcome of each tale is sometimes predictable; but driven by logic not clich\xe9s.\n\nAs always happens; some histories are better than others; but even that will be different for different viewers.\n\nIn brief; an excellent movie that deserves to be seen by people with a brain and a will to think.", u'0.314487', u'Time does not heal all wounds. One thing leads to another in six outrageous, hilarious and extreme stories of revenge. A jilted and emotionally volatile bride wreaks havoc at her wedding with an equally unstable new husband, a towing company hauls away one too many times the vehicle belonging an explosive expert, and two macho drivers \x96 one in an Audi and the other in a pile of junk \x96 go head to head with explosive road rage, among other delicious and fiery adventures. The utmost fantasies fulfilled, the extremes of emotions, and the riot of laughter that engulfed me from all sides, I cannot remember having such a good time watching a film. The director, who answered questions at the 2014 Toronto International Film Festival, said the film is about the pleasure of losing control and giving in to unrestrained passions. Is it ever!', u'0.227137', u'It\'s hard to review an unconventional movie, because this one is sort of six movies all in one. Relatos Salvajes (Wild Tales) is about six different and independent stories with one thing in common: the limit of our patience, or like it\'s tagline says..."All may lose control". Ordinary people that find themselves in awkward situations they didn\'t look for, and that\'s the beauty of this movie. It\'s almost impossible not to feel identified with one of the characters, with one of their situations, despite the awkward moments they struggle that in some passages make us feel uncomfortable. And the merit of director Dami\xe1n Szifr\xf3n is to tell those stories with an exquisite combination of intrigue, suspense and a remarkable and effective dark humor. The acting, editing, photography and the music of Gustavo Santaolalla are all ingredients that give extra points. You\'ll get out of the cinema talking to each other which tale you enjoyed the most and reviewing some of their hilarious scenes.', u'0.297524', u'Mixing modern rage with black comedy this collection of shorts rises above expectations to become one of the best and funniest movies from Argentina along with The Secret In Their Eyes and El Aura, and probably the most accessible for international audiences\n\nSix unrelated stories that share a common theme of revenge are shown back to back, and not edited back and forward like it\'s usual with these kind of movie, some of them are better than others: the opener, the road rage incident, the hit and run, and the wedding stand out, while the more conventional and predictable "Bombita" and "The Rats" still entertain thanks to superb writing and directing\n\nThere\'s a few annoying problems with logical plot holes like why would the rich yuppie go out of his way to put the damaged spare tired in his trunk (and thus leaving it open) when running for his life and factual errors like on the wedding episode the bride\'s threats about this husband\'s companies are meaningless because in Argentina possessions are considered marriage goods ("bienes gananciales") only if the are acquire during the marriage and not before like the screen husband\'s companies, and like these are others but among such high quality stuff glaring mistakes like these are more evident\n\nhighly recommended', u'-0.61384', u'The Spanish title is more apt: Savage Tales. Six short stories show various ways in which savagery persists in the highest levels of civilization. The titles appear against a montage of wild animals. The twist is that here the savagery is celebrated not rued. Where civilization was supposed to free us from savagery, as in the American Western, here the savagery liberates the characters from their civilization. As director Damian Szifron told the Palm Springs festival audience, "The theme is the pleasure of losing control. Releasing the beast."\n\nIn each story a modern frustration wells up until the character erupts. All the stories involve a furious revenge, with a broadening range of characters. To convey the tensions in modern life, ordinary sounds are amplified, like the luggage wheels in the opening shot. \n\nIn the pre-credit tale, the pilot turns out to be a lifelong failure who has collected the various teachers, friends, psychiatrist, who have thwarted him, on a flight he will crash into his parents. \n\nIn a diner the waitress recognizes a customer as the smalltown gangster who drove her father into bankruptcy and suicide. Now running for mayor, he is rude and abusive. As her anger and conscience struggle the cook takes over and kills him. She\'s content to return to the security and comfort of jail.\n\nAn Audi driver rages at a redneck who blocks his way. When the rich guy stops to fix a flat tire his nemesis stops and assaults him. The road rage turns into class warfare. Ironically, when they\'re found burned alive their clutch suggests it was a crime passionel.\n\nWhen an explosives expert gets his car towed for an unjustified parking ticket his angry campaign for justice blows up his marriage, job, career and even shared custody of his daughter. When he blows up the tower\'s yard he becomes a local hero, Mr Dynamite. In jail his wife and daughter bring him a birthday cake and all the inmates and guards celebrate his day. His last act is blowing out the candles. Terrorism works.\n\nA spoiled teenager\'s fatal hit and run accident leads to a steadily expanding chain of corruption as his wealthy father tries to get the family groundskeeper to take the rap for him. As the bribery balloons no-one is innocent. Even the humble groundskeeper raises his demands. When the father decides not to pay to save his spoiled son, his lawyer says it would be dishonourable for him to renege on his bribery of the the public prosecutor. When the boy decides to confess the greedy renegotiate their scheme. As the fall guy is led away an angry citizen kills him. Amid all the bribes and false honour the poor worker pays the price.\n\nIn the climax, a rich Jewish family\'s wedding, the bride explodes after the groom admits he had sex with a colleague who\'s a guest. The demure bride turns into a vengeful virago wreaking massive destruction, reducing the groom to tears, the ceremony to chaos, and her rival to a bloodied mess. When the newlyweds reconnect \x97 making passionate love amid the ruins of the cake \x97 their union feels more honest than the initial smiles and formality. Now their union expresses more passion than manners. The chaotic wedding is more honest than the ceremonial ritual was. \n\nThe anthology structure hearkens back to Italian neorealism, where separate short stories provided a wide-ranging survey of social issues. Apt for a celebration of the unruly, the film is exuberantly comic but with a black undercurrent. As its initial frustrations are so common, the film provides its audience with a greater catharsis than most comedies or tragedies. We\'re left calm of mind, frustrations spent.', u'-0.241134', u"I had an idea from the opening credits that Damian Szifron's WILD TALES, was going to be fun. Images of animals with the actors' names as counterpart, preparing the audience for the animalistic behavior about to come.\n\nThe film is comprised of six separate vignettes, short stories, if you will. These vignettes all begin innocently enough, passengers boarding a plane, a man driving through the desert, a restaurant on a stormy night, a wedding, everyday slices of modern day life. Something occurs to break the routine, the main character responds, then the scene escalates, and escalates, and when you think you've reached the peak, it escalates even more, and finally in the end reaches a perfect balance of comedy and tragedy. The tales are all perfectly relatable and escalate logically and realistically, nothing comes out from left field. All the characters, each flawed in so many ways, remind us so much of ourselves, both at our best and at our worst... and make us laugh and feel in recognition.\n\nGreat Movie.", u'0.380673', u'Greetings again from the darkness. Do you often get accused of having a slightly demented sense of humor? Do you have secret crazy thoughts of seeking revenge on those who have wronged you? If so, writer/director Damian Szifron has a collection of short stories just for you!\n\nNominated for Best Foreign Language Oscar, Argentina\'s entry is just now opening in the Dallas market where I live. To say Wild Tales is a wild ride would be quite an understatement. There are six short stories blended together, and while you may not recognize the theme immediately, it doesn\'t take long before rage and retribution jump to the forefront in these seemingly typical slices of everyday life.\n\nThe best short stories make a quick grab for attention, and manage to convey character and setting from the beginning. The writing is crucial and can easily collapse in the hands of a less-proficient short story writer. But when it works, it\'s fascinating to watch, and Mr. Szifron has a real talent for making us laugh in the midst of truly awful situations.\n\nNot to give away any details, but the six stories involve: a remarkable "coincidence" on a flight, an unwelcome customer at a local diner, a close-quarters brawl at a bridge, the frustration of dealing with "the system", misguided parental instincts in protecting their kid, and the most wheels-off wedding reception ever filmed.\n\nIf you are ever searching for an example of a dark comedy, this one will provide clarity. The seemingly unrelated stories are woven together through payback, though the price is often pretty high. Mr. Szifron\'s stories remind us that life is not fair, but when it\'s happening to someone else, we can still laugh about it.', u'0.124365', u"Hopefully Dami\xe1n Szifron is on his way to Hollywood. Simply the most refreshing and entertaining film that I've been lucky enough to watch since Nightcrawler...really it's that good. The darkest comedy you'll have the pleasure to experience. Ticks all the boxes, cinematic, a superb ensemble cast deliver in every short story, dead pan humour, intelligent, thought provoking, terrifyingly realistic, wonderful camera-work especially in the final story, with a couple of explosions and some (thankfully) subtle CGI thrown in to complete this masterpiece. Lovely to once again sit amid an audience all happily laughing out loud, without the need to lower itself to racist, sexist, ageist, homophobic humour, though the scatological humour is surprisingly perfectly appropriate and carefully framed to make the point without unnecessary vulgarity. Ten out of Ten. A new name to watch. Kudos to Dami\xe1n Szifron.", u'0.717318', u"If ordinary films are like novels, this one is like an exquisite collection of short stories. The film is divided into six segments, each with its own plot and character development. Director Damian Szifron is like a modern-day Guy de Maupassant, telling each story with meticulous accuracy, carefully measuring out each twist, detail and conversation. \n\nThe segments are hilarious and over the top, but at the same time satirical and somehow realistic - the extreme events could happen to any of us. That's why this is such a great film: its shows the darkest side of human nature and of Argentinian society, but in such a way that it makes you smile. \n\nThe director claims the theme connecting the stories is 'the joy of losing control'. It's also the tag-line of the movie: 'We can all lose control'. Indeed, most of the segments are about losing control, although one is about keeping everything under control in a situation that can easily spin out of control. In any case, all segments are about individuals solving a conflict in an extreme way. In most segments, the solution is extremely violent or deadly. \n\nAlthough the trailer splashes out the name 'Almodovar' because Pedro and his brother produced the film, the style is by no means Almodovar-like. Szafron uses a sophisticated style, very different from the extreme cinematography we know from Almodovar. 'Relatos Salvajes' also surprises with original cinematographic gimmicks. In one scene, the camera is positioned in an overhead bin of an airplane. In another, in the interior of an ATM, with the image filmed through the touch screen. The film is carefully constructed, with lots of little details. In one segment, about a man fighting the parking ticket bureaucracy in his city, we see the conspicuous towing trucks constantly moving through the image, as a sort of evil force. \n\nOnce again, an Argentinian film maker pleasantly surprises moviegoers around the world. Maybe such wonderful, sharp-edged movies can only flourish in a country like Argentina, where life is a bit of a struggle and not everything is taken for granted", u'0.0442009'], u'tt1663202': [u"A lot has been said and written about this film, mostly about its troubled production - forget all that: it has no meaning whatsoever for the experience this film provides. A word of advice though: if you go in expecting a testosterone-fueled revenge thriller in the vein of 'Apocalypto', you'll likely end up disappointed. It's simply not that kind of film - but that doesn't mean you won't enjoy it if you watch it with the right expectations.\n\n'The Revenant' opens with images from a dream; we see snippets of memories showing a peaceful life - and soon the loss of that peace, and the loss of life. The images change and we hear the soothing sound of gurgling water as we follow the camera via a long tracking shot over a flooded forest; it's an image that seems to imply peace, evoking nature's beauty with an almost meditative quality - before the barrel of a rifle appears in the frame.\n\nThose first three minutes I just described (which are the only spoilers you will get in this review) set the tone for the film perfectly. It's a film that tells a story of harrowing circumstances through images that are breathtakingly beautiful; a film about survival and death and shocking acts of sudden violence - and yet a film that, despite all its visceral intensity, also has a quiet, immersive quality to it that feels almost hypnotic.\n\nMany critics and reviewers have pointed out the stark contrast between the film's poetic beauty and the ugliness of its violence - implying the director wanted to use this contrast to make a certain point regarding mankind's interference with nature. While that would seem pretty obvious (and it probably is at least partly true), I left the film feeling I\xf1arritu had shown a vaster, far too complete image of the clash between man and nature to justify such a simplistic interpretation of the events portrayed on screen. Whether intentionally or not, I\xf1arritu shows the star of his film with a complexity and honesty that we normally don't get to see in these kinds of stories. And I'm not talking about Leonardo DiCaprio here (who gives a no-holds-barred, crazy good performance and I'd love to see him win an Oscar for this film) - the star of this film is not a person: it IS nature, plain and simple.\n\nThe revenge plot - which felt almost like an afterthought or a ploy to give the film a certain structure and a proper ending - is not really the film's main theme or strongest aspect, and it certainly isn't the reason that made this film so compelling to watch for me. Such stories have been told often enough - and often better - than in 'The Revenant'. No, what really made this film stand out for me is that I have NEVER seen a Hollywood film (any film, really - apart from documentaries) that showed nature in such an unflinchingly honest and mesmerizing way as was the case here. And the way I perceive it, I\xf1arritu sees his human protagonists as being very much a part of nature as a whole - regardless of their destructive behaviour. \n\nIt's that refreshingly wholistic approach (which some viewers might perceive as nihilism on the director's part) that I found to be the film's biggest accomplishment: it depicts the people in this story as just another species trying to survive in that perilous frontier-world. The emphasis is not really on the moral aspects of the brutal injustice that the main character suffers or how the Native Americans are cruelly exploited; we witness all that - but I\xf1arritu keeps a certain emotional distance, as if he were shooting a documentary about predatory wildlife. And just like the bear's attack, most of the violence in this film comes as a reaction of defense. Be it self-defense, defending one's offspring or defending territory and valuable resources. Even the character that comes closest to an actual villain is driven by fear - not hate, and his most obvious character defects were caused by a very traumatizing experience. As in nature, there is a simple (if often brutal) logic to why most characters, men or beasts, act the way they do in 'The Revenant' (OK, maybe not the French - but I didn't say the film was perfect, did I). And the bear attack was the most realistic depiction of an animal attack I have ever seen on film.\n\nAll in all, this film felt less like a story of revenge and more like an ode to the visceral beauty of nature and the relentless, savage force that is life; it provides an immensely absorbing - and touching - experience to those who have an affinity for the wilderness, but it's also a visual masterpiece and a great piece of old-school filmmaking for lovers of Cinema. It's not perfect (especially during the last third of the film where I felt the pacing was a bit off), but it's a film the likes of which we will only rarely get to see - if at all - in the future. 'The Revenant' is visual poetry of the most primal kind, and it should be seen on the biggest screen possible. 9 stars out of 10 from me.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-Known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/", u'0.396189', u"You are almost immediately plunged into the action, in a similar way to the opening of 'Saving Private Ryan', with a Native American attack on a group of fur trappers. DiCaprio even does that momentarily deaf thing that Tom Hanks does. Lots of bows and arrows and gore and excellent photography that is really immersive. Great opening scene.\n\nThere there's the scene where DiCaprio is mauled by a grizzly bear. Again, really believable, exciting and up front and personal - you can almost smell the bear's stinking breath. Brilliant. \n\nAnd then there's ... well ... not much really. Photography and scenery are by and large excellent but you do get the feeling that better use could have been made of them. I\xf1\xe1rritu often seems to chop scenes around for no particular reason, although you do get the occasional sense of the vast wilderness that comes over well on the big screen.\n\nDialogue is scarce. Most of it goes to Tom Hardy who tries to put on a Texan accent but succeeds in sounding as if he has a sock in his mouth (does he specialise in being inaudible? remember him as the mumbling Bane in 'The Dark Knight Rises'?). \n\nThen there's the storyline. You know the ending, right? (Just look up the definition of 'revenant'.) Leo is up against it and he suffers a great deal. But you know he is going to survive. So when, to top everything, he falls off a cliff on his horse you realise he's actually become Mr Indestructible. And two and a half hours of crawling, grimacing and wincing does not a very entertaining film make.\n\nThere are also several non-credible plot twists. Like when Tom Hardy (a.k.a. The Mumbler) somehow cracks an impressive-looking safe and makes off with the garrison money and just two guys go after him, including the garrison commander. This nicely sets up the final confrontation between Mr Indestructible and The Mumbler .... but really? \n\nWe also develop little or no emotional connection with the main character. The silent dream scenes are a clich\xe9d way of trying to do this and they don't work in my opinion - they're just puzzling and boring. Nor do we see much of the relationship between Leo and his son to set up the emotional links between them - just Leo being harsh and dishing out tough love a couple of times. \n\nThe pacing is also poor. Once you've passed the opening scene and the grizzly scene, feel free to go and refresh your popcorn - you won't miss much. \n\nOverall, the film is self-consciously bleak and overdetermined and is unevenly paced. A better director might possibly have made this a good film but I\xf1\xe1rritu is clearly not David Lean.\n\nIf DiCaprio gets an Oscar for this it will be because the Academy think they owe him one and possibly because of the hype. This is a film that will be forgotten. If you want to see a good silent movie with snow, ice, struggle for survival and even the odd grizzly bear thrown in, watch Chaplin's 'The Gold Rush' - it's far more entertaining.", u'-0.0806608', u"Take the direction of Alejandro Gonz\xe1lez I\xf1\xe1rritu, combine it with the stunning cinematography of Emmanuel Lubezki and toss in Leonardo DiCaprio and Tom Hardy for their acting charms and what do you get? An extraordinary and masterful film.\n\nFresh off of 'Birdman,' I\xf1\xe1rritu moved straight on to 'The Revenant,' a western-epic inspired by the true-life experiences of frontiersman Hugh Glass in the winter-struck landscape of 1820s America. The film gained some notoriety in mid-2015 for its production problems and has thus been regarded one of the most challenging film shoots in the history of cinema. Rightfully so. The film opens with the soothing sound of running water, thrusting the audience into an almost meditative state, and then it strikes, an action-packed sequence ensues with a near single sweeping take. Now this is a spoiler-free review, so I'll leave the pleasure of viewing that scene to you.\n\nThis film heavily evokes reactions from the audience and does so well, whether it's staring at the screen in awe or gasping at the visceral violence, if you face this film with the right attitude and expectations, it will be a thrill ride like no other. Lubezki has proved that he is one of the most fantastic cinematographers of modern cinema, and the extensive use of natural lighting over artificial supports that statement even further, the film is beyond stunning. Supporting this is the score from the relatively unknown composers, believe me, when the sudden orchestral boom strikes your eardrums, it's mesmerising.\n\nThe makeup, the direction, the editing, the visual aesthetics, and of course the performances from a hopefully soon-to-be Oscar winning DiCaprio, 'The Revenant' is a visual treat for those who appreciate cinema and for those who wish to just get absorbed by the immense landscapes and poetic justice I\xf1\xe1rritu has given it. This is, for me, a modern masterpiece.", u'0.847248', u'The Revenant falls into the same category as Aronofsky\'s "Requiem for a Dream" and Spielberg\'s "Schindler\'s List" for me, in the essence of being a terrific movie but not something I think I can sit through a second time. In all these movies there are brutal sequences that cause emotional stress and disgust just watching because it is so REAL and GRIPPING. To think that events in these movies actually happened or that they could very well happen is too much for me to think about. Not to say that I did not enjoy this film thoroughly. \n\nThe Revenant is a technical masterpiece that left me wondering "How the hell did they do that?" after many scenes and sequences. With beautiful cinematography and adroit camera movement this film is a visual magnum opus. It is apparent that the great minds that put forth this film are none other than the same ones that brought us Birdman: Lubezki and Inarritu. There are many long shots without cuts that are sprinkled throughout the film that add a sense of sophistication to it with the added bonus of predominantly location based shooting and natural lighting for the film , that can even make a novice film watcher raise an eyebrow at its complexity. \n\nThe camera work is not the only noteworthy aspect of the film; The actors did a superb job executing their rolls. Many are raving about DiCaprio\'s performance but I was more of a fan of Hardy\'s brutal and gritty character Fitzgerald. Granted, half the words that came out of his mouth were unintelligible but he left no doubt in my mind that he was fully devoted to his role and bringing Fitzgerald alive instead of just Hardy playing a character named Fitzgerald. He was simply amazing.\n\nWith all this said, there are still flaws in the film. At some points it was dragging on and moving too slow. It gave the impression that the film itself was cocky and wanted to show off all of its beautiful scenery and camera work too much. Then there was the "he shouldn\'t be alive" situations. Hugh Glass was a real guy that really did survive a bear mauling but in the film they make this guy practically immortal. There were too many instances where I was thinking "he should be dead three times over right now, for me to enjoy the film as much I should have. \n\nAll in all a great film that I only recommend to seasoned and mature film viewers.', u'0.155356', u'What an absolute waste of 2.5 hours.\n\nIt didn\'t look like it was going to be my type of film, but the trailer was very convincing, not to mention the plethora of award nominations it has received, so I decided to give it a go.\n\nMistake.\n\nIt started with a collection of superb actors, delivering solid performances. Despite what I\'ve read, I thought Tom Hardy\'s accent was spot on - that is what that accent sounds like! Domhnall Gleeson is in everything these days, for good reason, and Will Poulter was certainly endearing. Leonardo DiCaprio was excellent, dragging oneself through the snow post-bear mauling should be pretty torturous, and as we know from Wolf of Wall Street\'s infamous \'Ludes\' scene, DiCaprio is a pro at crawling and grunting.\n\nA cast such as this should have delivered an outstanding movie, so I can only assume something went catastrophically wrong with the script. Because my God was it BORING.\n\nThere was absolutely zero character development. If you\'re going to produce something that is on the long side, at least give me something to work with here? The son was killed so early (and following so few lines) I genuinely didn\'t care, which didn\'t help to lay a foundation for why I should care about Glass\'s prolonged revenge mission. \n\nAs well as the characters being entirely 2D, they also quickly became parodies of themselves. "The Revenant Presents: Domhnall Gleeson as the Principled Yet Naive Captain (who must die as punishment for his ineptitude); Tom Hardy as the Southern Villain (with no redeeming features, who likewise must die to maintain the idea of a Just World); Will Poulter as the Impressionable Young Soldier-type and Leonardo DiCaprio as the Tortured Hero. Don\'t forget the Arrogant French Braggarts, and the Wise Yet Ruthless Indigenous People. Oh and Tom Hardy\'s Random Cockney Friend."\n\nWhile I still think Hardy\'s accent was well executed, the choice to use an accent which is often a source of ridicule (I\'m not endorsing that view) only served to undermine the tension rather than build it, making him seem like a fool rather than a dangerous adversary. Admittedly, he did a kill a number of people so maybe playing The Fool was his way of lulling everyone into a false sense of security.\n\nDiCaprio was convincing in his role of the Aggrieved Father avenging the death of his son, but his journey of adversity quickly became absurd rather than laudable. The bear attack was BRUTAL, and as his company quickly concluded, it seems unlikely he would have survived his injuries, particularly when being carted around in the depth of winter. \n\nBut no, not only does he survive, he also survives Hardy\'s attempt to smother him, and being dragged into a partial burial, as well as witnessing the murder of his son (which would be enough to render any of us catatonic). OK, this might be plausible, maybe.\n\nThen he wanders around for a bit, spurred on by the prospect of vengeance, before being nearly drowned in a river. Again, the trip down the rapids would have been enough to drown the average man, let alone someone who has just suffered a savage bear attack followed by an attempted smothering. But no, he comes to a gentle stop at the river bank and has a nap - mysteriously without succumbing to hypothermia.\n\nCue more wandering, some assistance from a kindly fellow wanderer, and yet more wandering.\n\nAs if three potential deaths weren\'t enough (four if you account for the bear effectively attacking him twice), he\'s then under attack by the very people who\'s daughter he\'s just rescued, and not only does he not get shot (despite these people having been shown to be frighteningly accurate), his horse RIDES HIM OFF A CLIFF and surprise, surprise - HE LIVES! In fact, he doesn\'t just survive it, he guts the dead horse and SLEEPS INSIDE IT. *Beats chest asserting manliness*\n\nBy the end I was desperate for one of them to just kill the other so I could go home. Tom Hardy finally met his maker - not before uttering the obligatory moral message that revenge doesn\'t make us feel better.\n\nThe Revenant is a classic case of style over substance. Fantastic actors, slipping effortlessly into a range of clich\xe9d characters, stunning cinematography, and zero emotion. I\'m a crier, I will cry at the majority of films and TV shows (and occasionally books), so the fact that I not only didn\'t cry, but felt absolutely nothing towards any of the characters, says it all.\n\nIt\'s clearly a polarising piece of work, I\'ve seen many other reviews here that echo my sentiments, yet my boyfriend loved it, and the average rating is currently 8.3! Unfortunately, Award Land appears to be siding with my other half. This year\'s Oscar Best Picture category is a crowded race with several worthy contenders - but the Revenant is not one, and I really hope it doesn\'t win.\n\nDoes DiCaprio deserve the nomination? He was one of the better things in this film, and playing such a role must have pushed him to his physical limits, so maybe he does. Frankly, he\'s massively overdue one so for God\'s sake just give the man an Oscar and let\'s forget this absurd study in masculine pride ever existed.', u'-0.339776', u'I went to see "The Revenant" on the day that it was nominated for 12 Oscars, which certainly sets the expectation that it is going to be good \x96 and it is. But I saw it described by DiCaprio as an "epic art-house western" and that\'s a good description. In the same way that I\xf1\xe1rritu\'s "Birdman" (this time last year) was unarguably a brilliant but not very mainstream film, so I think the Oscar buzz will attract a big audience to this movie who may find it a struggle to really enjoy. Because it is bleak\x85 unremittingly bleak, in terms of the landscape, the weather and the motives of the characters. It is also extremely violent but, unlike "The Hateful Eight" (another film I saw this week that was unremittingly bleak) the violence is much more gritty, realistic and visceral making the drama a lot more compelling.\n\nDiCaprio plays "Hugh Glass", an historical figure who was a legendary fur-trapper in the early 1800\'s and the central figure in this bear-related yarn. Although the story has been re-embroidered over the years, the \'facts\' align with the film\'s basic story (there\'s a good "Daily Telegraph" article outlining this - see the link on bob-the-movie-man.com).\n\nAttacked and pursuing by local natives, Glass\'s party is striking across woodland when he is viciously attacked by a 500lb Grizzly bear. Although appearing mortally wounded, he is a highly respected individual and so is stretchered up by his boss Captain Henry (Domhnall Gleeson). Unable to proceed further, Henry pays for the mercenary John Fitzgerald (Tom Hardy) to stay with him, together with his half-Pawnee son Hawk and friend Bridger (Will Poulter), to die in peace. Predictably, Fitzgerald is not to be trusted, and Glass is abandoned in a shallow grave. If this is not enough, for other reasons we won\'t go into, Glass has even less inclination to keep his fellow trapper on his Christmas card list. Thus is set up a classic revenge movie, with Glass determined to stay alive to enact that revenge despite the enormous odds stacked against him.\n\nThis is surely DiCaprio\'s year for his elusive Oscar as he turns in a cripplingly painful performance. It is clear that the suffering on screen is not all acting \x96 it cannot be, given the inhospitable conditions in which the crew were filming (in Canada and Argentina). As examples he had to eat raw bison liver as well as suffering a much discussed Han "I thought they smelled bad on the outside" Solo moment. Despite having very few lines to deliver, DiCaprio is on screen for 90% of the time, and it is a bravura performance.\n\nTom Hardy \x96 also Oscar nominated \x96 is also impressive as the villain of the piece, although for most of the time his lines might have well been delivered through his Bain mask for the sense they made. He is an inveterate mumbler.\n\nDomhnall Gleeson\'s performance is also compelling, adding a degree of goodness and compassion to the film that was so missing from "The Hateful 8". (Gleeson is surely vying this year with Ben Whishaw for the busiest mainstream film appearances after this, "Ex Machina", "Brooklyn" and "Star Wars"). Finally Will Poulter gets a chance to shine in an A-grade mainstream dramatic movie and he well and truly makes that grade.\n\nDirector Alejandro G. I\xf1\xe1rritu has to be commended for eschewing the use of green screens, insisting on live performances and in natural light to boot. Stylistically (and indeed story-wise) the film has many parallels with "Gladiator", with its effective and artistically constructed dream sequences. But the film is not without special effects, and these are phenomenal, most incredibly delivered during the relentless and gruelling bear attack scene: a seamless blend of live animal work and effects that make it horrifically believable.\n\nThere is also some fantastic camera work (by Emmanuel Lubezki) of the "how the hell did they do that variety". Recalling his work in "Birdman" it\'s challenging to do single tracking shots of people walking through buildings. To do these same tracking shots during a pitched battle scene is just phenomenal. During one scene in this harrowing sequence at the film\'s start, the camera is on the ground filming a native galloping towards a victim, then the camera is seamlessly filming the rider as he gallops away. Astonishing.\n\nThe only area I really didn\'t care for was the music, by Carsten Nicolai and Ryuichi Sakamoto. A combination of droning strings and (later) some whiny "Ligeti-style" elements, it was in turns intrusive, gloomy and annoying. Music should largely stay in the background to set the mood. This didn\'t.\n\nOverall, this is a masterful film, but it is a slog and not a feel-good film to sit through. It also has significant violence which might not suit all viewers, with the final confrontation in particular being one of the most visceral fight scenes I\'ve seen in years.\n\nBy the way (I had to look it up) the definition of "revenant" is:\n\nnoun \n\n1. a person who returns\n\n2. a person who returns as a spirit after death; ghost.\n\nNow you know too \x96 this public service announcement brought to you by One Mann\'s Movies! (Please visit the graphical version of this review at http://bob-the-movie-man.com. Thanks.)', u'0.23728', u"I was hoping for something a bit more interesting than Hollywood's standard approach to cowboys and indians, especially as the film seems to have been critically acclaimed and Leo is a great actor. \n\nThe quality of the camera-work is excellent and the bear mauling scene very accomplished if that is the right way to describe such a visceral few minutes. But oh the plot. If you try to take it seriously it fails utterly. As an Indiana Jones caper it lacks wit. Too often you say 'I know he'd be dead from hypothermia/blood loss etc etc in any possible world but I'll just keep watching in case something interesting happens'. You ride your horse over a 150 foot drop, fall into a tree, and survive. You travel downstream in an icy river in your fur coat and don't drown/freeze. You manage to light a fire even when you are 9/10ths dead, there are no branches and you're flint went a few scenes ago. What a relief when the baddie is finally left to his fate, but then you realise you've just wasted 2 hours of your life.", u'-0.1385', u"Go and see this movie. In the cinema. As soon as possible.\n\nSimply put, it is an excellent story of family, revenge, survival, and nature.\n\nThe Revenant is one of the most beautifully-shot films I have ever seen. I lost count of how many scenes I sat there in utter amazement, which is undoubtedly due to the brilliant directing and spectacular cinematography: there's no shaky-cam, no quick-cut editing, and a lot of incredibly complex shots which appear to have been completed in a single take. If all films were shot similarly to how the Revenant is, then the movie industry would drastically improve.\n\nIt must also be pointed out that the Revenant has won 3 Golden Globe and has 12 Oscar nominations; if that isn't compelling enough evidence of a fantastic film then I don't know what is.\n\nThe entire cast did a phenomenal job and they all deserve recognition for their performances; however, if Leonardo DiCaprio doesn't win an Oscar for his breathtaking portrayal of Glass then that will be the single biggest injustice of the year. \n\nDo not miss the opportunity to see this masterpiece on the big screen!\n\nUPDATE: I've read an unnerving amount of other user's reviews complaining about the plot. I can understand that the plot may seem a little basic or perhaps lacking at times; however, the plot is not what makes this film so excellent, and I feel as though those who failed to recognise this have seriously missed out. You don't just watch the Revenant: you experience it. Every single element from the music to the cinematography is cleverly concocted to draw you into the film and put you alongside the cast in the brutal wintry conditions. If you've not been drawn in due to being too concerned with the premise of the story, then I fear you've missed a truly enthralling and one-of-a-kind cinematic experience.", u'0.245063', u"The natural landscape and some of the scenes are overwhelming and spectacular! The camera-work is so immersive, you believe are a part of Hugh Glass' journey through the wilderness and back to civilization. Also with great performances not only by DiCaprio, but also Hardy, as the unsympathetic fellow fur trapper leaving Glass behind. \n\nStory-wise, it is a bit thin for a 156 min picture. Glass' quest for vengeance is sometimes lost as he utters few words about his drive and is being more or less, chased himself. The story arc of the Indians quest for their daughter felt a bit out of place and strange. We also get to see the fur trappers p.o.v. that left Glass behind and the Captain way ahead of them. Which in my opinion takes a little bit of the magic of Glass' total perilous journey.\n\nAll my stars goes to the beauty, production value and performances alone! Regardless, this is one of those overlong movies one like, but would not sit out for another viewing!", u'0.18054', u"I cannot believe how many people think this is a good movie....watching a guy struggle to survive for 2 hours ...come on people..I know there are not many good movies being made but my word....so many things are unbelievable...the bear attack, carrying a near dead guy out of the wilderness up a mountain...going over a cliff on a horse and not getting hurt...spending long periods of time in freezing cold water.....surviving extreme cold overnight inside a dead horse...my god the list is endless....and for Leo's so called acting don't get me started...a lot of crawling and moaning and groaning....the whole thing was a letdown and really a waste of time...also tell the director to back the camera up a bit on those facial close-ups...they were also ridiculous...trust me save your money and go see The Hateful Eight.", u'-0.840713', u"What a waste of a night. Spoiler alert! Here is the whole movie in 30 seconds.\n\nA guy almost dies, a guy walks, a guy builds a fire, the guy almost dies again, walks some more, goes for a swim, builds a fire, almost dies, goes for a swim again, builds a fire, makes it back safely, goes back out again, finds a fire, almost dies, makes someone else go for a swim. Looks into the camera deeply. The end.\n\nBest supporting actor to the bear. My life would have been better had you finished the job.\n\nI'm pretty sure this script was two pages long, and they turned it into a 2.5 hour movie. The closed captioning graphic artist had more words than any one else in the movie.", u'-0.105044', u'"The Revenant" is probably the most beautiful movie I have seen for a long time. This is not only due to the incredible locations, but also to the excellent (and by excellent I mean excellent) camera-work. Frequently I was just blown away by the sheer beauty of the rough terrain of Canada and how it was captured by the crew. However, there are a few drawbacks. Mainly the story (it is a very simple revenge story line) and the dialog (it is basically not existent :D).\n\nWhen I first left the movie I was still blown away by all the great things I mentioned above (I was thinking about a 10/10 rating), but the longer I was outside the movie the more I recognized that "The Revenant" is a film that is incredible entertaining whilst sitting in the cinema, but also a movie I quickly forgot about when being at home again.\n\nStill, the movie is definitely a must-see. Your money is well invested!', u'0.334498', u"Since the first trailers of this movie came out I knew it would be an experience. Following the incredible Birdman, director Alejandro G. I\xf1\xe1rritu had the public anxiously awaiting his interpretation of this bleak survival story, and much like Birdman, I\xf1\xe1rritu is also the star of this film. The Revenant has some of the most beautiful cinematography I've ever seen. It's cold, visceral, and almost entirely authentic from the use of natural lighting to the barebones yet powerful storytelling. You can tell I\xf1\xe1rritu poured his heart into this project and it pays off tremendously. This is not to discount the incredible performances of DiCaprio and Hardy (DiCaprio finally getting his well-overdue Oscar), but it's hard to imagine the movie being so impactful had another director been at the helm. \n\nThe story is as simple as it gets. In the 1800s, a group of settlers escape an ambush by an indigenous tribe, and during their travels one man gets separated from the group and gets brutally attacked by a wild bear and subsequently left for dead by his team. It's a revenge story more than anything. What it also highlights is human perseverance and the will to live. The things that happen to this man are truly horrific and difficult to watch. I'm not sure what parts of the story were embellished or Hollywoodized, but this film sucks you into this world and puts you right alongside this fatally wounded man desperate to survive. Leonardo DiCaprio gives a heart-wrenching performance as Hugh Glass, expressing a wide range of emotions despite the limited dialogue. Tom Hardy is also phenomenal as one of the most vile, wretched human beings on the planet. This guy is despicable to the core, and you forget you're watching Tom Hardy at times because he's completely absorbed in the role. The supporting cast is great as well despite their small time on screen. As far as performances and cinematography goes, The Revenant is flawless.\n\nWhat prevents this from getting a perfect 10 is one particular storyline that I didn't think was needed, and it involves the wife of Hugh Glass. She's never developed as a character but she appears intermittently in visions and dreams and it almost sucks you out of the movie for a second because of how intense the main narrative is. But this is a very small gripe. From beginning to end this movie had me on the edge of my seat, my jaw on the floor and my eyes glued to the screen. The Revenant is definitely not for everyone, but it's impossible not to appreciate it for the breathtaking cinematic achievement that it is.", u'0.282811', u'I went into this movie with high expectations. I came out feeling like i\'d just sat through a long funeral for someone I didn\'t know, on a hot and humid day. \n\n*********MASSIVE SPOILERS******** I BASICALLY DESCRIBE THE WHOLE MOVIE IN DETAIL *********\n\nThe movie started out great with a little action scene and a little bit about the main character (Leonardo DiCaprio) and his son. After that, with very little else about the story or anything to tie viewers into it, DiCaprio is mauled by a bear because for some reason he\'s in the forest alone after just being raided and destroyed by some Indian tribe, who are looking for some random girl. (maybe i\'m missing something but that\'s about all I took from the beginning of the movie)\n\nSo the rest of the "Americans" come and rescue DiCaprio from underneath the bear he just killed after it nearly mauled him to death, and for some reason he survives even though in reality he\'d probably had lost enough blood at that point to kill three people. The rest of the middle of the movie is watching DiCaprio breathe heavily and crawl around the forest floor with some cinematic shots of snow, and listening to Tom Hardy attempt to cover up his terrible accent by speaking as low as possible. Oh and did I mention DiCaprio has an Indian kid? Yea so he has a kid, the kids mom and tribe was massacred by Americans or French or something like that, and DiCaprio is really close to the kid and vice versa. (Yes it\'s the predictable average story of revenge)\n\nSo Tom Hardy kills DiCaprio\'s kid because the kid doesn\'t want him to kill his father. Then they leave DiCaprio behind to die (BUT GUESS WHAT??? THE MAIN CHARACTER DIDN\'T DIE! WOW! DIDN\'T SEE THAT ONE COMING)\n\nso he regains strength, gets some support from some random Indian dude who also lost his family, but to another tribe, and then some French dudes who have the girl the other tribe is looking for, find and kill the other Indian dude, but don\'t see DiCaprio apparently even though he was in a giant wood shelter with a fire going. DiCaprio becomes hero and saves the girl, kills some french dudes, and rides off to get his "revenge"\n\nAnd you know what happens next?? HE GETS HIS REVENGE!@!!!@#!@ WOW WEE WHAT AN ADVENTURE \n\nMovie ends with the Indian tribe who got their girl back finishing off Tom Hardy with a hatchet or knife, and they walk past Leo and leave him alone. \n\nSeriously though, I don\'t understand the hype around this movie. It WAS Oscar bait, because 90% of the movie is Leo breathing heavy, acting as injured and in pain as possible crawling around grunting and moaning. \n\nThe only good thing about the movie was the cinematic shots and scenes, but nothing else. Insanely bland and generic story with a good setting. \n\nI actually like most of DiCaprio\'s movies, and I think he should\'ve had an Oscar a long time ago, but I don\'t feel it should be for this movie.', u'-0.186231', u"In real life, Hugh Glass was mauled by a grizzly & left for dead, but managed to drag himself back to a frontier outpost. The cinematic handling of the story in Revenant, however, is straight out of Cormac McCarthy: heavy-handed with funereal music & gray-scale tones throughout, creating an overall impression that the sun rarely ever shone in those mountains in those times. Just watching it becomes a test of endurance. Cold, colorless, dismal, stark, bleak, brutal, dispiriting & ultimately pointless. Perhaps that was how these men actually lived their lives? Maybe that's the point? If there is one?\n\nAt the end of the film, we're left not even knowing whether Glass, after exacting vengeance on the man who killed his son, lives or dies himself. Or perhaps that doesn't matter? Perhaps none of it matters? Ptui! Worst film I've watched since Deadman.", u'-0.302038'], u'tt0031381': [u'This film shows the best of the American cinema. Whether we like the film, or not, one has to recognize the greatest achievement, perhaps, of the creative talent of the people working in the movie industry. "Gone with the Wind" represents a monumental leap, as well as a departure, for the movies, as they were done prior to this film.\n\nThe vision of David O. Selznick, the power behind bringing Margaret Mitchell\'s massive account about the South, before and after the Civil War, pays handsomely with the film that Victor Fleming directed. This movie will live forever because it reminds us of how this great nation came into being, despite the different opinions from the two stubborn factions in the war.\n\n"Gone with the Wind" brought together the best people in Hollywood. The end result is the stunning film that for about four hours keep us interested in the story unfolding in the screen. Of course, credit must be due to the director, Victor Fleming, and his vision, as well as the adaptation by Sydney Howard, who gave the right tone to the film. The gorgeous cinematography created by Ernest Haller gives us a vision of the gentle South before the war, and the Phoenix raising from the ashes of a burned Atlanta. The music of Max Steiner puts the right touch behind all that is seen in the movie.\n\nOne can\'t conceive another Scarlett O\'Hara played by no one, but Vivien Leigh. Her beauty, her sense of timing, her intelligent approach to this role, makes this a hallmark performance. Ms. Leigh was at the best moment of her distinguished career and it shows. Scarlett goes from riches to rags, back to riches again and in the process finds an inner strength she didn\'t know she possessed. Her impossible love for Ashley will consume her and will keep her away from returning the love to the man that really loves her, Rhett.\n\nThe same thing applies to the Rhett Butler of Clark Gable. No one else comes to mind for playing him with the passion he projects throughout the movie. This is a man\'s man. Captain Butler was torn between his loyalty to the cause of the South and his sense of decency. His love for Scarlett, the woman he knows is in love with a dream, speaks eloquently for itself.\n\nThe other two principals, Olivia de Havilland and Leslie Howard, give performances that are amazing to watch. Ms. de Havilland\'s Melanie Hamilton is perfect. Melanie is loyal to the woman that does everything to undermine her marriage to Ashley. Mr. Howard\'s Ashley gives a perfect balance to the man in love with his wife, while Scarlett keeps tempting him.\n\nThe rest of the cast is too numerous to make justice to all the actors one sees on the screen, but omitting the contribution of Hattie McDaniel to the film would be sinful. Ms. McDaniel was such a natural actress that she is excellent no matter in what movie she is playing. This huge talent is a joy to watch.\n\nComments to this forum express their objections to the way the race relations play in the movie, but being realistic, this movie speaks about the not too distant past where all kinds of atrocities, such as the slavery, were the norm of the land. While those things are repugnant to acknowledge, in the film, they are kept at a minimum. After all, this film is based on a book by one of the daughters of that South, Margaret Mitchell, who is presenting the story as she saw it in her mind, no doubt told to her from relatives that lived in that period of a horrible page in the American history.\n\nEnjoy this monumental classic in all its splendor.', u'0.492232', u"\nEvery time I watch this film, and I've seen it more times than I can remember, I'm always astonished by the freshness of the story, the power of the emotions it conveys and the beautiful, detailed images of a time long gone. That this film was made in the 1930's is almost incomprehensible to me. The challenges that had to be overcome in order to bring it to life must have been monumental. But come to life it did, and still does! A triumph of film-making ingenuity and genius, that will live on for many generations to come.", u'0.146143', u'\nThe setting is a Georgia plantation. The year is 1861, and sixteen-year-old Scarlett O\'Hara is infatuated with the blond, drowsy-eyed Ashley Wilkes - the problem is, Ashley plans to marry another woman. Little matter that every other man in the county is courting Scarlett and that a charming scoundrel named Rhett Butler is staring at her with questionable intent - she cares only for Ashley.\n\nSuddenly, the Civil War brakes out, changing the fates and fortunes of all. Scarlett, clever, manipulative, and charming, proves an adept survivor - but what will she have to do to survive? And will she ever learn whom it is that she really loves?\n\nGWTW is one of the most meticulously cast films ever; with the possible exception of Leslie Howard as Ashley (in his forties, rather old to be playing a man half that age), every role was perfectly assigned. After you watch Vivien Leigh you will be unable to imagine anyone else playing Scarlett, and Hattie McDaniel\'s strong, unforgettable performance as "Mammy" netted her an academy award (the first for an African-American actor).\n\n\nGWTW\'s backdrop is the gruesome Civil War, and in the end this film is the story a woman and a civilization (the Old South) going through a war that will not leave either of them unchanged.\n\nThe cinematography is beautiful, memorable. Gone With the Wind was shot entirely in gorgeous technicolor; the scene of the fire in Atlanta required the use of all eight technicolor cameras in existence at the time.\n\n\nThe pragmatic may think Gone with the Wind overly dramatic; the restless may find it too long; the action-stimulated, too subtle. None of this, however, detracts from the fact that GWTW retains a lasting appeal as one of the crowning cinematic achievements of the 20th century. Those who see its ending as depressing - tragic, even - perhaps miss the point - which Scarlett O\'Hara makes in her very last instant with us, tear-stained eyes uplifted in a sudden, curious burst of hope beneath all the turmoil; that .. . "After all, tomorrow is another day." 10/10', u'0.188886', u"I believe that when one views a film, one should consider the context in which it was made.\n\nBarely 10 years after talking pictures were first created; less than that after the first full-length color feature film was created; near the end of the greatest depression this country ever experienced, and in which pretty much the only entertainment available to most was radio or the movies; David O Selznik decided to turn the biggest pot-boiler blockbuster novel into a movie.\n\nAnd what a movie. Stunning color, the most popular mail actor of his time, perfect music score, incredible action scenes, story line only 70 years removed from when it happened, and on, and on. Can you imagine what a store-clerk or a farmer, or a teacher experienced in that world, seeing Gone With the Wind? What was there to compare with? 1939 was a watershed year for great movies, and this one was the greatest produced. Try watching this movie as if there were no TV, no DVD's, only a few radio stations, spending maybe the second to the last quarter you owned, never having seen such a movie before, and you get what I mean. Masterful for its time, and still timeless today.", u'0.380665', u'It is always in people\'s nature to put down great things and to nit-pick or sometimes just be plain mean. No matter what anyone says, this is utterly fantastic: in story, in special effects, in casting (with perhaps the sad exception of Leslie Howard as "Ashley") and in captivation. Vivien Leigh is so powerful, passionate, magnificent and beautiful that you could watch it 1000 times on that ground alone. She brings something so convincing and human to the role of the selfish, spoilt Scarlett; the character is larger than life.\n\nLeaving Vivien\'s astounding performance aside, this remains a sweeping unrivalled epic. Watch it. Esther\'s rating: 20/10', u'0.834497', u'\nOne of the greatest achievements in film history. This is not only an eye-popping cinematic treat, but one of the greatest stories ever put on celluloid. The movie lasts nearly four hours--- it\'s longer than any other mainstream commercially successful film ever made. But the time goes by so quickly that you\'ll miss it when it\'s over.\n\nOf course, we all know that this movie is set in the days of the Civil War in the 1860s. It\'s the story of Scarlett O\'Hara, a plantation owner\'s daughter who is very beautiful and who seemingly MUST have her own way at all times. She\'s willing to scheme and manipulate everyone in her path until she gets it. When the movie opens, the country is on the verge of civil war--- North against South--- but Scarlett barely notices, and doesn\'t care in the least. Her biggest obsession is that she\'s in love with dreamy/poetic Ashley Wilkes, and she stays in love with him throughout 98 percent of the movie. \n\nThe only problem is....Ashley doesn\'t have any particular interest in her at all. In fact, he spends most of the movie being married to gentle Melanie Hamilton--- a fact that frustrates Scarlett to no end. Ashley remains the one object of her desire that she is never to obtain.\n\nShe would have been better off pining after Rhett Butler, a much more solid, rather dangerous man with a reputation as a no-good scoundrel. He is openly attracted to Scarlett, grows to love her (although he dare not let her know, or she\'ll use it against him), and it\'s obvious that he would make a lot better match for her than the drab Ashley. Very late in the movie, he finally does marry Scarlett. But it\'s probably too late for them to be happy by then, ironically--- and they never really are happy together.\n\nThe complicated and utterly fascinating relationship between Scarlett, Rhett, Ashley, and Melanie is the fuel that keeps the movie going. But there are dozens, if not hundreds, of little extra twists and turns that fill out the movie. The Civil War backdrop for one, the colorful supporting roles for another. \n\nA great many reviewers here have seen Scarlett as purely a selfish, one-dimensional manipulative shrew. But she\'s far more than that! This is a complex, multi-dimensional young woman with lots of conflicting motives. Yes, she\'s selfish and manipulative. But she\'s also selfless: the extreme sacrifices that she makes on behalf of her family, and Melanie (keeping in mind that, other than her father, she doesn\'t even particularly like any of them) are nothing short of heroic. She is overwhelmingly protective of her loved ones. She\'s a ball of fire when work needs to be done, and she\'s fiercely courageous. \n\nDespite her hardness, she does also grow as a person. To her great credit, she slowly comes to value Melanie\'s friendship and support. She genuinely loves and is proud of her daughter. And at the very end of the movie, she does finally realize how ill-suited she and Ashley have always been for each other, and how little passion ever actually existed there.\n\nSome quick high points, and a few flaws: the supporting roles are superb in every way. Even the rather bland Ashley is given as much life as could be expected by actor Leslie Howard, and the other parts are vivid and fill out the movie. Two female parts in particular--- wise, funny, respected Mammy (Hattie McDaniel) and wistful, decent-at-heart prostitute Belle Watling (Ona Munson) are standouts.\n\nThe scenery and photography is possibly the most superb ever done in the history of film. Many scenes are just sumptuously lit and filmed. The gripping nighttime escape from Atlanta (the whole city seemingly in flames) is one of the most spectacular action sequences ever done. The sunsets are jaw-droppingly beautiful.\n\nMuch has been said about the supposed racism of this film. It\'s true that it does portray black slaves as being HAPPY to be slaves. But much more important, it\'s also true that the wisest person in the whole movie is Mammy. This black lady may be a slave--- later an employee--- but she is smart, funny, observant, and she\'s treated as an equal, if not a superior, throughout the movie. And it\'s made clear she deserves it. With no irony or rebuke whatever, she scornfully refers to certain low-lifes as "poor white trash", and we know (Mammy knows too) that if they get called that, they deserve it. She may be black, but she isn\'t inferior to them or anybody. And we root for her all the way.\n\nA few minor flaws, and I do mean minor: 1) Most of the acting looks pretty modern, but there are a very few scenes where it seems a little old-style. Hey enjoy the movie and don\'t worry \'bout it. People didn\'t do today\'s "method" acting in the 1930s. 2) Some of the "raw" scenes still have a Hollywood gloss to them. Even when Scarlett is on the brink of starvation and probably hasn\'t had a good bath in weeks, she looks perfectly made up with only a few hairs out of place. Oh well. It *was* big-time Hollywood after all. 3) The second half of the movie is more "talky" and less action-oriented than the first. I would not say it\'s more boring, just less movement. I don\'t find it draggy, but some people do. \n\nStill a heck of a good story, and a great film, so enjoy the ride!\n', u'0.1633', u"Before I ever saw Gone With the Wind, I was well acquainted with Max Steiner's theme. It opened WOR TV's Million Dollar Movie before every broadcast in New York in the Fifties and Sixties. When my parents took me to see Gone With the Wind in one of MGM's re-releases as the film music started in my youthful eagerness to show off my knowledge I remarked to all who could hear that that was stolen from Million Dollar Movie.\n\nMillion Dollar Movie is gone now, but Gone With the Wind, book and film, remain eternal. In these days Margaret Mitchell's southern point of view book might have trouble finding a publisher, let alone selling film rights to the story. But it is a tribute to her and the characters she created that they remain alive in everyone's mind who reads the novel or sees the film. And that's just about the same because I can't think of another film that remained so faithful to the text.\n\nIt is said that Margaret Mitchell wrote the book with Clark Gable in mind as Rhett Butler. As the sober and ever realistic, but charming Rhett, Gable for most of the film is playing a character not to dissimilar from what he usually played on screen. However in the last half hour of the film when he's hit with unbelievable tragedy and he edges to the point of madness, Gable reached dimensions he never did before or subsequently. \n\nIf Mitchell knew who she wanted as Rhett, nobody knew who would be Scarlett. The search for Scarlett O'Hara is one of those Hollywood legends as every actress with the possible exception of Edna May Oliver read for the part. Gone With the Wind started filming without a Scarlett as the famous burning of Atlanta sequence was done first. While it was being down, David O. Selznick settled on a fairly unknown British actress, at least in the USA, Vivien Leigh.\n\nIt was a stroke of casting genius. Vivien Leigh's screen output is pretty small, she was primarily a stage actress. Gone With the Wind is more her film than Rhett Butler's. The story is her story, how she evolved from a flighty young southern belle to a hardbitten woman who is determined to survive in the style of living she's become accustomed to from the pre-Civil War era. In the process she helps all those around her economically, but loses all their previous affection. \n\nI've always felt the key scene in the film is after Leslie Howard tells Leigh, he'll be marrying Olivia DeHavilland and Leigh makes a fool of herself with him, she finds out that Clark Gable has overheard the whole thing. He's fascinated by her, but because of that he's on to all her ploys.\n\nLeslie Howard usually comes in for the smallest amount of analysis among the four leads. His Ashley Wilkes is not all that different from Alan Squire in The Petrified Forest. Imagine Squire as a wealthy plantation owner and you've Ashley. He's stronger than he realizes though, he's the one that reluctantly enlists in the Confederate Army while the cynical Rhett Butler makes some big bucks as a blockade runner.\n\nI've always felt however that the most difficult acting job in Gone With the Wind was the role of Melanie Hamilton. Olivia DeHavilland after initially considering trying out for Scarlett, decided to go after Melanie. \n\nIt's a deceptive part, superficially it's a lot like the crinoline heroines DeHavilland was doing at Warner Brothers. Melanie is the counterpoint to Scarlett, an incredibly kind and decent soul who can't see bad in anyone. One of her best scenes is with Ona Munson who is Belle Watling, the most prominent madam in Atlanta. The other women of society snub her, but DeHavilland accepts her help for the Confederate cause. It's not about politics or slavery for Melanie, her husband is at war and his cause is her's.\n\nAnd DeHavilland's death scene would move the Medusa to tears. It's a great tribute to the playing skill of Olivia DeHavilland in that Melanie NEVER becomes a maudlin character. She got her first Oscar nomination for Melanie in the Supporting Actress category, but lost it to fellow cast member Hattie McDaniel as Scarlett's mammy.\n\nHattie's a shrewd judge of character, she's a slave, but she's also a family confidante of the O'Haras. As Gable says, she's one of the few people he knows whose respect he wants.\n\nOf course Gone With the Wind is from the southern point of view. Growing up in Atlanta, Margaret Mitchell heard reminisces from many Confederate veterans and the stories they told found their way into Gone With the Wind. It's about what the white civilian population endured during the war and Reconstruction.\n\nDavid O. Selznick got a bit of irony in there though. Please note during the burning of Atlanta the slaves who are being marched out to dig trenches are singing 'Let My People Go.' And that's just what the Union Army was coming to Atlanta to do.\n\nGone With the Wind copped so many Oscars for 1939 that Bob Hope quipped at the Academy Awards ceremony that it was a benefit for David O. Selznick. Of course it was the Best Picture of 1939 and Vivien Leigh won the first of her two Best Actress Awards.\n\nMetro-Goldwyn-Mayer kept itself in the black for years by simply re-releasing Gone With the Wind. Unlike any other classic film, it won new generations of fans with theatrical re-release. Somewhere on this planet there are people seeing this 67 year old classic and it is winning new fans as I write this.\n\nAnd I think Gone With the Wind, the telling of the interwoven lives of Rhett, Scarlett, Ashley, and Melanie and the world they knew, will be something viewed and read hundreds of years from now.", u'-0.0347028', u'Margaret Mitchell\'s Gone with the Wind, in its true essence, is a case study on the Old American way of living where pride and honor were the very essence of human existence. Victor Fleming\'s rendition of the classic novel, a classic within its own right, does full justice to the themes propagated by Mitchell\'s evocative masterpiece. In the words of Mitchell herself, Gone with the Wind is the story of the people whose gift of gumption gave them a definitive edge to endure the tribulation and throes of the American Civil War vis-\xe0-vis those who lacked an inner resolve and determination needed for survival.\n\nScarlet O\'Hara, the well bred, haughty, tempestuous and opportunistic protagonist of the saga, is an ostensibly flawed individual whose inexorable urge to placate her ego and realize her fancies appears far stronger than her adherence to any credence pious to her people and relevant to her time. Her scintillating charm and unrestrained zeal not only make her an object of desire for her male counterparts but also an object of envy for the girls around her.\n\nVivian Leigh perfectly fits into the caricature of Scarlet O\'Hara. She makes full use of her talent, courage and guile to portray a part that requires subtlety, brusqueness and poise in equal parts. It may sound like a hyperbole, but no other actress seemed better equipped to play the part a southern belle than Leigh herself, who won not one but two Oscars while playing one: first for her portrayal of Scarlet O\'Hara and second for portraying Blanche DuBois in A Streetcar Named Desire opposite Marlon Brando. In fact, her portrayal of Scarlet O\'Hara, in which she perfectly blends panache, poignancy and peremptoriness, is arguably the greatest portrayal by a female lead in cinematic history. Leigh uses her on-stage experience to improvise in order to add new dimensions and complexities to Scarlet\'s caricature, which according to the novel was mostly one dimensional: out-and-out bad. Scarlet\'s stubbornness and her impish obsession for a conformist like Ashley, who is not only indifferent to her feelings but also incapable of reciprocating the passion and zeal with which she pursues him, represent just one dimension of her multifaceted self, which is revealed layer by layer with the progression of the narrative. The viewer is gifted to see Scarlet in various avatars: a usurper, an egomaniac, a damsel, a nemesis, a menace, a guardian, a savior, a patriot, a fighter and most importantly as a quintessence of womanhood.\n\nClark Gable as Rhett Butler perfectly complements Vivian Leigh\'s larger than life portrayal. He is an outright reprobate, an unscrupulous opportunist whose life revolves around making money and pursuing carnal pleasures. However, behind this facade, just like Scarlet, there is a human capable of love, and worthy of being loved. These unobtrusive yet obvious similarities make Scarlet and Rhett a perfect match for each other. The subtle chemistry and tension between the two protagonists give the story its impetus and resonant charm. The rest of the cast has given exemplary performances with a special mention of Olivia de Havilland, who as Melanie is a paragon of love, humility and forgiveness. She provides a striking contrast to Scarlet\'s caricature and represents a more traditional picture of womanhood.\n\nThe movie\'s direction, cinematography, editing and music are all top notch and it is the great synergy of all these elements that makes the movie an extravaganza and an undisputed master piece, one to be savored till eternity. The movie is an amalgam of scenes, high on emotion and drama, which keeps the viewer absorbed throughout. The scene in which Scarlet\'s father tells her the importance of mother land, deeming it as the only thing worth fighting for, is pure gold. Other scenes that come close to matching its brilliance include the one in which Scarlet performs the duties of an obstetrician to help Melanie give birth to her child, and the one in which Scarlet pledges to protect Tara till her last breath. The movie also has an amazing repertoire of dialogs that are delivered with a nice mix of finesse and accuracy. Butler\'s famous dialog in which he says to Scarlet, "You should be kissed and often, and by someone who knows how," also happens to be one of all time favorite. \n\nThe movie, especially its anti-climatic ending, brings tears to eyes and leaves the viewer overwhelmed as he experiences a rainbow of different emotions, being awestruck by the tremendous impact of the journey that he is vicariously made to undergo.\n\nPS. Gone with the Wind is undoubtedly one of cinema\'s greatest marvels and is a living testament to cinema\'s timelessness, and its limitless potential. A must watch for everyone. 10/10\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/', u'0.533145', u'Gerard O\'Hara (Thomas Mitchell), an Irish immigrant, settles in North Georgia and becomes a prosperous plantation owner\x85 By great luck he marries young Ellen Robillard (Barbara O\'Neill) of Savannah, the daughter of one of the noblest Georgian families and becomes accepted by his aristocratic neighbors\x85 They are blessed with three daughters, Scarlett (Vivien Leigh), Suellen (Evelyn Keyes), and Carreen (Ann Rutherford).\n\nScarlett, the eldest, worships her mother\x85 Yet, under her beauty and Southern coquetry, she is charming, but proud, willful and vain\x85 She believes she is in love with Ashley Wilkes (Leslie Howard), a good-hearted young army captain\x85 But Ashley loves his cousin, Melanie Hamilton (Olivia de Havilland), a delicate, selfless woman\x85 He is frightened by Scarlett\'s energy and animation\x85 And although he admits his feelings for her, he is afraid to marry her and decides to take Melanie for his bride\x85 \n\nWhen Scarlett loses Ashley she is more certain than ever that she must have him\x85 On their wedding day, she meets Rhett Butler (Clark Gable), a wealthy adventurer from an old Charleston family\x85 Rhett, a gambler\x97who believes that self-interest is the motive of all human conduct\x97is attracted by Scarlett\'s beauty and realizes that they are equally merciless and conscienceless\x85\n\nVivien Leigh is magnificent as the spoiled, selfish southern belle... She carries the picture, and controls it... She reproduces the spirited character of Scarlett in all its fluent complexity... \n\nClark Gable\x97with a smile and great light in his eyes\x97is fascinating as the elegant, heroic gentleman ... He is perfect as the ladies man... His dramatic high point is his scene crying in Melanie\'s presence... His love scenes with Scarlett give the picture a vibrancy that is one of its great attractions... The film begins with their first stormy meeting in the library at Twelve Oaks and intensifies at the Atlanta bazaar, when he shocks the confederacy by bidding $l00 "in gold," to dance with the newly widowed Mrs. Hamilton who cares for nothing but herself\x85\n\nHattie McDaniel gives a rich characterization as Mammy, Scarlett\'s shrewd black servant who was never fooled by Scarlett\'s airs and tears...\n\nWith a memorable music score by Max Steiner, the film was an instant classic, winner of eight Academy Awards...', u'0.633834', u"If you have ever considered GWTW to be less than a masterpiece, you'll be swayed by the 65th Anniversary Edition DVD. The 4-disc set features the remastered film and more extras than you could possibly watch in one day (after watching the film, of course). The two-hour making-of documentary is fascinating and shows how the producer (David O. Selznick) of the film affected the cast, director(s) and writer(s) -- and shows the publicity frenzy that was the hunt for Scarlett. The feature of Olivia De Havilland (in 2004) discussing her role as Melanie is a real treat. The picture and sound are great on the 65th Anniversary DVD, and the special features are a true treasure. Accept no substitutes, seek out the 65th Anniversary DVD and bring it home.", u'0.720126', u'One of the greatest achievements in film history. This is not only an eye-popping cinematic treat, but one of the greatest stories ever put on celluloid. The movie lasts nearly four hours--- it\'s longer than any other mainstream commercially successful film ever made. But the time goes by so quickly that you\'ll miss it when it\'s over.\n\nOf course, we all know that this movie is set in the days of the Civil War in the 1860s. It\'s the story of Scarlett O\'Hara, a plantation owner\'s daughter who is very beautiful and who seemingly MUST have her own way at all times. She\'s willing to scheme and manipulate everyone in her path until she gets it. When the movie opens, the country is on the verge of civil war--- North against South--- but Scarlett barely notices, and doesn\'t care in the least. Her biggest obsession is that she\'s in love with dreamy/poetic Ashley Wilkes, and she stays in love with him throughout 98 percent of the movie. \n\nThe only problem is....Ashley doesn\'t have any particular interest in her at all. In fact, he spends most of the movie being married to gentle Melanie Hamilton--- a fact that frustrates Scarlett to no end. Ashley remains the one object of her desire that she is never to obtain.\n\nShe would have been better off pining after Rhett Butler, a much more solid, rather dangerous man with a reputation as a no-good scoundrel. He is openly attracted to Scarlett, grows to love her (although he dare not let her know, or she\'ll use it against him), and it\'s obvious that he would make a lot better match for her than the drab Ashley. Very late in the movie, he finally does marry Scarlett. But it\'s probably too late for them to be happy by then, ironically--- and they never really are happy together.\n\nThe complicated and utterly fascinating relationship between Scarlett, Rhett, Ashley, and Melanie is the fuel that keeps the movie going. But there are dozens, if not hundreds, of little extra twists and turns that fill out the movie. The Civil War backdrop for one, the colorful supporting roles for another. \n\nA great many reviewers here have seen Scarlett as purely a selfish, one-dimensional manipulative shrew. But she\'s far more than that! This is a complex, multi-dimensional young woman with lots of conflicting motives. Yes, she\'s selfish and manipulative. But she\'s also selfless: the extreme sacrifices that she makes on behalf of her family, and Melanie (keeping in mind that, other than her father, she doesn\'t even particularly like any of them) are nothing short of heroic. She is overwhelmingly protective of her loved ones. She\'s a ball of fire when work needs to be done, and she\'s fiercely courageous. \n\nDespite her hardness, she does also grow as a person. To her great credit, she slowly comes to value Melanie\'s friendship and support. She genuinely loves and is proud of her daughter. And at the very end of the movie, she does finally realize how ill-suited she and Ashley have always been for each other, and how little passion ever actually existed there.\n\nSome quick high points, and a few flaws: the supporting roles are superb in every way. Even the rather bland Ashley is given as much life as could be expected by actor Leslie Howard, and the other parts are vivid and fill out the movie. Two female parts in particular--- wise, funny, respected Mammy (Hattie McDaniel) and wistful, decent-at-heart prostitute Belle Watling (Ona Munson) are standouts.\n\nThe scenery and photography is possibly the most superb ever done in the history of film. Many scenes are just sumptuously lit and filmed. The gripping nighttime escape from Atlanta (the whole city seemingly in flames) is one of the most spectacular action sequences ever done. The sunsets are jaw-droppingly beautiful.\n\nMuch has been said about the supposed racism of this film. It\'s true that it does portray black slaves as being HAPPY to be slaves. But much more important, it\'s also true that the wisest person in the whole movie is Mammy. This black lady may be a slave--- later an employee--- but she is smart, funny, observant, and she\'s treated as an equal, if not a superior, throughout the movie. And it\'s made clear she deserves it. With no irony or rebuke whatever, she scornfully refers to certain low-lifes as "poor white trash", and we know (Mammy knows too) that if they get called that, they deserve it. She may be black, but she isn\'t inferior to them or anybody. And we root for her all the way.\n\nA few minor flaws, and I do mean minor: 1) Most of the acting looks pretty modern, but there are a very few scenes where it seems a little old-style. Hey enjoy the movie and don\'t worry \'bout it. People didn\'t do today\'s "method" acting in the 1930s. 2) Some of the "raw" scenes still have a Hollywood gloss to them. Even when Scarlett is on the brink of starvation and probably hasn\'t had a good bath in weeks, she looks perfectly made up with only a few hairs out of place. Oh well. It *was* big-time Hollywood after all. 3) The second half of the movie is more "talky" and less action-oriented than the first. I would not say it\'s more boring, just less movement. I don\'t find it draggy, but some people do. \n\nStill a heck of a good story, and a great film, so enjoy the ride!', u'0.1633', u"\n'Gone with the Wind' is one of the greatest American classics ever made. It tells the story of Scarlett O'Hara, played the very beautiful Vivien Leigh. She is one of the most selfish heroines you will ever see in a movie and still care for her. She is in love with Ashley Wilkes (Leslie Howard) but he marries to Melanie Hamilton. She is played by Olivia de Havilland in a great performance. A new man in Scarlett's life is Rhett Butler (Clark Gable) but Scarlett does everything to get what she wants including marrying someone for money and her own benefit. Rhett loves Scarlett with all his heart, mainly because they are much the same. They both think the world is there for them. Melanie and Scarlett become friends.\n\nThe movie is set in the time of the Civil War. What happens exactly with Scarlett, Rhett, Ashley and Melanie is for you to see but the war is pretty important for the story and the way it is used is great. The story itself is great anyway. Although the movie is long it is never boring. A reason for that is the performances. I already mentioned Olivia de Havilland, Clark Gable is very good, charming and sometimes funny, Hattie McDaniel as the black made is outstanding but I have to say that the best thing in this movie is Vivien Leigh. To make you care for a character like that is a pretty hard thing to do, but she makes it seem so easy. It is one of the strongest performances I have seen.\n\nBesides the story and the acting we have the music, the sets, the costumes, the cinematography and of course the direction. It is all great. It was made in 1939 and over 60 years later it still is a very impressive movie.", u'0.594164', u'What can one say? No matter how many times you\'ve seen "Gone With The Wind" it simply takes your breath away! The music, the technicolor, lovely Leigh in her most brilliant performance, roguish Gable, sensitive de Havilland and all of the others make it a must! It\'s so true (and sad) that Hollywood doesn\'t make films like this, anymore (which, is a real shame). "Gone With The Wind" is certainly "the" classic of all classics and just has to be the film seen by more people than any other film in the history of motion pictures. I\'m sure that no matter where you go in life, people all over the world will know of "Gone With The Wind" and will always regard it fondly as the most cherished of all Hollywood masterpieces!', u'0.203561', u"Gone With the Wind is without a doubt, one of the most magnificent romances ever. A realistic fiction that ends abruptly and leaves it's viewer/reader starving for more but unfortunately never produced a sequel. A book was written in the 90s that continued the story but trust me, it sucked. Scarlett was such a complex character, selfish, spirited, passionate about everything she wants. But in the end you see that Scarlett changes, she learns about communication and respect for all those who love her after she lost everyone who did. Never read the sequel if you read the first one because it isn't a Margaret Mitchell novel and therefor you won't SEE the complexity. Those of you who voted for this movie to have one star, I pity you. You cannot see the complexity or beauty of this wonderful tale or you just didn't see it and decided to vote for a movie you thought would be stupid when in fact it is the most popular civil war movie in history. Please support this movie and give it FAIR votes. It won ten Oscars and has claim to one of the most amazing casts ever so take that into consideration (plus the effort it took) when you give this movie a one/ten. It deserves so much more.", u'0.0874695', u'For some nostalgic dreamers, "Gone With the Wind" is a glorious swan song depicting the fall of the South during a devastating Civil War, and its reconstruction on the ashes of the Old Order, a Civilization forever "gone with the wind". It\'s the adaptation of Margaret Mitchell\'s epic tale written in bold letters with this peculiar ability to portray the Yankees as the \'bad guys\', so common in the stories related by Southerners, as they invite us to understand their idealism if not to root for it: a vision of Gallantry and Old European Nobility where women were courted, wives were submissive to their husbands and slaves treated with paternalism.\n\nBut for some idealistic spirits, "Gone With the Wind" resonates as one of the most heart-breaking pages of American History, when the North fought the South in the name of Liberty, Freedom and Justice, and when History, written by the victorious side, ultimately showed the Confederate as the \'ones who were wrong\'. "Gone With the Wind" chronicles what the South used to be, a world where coexisted two cultures, the Whites and the Colored. And the depiction of the slaves oscillates between the high pitched voice of the simple-minded Prissy (Butterfly McQueen) who knew nothing about "birthin\' babies" and the wisdom and authority of Mammy, Hattie McDaniel in her Oscar-winning role: two figures, two extremes, so rooted in our hearts it\'s impossible to dislike them, despite the obvious stereotypes.\n\nFor literate minds, History is only the setting while the film is an incredible achievement in storytelling, inviting us to follow a gallery of magnificent and appealing characters during a slice of life, where the passing of time can be felt, when History affects story with mercy or ruthlessness... sometimes tragic, sometimes ironic. It\'s a narrative whose emotional core is the heroine Scarlett O\'Hara (Vivien Leigh), whose heart belongs to the charming blonde Ashley Wilkes (Leslie Howard), married to the gentle and extremely good-hearted cousin Melanie Hamilton (Olivia de Havilland). A triangular love that sets the personality of Scarlett as a remarkable anti-heroine: selfish, greedy, jealous, but so brave, courageous and generous when the circumstances of War forever changed the face of the South. A great soul that could only be revealed by a great opportunity, a pivotal metamorphosis incarnated by the iconic "As God is my witness, I\'ll never be hungry again".\n\nThe fascinating aspect of Scarlett\'s personality is that her flaws elevated her above all the other characters: she doesn\'t care for etiquette, for traditions, her spirit is free, her ego is big and her heart so vulnerable. While the South is definitely turned to the past, Scarlett thinks of the future, as she says: "after all, tomorrow is another day". Scarlett is a modern figure and that\'s what makes her so appealing both in the film and to the audience. And Rhett Butler, Clark Gable in his most defining role as \'the visitor from Charleston\', is Scarlet\'s perfect match. Both don\'t belong to that era, they think of money, greed, prosperity, and passion. They embody all the values that America would stand for, transcending the old-fashioned setting of the South. But like the South\'s enthusiasm for War, the same pride that drives their passion would ruin their relationships.\n\nFor many passionate hearts, this is one of the most intense romances ever adapted to the big screen, a frustrating and seemingly impossible love between two strong-minded egos, two faces staring at each other as if they were at the verge of an irresistible passion or about to fight each other. As Scarlett was visibly jealous of Melanie when she went to bed with Ashley, the movie makes you penetrate the soul of these characters with such intensity you could feel she wished that Melanie could die. A childish and immature attitude, probably shared with Butler who wouldn\'t have minded if Ashley could die in the War, too. The love between Rhett and Scarlett is made of the same idealism that built the South myth, a lost but so endearing cause, a fire that burnt inside, and made pretty fitting that the most intimate and sensual moment they had was under the orange sky, during Atlanta\'s big fire. \n\nLove has never been as passionate as a love-and-hate relationship and never seemed a romance so comparable to a lost cause, mirroring the Southerners\' very faith in victory. Rhett\'s last stand when he takes Scarlett up the stairs in the \'one night she wouldn\'t turn him out\' is the perfect illustration of a love that pumped its energy from hate and anger. As Scarlett, lost in her love for Ashley, will never realize that her man is Rhett... and when she does, Rhett is already fed up and finally delivers the most unforgettable come-uppance ever: "Frankly, my dear, I don\'t give a damn" before disappearing in a foggy mist. Scarlett gets a magnificent lesson about life, and wouldn\'t have been as likable without this last slap in the face. This "I don\'t give a damn" voted #1 in the American Film Institute\'s Top 100 Movie quotes was Rhett\'s revenge, and he sure deserved it... and many wannabe-Scarlett would admit that too.\n\nBut while "Gone With the Wind" deals with lost causes, it\'s more than anything the triumph of Cinema as the most defining Art of the last century. Echoing the novel\'s status as a best- seller, it\'s one of the greatest films of all time, the greatest casting ever, the greatest score and the greatest challenge for superlatives. Victor Fleming\'s super-production that would become a landmark in film-making, with its unique visual style and beautiful cinematography in colors, forever incarnated by Scarlett\'s shadowy silhouette standing beside a tree, during a beautiful sunset. Along with "The Wizard of Oz", and "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington", "Gone With the Wind" is probably Hollywood\'s Golden Age reaching its pinnacle before the War would come in 1939 .', u'0.410395'], u'tt0061512': [u'\nHaving had the advantage of reading Donn Pearce\'s novel about a year before seeing Cool Hand Luke, it was with great anticipation that I awaited it\'s transfer to the big screen.  I was not disappointed.\n\nCool Hand Luke could easily be classified by the misguided as just a prison yarn, but it is so much more than that.  It is the story of a man who refuses to be nailed down or conform to the rules and regulations of a society that he has never craved to fit into.  When Lucas Jackson is arrested for cutting heads off parking meters, his explanation to the prison captain(Strother Martin) is "Small Town, not much to do in the evening", which would have us believe he was just being drunk and stupid.  Later, to one of the other inmates he mutters the same answer, but importantly adds "just settlin some old scores".  It is a brief but important point in helping to define the character of Luke beyond just being drunk and damaging public property.  As a service man, we also discover that Luke won a bronze star, achieved the rank of sergeant but came out as a private.  Again, early evidence that Luke is unable to conform to any body\'s rules but his own. Yet, we are given clear evidence that Luke knows what is right in principal and what is wrong.  At one point in the film when they are putting Luke in the box under less than reasonable circumstances, he tells the boss, "calling it your job don\'t make it right, Boss."  In a visit from his mother Arletta(Jo Van Fleet), Luke says plenty about his own character by telling her, "A man\'s got to go his own way" or as he also puts it, "I tried to live always free and above board like you but I can\'t seem to find no elbow room".  \n\nAs Luke enters the prison that will supposedly be his home for the next two years, we meet the other inmates.  Some of them wear chains, some of them do not.  It is a point early in the film that director Stuart Rosenberg, emphasizes.  We understand quickly that sooner or later you conform.    You either walk the line the way the bosses tell you to, or they will find the means to get you to walk the line.  As the Captain reiterates, "for your own good, you\'ll learn the rules" A point driven home often.\n\nWhat we discover about their crimes is minuscule.  One is jailed for manslaughter after hitting a pedestrian with his car, another is a paper hanger, another new inmate is charged with breaking, entering and assault.  The nature of their crimes is unimportant to us.  It enables to view these prisoners as men, and while we don\'t feel any genuine sympathy for them, feeling disgusted by their crimes would have been a distraction from the true purpose of Pearce\'s story, and Luke as the focal point.\n\n\nBecause of his individuality, it doesn\'t take Luke long before he unexpectedly becomes a hero to the other inmates.  It is not a role he chooses, or even wants.  It unexpectedly imposes the burden on him of having to live up to the expectations of others.  He never truly understands the nature of this hero worship, and would be just as happy if he didn\'t have to deal with it.  He is still trying to find his way in the world, and if there is any real purpose for his existence.\n\nAnother principal character is Dragline(George Kennedy).  It is he who finally establishes the fact that Cool Hand Luke is a man who can not be beaten.  Dragline\'s admiration for Luke seems to extend from the fact that he(Dragline)has learned the rules on how to get by, but yet regrets having lost some of his own individuality in the process.  He is the rest of the inmates in microcosm.  I can\'t remember a role that George Kennedy has ever been better in, and he deservedly won the best supporting actor award.\n\nCool Hand Luke is not without it\'s humorous moments especially in the  early going.  It is these moments that help move the film from the early stages to the darker more despairing later stages.  Perhaps, for that reason alone we are even more effected by Luke\'s dilemma.\n\nIn translating his novel to the screen Donn Pearce along with Frank Pierson, has managed to bring the heart and soul of his nove to the big screen.  Lalo Shifrin\'s memorable score emphasizes often the repeated drudgery of working on the chain gang.  Director Stuart Rosenberg made more good films after Cool Hand Luke, but in my opinion never achieved the same degree of perfection that he does here.   \n\nAs Cool Hand Luke, Paul Newman give one of the most memorable performances in a long distinguished career.  It is not an easy task portraying a man who travels the road from being a sincere individualist, to a man who may be beaten and defeated, yet in the end is still unwilling to accept that fate.  Although Rod Steiger won the best actor award that year, one could argue that Newman\'s role was more difficult, as it required substantially different subtle ranges in character.  As for the failure of Cool Hand Luke to achieve a Best Picture nomination, I\'m at a loss to explain that malfunction, especially when the likes of Doctor Doolittle and Guess Who\'s Coming To Dinner, far lesser efforts than this were nominated.\n\nCool Hand Luke is a true classic in every sense of the word.  It is a film that will long be remembered.\n\nMy grade: A+     \n\n', u'-0.0161972', u'This film got me from the first frame to the last. It\'s not even because of the story (which I love, of course) - it\'s just so very well made. And so modern. The kind of angles and perspectives the camera uses, the way it zooms in and out or even allows itself (literally) to get dirty - the way this whole picture was shot is just something I haven\'t seen in an American film released prior to this one. \n\nAnd yet, although it is considered a classic, when people talk about the "New Hollywood" somehow \'Cool Hand Luke\' is hardly ever mentioned - despite the fact that it came out only a couple of months after \'Bonnie and Clyde\' in 1967 and before \'The Graduate\'. \n\nI look at this film mainly as a character study but the story arc also works very well and it hasn\'t aged a bit. This is one of those rare films that was way ahead of its time and which has simply everything: great acting, iconic characters and scenes, wonderful music - and the cinematography is just unbelievable. \n\nFunny, tragic and moving, \'Cool Hand Luke\' is one hell of a film. What we\'ve got here is NOT failure to communicate - but a 10 star masterpiece.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/', u'0.744669', u"\nOne of the reasons that the late 60s/early 70s was such a powerful era in filmmaking is the emergence of the anti-hero (defined as an individual with heroic qualities, but not in a position we would usually find a hero).  This is symbolized greatly in `Cool Hand Luke'.  We can identify with Luke because his crime is venial and his concerns over the great questions of life are ours.  It is because of this and his persuasive charm that the other prisoners (played remarkably well by Kennedy and a host of others to include Wayne Rogers, Ralph Waite, Dennis Hopper and one of the actors who played a crewmember on `Alien') live vicariously through him.\n\nFilled with memorable scenes (the boxing match, 50 eggs, the fealty of his fellow prisoners who help him finish his food after his stomach is shrunk in solitary confinement, `shakin' it here boss', the sneezing dogs, and of course the carwash part) and outstanding character development (created by what is said and what is not said, i.e. the visiting brother), one of screen history's most repeated lines and the great acting of Newman, this movie deserves to be called a classic.  Released the same year as `Bonnie and Clyde', it makes one long for the days when you needed a real script to make a movie.     \n", u'0.317799', u'The rebel character in Hollywood after the death of James Dean went through a period of transition and did not gain definite new characteristics until the late sixties...\n\nThe three established rebel/anti-heroes in movies were Paul Newman, Warren Beatty, and Steve McQueen...\n\nIn 1967, screen audiences were exposed to two new rebel hero characters, Clyde Barrow, a rebel without a cause with enough guts to strike out against any bank, and Luke Jackson, an anti-hero \'born to lose,\' but a man full of pride and dignity...\n\n"Cool Hand Luke" resumes Newman\'s career as another rebel, a non-conformist, a perfect hero who beats the system wherever...\n\nSuperbly directed by Stuart Rosenberg, Newman exhibits a complete arrangement of emotions invading every nuance and implication... Resources of his true command of his technical acting are breathtaking in their impact... The motion picture (nominated for 4 Academy Awards) won him his 4th Academy Award nomination... \n\nNewman is again a cynical loner, but he\'s also charming, and everything is calculated to involve us with him; like "Hombre," the film begins and ends with closeups of his face, but here, appropriately, he has an engaging smile\x85 \n\nThe opening, where he drinks beer, unscrews tops from parking meters and mumbles to the arriving cop, recalls Dean\'s drunken incoherence at the start of "Rebel Without a Cause"\x97an apt title for Luke\x85 He breaks rules for no apparent reason, wherever he is, including the chain gang to which he\'s sentenced\x85 \n\nUnlike Paul Muni in "I Am a Fugitive From a Chain Gang," who steals only to eat and is turned by society into a hardened criminal, Luke is a criminal from the start, and his crime isn\'t motivated by hunger\x85 It\'s a meaningless anti-authority gesture\x97the existentialist "gratuitous act," committed purely for the sake of committing it\x85 Luke engages our sympathy not because he is economically deprived or the product of an unhappy home, but because for him the act of rebellion is its own justification: he\'s the perfect sixties hero\x85\n\nInitially, Luke alienates the prisoners by his indifference and sarcasm, and the top dog, Dragline (George Kennedy) picks a fight with him\x85 Luke is severely beaten but keeps fighting, and this\x97plus his continual defiance of the guards\x97wins him the men\'s respect\x85 Their admiration grows when he proves he can eat 50 hard-boiled eggs, one after the other, in only one hour, another gratuitous act ("somethin\' to do"). \n\nBut Luke gradually becomes a victim of the excessive admiration, rebelling because they expect him to, which leads to a pattern of escapes and captures\x85 As the warden says, "What we got here is a failure to communicate. Some men you just can\'t reach." Even though Luke becomes subservient after torture, he again escapes\x85 Dragline admires the way he fooled the guards while planning all along to escape\x85 But Luke says he really did break down, and asserts: "l never planned anything in my life." Even his last act is motivated not by heroism but by impulse\x85\n\nThe physical punishment Newman\'s characters often undergo reaches an extreme here, as Luke constantly invites pain (in his fight with Dragline, he says, "You\'re gonna have to kill me."). Underlying his sometimes vigorous rebelliousness is despair at a cruelly indifferent world\x85 But the men need a hero, and Dragline perpetuates the myth, telling them that he had "that Luke smile" to the very end\x85 We last see a montage of shots of Luke smiling\x97the men\'s vision of him as unbeaten and almost immortal\x85 \n\nNewman\'s performance is among his best, and Luke is one of his definitive studies of non conformism\x85 As in "Hombre," he underplays, but in a loose, relaxed, "cool" manner\x85 He\'s affecting in a wide range of moods: quiet detachment, wry contempt, raw courage, exhaustion, exuberance, gentleness, anger, resignation\x85 \n\nThere\'s a superb1y understated scene in which Luke\'s dying mother (Jo Van Fleet) visits him\x85 Like Rocky Graziano, he says he tried to live cleanly, but could never find a way\x85 But the mood is quite different here: instead of intense emotion, there are on1y ingenious expressions of uneasiness, regret, sadness, acceptance\x85 Newman conveys his unspoken affection entirely through his glances and reactions, as she wistfully remarks that she once had high hopes for him\x85 \n\nThe actor even survives the film\'s pretentious attempts to make him a mock-Christ figure\x85 Besides the obvious sacrifice-resurrection parallel, he\'s even shown in the exact crucifixion position following his fifty-egg (Last Supper?) ordeal\x85 There are two badly conceived dialogs with a God he doesn\'t believe in\x97after which he realizes, "l gotta find my own way," a rather unconcealed statement of existential despair\x97but Newman performs them with quiet conviction\x85. \n\nHis mock religion is better suggested by the bottle opener he wears in lieu of a religious medal\x85 And the despair is effectively dramatized in his reaction to his mother\'s death\x85 The men leave him by himself, and he sits on his bed, playing the banjo\x85 With a sad, breaking voice, he sings a religious parody: "l don\'t care if it rains or freezes, long as 1 got my plastic Jesus\x85" He looks down and begins crying, but sings faster, obsessively, withdrawing into himself and expressing his utter loneliness in a world that has no God\x85 It\'s one of the most moving scenes in all of Newman\'s work\x85\n\nParalleled to "One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest," "Cool Hand Luke" is a character study, which works beautifully, very well-made with sense of graphic imagery and cinema view, a good-looking film with superb photography in Color, extremely good as an entertainment...', u'0.120846', u'\nTruly a memorable movie, and more than just a documentary about southern road gangs. It\'s a study on the theme of the indomitability of the human spirit in the face of oppression. I was about to name this as Newman\'s finest performance until I thought of Eddy Felsen in "The Hustler" and Frank Galvin in "The Verdict"; it\'s impossible to choose among such a cornucopia of acting achievements, but Luke is right up there (the analogy to Luke as Christ becomes a tad heavy-handed when we see him, at the close of the egg-eating scene, stretched out, arms outward, feet crossed, as if crucified; none the less, it\'s a powerful image). There is no doubt, however, about George Kennedy as Dragline; it is his finest achievement, and fully deserves the Oscar he got for Best Supporting Actor. It is also fascinating to find so many familiar faces among the inmates - actors such as Dennis Hopper, Harry Dean Stanton, Joe Don Baker, Ralph Waite. and Wayne Rogers - who would go on to fame in their own right. This movie can unquestionably be called a classic. American Movie Classics just started (11/2000) showing a beautifully restored letterbox version which shows it in all its glory. ', u'0.621237', u'"For the secret of man\'s being is not only to live but to have something to live for. Without a stable conception of the object of life, man would not consent to go on living, and would rather destroy himself than remain on earth, though he had bread in abundance." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky. \n\nStuart Rosenberg directs "Cool Hand Luke". The plot? Paul Newman plays Luke Jackson, a young drifter who returns home after WW2. Luke\'s been dealt one bad hand after the next, and, no matter how he plays his cards, always seems to lose. The film opens with Luke, drunk and shameless, knocking the heads off parking meters. The authorities try to cash in on our everyday movements, and this lack of freedom ticks Luke off. The poor guy just wants to be free, man.\n\nAfter being arrested, Luke is sent to a Florida prison. What then unfolds is one of the greatest existential movies of all time. Luke\'s experiences, his conversations with God, his isolation and alienation, and a pair of profound scenes, both involving his mother, elevate "Cool Hand Luke" above most prison-break movies.\n\nOf course this period saw a number of strong prison flicks ("The Great Escape", "The Bridge on the River Kwai", "King Rat", "Birdman of Alcatraz", "Papillon", "Cuckoo\'s Nest", "The Hole", "Escape from Alcatraz", "A Man Escaped", "Riot in Cell Block 11" etc), but "Cool Hand Luke" takes a far more mythical stance. We don\'t know much about Luke. He\'s held at a distance, never looks anyone in the eyes when speaking and always has a sly grin on his face. And yet behind his smile we sense deep pain, though its a pain matched by a dogged spirit to continue fighting. \n\nInterestingly, whilst a film like "One Flew Over The Cuckoo\'s Nest" had a system that despite its flaws genuinely tried to heal and help others, Luke\'s social institution is corrupt and in many aspects pointless. Still, for a while Luke abides by it. He goes about the state\'s business with a smile, cutting grass and paving roads. He only has 2 years in chains. He can make it. And like he says, he has no place else to go. No plans. He plays his cards with cool, detached ambivalence.\n\nIn one beautiful scene, Luke\'s dying mother comes to visit. What follows is a touching conversation, she informing us that tried her best with Luke, giving him nothing but love. And yet, no amount of motherly affection has helped her family. Because of this, she says, she "wishes mankind were like dogs". She wishes she could abandon her children and forget about them, never having to worry or fret about how they are, what they\'ll do or where they\'ll go. Of course she loves Luke, but hates the agony he puts her through. And yet we sense that she understands him intimately. Perhaps she admires him because she too has been dealt a life of bad hands.\n\nLuke\'s outlook changes when his mother dies and the prison warden locks him in a box for no particular reason. When the Boss says "Just doing my job", Luke replies "That don\'t make it right." \n\nFrom here on Luke begins to fight back. He refuses to spend his life on his knees and refuses to submit. The film then becomes a tale of resistance and idolatry. The other inmates quickly begin to idolise Luke, worshipping his never-give-up spirit. But rather than fight themselves, they sit back and exalt Luke, relying him to personify their own desires. Luke begins to resent this. "Step feeding off me!" he yells. But they\'re content to sit on the sidelines. He\'s a one man revolution, and like many revolutionaries is praised for his stance from afar but never actively supported. Why do men have to die for causes before we take notice?\n\nThe film ends on an ambiguous note, in which Luke may or may not be riddled with bullets. Does Luke smile? Does he die? Does he survive? If he does survive, is his survival merely wishful thinking on the part of his fellow inmates? Note that the film\'s final image is a brief shot of a photograph. It was established in an earlier sequence that this idyllic photograph represents a lie. We also know that the photograph\'s image was staged and that the photograph itself was torn to shreds earlier in the film. The ending thus suggests that though Luke has died and the system utterly beaten him down, the men nevertheless choose to believe in him. They believe he has risen - indeed, the film is filled with Christian imagery) - that he\'s survived death and still fighting the fight, sticking it to the man for all of mankind.\n\nBut like that photograph, the inmate\'s belief is an illusion. Luke is dead, and though his fighting spirit remains in the hearts of these men, it will take something larger to wake them up and shake them out of weak surrender. In the end, "Cool Hand Luke" suggests something almost contradictory: that hope must be held onto lest we submit, but that such hope, fuelled by a kind of mythologising and shared delusion, is precisely what engenders submission. \n\n9/10- An accidental masterpiece. The planets really lined up for this one. The only flaw is an overly silly (though iconic) car wash scene.\n\nWorth multiple viewings.', u'-0.114423', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nAs an earlier excellent reviewer wrote the film is about conformity and Luke\'s inability to fit in the role cut out for him. He says,"I tried Arletta...," but it is much more than this: it is the voice of the counterculture whose hero Luke is. Like Dirty Harry, Luke looks at \'the man\'s world,\' and sees nothing that interests him. A modern, much lesser parallel is Coppola\'s RUMBLE FISH. Rourke is like Luke; he just cannot find anything that is offered that appeals to him. His rebellion is existential; he simply has a being in the world that will not work anywhere. So, he becomes nihilistic like Motorcycle Boy. Both Harry, Luke and Motorcycle Boy have great courage but they were born in the wrong place and the wrong time. Boredom consumes Luke; the egg eating contest, besides providing the only levity in the film, delineates the depth of Luke\'s nihilistic rebellion. He vents at the Deity; on the road and in the church daring Him to let me have it," you there Old Man?"\n\nIt must be seen for what it is at its core; like all films it is a product of its zeitgeist. Here, it is the 60s, get the man. Like Harry, the system is stupid, broken and cruel. Luke sneers contemptuously at the boss and says,"saying its your job don\'t make it right boss." The other target is the hypocrisy of his keepers protecting their tender consciences from the cruelty they are subjecting the prisoners too. I love,"I wish you\'d stop being so good to me captain." This provokes Strother Martin because they all need to hide in the \'man\'s game\' of putative rehabilitation instead of sadistic punishment which is what it is. Luke\'s strength that wins the hearts of all the others is also his fatal flaw. Luke cannot stop his rebellion; it is inherently nihilistic like Motorcycle Boy\'s. He wishes to die; after Arletta goes the last tether to existence is cut. He goes down a death spiral. Dragline looks at him befuddled; why does he not stop?: because he can\'t. \n\nYes, like both of Rosenberg\'s prison movies this and BRUBAKER they are about the cruelty of prison. Yet, COOL HAND Luke is a study of an existential drop out; the world simply has no place for him. It is an error to attack the movie as not really a movie but a series of episodes. These episodes: egg contest, dragline fight, escapes, all function to reveal Luke\'s Dasein or being there. Luke is escaping but from life; he does not really grasp it himself. Arletta\'s death is the final straw; as he sings PLASTIC Jesus, that is how the world is to him; an empty, phony facade full of rule making hypocritical liars. He wants no more of it; they break him, but the pull downward is ineluctable. He cannot help himself. The last sneering mockery that brings about his death is the quintessence of Luke: he vomits back their lying hypocrisy. We see astonishment on his face; the world he never really was in destroyed him. \n\nIt is a sad, dark often sacrilegious film; it may deviate from my beliefs that does not make me honor it any less. PAUL NEWMAN\'S BEST MOVIE. Watch what society does to deviants; it is not a pretty picture.', u'-0.303592', u"This is an absolute perfect movie in every way.Storyline,acting,settings---everything is perfect.Hollywood used to make great movies like this before it became the special effects driven computer generated movie making schlock capitol of the world.\n\nThe great Paul Newman plays a prisoner locked up in a Southern jail after a night of petty crimes.His constant struggle to be free even while locked up makes this one of the greatest roles ever seen in a movie.Newman is at his absolute peak playing the cool Lucas Jackson.I was so struck by Newman's performance in this movie I was determined to name my son Lucas Jackson,but alas,I only had daughters and my wife wasn't too thrilled about naming either of them Lucas.Oh well.\n\nGeorge Kennedy plays Jackson's enemy turned buddy and he is absolutely perfect also.His portrayal of Dragline is Kennedy at his finest.The sublime Strother Martin plays the prison captain and damn is he ever good.He was always so underrated as is Kennedy too,I think.\n\nIn fact this whole movie is full of familiar faces that would go on to other big time roles in TV and movies.In this movie everyone meshes perfectly to create an unforgettable movie that will stay with you long after many other movies you've seen fade from memory.\n\nYou must see this movie.", u'0.322549', u'Luke (Paul Newman) lands himself in a Deep South prison farm for drunkenly cutting the heads off of parking meters. Once at the farm Luke refuses to be ground down by the system and its grinning warden (a brilliant Strother Martin). As things role by Luke becomes something of a hero to his fellow inmates and this is not lost on the authority in charge of the farm. Things are sure to come to a head as Luke rebels to the point of no return...\n\nDivision of Corrections. Road Prison 36.\n\nThe close examination of Cool Hand Luke over the years has rightly thrown up the fact that it\'s a Christ allegory. Which is just fine given that Stuart Rosenberg\'s film is one of the finest films that the 60s had to offer. It also boasts, arguably of course, the Paul Newman signature role (yes even better than The Hustler). As the title suggests, Cool Hand Luke, both the film and character, there is a great deal of cool here, in fact for a great deal of the first half of movie it\'s laced with comic touches as we warm easily to the "rebel - against - the - system" machismo and charm that Newman provides as Lukas Jackson. But the film shifts considerably at the mid-point to give us something far more potent and dramatic to alter any preconceptions the audience had of this just being a movie about a macho loner earning our sympathy.\n\nCalling it your job don\'t make it right Boss.\n\nMuch in the film has been firmly ensconced in the memorable moments department: 50 eggs, tar that road quickly, the "Kick a Buck" poker game, "still shaking boss", a mountain of rice to be eaten, sneezing bloodhounds, the boxing match and one of the greatest and most iconic of tag-lines ever; "what we got here is a failure to communicate", all forming part of a truly great whole. However, revisiting the picture often brings the realisation that so much more is on offer than at first thought. Luke is a real war hero whose crime is pretty tame for the sentence he finds himself faced with, the Dragline (George Kennedy kicking up a storm of acting quality) and Luke friendship that builds with grace and thunder, sexual frustration of the incarcerated male and a mother and son arc that attacks the soul and lets Newman show many of his acting peers just how grief should be acted out on screen...\n\n"Well, I don\'t care if it rains or freezes, Long as I have my plastic Jesus, Riding on the dashboard of my car. Through all trials and tribulations, We will travel every nation, With my plastic Jesus I\'ll go far"\n\nWith Newman, Kennedy and Martin holding court with every scene they are in, it would be easy at first glance to ignore the supporting roles, but Rosenberg ensures that supporting players make telling marks. It\'s a roll call of sweaty and twitchy character actors that features the likes of Anthony Zerbe, Joe Don Baker, Clifton James, Harry Dean Stanton, Dennis Hopper, Morgan Woodward, Wayne Rogers and J.D. Cannon. Filmed in Technicolor and Panavision, Rosenberg and cinematographer Conrad Hall do an amazing job of making Stockton, California feel like the actual Deep South. Film unfolds to the backdrop of a sun- drenched land inhabited by life\'s unfortunates and the supposed upstanding face of American officialdom...\n\nIconography and martyrdom unbound, Cool Hand Luke is a slow-burn classic of deep thematic worth. 10/10', u'0.411454', u'In Cool Hand Luke Paul Newman shows us what the underside of what life is like as a rebel. Picture James Dean doing this part had he lived to do films like these.\n\nNewman plays his usual non-conformist rebel type, but he\'s really a rebel without a cause. He\'s in his early forties, a Korean war veteran who just hasn\'t found his place in civilian life. He gets himself busted for no great cause, just on a drunken spree in some Southern town he decides to knock the heads off a bunch of parking meters.\n\nThat lands him a stint in a county jail with a lot of outdoor work on a road gang. He fights with, but later wins the respect and becomes friends with George Kennedy the head honcho in his barracks.\n\nThe real tragedy of Cool Hand Luke is that Newman is a failure in life, it\'s why he\'s in prison. He gains the respect of his fellow convicts for those ways, but that involves going against the penal system and in the end that gets you nothing. Can you picture James Dean as a forty something doing what Newman is doing? It would have been his kind of role for sure.\n\nNewman does a fine job playing the non-conformist Luke who seems to be just going on the path fate has decreed for him. George Kennedy got his Oscar winning career role as Dragline. Other men in Luke\'s barracks are Wayne Rogers, Robert Drivas, and J.D. Cannon and they fill their roles well.\n\nStrother Martin as the warden of the place is the guy with the film\'s favorite line, "what we\'ve got is failure to communicate." Martin and his correction officers have many interesting ways of getting their point across.\n\nCool Hand Luke may very well be the saddest role Newman ever undertook in his long career.', u'0.0869798', u'Cool Hand Luke is perhaps Paul Newman\'s most memorable character. He was outstanding as Hud, but he seems to have topped that performance in this 1967 classic.\n\nNewman plays a man named Luke. After cutting the heads off some parking meters, he is thrown into a prison system where he\'s forced to do some hard time tending to country roads. This character has to be one of the biggest enigmas in film history. Luke is likable enough. His mother points out to him that he\'s even had some good jobs. The viewer is left to ponder why in the heck he can\'t stay out of trouble.\n\nNot much is told about his past. We know he fought WWII, and even won some medals. He has no wife or children to care for. He has a mother who appears to be dying of lung cancer or some such ailment. His other family members seem to hold a grudge against him. We never really learn why he feels the need to cut the heads off the parking meters, but he\'s caught red-handed. The prison he\'s sent to makes its inmates work their tails off, but it looks like they\'ll treat you fairly if you follow their rules. Luke has no intentions of following any rules laid down by the warden or the "bosses" that watch over the road work, though.\n\nAfter taking a tremendous beating from the toughest inmate (Kennedy), Luke quickly begins to win the admiration of his fellow prisoners. His spirit catches on with the others, and they begin to get their work done more quickly and effectively than ever before. Things begin to go downhill for Luke once he learns of his mother\'s passing. He repeatedly tries to escape, and soon the warden and his cronies are out to break his spirit and make him conform. The film becomes a test of wills, and a fascinating character study.\n\nThe biggest question the viewer is left with is "why?". Luke could have simply served out his time and then gone on to a more normal existence. That seems to be out of the realm of possibilities for the character, however. He isn\'t simply out to impress the other prisoners. At one point he even demands they stop trying to feed off of him for all their strength. Luke seems like a man who simply cannot allow others to tell him how to live. There are a few moments where he openly questions the existence of God, but that angle doesn\'t go very far. It merely makes the guards want to abuse him even more, but that\'s about it. It becomes almost frustrating to see this man keep digging a bigger and bigger hole for himself. At one point Luke is forced to literally do just that.\n\nWhat exactly is the film trying to tell us? It doesn\'t seem to be advocating disobedience. We cheer for Luke when he\'s causing trouble for the guards, but we feel his pain when they punish him. The film\'s conclusion is more somber than inspiring.\n\nRosenberg\'s direction is outstanding, and the supporting cast shines. George Kennedy earned an Oscar for his performance. Overall this is an excellent film not to be missed! 10 of 10 stars from The Hound.', u'-0.165026', u'Perhaps one of the last of the chain-gang movies (until it was briefly shown in the beginning of 2000\'s "O, Brother Where Art Thou?), this has always been (1) an interesting film (2) a wonderfully photographed movie.\n\nYou hear more about the story and about Paul Newman than you usually hear about the cinematography, but it\'s good and this movie should be seen in widescreen. It was offered as such even on VHS.\n\nWhen I looked at this film sometime in the \'90s, I was surprised that the famous line from it: "What we have here is a failure to communicate," was only used twice, and the second time being the last sentence uttered by Newman. I had thought that Strother Martin had said it several times. Boy, Martin was one of the more effective villains in some 1960s film, a mean-talking sadistic guy.\n\nThis movie was another of the pioneers in promoting a new thing on screen: the "anti-hero," so it was popular in the protest decade of the \'60s. Newman\'s character fit right into the period where the rebel is the hero and the authority figure is the bad guy. You\'ve seen this repeatedly ever since, although filmmakers have always loved rebels.\n\nGeorge Kennedy gives Newman memorable support as "Dragline" and was aptly awarded for his performance. Someone who I always remembered was the prison guard who said nothing, just stared through his sunglasses. I can always picture that guy and those reflective glasses. That, and eating 50 hard- boiled eggs have stuck with me for over 40 years!', u'0.110131', u'\nNow that it has become sort of fashionable to speak or write badly about the films of the 60s and 70s, saying that people stopped going to the movie theatres during that fruitful period (which is not true), we must -more than ever-rate a flick as "Cool Hand Luke" as it really deserves. The rebel spirit of the lead character (played to perfection by the excellent Paul Newman) against that brutal and -most of the times- unfair "establishment" represented by the prison guards is a subject that remains as topical as ever. If this picture had been made today, it could also probably be good, but it would undoubtedly be much more unpleasant and filled with four-letter words. Besides, who could match the performances of Newman, George Kennedy (the deservedly Oscar-winner who has kept on making a brilliant career -do you remember him as "The Blue Knight"?), Strother Martin, J.D.Cannon, etc.? Jo Van Fleet\xb4s character as Luke\xb4s mother seems a sort of slightly-aged version of her role as James Dean\xb4s mum in "East Of Eden", and it is really worthwhile. The scene of the hard-boiled eggs is a classic and a gem, but my favourite scene in the movie is that of the car-washing girl so wonderfully played by Joy Harmon (who is really a Joy for any man\xb4s eyes); that character truly says a lot of things without speaking -her gorgeous body speaks for her! I must say that it\xb4s not only one of the sexiest scenes I\xb4ve ever seen in a film but also a very significative one: there is an enormous contrast between the image of the lass moving and shaking in complete and absolute freedom (even in her way of dressing) and the imprisoned men-at-work who watch her as something extremely desirable but, alas, completely out of reach. (The viewer can really feel like a prisoner too!). All in all, this is a fine film of the 60s, but also of the 70s, the 80s, the 90s, the 21st century and whatever God wants it to come. ', u'0.291307', u'This film is set in America\'s Deep South in the years after the Second World War. Luke Jackson, a down-on-his-luck war veteran, is arrested for vandalising parking meters while drunk and sentenced to imprisonment in a brutally tough prison. At first his offhand, seemingly arrogant, attitude alienates not only the prison governor and guards but also his fellow-prisoners, and he is soon challenged to a fight by another inmate named Dragline. The tall, powerfully built Dragline is an easy victor, but Luke\'s determination and fighting spirit, never knowing when he is beaten and refusing to quit, arouse the respect of the others, especially Dragline who becomes his close friend. Luke becomes a hero to the prisoners because they see him as a rebel who refuses to be beaten by the system. (His nickname stems from the cool way in which he plays a hand at poker, but it also refers to his remaining cool in the face of persecution). Luke makes two escape attempts, but on both occasions he is recaptured and brought back to the prison for punishment by the guards who are determined to break his spirit. It seems that they have succeeded, but then Luke and Dragnet make one last break for freedom.\n\nOn one level this film is a critique of the inhumanity of the American prison system, part of a tradition going back to "I am a Fugitive from a Chain Gang" and continuing more recently with "Brubaker" (also directed by Stuart Rosenberg) and the less successful "The Last Castle". The regime in this jail is particularly inhuman. The prisoners are put to work all day digging ditches in the hot sun. (It is never made clear whether the ditches need to be dug and the prisoners are a useful source of free labour, or whether putting them to demeaning and useless work is seen as a means of keeping them under control and of giving vent to the sadistic impulses of their jailers). There is a long list of petty regulations, breach of which is punished by "a night in the box", a tiny cell used for solitary confinement. The guards take a perverse delight in tormenting and humiliating the prisoners. Strother Martin\'s governor (who prefers to be called "the Captain") is a particularly frightening figure, a little man with a grating, high-pitched voice who can even make a piece of bland management-speak like "What we have here is a failure to communicate" sound like a terrifying threat.\n\nThe film is more, however, than a social-realist exposure of conditions in America\'s jails. It was made in the sixties, the decade when the times they were a-changing and when traditional concepts of authority were being challenged everywhere. Like a number of films from the sixties and seventies, "Cool Hand Luke" reflects this popular mood. The film with which it has most in common is "One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest" in which Jack Nicholson does for mental asylums what Paul Newman does here for prisons. Newman\'s screen persona was often that of the cool, detached outsider. This may have had the effect of narrowing his range as an actor somewhat- he could often seem too laid back in more traditional types of film, such as Hitchcock\'s "Torn Curtain"- but it meant that he could be excellent playing anti-heroes in films of this nature. ("Hombre" is another example). Here, in one of his best performances, he makes Luke a symbol of the little man standing up against authority. We learn that he was a hero in the war and was decorated a number of times but that he finished the war as a private after being demoted from sergeant. The implication is that military discipline was as uncongenial to him as prison discipline and that he lost his rank for some act of insubordination. Even his crime can be seen as a protest against the petty tyranny of rules and regulations of which parking meters are a symbol.\n\nThere has been speculation about the possible religious implications of the film and whether Luke is intended to be a Christ-figure. Certainly, the shot in which he is seen in a crucifix-like pose after the egg-eating contest is derived from standard Christian imagery, but in my view this is not a deliberate Christian allegory along the lines of "Whistle Down the Wind" or "The Omega Man". In orthodox Christian thought, Christ is much more than a rebel against authority or even a man unjustly persecuted; he is also the Son of God and the Redeemer of mankind. One scene does not an allegory make. Nevertheless, there are undoubted religious overtones to the film. If Luke is an allegorical figure, the allegory is not with Christ but with Everyman, a man in search (sometimes a despairing search) of God. He claims not to believe in God, yet has long conversations with Him. The song he sings after the death of his mother is irreverent, possibly blasphemous, but blasphemy is the sin of the angry believer, not of the unbeliever. A true atheist cannot blaspheme, because there is nothing for him to blaspheme against.\n\nNewman was nominated for "Best Actor" and George Kennedy won a well-deserved "Best Supporting Actor" for his portrayal of Dragline, but I was surprised that the film was not nominated as "Best Picture", especially as the nominations in 1968 included a film as weak as "Dr Doolittle". Whatever the Academy may have thought, however, "Cool Hand Luke" is a film that has matured well. It is a multi-layered film that works well on each of its several levels of meaning. With "I am a Fugitive\x85." and "The Birdman of Alcatraz", it is one of the greatest of all prison dramas. This was Stuart Rosenberg\'s first feature film, but like Orson Welles ("Citizen Kane"), Sidney Lumet ("Twelve Angry Men") and Bryan Forbes ("Whistle Down the Wind") he made a great film on his first attempt. 9/10', u'-0.124033', u'\nAmazing movie....watched it for the first time three or four years ago. Seen it plenty of times since......this, along with "One Flew over the Cuckoo\'s Nest", is one of my favorite films of all-time. Luke is a truly memorable character; funny, tragic, inspirational.....a lot like Randle Patrick McMurphy. Paul Newman once again proved the Academy to be full of idiots, giving a great performance deserving of an Oscar. How he only won once, when Sally Field is the owner of two statuettes, is inexplicable. His run of classic films and touchstone characters from the 60s-70s (Luke, Fast Eddie, Butch, etc) is unparalleled. George Kennedy was good, too......I mightn\'t be good at critiquing, but I know what I like. And I like this.\n', u'0.396409'], u'tt0978762': [u"There's a constant stream of animated films these days, but mostly they're either glossy Hollywood product (Pixar/Dreamworks), or Japanese anime. For adults wanting something different we have to wait for the likes of The Nightmare Before Christmas, Waltz With Bashir, Persepolis, or Aardman's films to turn up. Mary & Max is one of these films that comes as a complete departure from all the others, both in visual and storytelling style, and sticks in the mind because of it. I won't repeat the plot here, so I'll just mention a few pros and cons. The cons are obvious. Some people will be put off by the almost constant narration (which took me a while to get used to), the rather numerous calamities (a lot more than you'd expect if you thought this was just a kids film), and the sadness within some of these people's stories. It's actually a little surprising that the film got made without the people financing it demanding a script that was more tailored to appeal to a wider audience. What we get is something that feels a whole lot more personal than the higher profile animated films. It feels personal, and therefore real, and the explanation is that it was written from life by a director who has a real feeling and sympathy for people who don't quite fit into the world, and feel alienated or are misunderstood by others. Mary was partly inspired by the director's own childhood (and there's a little bit of Toni Collette's Muriel Heslop thrown in I suspect), and Max is also based on a real person he's been pen friends with (but so far has never met in person). The way the film handles his Asperger's Syndrome just feels different to how you'd normally see such an issue handled on screen. There's a constant stream of humour (ironic, black, childish), and I really enjoyed the small perfect touches on growing up in an Australian suburb in the 70's and 80's, and the depiction of grey New York, as it appears to the easily frightened Max. The animation is constantly a joy to watch, and I highly recommend seeing it on the big screen where it can be properly appreciated in all it's hand-made glory.", u'0.0727965', u"It's hard to describe just how excellent this film is. The story is great, both very funny and touching. The art-design and animation are a delight, thoughtful, very rich in details, and very consistent in style. The music is great. The storyline and direction... I can't find a bad word to say, except that the story drags a little half- way through, but then picks itself up again toward the end. Truly, a must-see. If you like adult animation, this is definitely for you. I agree with those comparing it to Aardman films, Waltz with Bashir and Persepolis, but this movie's animation is so professional, that only Aardman truly compares.", u'0.613341', u"I went into this film at the Berlinale with mixed feelings. I knew that Adam Elliot's shorts were great but frankly the last few years haven't been great for Australian films and a number of short filmmakers have made disappointing first features.\n\nBut right from the opening frame, this film shattered any of my doubts. It's so refreshing to see a film told with such a strong unique vision and pulled off so effortlessly. This is made even more remarkable not only as it's made using stop motion animation but also because of the characters and subject matter it tackles.\n\nMary is an 8 year old outcast living in the suburbs of Melbourne. On a whim, she chooses a name at random in a phone book and sends off a letter asking about life on the other side of the world. The letter is received by Max, an overweight depressive in his 40's living in New York, suffering from Aspergers Syndrome. A friendship is born as the pair exchange letters over the next 20 years. offering each other support, advice and the chance to see life through another set of eyes.\n\nWhile the world is painted in gloomy hues of brown and grey and the characters lead bleak lives, the genius of the script is that the characters never wallow or feel sorry for themselves. The tone is kept humorous and balanced allowing us to be moved by the characters as they stumble through life but also laugh at their foibles and observations of the world they struggle to fit into. Not since Muriel's Wedding has Australia produced so fine a comedy with such rich detail and I probably got even more laughs out of this.\n\nMy only criticism of the film would be some of its music particularly its use in one key scene of the Humming Chorus (already used so memorably in the finale of Heavenly Creatures). It meant that in a critical moment I was thinking of Kate Winslet up to no good instead of connecting with Mary & Max. But this is more a personal concern and if that's the weakest thing about the film, it's doing pretty well. I hope this film is seen by the wide audience it so richly deserves.", u'-0.006855', u"In Australia in 1976, a young girl named Mary (voiced by Bethany Whitmore) is a lonely child looking for a friend. She lives with both her parents but her mother is a chain smoking drunk and a thief and her father, who works in a factory putting the strings on teabags, would rather spend time with his collection of dead birds. Mary remains curious about life and finds the address of an American living in New York. She writes him a letter to become his pen pal. The recipient is Max (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a severely overweight Jewish hypochondriac and full-time no-hoper. Gradually, as they send each other letters, Mary and Max's relationship develops and we begin to learn more about their past and their heartache and insecurities of being alone.\n\nFollowing the short animated film, Harvey Krumpet, director Adam Elliot has constructed his first full feature claymation picture, displaying as much skill as many of the major mainstream studios. The film has been immaculately designed, with many tiny details and features placed into the sets, all of which would have taken many countless hours to mould. The lighting and colour scheme too are significant to the unique look of the film, ranging from highly saturated to almost entirely black and white, to reflect the self-depreciative and sometimes gloomy tone of the narrative. It is a film made of great patience and craftsmanship.\n\nYet the strongest asset of the film is the humour of the screenplay. Whereas many mainstream animated films such as Shrek and The Incredibles adopt a great deal of hilarity from their pop culture references, Elliot has an eye for the simpler things in life. From the way Mary and Max share their eating habits of chocolate hot dogs, to how Max describes his past jobs, including a street cleaner and a member of the Communist Party, the humour of the film remains truly original, bizarre and often very witty. Elliot excels in his ability write about the most normal things and then turn them on their heads, or degrade his miserable characters in the most hilarious way. Yet there are moments of poignancy too, such as where Mary describes her difficulty at school as she is teased for the birthmark on her forehead, that provide the film's screenplay with a subtext - no matter how simple \x96 about isolation and the need for friends.\n\nThe use of Barry Humphries' voice over to convey much of the story is initially highly annoying and intrusive. In the opening scenes it feels overly used and distracting from the story and the detail of the scenes. Gradually though, as the film moves from its opening exposition, the voice over is used slightly less and its scarcity achieves the storybook quality and poetry that it deserves. Barry Humphries reads his lines beautifully. The rest of the voice actors too are splendid. Philip Seymour Hoffman is again in fine form, adding a slight accent to his voice and the decision to model his voice with a character of a similar physique fits nicely. He is quickly become one of the most diverse actors in the world. Bethany Whitmore as the young Mary is equally impressive too and her voice has a real innocence about it. Toni Collette and Eric Bana also have much smaller roles too. It is a well thought out voice cast and while some of the minor characters verge on grotesque, there is still a real sweetness about this film that carries it.\n\nElliot has described his film as being suitable for everyone. This is rather optimistic. I don't know how particularly young children, who have been conditioned by the more mainstream animated titles, would appreciate the film. It is extremely funny for the most part, but there is also a real sense of gloom around these characters that might not be as appealing to children. And towards the end, the film, despite being well under two hours, begins to lose a bit of momentum as the characters wave in and out of their depleted lives. Perhaps the films message of learning to live with your flaws and accepting the path life has given you is something that children, even if they don't entirely understand now though, needs to be seen anyway. Regardless, it remains a mostly sharp and funny film that many will find refreshing and engaging given the home-grown talent involved.", u'0.379279', u"I thought this movie was very well made. I can relate to Max's character, as i work with people who have Asperges Syndrome. The creator showed the audience what it is really like, in society, to have a mental disability of this kind. The use of gray colour with a splash of red when showing the scenes with Max, was very effective, and give the audience the sense of what Max was feeling. I saw this movie with work colleagues who also work with children with this disorder, and we were all curious to see how this disorder would be shown. We were all very pleased. \n\nThis movie shows the audience what people with asperges syndrome go through in day to day life, and how they don't understand things that most people would. As well as how they do/do not cope with some issues.\n\nThis movie is not for children. It is quite sad, but with some really funny parts. and for those who live in Melbourne, especially, you will understand some of the references.\n\nI give this movie 10/10.\n\nAfter 5 years in the making it is definitely worth watching", u'0.0649807', u"Just finished watching this, And Loved it. Previously Wall-e was the only animation that I rated 10/10. And this is the second one.\n\nIf You have not seen this You have no idea about how good it is.Its very well written (A True Story) , well Directed, narrated and equally good Animation in all respects. You don't Find Much stuff like this.\n\nIts would get a rating of Pg-13 because of sex related material but I think every Children of 10+ should see this because the sex related material is kept very implicit.\n\nI hope It will get Nominated for best Animation for year 2011, Best screenplay and best picture as well.\n\nI have much more to say but since I have to review lot more movies I will just tell ya: I just Love It.\n\n9.5/10. (Better than all animations of 2009) Can't wait to see it in top 250.", u'0.34895', u"Coming from Australia, Mary and Max is one of these few films you'll remember all your life. This amazing claymation touches upon an unlikely friendship between two pen pals: a young girl living in Australia and an aging Jew from New York. It's unbelievable what a precisely structured narrative this is. Director-writer Adam Elliot blends odd scatological, yet clever humour with poignant dramatizations to a splendid effect creating one of the best tragicomedies of the past few years. The fact that it's in the form of claymation only helps to enhance uniqueness of the whole experience. The movie was 5 years in the making and this is visible in its every frame. Elliot masterly captures the motion in an endlessly creative manner. Most importantly though, his lovably oddball characters are well developed and admirably complex with all their awkward traits and quirks. Due to its serious themes and dark tone, Mary and Max is an adult movie aiming much higher than its big studio counterparts. It happens to be more contemplative, and intelligent mimicking the real life with all its ups and downs. Calling Elliot's movie an extraordinary piece of art is certainly not an overstatement.", u'0.675804', u'In 1976, in Australia, the misfit and outcast eight-year old girl Mary Daisy Dinkle lives in Mount Waverley with her alcoholic shoplifter mother Vera Lorraine Dinkle that is addicted in Sherry and her absent father Noel Norman Dinkle that works in the Earl Grey Factory attaching strings in the teabag and spends his leisure time in his hobby - taxidermy. Mary has absolutely no friends and is teased by her schoolmate Benny Clifford. She has a complex because of her brown birthmark in the forehead and she adores her favorite cartoon The Noblets that she watches with her rooster Ethel and condensed milk. Meanwhile, in New York, the lonely forty-four year-old Max Jerry Horowitz has Asperge Syndrome and trouble to sleep and is obese since he eats chocolate hot-dogs to compensate his anxiety. He frequently goes to the Overeaters Anonymous Meeting. Max does not have any friend, only the invisible Mr. Ravioli, and also loves The Noblets. His life goals are to have a friend, Noblets and chocolate. One day, Mary picks Max address out of an American phone-book and she decides to write to him to ask from where babies come in America. Along their lives, they become pen pals and their unusual friendship oscillates due to the anxiety attacks of the unstable Max.\n\n"Mary and Max" is an unforgettable and heartbreaking bleak tale of friendship and loneliness. The story is bittersweet and witty, with an ironic black humor and provokes the most conflictive emotions in the viewers, funny in a moment, and depressive in the other. The excellent animation follows the dark style of Tim Burton and the screenplay is a profound insight in human behavior. My vote is nine.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Mary and Max \x96 Uma Amizade Diferente" ("Mary and Max \x96 A Different Friendship")', u'0.126984', u'Oscar winning (and proudly gay) animation artist Adam Elliot\'s acclaimed clay-mation feature film "Mary & Max" is astoundingly rewarding wonderful entertainment on the big screen. \n\nIt\'s an intriguing tale, starting in the mid seventies, of the ongoing true friendship of two long distance pen-pals, younger Mary in rural Australia and older Max in the rat-race of New York City. A significant element of the story involves Max\'s experience of living with Asperger Syndrome, knowing painfully full well that he senses the world in a radically different way to most. I\'ve never seen any other project deal so honestly and powerfully with that condition. It\'s a genuine celebration of the value of difference.\n\nThere\'s lots to laugh and think about - and the attention to detail is staggering. Australia\'s living legend Barry Humphries excels as the narrator. \n\nI loved the soundtrack which strongly featured two of my favourite Penguin Cafe Orchestra compositions. I\'ve ordered the soundtrack CD already.', u'0.651072', u"A couple of claymation misfits who are worlds apart, form an unlikely dialog, in a pre-Internet age where it takes weeks to get a reply.\n\nThere is a growing trend amongst publishers and in Hollywood, where the writer is strongly urged to rather show the story rather than tell it. This is fine for certain works, especially action films, but I personally believe that the aforementioned edict is a steaming pile of moronic dribble. People are more than intelligent enough to garner rich satisfaction from being provided a story in any form as long as the story itself holds interest. Its worked fine for all the classics in literature, most of which are still being read in droves, but many believe that audiences are stupid and need to shown everything and must capture their attention in the first five seconds. Indeed, most manuscripts are rejected based upon their first page, a ridiculous scenario.\n\nIn this case, there is much in the way of telling via the voice-over of the wondrous Barry Humphries and yet the visuals provide us with an extra layer on information, working with the voice-over rather than being hindered by it. Occasionally it goes on too long, but Adam Elliot is incredibly brave in wanting to tell this story his way. Aside from stylistic similarities to his earlier shorts, he has remained true to himself. He thanks a lot of people in regards to his script; its clear he has made the effort to get it right, proving the basic notion in screen writing, is to get right on the page first folks. The script is a gem, finding the humor in a rather grim tale, without ever being patronizing to the characters or their plight. If anything, he manages to reinforce their humanity.\n\nThe choice of music is ideal, setting a tone that is complimentary and yet as though these classical pieces were designed specifically for this wide, but often claustrophobic gray universe. I hope audiences embrace it on the big screen as there is glorious detail lurking in the background, providing an extra chuckle or irony for the keen eye. If there was ever a reason to leave the home theater, this is it. Mary and Max is a brilliant, entertaining work of visual art combined with depth and grace.\n\nThere was a couple of moments when I raised eyebrows at certain things that didn't fit correctly for the late seventies, such as the mention of Stephen Hawking as well as cigarette patches (which debuted in the early 90's) but otherwise this laugh out loud, tear to the eye unique celluloid experience is one of the standouts of the year.", u'0.35953', u'And It happened!!! I don\'t know how and why, but "Mary & Max" incredibly made me cry... I loved it, to the first frame until the last one! \n\nWell, this animated picture can not be a PIXAR production or even a American movie, but you can bet this is a stupendous Australian animated feature... I only hope that "Mary & Max" get some nominations around the world, like it happened with "Persepolis" or "Vals Im Bashir", its quite possible it reach the 2010 Oscars... And it would be such a pleasure! \n\nThe story line is superb, noble and above all it has the ability to describe many rotten realities of our society, so if you didn\'t see it yet, please, make a favor to yourself and spend a very well done hour lurking this two suffering, sad and nevertheless comic lifes, of an Australian girl and an American middle age man! \n\n"Mary and Max" is not to be missed... 10 out of 10', u'0.105231', u"To say it short, this movie is about a friendless 8 year old girl in Australia who befriends an obese 44 year old male in New York by writing mails to each other.\n\nI'm not a big animation fan, so I wasn't looking forward to see this movie. I am currently working on the IMDb Top 250 list and Mary and Max just entered the IMDb top 250, so I took a look at it.\n\nI watched it with a small screen on my computer while chatting with someone on Facebook. But then I logged out because I got hooked by the fantastic but sad narration mixed with humor by Barry Humphries, so I watched it with a big screen. Thank God that I did that, because this is an unforgettable and heartbreaking cinematic experience! It got fantastic narration and dialogue that will make you laugh and cry!\n\nPS.There are many scenes that will choke you up, so bring some tissues.\n\nPSS.Don't watch this movie with your kids!\n\nI hope this review was useful!", u'0.0347101', u"In this cinematic era of computer animation, the art of claymation (for which hand-moulded figurines are painstakingly photographed one frame at a time) is slowly dissolving. Aardman Studios (the guys behind Wallace and Gromit) seem to be the only ones who still possess the patience required to continue the practise into the 21st Century. It's therefore refreshing to witness the Australian film Mary and Max (the feature film debut of Adam Elliot, who won an Oscar for his short film Harvie Krumpet), which was created using this claymation method to tell a bizarre, sweet and mature story. Tremendously inventive, clever, hilarious and wise, Mary and Max is a sublime movie of warmth and compassion about life's dissonances. The animation is superb, the characters are endearing, the humour is abundant, and it honestly and thoroughly explores several topical themes. If American Beauty director Sam Mendes collaborated with Aardman Animations, the product would be something like Mary and Max.\n\nBased partly on Elliot's own life experiences, Mary and Max is a feature about two people leading a mundane existence on the fringe of society; finding solace only in their heartfelt pen-pal letters to each other. Mary Daisy Dinkle (voiced by Bethany Whitmore and Toni Collette) is a chubby, friendless 8-year-old living in the suburbs of Melbourne with her neglectful parents. One day, Mary randomly selects a name from the Manhattan phone book and writes a letter to him. She chooses Max Horovitz (Hoffman); a severely obese 44-year-old Jewish man with Asperger's Syndrome living in the chaos of New York City. It turns out they have a lot in common - beyond loneliness and a complete lack of friends, they share a love of chocolate and a TV show called The Noblets. Thus begins a 20-year correspondence, with their friendship surviving more than the average diet of life's ups and downs.\n\nThere's plenty of playful narration (almost constant) courtesy of Aussie legend Barry Humphries which gives the film the feel of a children's tale, but Mary and Max is not for kids. The movie doesn't shy away from covering an array of mature, confronting issues, such as depression, sexuality, suicide, obesity and mental illness. Unlike most mainstream movies in which friendship saves the day and everybody is happy, Mary and Max is unmistakably dark - both physically dark, and dark in its depiction of reality. Max is never able to lose weight, and Mary can never escape the shadow of her parents. Mary eternally resides in her brown-tinged Melbourne suburb, while Max's New York City is depicted as a grey metropolis whose only bright colours are those that come from Mary (a red pompom, for instance). The predominantly colourless and ominous cityscape of NYC is clearly symbolic of Max's melancholy, mental distress and isolation. The ending in particular underlines the film's dark disposition; showing that in real life there may be happy middles, but happy endings are almost non-existent. But despite this, Mary and Max is by no means a highly depressing venture; it's a cinematic delight, with its downbeat content matched by constant laughs, a super- abundance of heart, and several deeply moving moments. Somehow, all of this is squeezed into an 85-minute timeframe, which at times feels longer due narrative simplicity and the occasional pacing issues. This is probably to be expected, however, as Elliot has only previously worked on shorts.\n\nEven though a mere claymation short could take up to a year to create, old-school animators such as Adam Elliot and his team display a palpable affection for this approach. Mary and Max spent a total of five years in the making, with six dedicated animation teams working under Elliot's direction in a converted factory in Melbourne, and each team creating an average of 4 seconds of footage per day. A huge kudos to Adam Elliot and his claymation team for creating such a vivid, picturesque world here, with the grim landscape evoking a film-noir feel. Every one of the characters, created from plasticine, is intricately and lovingly detailed. The detail does generate the illusion that we're watching a computer-animated movie, yet the painstaking claymation process affords a look, feel and soul that has yet to be replicated through computers. One must have patience and passion to undertake a stop-motion feature of such scale, and these are two qualities Adam Elliot infinitely exerts.\n\nAnother tremendous pleasure of Mary and Max is the voice cast; a cornucopia of vocal talent from across the globe. Without a doubt, Philip Seymour Hoffman has proved one of the most versatile actors of recent years with his exceptional vocal work (Capote, anyone?), and he's virtually unrecognisable here. This is, of course, the true essence of voice acting - a viewer should not be given the chance to focus on the actor providing the voice, but instead the character they are voicing. Meanwhile Bethany Whitmore is effortlessly endearing as the young Mary, and Toni Collette is pitch-perfect as Mary in her later years.\n\nThrough an immense artistry as well as an evident maturity emanated by the makers, Mary and Max affirmatively and genuinely answers a potent question: is there someone for everyone? In adulthood, we understand that we're born into our families but choose our friends, and the 20- year friendship between these two vastly different yet curiously similar individuals proves the theory. Adam Elliot's ambitious first feature- length claymation movie is an absolute delight, merging witty laughs with heartfelt emotion to generate this genuinely moving slice of animation. Mary and Max is, at least for this reviewer's money, the best animated motion picture of 2009 (yes, better than Up). After the terrific Harvie Krumpet and now this, it's clear Elliot is a highly talented filmmaker one should keep an eye on in future years.", u'0.370364', u'"Mary and Max" is a difficult movie to review.\n\nA good place to begin is by pointing out that Adam Elliot painstakingly created a broken world here. The inhabitants of this world are, with few exceptions, wounded or maimed. It is a world not governed by a loving God, but by chance.\n\nBy chance, Max Jerry Horovitz has asperger\'s syndrome.\n\nBy chance, Mary Daisy Dinkle was born with a birth mark that looks like a poo stain, has an alcoholic mother, and stumbles upon a stray rooster.\n\nBy chance, the two become pen pals.\n\nMary and Max\'s lives and relationship with one another are at the heart of movie. Both have miserable/nonexistent family structures. Both are so alienated from society that two of their main sources of pleasure come from eating and watching a television show called "The Noblets." About halfway through the movie, I came to the realization that "Mary and Max" is really a portrait of contemporary, industrialized societies. War, poverty, alcoholism, bullying, obesity, mind-numbing careers, distrust, distorted body images, suicide, mental illness, loneliness, half-hearted self-help books - heck, even siphoning off charitable donations is covered in a quick 80 minutes.\n\nOne of Elliot\'s most impressive accomplishments in the movie is the pace: we feel the sluggishness and lethargy of the two main characters.\n\nYet, Elliot also treats us to many disarmingly hilarious scenes. One minute you\'ll be cringing, the next you\'ll be genuinely moved, and in a blink, you\'ll be grinning ear to ear. Sounds like a microcosm of life itself.\n\nThe quotation that closes "Mary and Max" invokes God in a surprising way. I honestly don\'t know what to make of it.\n\nIn my opinion, "Mary and Max" is a work of high art and one of the finest movies I have seen in a long time. It will stay with you. A must see.', u'0.163705', u"Mary Daisy Dinkle (Bethany Whitmore/ Toni Collette) is an unfortunate 8-year old living in Mount Waverly Australia in 1976. Her mother is an alcoholic, chain-smoking kleptomaniac and her father is a reclusive blue collar worker who attaches the strings to tea packets. Mary has no friends. Despite having an unfortunate birthmark on her forehead and generally being teased and bullied by the other children at school, Mary is an incredibly curious child that is keen on learning everything she can about the world.\n\nOne day while her mother is out 'borrowing' supplies from the local post-office, Mary hits upon the idea of writing someone on the other side of the world to ask whether or not babies come from the same place as they do in Australia. According to her grandfather, who has recently passed away at the start of the film, babies come from the bottom of beer glasses, a fact that Mary is utterly intrigued by and one she is compelled to explore further. \n\nAfter randomly selecting a prospective pen-pal in New York City, she sends her crudely scribbled inquiries to a Mr. Max Jerry Horowitz (Phillip Seymour Hoffman), as well as a bar of chocolate. Max is a morbidly obese, middle-aged Jew-turned-Athiest that lives alone at the top of a decaying domicile. He attends Overeaters Anonymous meetings and is prone to severe anxiety attacks. Plagued by his eccentricities and his inability to form meaningful relationships with anyone, Max is gripped by a sudden uncontrollable panic attack after reading Mary's letter. Eventually he responds to his new pen-pal and the two begin a correspondent friendship that last several decades.\n\nI believe Mary and Max to be one of those rare treasures you stumble upon accidentally and never quite forget. Its an absolutely beautiful story rich in both the mastery and detail of the animation and also memorable character development. Elliot does a superb job of crafting characters that are ultimately shaped by their idiosyncrasies. Also the atmospheres he create for both Mary and Max make you fully appreciate the respective isolation felt by each title character. In one realm you have Max's noirish New York that represents his inherent pessimism and distrust. With Mary you have a muted Sepia feeling that represents parental neglect and abandonment.\n\nIt's a clever black comedy that left me incredibly refreshed and pleased with my Saturday Night.\n\nRead this and other reviews on the DriveInZeppelin website", u'-0.200065'], u'tt1255953': [u"A bona fide masterpiece. As simple as that. It is ironic that one of the best films about the Middle East conflict, and specifically the tragic civil war in Lebanon, should be made by a Canadian film maker. Incendies is based on a play but it feels as though it has been adapted from a great literary work. In fact there is no specific mention of any country in the film but no one can be in any doubt that the unnamed country is Lebanon.\n\nA Canadain-Lebanese woman dies in Canada and in her will she leaves two letters to her twin son & daughter. One is to be delivered to their brother (whom they did not know existed) and the other to their father (whom they had presumed dead). To find these people they have to travel to Lebanon to unravel the mysterious past of their deceased mother. As we follow their search, flash backs slowly reveal to us key moments in the life of their mother.\n\nThere are extremely powerful and unforgettable images and scenes in Incendies. Suffice to say that even if you have no interest in the history of the Middle East, this film will capture your attention from the start and grips you right till the end. It is the third great film (and arguably the best)that I've seen on this topic after Waltz with Bashir and Lebanon. All of these are essential viewing.", u'0.430949', u"When people watch the Oscars, they don't usually care about the Best Foreign Film nominees. Incendies provides so many reasons why people should actually get to see those nominees at all costs. Incendies is the kind of film that one walks away from feeling emotionally drained, one where it stays in the viewer's mind for days on end. Like an intense personal experience, it takes a lot to come to grips with the film's story, a moving plot full of twists and catharsis. At the New Directors/New Films Festival in New York, at which I saw this last night, Denis Villeneuve explained that he has made four films in Canada, but this is the first one to be released in America. Right now, I see no reason why Villeneuve, or any of the actors for that matter, shouldn't have a great future ahead of them.\n\nBased on the play Scorched by Wajdi Mouawad, Incendies follows a non-linear plot that spans two generations. In the present day, Jeanne and Simon are twins who have lost their mother, Nawal. Nawal has stipulated in her will that Jeanne and Simon must return an envelope to the brother they didn't know existed who is currently living in a fictional Middle Eastern country. Only then can the twins give Nawal a proper burial. Jeanne feels obligated to return the letter, so she goes to the Middle East, only to realize some of Nawal's nastiest secrets. As Jeanne uncovers more about Nawal, the viewer is shown Nawal's story. The film builds up to an unforgettable ending that is sure to rock any viewer.\n\nIncendies already had great source material. I've praised the plot enough, but one thing I must add is that the play is apparently four hours long, according to Villeneuve. It's impressive that this movie succeeds so nicely because I can't imagine that anything was cut. But to back up that source material, there's some really great acting. The entire cast plays their parts with such an emotional vigor that it seems impossible that this work of art wasn't autobiographical.\n\nFurthermore, Villeneuve has made a film that relies on great filmmaking to impact the viewer. The cinematography is beautifully bland, surely a nod to some of the deserts in the Lebanon- like land where the movie takes place. Color scheme is also used to Villeneuve's advantage to show the parallels between Nawal and Jeanne's lives. Villeneuve seems to love working with extended zoom shots that shock the viewer with their overwhelmingly long silences. Why Villeneuve didn't receive critical acclaim (in America, at least) before Incendies is a mystery.\n\nThere are many movies about the Middle East. Some have failed miserably in their attempts to strike an emotional chord with critics and viewers alike (Redacted, Rendition), but others have been extremely successful (The Hurt Locker, Lebanon). Incendies could very well be one of the best films ever made about the conflicts in the Middle East. It has its flaws which keep it from being a masterpiece (maybe it could've lost five or ten minutes), but it is that rare type of film that really resonates beyond the initial viewing. Hopefully, Incendies will be remembered for years to come as the little, brilliant film that spawned the great fame of Denis Villeneuve.", u'0.396605', u"I had the pleasure of attending a screening of Incendies at the Telluride film festival and was absolutely shattered by it. This meticulously crafted film was my favorite of the festival. \n\nStuff happens and you'll be like NO WAY and then the film goes even further and you'll be like WHOA OKAY WHAT and then even further and you'll be like OH MY GOD and then even further still and you'll be like HOW CAN THIS BE HAPPENING OH MY GOD PLEASE and then it'll just keep going even further and further and further and by the end of the film you'll just be a steamy, shattered mess like I was.\n\nCharacters and events throughout are depicted with the subtlety and prowess of a master filmmaker. I don't want to spoil anything, but there were numerous moments in the screening that I attended when the audience was vocally reacting to moments on screen that were extremely visceral and affecting. \n\nBeautiful, powerful film.", u'0.37319', u'"Incendies (Scorched)" opened in town this Friday, just days before it made the short list of nominees for Best Foreign Film for this year\'s Academy Awards. It played in the Vancouver International Film Festival 2010, but I missed it then.\n\nFortunately, it received theatrical distribution; this devastating film on the horrors of conflict and its enormous human costs simply must be seen. Denis Villeneuve\'s searing work, his fourth feature, is based on the celebrated play of the same name by Montreal native and artistic director of the French Theatre at the National Arts Centre in Ottawa Wajdi Mouawad. While there is no doubting the immediacy and impact it must have had as a piece of theatre, "Incendies" benefits from the transition to the larger canvas of the big screen, appropriate for the epic themes and emotional conflagrations it tackles.\n\nWhen their mother dies and her will is read, twins Jeanne and Simon Marwan are stumped by its bizarre burial instructions. Nawal Marwan states that she must be interred naked and facing away from the sun in an unmarked grave, until the two letters she has left with the family notary are delivered on her behalf. One is addressed to the father the twins believed dead, the second to a son whose existence comes as a complete surprise to them. The will makes the twins realize that they did not know their mother at all. They have not had an easy relationship with her, and are understandably reluctant to comply with her terms.\n\nThe daughter Jeanne moved away and found refuge in the abstract realms of pure mathematics. Her sibling Simon, who remained at home, had the more complicated relationship because he dealt daily with Nawal\'s strangeness. Jeanne agrees to deliver the letter that was left to her, and embarks on an odyssey of discovery, in search of the father she has never known. Later, she convinces Simon to join her.\n\nAlthough the Middle Eastern country is never named in the film, Wajdi Mouawad ascribes the inspiration for his play to Soha Becharra, a woman who was imprisoned for six years in Khiam, southern Lebanon. In an interview with the Montreal Gazette, he explained "For me, the success of this play and the film is a way to give back some life to a woman whose life was taken away from her." The cinematic endeavor is hugely, powerfully successful: as Jeanne scours an alien land for clues of her mother\'s past, we see Nawal\'s tough life in flashback in the same locations that her daughter visits for the first time. Sectarian strife, tribal and religious warfare, family blood feuds, and honor killings have been the blight of the Middle East and areas as far as Afghanistan and what is now Pakistan, and parts of Africa. Bloodshed and violence have been a way of life; each side claims to be justified in killing to avenge earlier injustices. While humankind has not lost its baser urges\x97we just have to recall the recent incident of the young Afghani woman whose nose was hacked off, or the countless rapes in present day DR Congo\x97the film is a plea for reconciliation and forgiveness to bring about the much needed change.\n\nNawal barely escapes an honor killing due to her unwed pregnancy, gives up her baby son for adoption, and spends the rest of her life looking for this lost child. Along the way, she takes sides in the violence and is imprisoned for fifteen years for shooting a political leader. Upon her release, she begins life anew in Canada with her infant twins, the outcome of brutal rape at the hands of a torturer. Regardless of the change in geography, she remains haunted by the past and her unending quest for her lost child. How does one look for reparation and justice, when the perpetrators frequently flee the country of their misdeeds and seek asylum elsewhere? As she has not kept her word to her son to return to him, she feels unworthy of a proper burial. A character in the film wisely observes that death always leaves its traces, and Jeanne and Simon finally get to know their mother from the relics of her life.\n\nThe Belgian actress Lubna Azabal\'s heroic performance brings Nawal to awe-inspiring Brechtian life. Undefeated by each dehumanizing blow, she stoically navigates a war-crazed world devoid of any sense, her driving force is the need to reunite with her son. M\xe9lissa D\xe9sormeaux-Poulin and Maxim Gaudette do excellent work as the siblings who gradually begin to understand their mother. R\xe9my Girard and Allen Altman, playing the Canadian and Middle Eastern notaries respectively, guide the siblings through their search, while Abdelghafour Elaaziz makes an impact in the small but important role of Abou Tarek the torture specialist. The rest of the characters are brought to life by a talented cast of unknown actors; in their hands, even the smallest roles acquire great significance. Denis Villeneuve\'s film honors the stories of these people by rigorously avoiding directorial excesses. Events and stories this powerful do not require embellishment, and Villeneuve\'s spare, dispassionate directorial style maximizes impact.\n\nSomeone remarked that "Incendies" is the closest contemporary approximation of Greek tragedy, and I agree with this assessment: the crimes and consequences are universal and timeless, and if a film holds up a mirror to question our capacity for barbarism, it is reason to applaud. Regardless of the outcome at the Academy Awards, "Incendies" is a major achievement for Canadian cinema.', u'-0.0934004', u"Denis Villeneuve has created nothing less than a masterpiece. This film is revealing a great Director, especially when given an original story with such powerful dimensions.\n\nDespite being skeptical as first of the film being shot in Jordan, when dealing with the very specific, multidimensional Lebanese drama, the geographic distance with the land of Lebanon is detaching the film from the strict reality of the place and taking it to whole other level of significance. Jordan's landscape especially with the film's photography, are somewhat surrealistic, as if the story was taking place in a deep level of the region's sub-conscious.\n\nVilleneuve has managed to delicately craft a story with dimensions that a human mind in its normal condition is not prepared to understand and confront. And yet these things did happen, many times during the war and retelling them is a very not an easy task. Actually a quasi impossible one and yet Villeneuve did it.\n\nThis has to be the film representing Canada at the Oscars. And it will win.", u'0.277115', u'This is a superb film. Best film of the year in my estimation bar none. This exceptional Canadan film should easily win best Foreign film at the Oscars. \n\nDirecting, photography, cinematography, casting, acting all outstanding. The film also has something to say on the nature of hate and violence. \n\nUnfortunately this wonderful film will neither be seen nor appreciated by a wide audience. \n\nDenis Villeneuve has created a fabulous film. He has done an immense job taking this from novel to the screen.', u'0.32472', u'This film is extraordinary on just about every level. The script is terrific, the actors are perfect, the direction and cinematography are all you could hope for. I recommend it without hesitation.\n\nAnyone who has seen any of Villeneuve\'s previous work--or Andre Turpin\'s Zigrail--knows that these filmmakers have bodies of work that are almost without peer in contemporary cinema world-wide and are unparallelled in the history of Canadian cinema (until seeing Incendies, Maelstrom was my favourite Canadian film). Incendies does not betray that "legacy". You should absolutely see it.\n\nIn a film as stunning as this one it\'s odd to single out one aspect, but I must say that Lubna Azabal\'s performance is among the best I\'ve ever seen. Though I\'ve watched a few films that she\'s been in in the past, she never really stood out for me. She is devastatingly good in this picture.\n\nI do hope that this film gets submitted to the AMPAS for Oscar selection as it is definitely the best film I\'ve seen this year and a shoe-in for the foreign picture Oscar.\n\nMy only complaint about the film was the use of music by Radiohead, which took me out of the film each time it played. The rest of the music cues were spot-on and quite excellent, but Thom Yorke\'s voice belonged nowhere near this film.', u'0.322901', u"During the reading of the will of their mother's, a twin brother and sister learn of some unusual last wishes. Amongst other requests, two envelopes need to be delivered to respectively the father of the two and a brother whom are both unknown. The quest leads the twins through the Middle East where they slowly learn of the horrific tales which is the life history of their late mother.\n\nThe movie tells a very graphic but endearing story, perfectly shot and acted allowing the viewer to get fully immersed into the journey and findings of the twins. Through flashbacks we learn about the hardship of the mother and, eventually, the fate of the father and brother. As a treat, there is a great twist at the end which is really the icing on the cake.\n\nHighly recommended.\n\n92/100", u'0.418268', u"The film begins in sweeping slow motion, centered around a harsh cemented premises with a bunch of boys undergoing the shaving of their hair ala military fashion, with the camera centered on one boy possessing this crazed looking eyes, before cutting to Canada where twins Jeanne and Simon Marwan (Melissa Desormeaux-Poulin and Maxim Gaudette respectively) arrive at a notary's office to accept the will of their recently deceased mother Nawal (Lubna Azabal), where they are left with letters to deliver to a father and brother that they do not know. In the meantime, they are to bury their mother in a certain strange way until their quest has been completed, with the notary Jean Lebel (Remy Girard), Nawal's boss the last few years, ensuring that her last will and testament is completed the way it was intended.\n\nIncendies, based upon the play Scorched written by Wajdi Mouawad and adapted for the screen by director Denis Villeneuve, was this year's Best Foreign Language Film nominee from Canada, and there's every reason why it was a nomination well deserved. Set against a mystery to be unraveled so slowly, bringing together seemingly disparate events together in shocking fashion by the time we're through, the narrative is split into two different timelines, with the current one being the twins' journey to an unnamed Middle Eastern country in search for clues to their unknown father and brother, while with each milestone achieved of sorts, we get to see a flashback to the time of their mother, brought up in a harsh environment involving the staining of family honour, as well as religious zealots and militants who set her off in a tale of an avenging angel, and sacrifice.\n\nAnd the story sprawls in many directions, though with Villeneuve always having an assured hand in not having this fall into melodramatic terms nor have any wasted scenes, highlighting issues that still exist to this very day involving hatred, revenge and forgiveness, but not before laying down a number of surprises that will shake you to the core especially when the mysterious equation finally gets solved \x96 you may get a hint of what's to come, but this got handled so expertly without being verbatim, that it accentuates and compounds the myriad of complex emotions felt by all the characters involved.\n\nWith sweeping cinematography that's achingly beautiful to gaze at, one of the best scenes involve the brutal, cold blooded mass murder where militants spray countless of rounds into a packed bus, culminating in that shot of a burning bus shrouded in thick black smoke against an endless sandy environment, with Nawal finally snapping into making a decision to take matters into her own hands from then on. Between the two stories, perhaps it is Nawal's painful journey that makes this compelling viewing, from having her lover forcefully and terminally separated from her by family during her teens, then her volunteering and sacrifice leading to imprisonment and ill treatment within as punishment. What she did as part of reconciliation is in part a masterstroke in inflicting inexplicable pain in return to her perpetrator, is what made this film a winner, although it will stun you into silence well after the end credits roll from the devastation the narrative left in its wake.\n\nThe other half of the narrative deals with Jeanne and Simon's journey to dig through unwritten laws, and reluctance of tightly knit communities that prefer to keep the status quo and not dwell and reopen wounds inflicted from their collective shameful past, some in denial, while others happy to have seen a more favourable outcome from Nawal's hardships. It is this piecing together of the mystery like an investigative drama that makes Incendies unique, and what more, Radiohead also features in the soundtrack \x96 strange but true, and very powerful if you ask me.\n\nComparing the ratings between this film at M18 and Womb at R21 reveals what the censors allow and not allow when dealing with more mature themes, likely centered around the intention of its more controversial scenes. It's anyone's guess why was was given the highest rating possible, and the other one rung lower, given that both actually didn't have anything explicit, except perhaps one was used as an unintentional weapon of torture and destruction in the psychological sense, while the other was a love story gotten out of control! Still, for its strong story and excellent production values, Incendies becomes that must watch film in 2011, especially during this season of noisy summer action blockbusters that absolutely don't resonate as much as this film. Highly recommended!", u'0.234607', u'I decided to watch this movie because I have read many excellent critics and because this book is used in Quebec\'s "cegeps", some kind of a post-high-school, and my girlfriend talked about it with me. Indeed, I am very happy to have seen this intense movie. It is really a great and close to perfection. Even though I have even seen one or two better films this year, this movie is at least the best drama I have seen in the last five years.\n\nThis movie is absolutely convincing. It has very intense images and words and has a very slow paced and sad atmosphere. The movie begins very calm but the tension raises very fast and you really feel more and more with the tragic characters. This movie makes you cry, it makes you angry, it shocks you. Once again, it is a Quebecker movie that is cut into pieces and may mix you up a little bit in the beginning. You see scenes from the present where Jeanne and Simon are first parallely looking for the truth and trying to fulfil her last will, you see scenes from the dramatic past of her mother at different stages of her life and you also see scenes from the past of her family. The movie shows not only a couple of interesting and diversified characters (played by mostly unknown and indeed extremely talented actors), but also magnificent and intense landscapes, shocking crime and war scenes and insights of a foreign culture and the clash of the generations and ideologies in the past and the present. The movie is much diversified and very intellectual.\n\nMany people were surprised by several twists and a very intense and dramatic ending. It is true that the development the movie takes is really shocking but I have seen a few things coming and wasn\'t that surprised in the end, but that almost does no harm to the atmosphere and tension of the movie. The movie tells in a very philosophical way about the irony of fate, peace and war, love and hate, vengeance and forgiveness, saints and sinners. It is uneasy to watch the movie and you still think about what you have heard and seen for quite a while after the movie.\n\nAlmost everything is perfect in this movie. There are two minor reasons why I don\'t give the best note. First of all, I was somehow able to predict some of the punches at a certain point in the movie and I have already seen more intense and shocking dramas that very even more uneasy and heavier to watch than this one, for example "The pianist". Second, some scenes in the beginning of the movie are not done very well by the camera man. In the scene where Jeanne is in her mathematic class and when she looks for some accessories in her room, the camera is disturbingly shaking and moving all the time but not to create an effect of uneasiness, because there are no similar scenes later in the movie during way heavier scenes. Those two scenes (that would not have been complicated to produce or film again) are just not well done and the director should have seen and corrected that before sending the final product to the festivals and cinemas. In a perfect and intense masterpiece, this little detail is really something that could harm the reputation and professionalism of the whole brilliant work. The next time, they should be more concentrated on the movie\'s perfection and keep their eyes open or invest the money in a good camera director instead of some war scenes.\n\nBut all in all, I think that we can really talk about an extremely good movie here! It is surely worth watching it and I agree with those ones who would like to see this movie represent Canada at the Oscars.', u'0.148479', u'It started well, though. Mysterious last will and testament with missions to accomplish... Adorable french Canadian accent (I\'m french, I love what our cousins have done with our common language ). A Quebec thriller, yeah !\n\nRapidly, first eyebrow raisers... What Arab place are they talking about like everyone should know about it ? Never heard of it...\n\nThen you realize the Arab country they are going to is just an archetypal Arab country, non existent. A caricature of many seen-on-TV Arab countries... OK, why not, I suppose Americans (as people living on the American continent) have a lesser history burn with Arab countries than Frenchs, for example, do, and have no problem building a make-believe Arab country just for the sake of... what? At this point, I supposed the filmmakers wanted to make some point about Arab or religious wars... or terrorism... ? Since they are Canadians, not Unitedstatesians, I was hoping maybe for a not so obvious / good vs bad kind of story... But I was really wondering what was the purpose of all that.\n\nThe story goes on, civil war, religious war, slaughter, all fake, all archetypal, OK, but to what end? What\'s the point?\n\nAnd then, you finally get the answer, at the end of the movie, with one unforeseen big plot twist.\n\nAnd then you realize the Arab story is absolutely irrelevant. The same plot could have been set in any archetypal place with a credible history of violence and torture... South America? Former Yugoslavia? Caucase? Heck, actually, since the prison/torture part is altogether sufficient to hold the whole movie, the very same movie could have been set just about Guatanamo (and viewers would then believe for one hour they were watching a anti-US movie, only to realize at the end the total irrelevance of all that)\n\nAt the end of the movie, you get that astonishing plot twist, which makes you realize the vast vacuity and uselessness of all the side stories you have been watching for the past hour. But, OK, what next ? What to do with that extraordinary situation ?\n\nWell, nothing. Movie ends here. Tadaaaa.\n\nAnd loopholes appear : there\'s obviously a wrong choice of actors : one of them should really look like twenty years older that what he looks like. The lawyer, since he wrote all three letters, should have understood much earlier the whole thing: it never shows that he knows more than the others participants to the quest. Weird.\n\nGood acting. I loved the actresses. The boy is deliberately annoying, and he does annoy me, so I guess he is a success too.\n\nOn the whole, a waste of time, the feeling of having been cheated, using a deceitful setup for a story that could hold in three lines.\n\nI do suggest, instead of watching this movie, reading the Robert Heinlein 1953 short story "All you zombies". On the same kind of twisted plot, that gem makes this movie looks... petty.', u'-0.318186', u"Just watched it, hence the ramble... Such a beautifully-made film with terrific performances. I can see how many people find it an extremely powerful tragedy but I wonder if it tackles too much for its length and medium. There's only so much you can do and say in a 2 hour conventional-ish movie without overtly manipulating the audience.\n\nPersonally I have a problem with many fictional films of this type though I understand my reaction is not the common one. To me, these films take extremely shocking or despicable events which 'could be real' or 'could have happened' and 'do sometimes happen'. They film these events realistically but they ask the audience to dive in and get into the story as you would a piece of riveting fictional drama, The Godfather etc. At the same time they insist the film has elements of reality or quasi-documentary - to have 'this is almost truthful' or 'this is currently happening' qualities. Yet the screenplay, the unfolding drama, is only as real as a Greek tragedy, say - it is carefully scripted and story-boarded to shock and amuse and provoke. It's a play. A drama. A movie. It's still only another The Godfather or The Matrix. It's not a documentary or a record of an event or events which happened. It's like having your cake and eating it - taking an irony-filled, message-laden 'impactful' stage play and putting it in the package of a realistic contemporary action-drama thriller mystery tragedy. \n\nI think if another director had played more on the fictional 'Greek tragedy', 'heightened ironic drama written for the stage' aspects I would have loved it. (Eg if the audience understood they were being manipulated for the sake of great drama.) Conversely I think if this director had made a similar movie based on a true story without the central shocking irony I would have loved it. He's a great director.\n\nNot meaning to 'compare' different films and different intentions, and perhaps conflicting some of what I have said so far: I liked the way Roman Polanski's 'Death and the Maiden' keeps the stage play aspects of the original. I didn't enjoy 'The Kite Runner's mixing of fact and fiction, and then its action rescue ending. I'm a fan of some films which take real events and work them into drama and then finish by revealing the actual protagonist in real life - Europa Europa is an example. I'm a fan of City Of God only because it is so obviously a complete fiction, a 'Hollywood' style shoot-em-up, rather than a 'state of address'. I'm a huge fan of Sergei Bodrov's 'Prisoner Of the Mountains' as a film depicting some themes of war and religious conflict in a fairly realistic way but somehow with a nice balance between 'this is just a filmed play' and 'this is something happening right now which carries some universal truths'.\n\nI don't comment that often on IMDb but I do think that for films of an extreme nature (such as Incendies' central twist) it is probably worth recording people's different reactions.\n\nFinally, I do think the director is one of the best of recent times and congratulate him on the film despite it not being to my taste.", u'0.270551', u'In Canada, the sixty year-old immigrant secretary Nawal Marwan (Lubna Azabal) passes away and the notary Jean Lebel (R\xe9my Girard), who had been her employer and friend for seventeen years, reads her will to her twin son and daughter Simon (Maxim Gaudette) and Jeanne Marwan (M\xe9lissa D\xe9sormeaux-Poulin), who is a mathematician.\n\nNawal requests to be buried naked with her face down and her tomb without a gravestone; further, she leaves three sealed envelopes addressed to the twins\' father that they believed had deceased in the Middle East; to their unknown brother; and the last one to themselves to be opened only after the delivery of the other two. Then, they may put a gravestone on her tomb. Simon is reluctant to respect his mother last wishes, but Jeanne decides to find her biological father and brother.\n\nShe travels to the Middle East to track down the past life of her mother and she discovers who she was before moving to Canada. She feels disturbed with the revelations and asks Simon to come to the Middle East to assist her in her journey. Simon discovers who his father and his brother are and concludes that one plus one may be equal to one.\n\n"Incendies" is an intriguing film about the journey of two twin siblings that travel to the Middle East to fulfill the last wish of their mother and end discovering the disturbing history of their family.\n\nThe screenplay is very well written and discloses in parallel to the journey of Jeanne first and Simon later, the brave history of their mother in an unnamed country in the Middle East. The plot point in the conclusion is totally unexpected and heartbreaking. My vote is eight.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Inc\xeandios" ("Fires")', u'0.416348', u'Incendies starts with twins a brother and a sister receiving a letter from their late mother. The letter sends them on a mission to find the truth about their backgrounds. The main problem with this film is the purpose of the letter. Why does the mother send them on this mission? The truth revealed is cruel and shocking? The mother has died after finding out the truth, now she wants her children to go on a mission to find the truth rather than reveal to them the truth through the letter. One could argue that the mother wanted to reveal the truth and reveal the horror and the pointlessness of the Middle East conflict. But the journey is contrived and feels as though the screenwriter just wanted to use the incest as shock value.', u'-0.590586', u'"Incendies" is one of these movies that really disappoints - The ones that for a good portion of the movie are highly enthralling, but then comes crashing down. (Major Spoiler) I had an inkling that the filmmakers might pull what they ended up trying to smear on the viewer, and it was so, so disappointing. Suffice it to say to twist the plot around and pretzel it like they did, the filmmakers stooped to utter contrivance. They blew up logic and believability for the sake of sensationalism. How probable could all of this actually take place in such a sequence (?), quite improbable. Additionally I had a hard time understanding what exactly transformed the mother into a killer(?) The ending became marginal and a continuation of the contrivance. Too bad - it had a great story going up until the last quarter of it\'s run-time.', u'-0.707111'], u'tt0093779': [u'\nI have been waiting for the right time to review this film. I did not feel until today that I was truly ready to say all I had to say about director Rob Reiner\'s unforgettable staple of 1980s pop culture. When I first saw The Princess Bride, I was only 7 years old, and hardly cognizant of film as anything but a pastime. While I remember the movie as being enjoyable, I did not have anywhere near as strong a liking or appreciation for it as I do now. I certainly did not remember the film as a theater-going experience, and recently, I got the chance to view it, on the big screen, with at least fifty others in attendance at a midnight screening.\n\nPersonally, I am one of those people who, by nature, absorbs memorable quotes, and by that token, the entirety of The Princess Bride is fair game. As I sat there watching, I could always hear somebody, if not more than one person, at least whispering along with the movie under his or her breath. Meanwhile, I noticed that there was a wide disparity of age groups. There were pre-teens, teens, people in their twenties, thirties, and some that looked well past forty. If the showing had not been at midnight, I do not doubt that there would have been pre-pre-teens as well.\n\nWith a screenplay written by William Goldman (based on his book), The Princess Bride is a classic, familiar story of a princess, her true love, and the forces that come between them. As is evidenced by those in attendance, this is a story for all ages. The manner in which this fairytale part of the story is executed by Goldman and Reiner is memorable enough to make this a great film. As any fan of the movie will tell you, however, it is the film\'s whimsical, irreverent, pervasive tongue-in-cheek antics that make it an unqualified masterpiece.\n\nIf you hang around people who love this film, do not be surprised if they react to unbelievable situations with the exclamation, "Inconceivable!" Likewise, if you tell them to just wait a minute, don\'t be thrown aback when they suddenly sport a Spanish accent in saying, "I hate waiting." And if you suddenly, from out of nowhere, hear, "Hello.my name is Inigo Montoya.you killed my father.prepare to die," don\'t worry. It\'s not your fault, and you\'re not going to die.\n\nWhile The Princess Bride has the sort of satirical edge more geared towards adults, the film is equally effective as a pure fairytale, and for this reason, there is a little something for everyone. In addition, the film enacts a self-referential tribute to the power and beauty of fairytale stories, even in the current age in which many consider them archaic and obsolete.\n\nA sick grandson (Fred Savage), who is spending his time mindlessly playing video games (of the nostalgic Atari 8-bit type), gets a visit from his grandfather (portrayed through a wonderful performance from Peter Falk). To the grandson\'s dismay, his elder has brought a book to read to him. When he expresses disapproval at his grandfather\'s old-fashioned ways, the grandfather\'s response is, "When I was your age, television was called books." Even this quote stands out as resonant and memorable.\n\nThe grandson starts out expressing skepticism and boredom, but of course, as the reading of the story progresses, this gradually gives way to captivation and praise. Buttercup (Robin Wright, in her breakthrough role) is a fair-haired, stunningly gorgeous maiden who has been engaged to the smug, cowardly Humperdinck (Chris Sarandon), the prince who rules over the land of Florin. She of course does not love him, and she has been without joy since her true love, a farm boy named Wesley (Cary Elwes), was reportedly murdered on the seas.\n\nOf course, without Wesley, there is no story of true love, and we know that he must miraculously return to her someday. This happens through an extraordinary, and increasingly hilarious, set of circumstances. A group of three bandits kidnap Buttercup with the intent of killing her to precipitate a war between Florin and its enemy, Guilder. These three are (in order of increasing stature) the intellectually pompous Vizzini (Wallace Shawn), the Spanish swordsman Inigo (Mandy Patinkin), and the big-hearted slow-witted giant Fezzik (the late Andre the Giant, in one of the most no-brainer casting decisions in all of film history).\n\nDuring the kidnapping, however, a mysterious man in black closes in on the trail of the three abductors, and it is this man who takes on each of the three one by one in battles of skill, strength, smarts, and of course, deliciously witty repartee. There is something unusually extraordinary about these battles, however.\n\nWith the exception of Vezzini, the abductors are not villains as we might initially perceive them to be. The marvelously choreographed swordplay between the man in black and Inigo, and the hilarious absurdity of the handfight with Fezzik, are not at all about winning or losing. They embody a\nsense of honor, sportsmanship, and nobility that is rarely exemplified in competition (both fictional and real).\n\nInigo, Fezzik, and the man in black do not display their skills pretentiously or flauntingly. Instead, they take a strong sense of inner pride in the subtle mastery of their arts. As a result, when we see them engage in competition, there is not a sense of enmity, but a wonderful air of camaraderie.\n\nAlso included in the mix are a sadistic count (Christopher Guest) with an odd physical characteristic and a penchant for pain, an albino (Mel Smith) with a stuffy throat, the deadly wrath of an R.O.U.S., and a clergyman (Peter Cook) who makes Elmer Fudd seem eloquently spoken. Most memorable, perhaps, is the appearance of Billy Crystal and Carol Kane as the miracle-man Max and his wife. It has been reported that in the middle of filming this scene, Reiner was forced to leave the set, because Crystal\'s improvisations were causing him to laugh to the point of being sick.\n\nRegarding the film\'s casting, every single choice, without exception, is absolute perfection. Cary Elwes not only easily looks the part of a daring, ingenious hero, but as an actor, he has an incredible gift for a subtle mixture of drama and comedy, one that easily coincides with the film\'s sensibilities. Robin Wright easily essays the role of the headstrong princess, endlessly devoted to her love (with a convincing British accent, despite her American origins).\n\nFor the scene of swordplay, Elwes and Patinkin had to study fencing for months, which is impressive, but on-screen, I had no trouble believing that they were characters who had studied for at least several years. Despite his limited acting ability, wrestler Andre the Giant is perfect for the role of Fezzik, and something would be lost with any other actor in his place. And of course, Wallace Shawn is endlessly amusing to watch as the diminutive, perpetually exasperated Vezzini.\n\nWe also don\'t have to hear Christopher Guest and Chris Sarandon speak any lines to know they are portraying villains. The arrogance, callousness, and sliminess are readily apparent in their facial and bodily expressions.\n\nWhen all is said and done, we have witnessed a wide variety of hilarity, captivating acts of love and heroism, and of course, one of the most satisfying acts of retribution ever put on film (one that immortalizes the film\'s most famous quote and chooses just the right time and placement for the film\'s sole swear word).\n\nFor someone who watches this film for the first time, and quickly catches on to the film\'s capricious mix of reverence and satire, the film is a marvel to watch simply for the knowledge that you do not know what will come next. Will there be a touching moment? A reflective one? An act of bravado? Or will our expectations be subverted in an act of comical subterfuge? The answer: any of them will do, as the film has a delectable variety of all of them.\n\nFrom start to finish, The Princess Bride is a transcendent, magical experience that constantly elicits uproarious laughter and simultaneously immerses the audience in a rich, magnificent, and almost nostalgic world of folklore that, after the end credits roll, seems timeless and undying. In the years since its release in 1987, it has grown into a cult film of legendary status, and judging by the wide variety of ages I witnessed at the screening (as well as the endless barrage of quoting), it seems perfectly reasonable to assume that the film will endure for many years to come.\n', u'0.355043', u'\nThere\'s enough reviews here to show how enjoyable and entertaining this movie is, but I had to put my own word in...\n\nI simply love this movie. I watched it with my parents when I was very young, and have been watching it constantly ever since. It\'s a movie that I\njust can\'t seem to grow tired of. For one, I absolutely love the medieval fantasy genre, both in books and movies. From a small child I\'ve loved knights, castles, dragons. the whole sort. This movie, quite simply, puts the viewer into an imaginative world where everything seems real. Second, the characters are so enjoyable to watch, you really begin to feel for them - all of them. Even humperdink, whose name does him justice, gets pity at the end. Lastly, the grandfather\'s list of the qualities of the book at the very beginning are all true... this story has everything. That is why it is such a classic, when everything comes down to it. From the moving love story between Wesly and Buttercup, to the dynamic and brilliantly scripted duel between the Man in Black and Indigo, to even the hilarious bickering from Vezinni to his lovable giant, Fezzik... This movie finds a place to include EVERYTHING one can imagine.  The story moves along at a great pace, and you feel as though the whole land has been covered when the book is closed. Furthermore, the whole conception of using the "telling a story" approach doesn\'t taken away from the realism of the story, but raises it even more by showing how mesmerized the boy is, listening to the tale - just as we are, in front of the screen.\n\nMaybe it was how I was captivated to the screen, watching it as a child... Maybe it was how I\'d pop the movie in and turn a boring Sunday afternoon an exciting adventure as I grew up... Or maybe it\'s how I can sit down with friends and all enjoy the movie together, laughing at its funny parts, and cheering at it\'s exciting moments. The movie has a place in my heart, and that will never go away. A "10" on the scale, and even these words, can\'t begin to tell how much I love this movie.', u'0.401232', u"\nThis is one of those rare films that gets better each time you watch it. With something for everyone, The Princess Bride combines romance, action, adventure and parody to create the perfect movie.\n\nCary Elwes and Robin Wright are beautiful to watch and the story of their love is a wonderful backdrop to the adventure and intrigue played out in this story. Mandy Patinkin is wonderful as Inigo and gets to deliver some of the best lines in the film. Chris Sarandon is perfect in his role as the bad guy prince.\n\nThe plot is rich, with adult innuendos the kids will miss all together and levels of wit to entertain the whole family. The dialogue is full of very funny catch phrases-  many of which are still part of my repertoire more than a decade after I first saw the movie.   If you like dry humor and fast wit, The Princess Bride will make your day.\n\nI have owned this video since 1988 and still watch it regularly - it has become my 'sick day' movie because it is such a joy.", u'0.589782', u"\nI'm not exactly sure what exactly it is that makes The Princess Bride such a spectacular film. Or, at the very least, I just can't pinpoint a single characteristic about it that really rises above all others as the main reason that no one should miss it. Indeed, it has a title that should prove to be remarkably uninteresting to the typical action adventure fan (okay, MALE action adventure fan), but even the most die-hard Die Hard fan would love this film. It is extremely important not to judge this film just because it has such a flowery and dangerously (at the risk of sounding shallow) girly name, because it is full of wonderful adventure and even some good killing and violence. Does this belong in this kind of romantic comedy? Absolutely! The cover box of the film looks like that of a cheesy romance novel, but the film is truly great from start to finish. And, indeed, the film is very aware of the superficial impression that it leaves, and it even presents it directly through Fred Savage's initial response to his grandfather reading him the story. But as the film goes on, we begin to have the same reaction that Fred has. We can't get enough. \n\n\nCary Elwes delivers by far the most outstanding performance of his career as Westley, the love-struck servant to Buttercup, a beautiful blonde woman living in a misty romantic fantasy world. Sadly, Elwes' later career has been punctuated by roles that do not serve him well, especially after such a stunning performance in this role. Liar Liar and Twister come immediately to mind. Robin Wright also gives one of the best performances of her career in her film debut here as Princess Buttercup, but the real quality of the performances that makes the movie so great is the fact that they were able to pack the film full of comic relief (it was nearly nonstop from start to finish) without taking anything away from the tension or the overall respectability of the film. It is interesting to consider the polar opposite effect of the comic relief on the vast majority of the James Bond films. Wallace Shawn is absolutely hilarious as Vizzini, the bonehead villain who is completely convinced that he has the whole world figured out, Andre the Giant delivers a lumbering but highly impressive performance as Vizzini's enormous, idiot sidekick, and by far my favorite of all, Mandy Patinkin creates one of the most entertaining and likeable characters created in a film in the entire decade of the 1980s (`My name is Inigo Montoya. You killed my father. Prepare to die!').  \n\nThis is great stuff. Told as a story read from a book, just like The Neverending Story, The Princess Bride provides a magical mix of romance and fantasy and action and comedy to provide an enormously entertaining film for moviegoers of all ages. The Princess Bride is an absolutely wonderful film that is truly not to be missed.", u'0.293625', u'\n"As you wish..." "Inconceivable!" "My name is Inigo Montoya..."\n\n\nI love this film so much.\n\nFrom its opening scenes of the young boy being read a story by his kindly Grandfather to the romance, action, adventure and fun of the fairy tale. The Princess bride tells the tale of the beautiful Buttercup (Robin Wright) and her true love Westley (Elwes)who become separated through the course of an unfortunate event involving some pirates. Westley\'s destiny is to rescue Buttercup from the clutches of an evil Prince so that they might be together again. Yet he\'s not bargained on some of the wonderful characters that he will meet (and befriend) along the way...\n\nThis film is so deliciously acted, made and written that it is a treat to watch.I\'ve lost count of how many times I\'ve seen it now. But every time I still gain the same enormous amount of pleasure from watching it. A movie that is a delight for the young and just as much fun for everyone else.\n\n\nThe actors are all superb in their roles (\'perfect casting\' does not come close to describing it!) A young Cary Elwes is suitably dashing as our cocky hero (check out the sword fighting!)and Robin Wright is good as the beautiful Buttercup. Mandy Patinkin is great as the vengeful Inigo Montoya who utters that famous "you killed my father. prepare to die" line. Everyone else gives there all, including Christoper Guest, Chris Sarandon (as the main villian), Wallace Shawn, the late Andre The Giant,Mel Smith, and Billy Crystal.\n\nEven though it is about 18 years old, the humour and sly jokes are still as sharp today as they were back in 1987.You know you are watching a great movie when you here Elwes\' "To the pain..." speech near the end. You\'ve probably seen The Princess Bride. If so...go and watch it again. Right now, and remind yourself how good it is! And if you haven\'t- what are you waiting for? Go and check it out now! It\'s worth it! Hands up who can quote this entire film off by heart! ;)\n\nWatch out for:\n\nThe R.O.U.S\'s Elwes\' and Patinkin\'s Sword/word fight The Miracle Max scene When our heroes storm the castle (Go Inigo! Go Inigo!) Elwes\' "To the pain..." speech. (Superb. Shows what a great (and unfortunately underused) actor he is)\n', u'0.385095', u'\nThe Princess Bride is a wonderful family film about a maiden named Buttercup and her "farmboy" Wesley. When Wesley goes away to seek his fortune, he is reported to be killed by the Dread Pirate Roberts. Hearing this really gets Buttercup down, and it only gets worse when Prince Humperdink chooses her to be his bride.( Hence the title) To make a long story short and not give away the ending, Buttercup\'s kidnapped for suspicious reasons and rescued by someone familiar. She\'s in love and nothing can stop true love! A couple of deaths, a would be wedding, revenge fulfilled, and a couple reunited end this gala of a film. But this doesn\'t even sum it up, I promise! I love this film because it does not take itself too seriously and flows well across the screen. The main characters and their supporting cast are quirky and memorable. You will be repeating classic lines like, "My name is Inigo Montoya, you killed my father, prepare to die!" over and over again. Through the adventures of Wesley and Buttercup you feel drawn to the characters and fall in love with their ability to amuse you. Do you want to be entertained with a light hearted fantasy/comedy? Then head on over to your local video store and pick up a copy. Ready to enjoy? "As you wish."', u'0.236003', u"\nThis film is an intelligent, sardonic send up of several genres that pokes fun (affectionately)\xa0at fairy tales, swashbucklers, love stories and basic conventions of film.  One of my favorite scenes is where Inigo Montoya first confronts his quarry after years of searching.  His adversary does the unexpected-and what most villains in real life WOULD do under the same circumstances, with hilarious results in the scene.  Basil Rathbone probably whirled in his grave!\n\nNot by any means Citizen Kane (we already have one of those, anyway) but a champ in its weight class, with a perfect score, a fine script and good performances.  Far more true to the flavor of the original fairy tales that it spoofs than even the best of Disney's takes.  I loved it the first time I saw it and love it more now.  Well worth watching.  Recommended. \n", u'0.649964', u'\nCary Elwes, Mandy Patinkin, and Robin Wright Penn star in this classic fairy tale entitled The Princess Bride. It is based on a novel by William Goldman, who also wrote the screenplay. Director Rob Reiner brings life to this story and effectively evokes the enchanting spirit of the witty 1973 novel.\n\nThe movie opens with a sick boy (Fred Savage) who receives a visit from his grandfather (Peter Falk) who intends to read to him from his favorite book. The boy is not exactly pleased to be distracted from his world of video games. However, his mood quickly changes as he and the viewer are transported to a place out of time. We are taken to Florin, a kingdom in an imaginary land, complete with dashing heroes, cowardly princes, rhyming giants, rodents of unusual size, fancy swordfights, and yes . . . even some kissing.\n\n\nThis fairy tale begins on a farm in the countryside. There lives a beautiful, young woman named Buttercup (Robin Wright Penn) who learns that "as you wish" really means "I love you" when she falls for her farmhand Westley (Cary Elwes). While trying to seek his fortune, Westley disappears at sea and becomes an apparent victim of the Dread Pirate Roberts. A few years later, Buttercup, who is now engaged to Prince Humperdinck (Chris Sarandon), is kidnapped by a trio of misfits, which includes brains--Vizzini (Wallace Shawn); brawn--Fezzik (Andr\xe9 the Giant); and sword--Inigo Montoya (Mandy Patinkin). As they sail away toward the Cliffs of Insanity, they notice the pursuit of a man in black. Now begins the adventure . . . .\n\n\nThe central idea of The Princess Bride is that true love can conquer all. Throughout the movie, there are many hardships and trials that true love must endure. The movie keeps the viewer guessing until the very end whether or not there will be the classic fairy tale ending.\n\n\nThis movie is appealing to me because of the classic fairy tale style combined with the witty humor, well choreographed action sequences, and intense instances of suspense. The characters are well developed and all the actors give an amazing performance which adds to the overall appeal of the movie. The Princess Bride is easily one of my all time favorite movies.\n', u'0.600679', u"\nI love this movie!  It's sweet, but with satirical humor. The dialogue is great and the adventure scenes are fun.  Rob Reiner shows an excellent touch once again with comedy and a childlike point of view.  It manages to be whimsical romantic while laughing at the conventions of the fairy tale genre. I would recommend it to just about anyone. I've seen it several times, and I'm always happy to see it again whenever I have a friend who hasn't seen it yet. I haven't watched it with any kids, but I think it has lots for them too. There are wonderful quotes throughout.  I think Mandy Patinkin absolutely steals the scenes he is in as the Spaniard Inigo Montoya, bent on avenging his father's death. I gave it 8 out of 10 mainly because it feels very light, but I may go back and change to 9 thinking of how happy this movie makes me and it's rewatchability.", u'0.605753', u"The Princess Bride is one of those rare, but very perfect films that everyone once in their life time has seen. Just because it is such a loved film, how could you not love it? It has action, romance, revenge, sword fights, true love, humor, friendship, etc. I was only 2 when this film was released, but I still remember how much I was in love with this film at 4. I would rewind the tape and watch it over and over again, the funny thing was my parents wouldn't mind watching it with me, it appeals to children as well as adults. I think the reason why this was such a fantastic film was due to the fact that it was the perfect mixture of a fairy tale with humor, action, and romance. Rob Reiner really knew what he was doing when he made this movie; and it all starts with a grandfather simply reading his favorite childhood story to his sick grandson.\n\nButtercup and Wesley are two farm people who eventually fall deeply in love, but in order to get money to get married, Wesley goes off to find a job and start a life for them. But when Buttercup hears of Wesley's death by pirates, she is taken away by Prince Humperdinck who is about to make her his bride. She is then kidnapped by three rebels who wish to start a war with the prince, Vizzini, Fezzik, and Indigo Montoya(who is on a revenge streak to kill the six fingered man who killed his father). But she is saved by an unknown pirate who later reveals himself as Wesley who escaped death, but Buttercup is taken once again right as she and Wesley are reunited by Prince Humperdinck. The prince orders to torture Wesley and kill him to keep him away from Buttercup, but Wesley ends up being saved by Fezzik and Indigo who will help him save Buttercup.\n\nThe Princess Bride is a classic film that will never be forgotten. It has classic lines like: Hello, my name is Inigo Montoya, you killed my father prepare to die. And of course INCONCEIVABLE repeated constantly by Vizzini. The acting is perfect and the sets are just amazing. Of course who could forget Billy Cristal and Carol Cane's great performance of the miracle worker and his wife? They were just priceless. Please watch this movie, it's one of those movies that's just impossible not to like, why not to like it would be inconceivable.\n\n10/10", u'0.468371', u'\nThe simplest pleasures in life are the best, and this film is one of them. Combining a rather basic storyline of love and adventure this movie transcends the usual weekend fair with wit and unmitigated charm.  Every character is a delight and you just want to see more of them.  "The Princess Bride" is based on the unsurpassed novel by William Goldman, who also penned the screenplay. While this is a movie review, I cannot recommend the book on which it is based more highly.  It is quite simply the most humorous, enthralling fable ever written and will fill in many details that were impossible to include on the screen.  The only other movie of this type that I can think of that is this much fun was Danny Kaye\'s "The Court Jester," another costumed comedy/adventure/romance that I also highly recommend. ', u'0.854686', u'I have always been a fantasy genre hardcore fan since I was a child. Whether it is a book or a movie, I have always given it a try and guess what! I have enjoyed most of them but not this one, sorry fans! Having heard all the praise and seen the high ratings and recommendations, I finally rented it and finished the chore of watching it a couple of hours ago. I almost never stop watching a movie, no matter how awful it is and kept watching this one because I was looking for something more, something close to its 8.1 rating (which should have 1.8!). I understand many people who still love it, have memories and nostalgic childhood feelings for it but I still believe there were more 80s movies in fantasy genre which had better story, better acting, better dialogues and better visual effects!!! This film is about a girl named Buttercup (seriously?) who is deeply in love with a Westly! farm boy (which could have been much better if their love was pictured more than " as you wish" means "I love you" and a kiss!). Then the boy is gone and the girl is becoming the princess bride by getting engaged to an evil prince who plans to kill her so put the blame on enemy and people get mad because they love their buttercup (again why do they love her? do they personally know her? was she specially kind to them? or maybe because their daughters were saved by this marriage) and attack the land of enemy. There are some zorro-ish sword fight in between, a very not funny kidnapper and some of the worst and most nonsense dialogues I have ever heard in a movie. Oh, I forgot the rat which was like one of those Halloween costumes that kids wear. I\'m sure they acted like a better rat if they were put on their all fours and auditioned for the part! Anyway, I do not recommend it to any one who is impressed by all the love for this film. Those who love it will always love it so they\'d better watch it together but do not include their kids or adults who they think will certainly love it. No please don\'t do that to them. I confess I wanted to express my views on the message board but i knew I\'d be murdered so I wrote my review and gave it 5 stars (though it deserves much less) because I myself am a very nostalgic person and live with my memories so 5 stars to all those who have kept this movie alive but gonna show mercy on the others!', u'-0.00603542', u'Despite the glaring flaws you will find in this movie. It remains one of my favorite ones to watch for a number of reasons.\n\n1) It has EVERYTHING! Action, comedy, drama, suspense, revenge, fairy- tales, heroes, villains, pirates, giants, miracle men, even rodents of unusual size. There is a reason it is always among the list of Best Movies, Funniest Movies, and Best Love Stories of All Time. \n\n2) The CAST. Hard to name a more fitting princess than the beautiful Robin Wright, Cary Elwes can sweep you off your feet as a farmboy or a masked man, Mandy Patinkin delivers the most memorable quote of his career, and the rest of the ensemble transport you into their magical world.\n\n3) It has ROBIN WRIGHT in it! Did I say that already?\n\n4) It brings out the KID in me and the nostalgia of those days. If only for two hours you can go to a distant land and be on an adventure and feel positive and young again. \n\n5) It has plenty of MEMORABLE LINES and scenes. \n\nSOME MISSES: - SPECIAL EFFECTS are pretty lame, even by 80\'s standards (the rodents could not have been more fake and some of the props are sub-standard) - STORY: Predictable and full of clich\xe9s - SCRIPT/DIALOGUE: While there are numerous memorable lines, they are repeated too frequently throughout the course of the movie. The script was simplistic. And to be objective, not too funny for most adults. - ACTING: There isn\'t much depth to any of the characters but the script didn\'t give the actors much to work with, for starters. Younger audiences may not notice it, but older ones may cringe in some scenes - CHEESE FACTOR: oh boy, it has plenty. It openly deals with "True Love" in a fantasy environment so it\'s pretty much set-up for sappy-ness.\n\nFOR: - People who still have their inner child intact somewhere - Family movie night - Slumber Party with the girls - Reminiscing with others who have seen this movie as a kid\n\nNOT FOR: - Kids who are too young (who might get scared by giant rats, some fighting, torture, talk of killing, and kissing scenes) - People who take themselves too seriously or are jaded cynics - Grown-ups who will be seeing this for the first time and have been misled by the high ratings\n\nBOTTOM LINE: Cheesy Mac & Cheese with bacon bits. My favorite food ever since I was a kid. It was yummy then and still yummy now and I don\'t have to explain why I love it, I just do. If only for the fact that I\'ve carried my love for this movie since childhood, my sentimental attachment to it would give it a 10/10.\n\nBut then my Mac & Cheese, no matter how yummy, is never gonna get 3 Michelin stars next to a dish with fancy truffles. As a MOVIE, stripped of my nostalgia, this one is mediocre at best. There are more imaginative fantasy movies, funnier comedies, more romantic love stories, and more exciting adventures.', u'0.285077', u'I very rarely like to put 10/10 for a rating of something as I feel nothing is perfect. However, this movie i feel is so close to that 10/10 it would be wrong not to award it this. Although it may not be the greatest movie ever made, it is brilliant in its own right. The characters are humorous, the dialogue is witty and the cast is brilliant. It contains so many different elements which also make it a really good family film. Action, adventure, sword-fighting, pirates, romance, comedy and fantasy. It captures all the elements I could Whilst I still stand by the fact that the book is better, this is still my favourite film.', u'0.832571', u'Rob Reiner\'s The Princess Bride is one of the best fairy tales ever in my opinion. The movie takes place in a sick child\'s (played by Fred Savage) home when his grandfather (played by Peter Falk) walks into his bedroom to read a story called The Princess Bride to him. When the grandfather is reading the story the movie is set in a farming area with the two main characters Buttercup (played by Robin Wright) and Westley (played by Cary Elwes) until Westley leaves and Buttercup finds out that he is supposedly dead and says that she will never fall in love again, until she gets engaged to a nasty prince named Humperdinck (played by Chris Sarandon) , then she gets kidnapped and held against her will by 3 men named Vizzini (played by Wallace Shawn), Inigo Montoya (played by Mandy Patinkin), and Fezzik (played by Andre the Giant) until Westley comes along and saves the princess under another identity. And then Prince Humperdinck and his men try to save the princess when she has already been saved but without even realizing and Westley is about to get killed by a little dwarf who calls himself the albino (played by Mel Smith), along with Count Tyrone Rugen (played by Christopher Guest) who killed Inigo\'s father 20 years earlier also known as the man with six fingers. then Westley is brought back to life by Miracle Max (played by an almost unrecognizable Billy Crystal) and his wife (played by Carol Kane). Then after Westley is brought back to life they have another mission on their hands crash the princess\'s wedding to the prince, and Inigo\'s mission is to kill the man who killed his father by repeatedly saying "My name is Inigo Montoya, you killed my father prepare to die." While watching this movie it reminded me of other movies like Forrest Gump a little bit because of how both stories were told, Touch of Evil because of Prince Humperdink\'s mission to kill his so called future wife after the wedding, and of course The Adventures of Robin Hood because of whole entire story-line to both films. The way Rob Reiner directs this movie is not only similar to the way that Michael Curtiz directed the 1938 movie version of Robin Hood, but also it brings William Goldman\'s book of the same name to life on the big screen. A great movie for a whole family to watch.', u'0.404382'], u'tt0395169': [u"Anything I say in this review is probably redundant, because there isn't a single negative review in all the comments so far here, and I agree wholeheartedly with what has been said by other reviewers.\n\nNevertheless Hotel Rwanda is that rare kind of movie experience that doesn't easily relinquish its hold on the audience just because the credits have rolled. Watching with a friend, after ten minutes we had to pause the film because we decided we would be better served if we were more informed about what the basic facts of the conflict in Rwanda were. So to my shame, we had to read on the internet about what really happened, before we could continue. I say shame because we should have known, both of us were of an age when it happened to have taken more of an interest in world politics.\n\nThe film is beautifully understated, eschewing sentimentality in favour of raw emotion and letting the story tell itself. The acting was flawless - Don Cheadle's breathtaking performance being a particular standout - and the direction didn't falter, despite all the potential pitfalls of dramatising a recent and horrific conflict. The scenes which were hardest to watch in terms of tension and violence were often suffused with humour and hope.\n\nIt's difficult sometimes to separate the significance of the true story, from the artistry of the product, and often I get impatient with 'worthy' movies scoring big at Oscar time because it seems as though important stories ought to be rewarded, whether or not they make good films. However, I can't recall being so profoundly moved by a film since I saw The Grey Zone, and I hope Hotel Rwanda gets all the plaudits it deserves.", u'0.0637875', u"I have never been so touched by a movie. It was the hardest movie I have ever sat through but also the best. it's so easy to ignore human rights abuses if they are not happening to you or your family, but just because you ignore it, they are still happening. i hope this movie receives the praise it deserves. i am frustrated because nothing i can type can represent how powerful this movie is or how much it moved me. i can't comment on the amazing acting or cinematography or directing because the movie transported me. i did not think about the making of the movie but rather sat shocked and horrified and nauseated and inspired. there was the red cross agent. there were heroes and while human nature perverts and the thin veil of culture unravels, there is still good. i have to look at the good of the heroes in the movie and of the people that wrote the movie, and realize that going to the movies doesn't have to be about escapism. it can be about reality. this is a must-see, not because it will make you laugh but because it will make you think and feel.", u'0.216222', u"I was fortunate to see this film at the Toronto Film Festival. I had heard nothing about this film before I read up on it in the Fest guide and originally was going to see something else. But, the subway happened to shut down and I was not going to be able to see the film I originally intended. So, I decided to give this a try.\n\nAnd I am so very glad I did.\n\nThis film is by far the best drama I have seen all year, and indeed was the best film of the 11 I saw at the festival. It is gripping, heart-wrenching, and opens your eyes to so many things. Don Cheadle -- who I am a long time admirer of his work -- is phenomenal in the lead role, and I hope that he is nominated for Best Actor this year, because he certainly deserves it.\n\nI am recommending this film to everybody I know and I hope that it gets a wide distribution because it certainly is a film that needs to be seen. While comparisons can be made to Schindler's List, I think that this film goes further to show that events like the Holocaust can happen any time -- even now -- so long as people look away, just as the UN did in Rwanda. It certainly makes one think about how easy it is for us to forget our history and allow it to be repeated, because (as one character says) we will watch it on TV, say that it is terrible, and go right on eating our dinner. 10/10", u'0.345286', u"I have no doubt that this is the only movie for the past year that can get me totally, if not 101%, emotionally involved. For other movies, I might be interacting with the story a lot , say associating my personal experiences with the characters, making judgment on them, criticizing the development of the story, ways of expression, the cinematography, acting, etc. BUT, Hotel Rwanda simply took me over as I was watching it. My emotion was going along with Paul ( Don Cheadle) all the time. The director did a great great job in capturing the feelings of people facing uncertainty, horror, ridicules, anger, death, waning faith... Family, life and dignity/integrity become the largest things in the situation. What's more is that it squarely shows the realist thinking in international politics.It honestly shows the weakness or helplessness of the UN and the non-governmental organizations. It truthfully tells how indifferent most of the international community (or individuals, which may or may not include you and me) are towards the deprivation of social justice taking place in other parts of the world. It makes you question to what extent that it is true to say what we see ( the sufferings in the world) is what we tolerate. It shows you how monstrous human being can be. It scares you how sanity would fail. At the same time, the uglier the people become, the more beautiful you find those who have managed to keep brave and maintain humanity. The movie fully succeeds in showing me the spirit, faith, and compassion that the world is dreaming for.", u'0.265572', u'The only comment I can give about this movie is - SEE IT. It\'s one of the most heart wrenching, yet beautiful movies I\'ve ever seen. I really hope Don Cheadle and the movie receive Oscars! The acting is superb and the fact this is based upon a true story only makes it better. You may need some Kleenex as I was overwhelmed for a large part of this movie.\n\nI had the honor of seeing this movie at a preview screening with the real "Paul" and his wife attending - what an absolute amazing experience to be in their presence. This movie will make you rethink everything about what it means to be human and how much we need to think about all our neighbours in this world.\n\nDon\'t miss it!', u'0.516122', u"\nI was fortunate to see it at the Toronto International Film Festival.\n\nHotel Rwanda starred Don Cheadle and was directed by Terry George. It's based on a true event, about Paul Rusesabagina, a Hutu who worked at four star hotel in Kigali. When the war broke out he thought of only saving his immediate family but as he saw what was happening he opened the hotel to Tutsi and Hutus seeking refuge from the killing. He used all the favours he had stored as manager of the hotel and basically saved over a thousand lives. This will be the next Schindler's list. When the film was over, there was a standing ovation. Don Cheadle was excellent as an ordinary man forced to do extra-ordinary things. Paul Rusesabagina and his family attended the screening and he received a five minute standing ovation. Even Michael Moore came to see this movie. I highly recommend it. 9/10.\n", u'0.0770676', u'Rwanda 1994. The genocide of the Hutus and the Tutsis sadly commenced. The Hutu militia broke the peace of the country as they started killing any Tutsis in their sight as they called them "cockroaches". This all goes back to when Belgium took the country and sorted out the Rwandan people by shades of colour, nose size and more as it is briefly explained at the beginning of the film.\n\nHotel Rwanda however does not focus on the graphicness of the wars or the humanity that occurred. It focuses on the true-life story of Paul Rusesabagina and his amazing, heroic struggle. Don Cheadle plays Paul Rusesabagina magnificently as a hotel manager who housed over 1000 Tutsis in the Hotel Des Milles Collines. When all hell broke loose on Rwandan soil, he was there to shelter people in need.\n\nHotel Rwanda is not only an amazingly done drama but is also educational. It shows the real life events with all the details showing how France, England, Canada, and the U.N helped during the disaster. Nick Nolte plays Colonel Oliver, a Canadian soldier from the U.N who is there at the beginning of the film to help with the peace agreement. Later on, him and other Canadian soldiers are relied to help Paul and the rest of the people during the wars. His character is roughly based on the Canadian war hero Romeo Dallaire who wrote his award winning book, Shaking Hands with the Devil. Nick Nolte\'s performance is fabulous as he brings Colonel Oliver to life.\n\nSophie Okonedo superbly plays Tatiana, Paul\'s wife as she gives a stunning performance. She truly did a magnificent job with her stellar, dramatic talent revealed from this film. Joaquin Phoenix gives a gratifying, exceptional performance as an American cameraman there to visually capture the wars on film.\n\nThe real story here is Don Cheadle. With his absolutely extraordinary role, he carries the film on his shoulders. Definitely an astonishing, breathtaking performance, which is one of the best of the year. Don Cheadle\'s performance is so moving, emotional and so remarkable that he is at his absolute best ever.\n\nThe film\'s flaws are hardly noticed. During the intro, it has the documentary feel and seems hard to get into but after only 5 minutes, you get inside Rwanda and live the strong story of survival and heroic, epic events. Also, from a film like this, I expected more inspirational speeches from Paul Rusesabagina, but his actions and his emotions displayed are more than enough to compensate.\n\nThe film\'s cinematography and editing are well down. The direction Terry George brings to the screen is a calm but strong feel that sternly keeps you in the film as there is no place in the film without a small slight of suspense or tension. Even at some parts of this film, the constant, building tension is relieved with some nice jokes that fit right in. Terry George and his partner Keir Pearson cleverly do this as they beautifully bring their screenplay to life. One thing I loved about this film was during the most emotional times, the songs with the African children singers added to an already perfect atmosphere of sadness or emotional struggle. It was truly beautiful when these songs played as we watched the actions of Paul and his wife at the same time.\n\nThis film currently sits at #8 on my Best of the 2000\'s chart, as it is truly that good. One thing that absolutely got me furious was that this film was not nominated for Best Picture for this year\'s Oscars. With filth like Finding Neverland in the category, I really wonder how the Academy snubbed this one out. This film will never be forgotten, as I will undoubtedly buy this film on the first day its DVD is released.\n\nOverall, Hotel Rwanda is a truly moving, stunning and inspirational masterpiece. The acting is some of the best this year and Terry George does a superb direction job. As for Oscars, Don Cheadle got a nomination for this role and I\'m truly proud for saying that. Even more so for Sophie Okonedo as she truly did a magnificent job for a supporting role. This year, I hope either Don Cheadle or Jamie Foxx (for his absolutely extraordinary role for Ray) win Best Actor and I hope Sophie Okonedo takes the Best Supporting Actress statue. As for Best Original Screenplay, Hotel Rwanda can easily take it if it can beat Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind. On a closing note, I must say that I strongly recommend that all should view this masterpiece as it educates everyone on the disasters that occurred back in \'94. If you truly believe and have faith, the extraordinary can be accomplished and Paul Rusesabagina proved this to us.\n\nMy Rating: 9/10 (A High 9)\n\nEliason A.', u'0.446738', u'I have just seen this film and have to say I am deeply moved by it. The premise of the film is about one mans struggle to do the right thing at when everything around him is going wrong. \n\nDon Cheadle is the best African American actor out there. His passion and heart was so strong that moved me almost to tears. There is a definite wish here to let this story to be known to the world. \n\nIts powerful and provocative in its indirect and subtle jabs at the west for not intervening into such a horror that took place in Rwanda.\n\nVery well made and directed. Please see this and let it inspire you as it did me - to try cultivate selfless actions. \n\nThanks, Ricky Thind', u'0.343506', u"Just saw the San Francisco premier last night and it isn't a dramatization - it's much more of a documentary -- Hotel is extremely factual. CAN'T SAY ENOUGH ABOUT THIS FILM! INCREDIBLE EXPERIENCE! \n\nThe Director and the story's protagonist were at the screening to answer questions. We ovated him for almost 10 minutes. Near the end of the q&a, an older man stood up and was called on. Slowly he commented that as a Tutsi, the movie gave him a lot to think about and that it may now be possible to find peace in his heart. The audience was stunned. And believe me, it takes a lot to silence a San Francisco audience. \n\nOne last comment, the film is indpendently made and distributed - no Hollywood involvement at all (Terry George is British). There will be no machine pumping out ads and radio anouncements about this one. Help get the word out - great film!", u'0.0368874', u'At one point in "Hotel Rwanda," our hero Paul Rusesabagina (Don Cheadle) asks an American TV reporter (Joaquin Phoenix) how the western world could not intervene after seeing scenes of women and children being hacked by machete-wielding Hutu militia.\n\nHow could they not, indeed! As we all know, the west didn\'t intervene. Not surprising, really. After all, this was Africa and Rwanda had no oil reserves. The people being killed were innocent men, women and children, but they were poor and black.\n\nA few years ago, former President Bill Clinton apologized to Rwandans for not intervening during the 100-day massacre that saw about one million Tutsis and moderate Hutus slaughtered in the most barbaric manner. It was gracious of Clinton, but a fat lot of good his apology did to the people who were killed and their families.\n\nThe Rwandan genocide - that\'s what it was, though western leaders split hairs over the meaning of genocide \x96 also was a black mark on western nations, which simply got their citizens out of Rwanda and then remained indifferent to the senseless killings.\n\nTerry George\'s film gives us one story about the Rwandan genocide, of one hero, Paul, a savvy, clever and cunning manager of a swank, four-star Belgian hotel in the capital, Kigali. When the massacres began, Paul, a Hutu, sheltered more than 1,200 Tutsis and moderate Hutus in the hotel and saved them from the wrath of the bloodthirsty mobs.\n\nWorking from a smart script by Keir Pearson and George, "Hotel Rwanda" contains gutwrenching and emotionally trying moments not seen on the big screen since "Schindler\'s List" (1993). But whereas Spielberg\'s masterpiece was more arty and artistic - and I don\'t mean that pejoratively - George\'s film seems more immediate. Maybe it\'s because we now see a similar slaughter of poor, downtrodden people in the Darfur region of Sudan and, again, western nations aren\'t doing much other than threatening to rap the knuckles of the bad guys like angry teachers. This crisis gives "Hotel Rwanda" a sense of urgency.\n\nAs visceral as this film is at times, George handles everything in muted fashion. We never see the horrors firsthand. There\'s brief news footage of people being killed and one particularly searing scene when Paul and his bellhop Gregoire (Tony Kgoroge) find themselves on a bumpy road. The moment\'s made more horrifying because George unveils it quite matter-of-factly.\n\nMaking a PG-13 film about genocide requires numerous compromises. Putting most, if not all, of the violence off-camera is one such bargain George made. True, a closer look at the massacre would have rightly tortured us. But the film, nevertheless, works without gruesome moments. Pearson and George set out to make a story of heroism, survival, love and compassion amid the madness. And they succeeded.\n\nCheadle carries the entire film. There isn\'t a false note in his performance. For years, he\'s turned in one superb performance after another. He\'s one of those actors who never hits it wrong and whose performances always stand out even if the films themselves aren\'t all that memorable. Here, he\'s in equal measure the smooth manager, man with a conscience and frightened husband and father. You can sense Paul\'s frustration, though Cheadle rarely displays any vulnerability.\n\nHe gets great support from Sophie Okonedo as Paul\'s Tutsi wife, Tatiana, and Nick Nolte doing his best work in years as a Canadian United Nations officer, Colonel Oliver. Okonedo and Cheadle are utterly believable as a couple. They have one traumatic scene on the hotel roof, a quietly powerful moment that tugs at our heartstrings as we watch two people who love each other try to deal with what could happen. Okonedo conveys anger, fear and pain without ever turning the moment sentimental or needlessly overwrought. That\'s why the moment\'s shattering.\n\n"Hotel Rwanda" isn\'t flawless. George doesn\'t harshly indict the west for its indifference. Also, some scenes, especially one near the film\'s end, seem staged for obvious dramatic effect, to play with our sense of sympathy and dread. But minor faults can easily be forgiven because the rest of the film works so well, never sensationalizing any moment. The film\'s straightforward approach gives it more power, makes it more trenchant and meaningful.\n\nI would like to believe that we learn from history and the more powerful western nations will always come to the aid of oppressed people everywhere. But we\'re doing little in Darfur and although President George W. Bush openly touts his vision to spread liberty and democracy to oppressed peoples everywhere, I doubt he actually means it. After all, this freedom doctrine was something he created only after his initial justification for waging an unjust war - Iraq\'s supposed stockpiles of WMD - proved to be wholly without merit or fact. I doubt he actually considers bringing liberty to places like Zimbabwe or Burma. He speaks of the need for people to be free, conveniently ignoring some dictatorial nations - Pakistan and Turkmenistan, for instance - because they happen to be our allies. And so the dumb foreign policy continues.\n\nI can only hope the success of "Hotel Rwanda" will prompt other gutsy screenwriters and filmmakers to tell us more stories about the horrors that took place and the complacency of industrialized nations that could have helped and chose not to.', u'-0.127979', u'I\'m a college freshman at a small school in New York taking a class on the individuals role and responsibility in community. We read the book "We\'d like to inform you that tomorrow we will be killed with our families" about the Rwandan genocide and then went to see this movie. It is very accurate about what happened but reading it is just not the same as seeing it, it seemed horrendous always but when I actually saw the movie it was just... Jesus... it\'s so hard to believe that this happened and that this could. The film was excellent in both execution and portrayal. Everyone must see this movie and know we are all human beings and it is our responsibility to be there for each other. Jesus Christ... this can not happen.', u'-0.008814', u"I attended the United States premier of Hotel Rwanda on November 3rd, 2004 in Philadelphia. I have never written a review for a movie before, but this movie was excellent and I am urging everyone I know that they should see it as well. \n\nI lived in Rwanda in the summer of '04. I have read several books on the history of Rwanda and talked about the '94 genocide with locals in Rwanda and also with Rwandans living in the US. I am by no means an expert on the history or the country, but I do know a fair amount about it, which is part of why I am writing this review. \n\nThe movie was an excellent reproduction of what Rwanda is like and it tells the true story of one of the many heroes during that time. While it is a sad movie, it is also a story of hope. The portrayal of the violence was subtle and powerful, but not overly graphic. The movie focuses on the efforts of the manager of an upscale hotel in Kigali, the capital of Rwanda to protect the guests/refugees streaming into his hotel to escape the killing. The writer/directory (who spoke after the premier) said that he made an effort to get a PG13 rating rather than an R rating to ensure that students would be able to see this movie. \n\nIt is an important movie to see because it brings to life the hope and triumph in Rwanda. It also shows what the media did not show in '94 and is not showing in Darfur: The suffering of ordinary people who need help from the rest of the world. While governments repeat the phrase 'never again' yet do nothing, it is up to us to ordinary people to learn about these events and do something or make our governments do something about them. Please see this movie-it does not have the budget to launch everywhere and relies on word of mouth to generate enough interest to make it into every city.", u'-0.0649108', u'In 1994 tensions are high in Rwanda between the ruling Hutus and the Tutsis rebels while the UN tries to broken a peace agreement. This is of little interest to Paul Rusesabagina, a Hutu with a Tutsis wife whose position within a leading hotel means he has to curry favour with many officials and smoothing over any potential problems at every turn. When the Hutu president is assassinated, a massacre of Tutsis begin \x96 adults and children alike. With the UN unable to take action due to the indifference of the West the murders continue and Paul finds himself with a hotel, evacuated of important whites but full of Tutsis refugees as the Hutus seek to finish the job they started.\n\nI\'m not entirely sure how one can review this film with a clear mind because no matter how good or bad a film it is, it is near impossible not to left shaken by the events it depicts. The plot follows the story of Paul Rusesabagina, who pulled all the strings he could to protect the Tutsis refugees who wound up in his hotel during the genocide by the Hutus. In this regard we are given a way into the atrocities through this specific story and this is both a strength and a weakness in the telling. The strength is that it gives us a focal point and a point of emotional connection that we can relate to and see a human face in the way that the terrifying numbers do not. However the downside of this is that it makes the story smaller than it could have been and puts the scale of atrocities outside of our direct view for the majority. It also means that it produces a "happy" ending that leaves you with a sense of some respite (not to mention the obligatory "African" song). This was a problem for me because the film had succeeded in gutting me at points and I didn\'t want to be left with any upbeat note \x96 I wanted to go away feeling just like the foreign photographer did; "f**king ashamed".\n\nHowever considering what the film does well, it is petty and unfair to make a bit issue out of the fact that the narrative is occasionally a bit clunky and perhaps that the depiction of the genocide doesn\'t go far enough. Even without graphic violence and more than one scene of actual horror the film still sickened me to my stomach, had me almost shaking with anger and fear while at the same time failing to prevent tears rolling. Like many viewers I knew little more than a genocide occurred and couldn\'t have told you which side was killing the other \x96 this is not ignorance on my behalf but just the fact that the West ignored this and stood by while it occurred while the media gave it little or no coverage. The film depicts this very well giving us enough horror and enough human emotion mixed with an understanding of the West\'s attitude to produce an impression of an event that is indefensible and truly, truly horrific. The characters are quite broadly painted but they do enough to give us an understanding of what occurred. While I do feel that the film could have shown more and been wider, the close focus on the hotel and the Rusesabagina\'s means that we are never far from understanding the true extent of horror and just how much of a reality death is \x96 Paul does not discuss how his family will survive if the hotel is stormed, only how they will die in the least horrific way.\n\nMatching the tone of the film are two performances that blow away everyone they were nominated with at the 2005 Oscars. Cheadle\'s accent in Ocean\'s 11 was the worst cockney this side of Mary Poppins but here he gets the accent and mannerisms just right and made me forget that he was an American. His character changes throughout the film and he copes with it really well, producing a character that is easy to get behind and provides a very human face to the story. Okonedo is superb and is almost impossible to watch without being moved to tears more than once. Nolte is effectively gruff although he is less a character than he is a symbol of how ineffective the UN was at the time. In a similar vein Phoenix is excellent in a small role although really I could have done with a few less starry cameos as they tended to distract from the main material. Outside of the lead two, the actors are not given as much to work with as the lead two but Cheadle and Okonedo are superb and match the emotional impact of the material.\n\nOverall this is not a perfect film; it didn\'t quite go far enough and the focus on a small group tended to conceal the scale of the genocide. However this is a minor complaint because the film is devastatingly effective and is impossible to watch without feeling lost, helpless and utterly ashamed for our inaction. This is not an easy watch and will not be a fun night out for the audience but for many reasons it deserves as large an audience as possible.', u'-0.252724', u"1994 Rwanda,Kigali. Paul Rusesabagina(Don Cheadle)is a Hutu happily married(Sophie Okonedo) and with children.He's Hotel manager Millie Collines proprietary of Belgian Airlines:Sabena and its General Director(Jean Reno) placed in Belgium.Paul is respected for his generosity,charm,friendship and numerous contacts with important people.He's accidentally trapped in violent events when his family and neighbours are threaten to kill.He gets avoid it by means of bribes with the hope that United Nations(UN) and international forces arrive to preventing the civil war. However the happenings break out again.After assassination of President of Rwanda, all get worse.It begins the horrible genocide including rampage,ravishing and ravage in Rwanda which is spread for Burundi.Slaughter of Tusis by the Hutu is executed by soldiers and rebels. A journalist(Joaquin Phoenix)get into tumult and will shoot to show it at the world.Paul gets to protect his family and unfortunates refugees at the hotel but others hapless by the hundred are coming to ask help.Meanwhile the refugees Tutsis flee toward Congo to find shelter.The film has an acid critic to the indolence of United Nations(exception Colonel incarnated by Nick Nolte) and international community and specially, the abandon of foreign policy European.\n\nThus, a personage says that origin conflict is for Belgians whom in colonization epoch differentiated the Tutsi as highest and complexion more white and co-governed united the country,now the Hutu are taking the vengeance. It's calculated that in the indiscriminate massacre were cruelly killed by militia Interhamwe approximately one million people and in only three month.Conflict finished in 1994 when the Tutsi throw out the Hutu army and militia through of the frontier Congo. Leader of Interhamwe was condemned to maxim penalty. Don Cheadle interpretation is magnificent ,he was nominated for Acadamy Award although wrongly didn't obtain it.The motion picture is well directed by Terry George. Rating : Awesome and above average .Indispensable watching", u'-0.229909', u'The basic hurdle for the world to have more empathy with the macro issue of the horrendous massacre is the fact that the world is uninformed. Unlike the situation of Nazis and Jews, Irish Catholics and British Protestants or Crusade and Islam, the issue of Tutsi and Hutu in Rwanda has not generally been heard of by an average citizen of the world. In the movie, the reporter asks two women at the bar in Hotel Rwanda what tribe they belong to. "Hutu" says one, and "Tutsi", the other. The reported turns around and comments to his companion "They look like twins to me". That says a lot.\n\nThe film does educate us on the brief background of the local history, on how the Belgians used the Tutsi\'s to rule the Hutu and so since they left, the Hutu had been waiting for their chance to revenge. That is however just the bare backbone of the history, but we have not been brought to a deeper understanding of the bitter hatred that drove the Hutus to a diabolical genocide of a million Tutsi in 1994 as the world turned its back: "the nations are united in their indifference towards Rwanda" as Mr. Ebert aptly puts it.\n\nRather than being an epic on macro scale, Hotel Rwanda is a personal story (albeit a true one) on micro scale, about hotel manager Paul Rusesabagina\'s heroic efforts which saved twelve hundred hotel "guests" of Tutsi descent, including his own wife. This is a story told with high quality filming and yet one cannot help but come away feeling that it leans slightly towards looking like a Hollywood thriller. It would be gross injustice to say it\'s crafted and yet, the climax after climax of narrow escape and cliffhanging suspense does feel a tad Hollywood. It would be gross injustice to say that it\'s a tearjerker and yet one cannot help feeling traces of familiarity in the Hollywood style emotional pull. And there is considerable predictability, such as the sudden bumpy ride of the jeep in the fog would be easily discerned by a regular moviegoer as the signal for the next scene: a road strewn with bodies of massacred victims.\n\nOscar nominee Don Cheadle\'s performance as the circumstance-driven hero is deservedly recognized by the nomination. Nick Notle, who was wonderful in "Clean", puts in another great performance here as a similarly circumstance-driven hero in the U.N. peace keeping force Col. Oliver. The rest of the cast contributing to making this film a solid success includes Sophie Okonedo who was nominated for Best Supporting Actress as Pauls\'s wife Tatiana and Joaquin Phoenix as the reporter whose videotape of the massacre made the world pay attention. All told, Hotel Rwanda is a high-quality movie, but I can\'t agree with many comments hailing Hotel Rwanda as another Schindler\'s List.', u'-0.171523'], u'tt0477348': [u"I have a plea out on the message boards for someone to please explain this movie to me. I love movies and I am not one of those who insist on only being hand fed obvious characters and plots. I enjoy movies that make you think and use symbolism. \n\nBut I honestly did not understand this film. Im not saying its horrible but I will say I don't think it deserves the ratings it is getting. I personally rated it a 1 because I feel compelled to balance out the absurd over ratings it is getting.\n\nWhat I saw was two men fighting over the same two million dollars. One who is somewhat good and obviously poor and the other who is this maniac psycho killer. Im not even sure its his money, how he knows about it or why he even wants it. None of that was clarified.\n\nThe good guy is running with the money the bad guy is chasing him the sheriff seems like he is supposed to be chasing them but doesn't really want to and would rather be some sort of hillbilly philosopher about the whole thing.\n\nThen the good guy suddenly dies. The bad guy escapes death by the skin of his teeth AGAIN the money disappears and the sheriff retires but not becoming so philosophical that the whole movie just ends right there at his dinner table with him rambling on about some dreams he had.\n\nAgain I would love to figure out this movie.\n\nI am a 40 year old movie buff Academy Award trivia expert I own over 700 movies I've been a member here for 6 years And I have a college degree.\n\nMaybe I ate too many milk duds or something but it went right over my head.\n\nIf you are looking for a Donnie Darko, Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind MUST SEE A SECOND OR THIRD TIME TO FULLY UNDERSTAND kind of movie then go for it!\n\nIf you think you are going to see a Titanic, The Green Mile or Silence Of the Lambs kind of movie where the plot unfolds at a normal pace and doesn't make you search for answers and meaning then don't go see this thing. \n\nAgain, not a bad movie. Great acting, cinematography, pace.... the works... just incredibly difficult to understand after the first half.\n\nIn fact the first half is very good, suspenseful.. second half does not fulfill. Leaves you hanging and wanting more.\n\nOK Im done. Thanks for reading.", u'-0.307562', u"If this doesn't end my year in the top two films of the year then we are in for one hell of an awesome year of movies.\n\nThe new film from two of the best filmmakers working today No Country For Old Men shows the talents of the Coen Brothers on top form. After a couple of disappointments (Intolerable Cruelty had flashes of Coen genius but felt more of a Coen imitation than the real thing; Ladykillers had the odd funny moment but was the blandest film the brothers ever made, and there's just no excusing Marlon Wayans!) they knock this violent western drama out of the park.\n\nMore in the vein of their superb early mostly-serious efforts Blood Simple and Miller's Crossing (my personal favourite of the Coen back catalogue) No Country For Old Men is a slow-moving, character-driven masterpiece about uncompromising and uncompromised characters. It is very violent and bloody and not always for the squeamish.\n\nShot through with moments of humour these come, as in life, from real situations and observations so don't be fooled into thinking this will be the serious film with goofy-characters Coens of Fargo. No Country For Old Men is a tough, gritty story.\n\nThe unrelenting pace may take its time but you are gripped every moment. This is a thriller that genuinely thrills.\n\nJavier Bardem gives the best performance of his career. And, yes, I have seen The Sea Inside and he in superb in that but here he is simply extraordinary. It is a portrayal of unrelenting evil, of true derangement, of a human being with no shreds of humanity that ranks at the very top of studied film psychopaths. And I say film not movie because this is not a clich\xe9d character. This is not a character whose lunacy you enjoy over popcorn. This is one of the most frightening performances ever committed to celluloid. I felt truly nervous of what was going to happen every time he walked on screen.\n\nJosh Brolin essentially carries the bulk of the movie and he is excellent in a role that challenges him. I have never seen him perform to this level and if Bardem didn't steal the film you'd be talking about Brolin all the way home. As it is this gives him a showcase for his talents that should see him get a lot more attention.\n\nTommy Lee Jones is used sparingly but to great effect. Sounding more like Michael Parks than ever before his scenes pepper the movie with a wearied view on a world he doesn't really like or understand to great effect.\n\nI did find Stephen Root a little distracting as i have never seen him in a serious role before and he just looks amusing but he is in very little.\n\nRoger Deakins' cinematography is breathtaking as usual and the Coens' script is superbly crafted. There are moments, almost asides from the main plot, that would be superfluous in most scripts and excised in most studio films but which work perfectly in the overall context of the movie as only the Coens can achieve. One scene featuring Bardem in a gas station is up there with the best scenes i have ever seen on film.\n\nI have not gone into the plot here because I saw this film having not read Cormac McCarthy novel and knowing little other than the basic log-line - a man out hunting comes upon a scene of dead bodies, guns, drugs and money on the Mexican border and comes to the attention of both those behind the scene and a local world-wearied sheriff - and i think that's the way to see this film.\n\nGo in knowing as little as you can but knowing at least this: this is a serious, violent, slow-paced character piece from the Coens. This is not a Fargo. If you are squeamish don't see it. If you have a short-attention span don't see it. If you only love the Coens for their fantastic comedies like O Brother and Big Lebowski and the comedy/thriller Fargo don't see it. But if you want to see an intelligent, superbly acted, powerful, beautiful cinematic treat that will remind you of the true power of cinema see it, see it, see it. It's a masterpiece. Bravo Ethan and Joel.", u'0.314234', u'"No Country for Old Men" is for the kind of film fan who remarks, "Gee, wasn\'t that murder a clever mise-en-scene?" and who asks, "What kind of lens do you think they used in that strangulation shot?" The skeleton of "No Country for Old Men" is a cheap, 78-minute, gun-monster-chase B movie. Javier Bardem plays Anton Chigurh, the monster. He is Frankenstein; he is Max Cady from "Cape Fear;" he is from your childhood nightmares. He may be death personified.\n\nOne of many completely implausible scenes: an arresting officer, defying any logic, turns his back on Chigurh. Chigurh, displaying the supple sinuosity of a Cirque du Soleil contortionist, or an orangutan, slips out of his handcuffs. This is done out of camera view, because for Bardem it would be impossible; thus the scene\'s implausibility. Chigurh then, in real time, strangles the young police officer to death on camera. This is an extended sequence. This is the payoff for "No Country for Old Men": watching one human being kill other human beings, in scene after scene after scene, using various weapons, including a captive bolt pistol usually used on livestock. Guess Chigurh couldn\'t get hold of a Texas chainsaw. This is a slasher flick for the pretentious.\n\nEarly on, there are well-done, if standard, chase scenes. A man outruns a car: not believable, but fun to watch. A pit bull chases this fleeing man down a whitewater river. The man reloads his gun at the very last moment (of course) and shoots the pit bull dead just as it is about to sink its teeth into the man. Later, in a hotel, a beeping transponder informs the killer where his prey hides. Your pulse may race and you may think that this is all leading up to something interesting. You will be disappointed.\n\nTommy Lee Jones, whose ear lobes appear to be metastasizing as he ages, wanders aimlessly through the film as Sheriff Ed Tom Bell, delivering cornpone, homespun, cowboy poet ruminations that are more or less opaque in meaning. No doubt the film\'s fans are even now feverishly compiling a companion volume that decodes Bell\'s dreams and conveys their depth.\n\nWoody Harrelson, late the bartender of the TV sitcom "Cheers," shows up for a completely pointless half-hour role that yanks the viewer right out of the movie. "What is Woody Harrelson doing here?" Some years back, some bored English majors decided that conventional narrative structure was not intellectual enuf, and decided to play games with narrative. "No Country for Old Men" plays these sorts of games. The viewer is invited to invest time getting to know characters who are eliminated from the plot in ways that convey no meaning and are not moving. The narrative flow is truncated and yet the movie keeps going; viewers ask themselves why the movie is continuing -- sometimes out loud, even in a movie theater -- this is supposed to be a deep, intellectual experience. It is not. It is merely annoying.\n\nOther than bratty English major head games, pretty much the entire substance of "No Country for Old Men" is a series of murders and tortures committed by Chigurh, who may symbolize your high school\'s worst bully \x96 a bully so terrifying exactly because he targeted English majors. His victims are often courteous; their likability makes watching them be humiliated and then murdered an uncomfortable, and, given the film\'s structure, ultimately pointless exercise. Not only are the Coen Brothers torturing their characters, they also torment their ticket-buying audiences.\n\nChigurh\'s nice victims are often poor, rural, Southern, whites, the kind of people often not featured as positive, lead characters in Hollywood entertainments. They are often villains \x96 witness films like "Deliverance." Here they are murder victims. Chigurh is associated with Mexicans, part of a rising "dismal tide," as one Anglo character puts it. No matter how you feel about immigration, you may find this association of Mexicans with a rising tide of evil to be offensive.\n\nThe film\'s boosters insist that the movie offers three deep and shocking lessons: life doesn\'t always follow a neat narrative structure; evil often triumphs; and the old days were more peaceful and, nowadays, things are getting really bad. In truth, everyone walking in to the theater already knows the first two "lessons." No one needs the Coen brothers to inform him that life doesn\'t always follow a neat narrative structure, or that evil often triumphs. We expect filmmakers, and all artists, to offer us a more substantial thesis. As for the third "lesson," that the old days were more peaceful and things are getting really bad today -- have the Coens, or Cormac McCarthy, heard of Attila the Hun, or any number of other less-than-peaceful and courteous personages from our common human past? One might well be dubious about "No Country"\'s "lessons." Visit internet discussion boards devoted to this movie, and you will find fans asking, not "What is fate?" or "What is the role of a good man in a bad world?" but questions like, "If Hannibal Lector and Anton Chigurh were locked in a room, who would come out alive?" Given such reflections, one is safe in concluding that the appeal of this film is its emphasis on graphic violence, rather than on any more advanced intellectual or artistic merit.', u'-0.283696', u'. . . by the most overrated filmmakers ever.\n\n"No Country for Old Men" shares with other wildly overrated movies, like "Pulp Fiction" or "Collateral," a ludicrous setting in which criminals engage in wild shootouts and murder sprees lasting for days and days without any noticeable effort on the part of law enforcement to put a stop to it. NCFOM takes place in an alternate universe where an insane madman can travel across Texas murdering several people a day without the slightest hint of the FBI, DEA, U.S. Marshals, Texas Rangers, or any other authorities lifting a finger to stop him. The only cop who seems to be on his trail is an aging small town sheriff played by Tommy Lee Jones who doesn\'t actually try to catch him but just passing amiably through life making philosophical reflections on evil.\n\nThis movie has no interesting or sympathetic characters. Our supposed "hero" only gets in trouble because he commits an unbelievably stupid and selfish act -- stealing $2 million in cash from a drug deal gone wrong in which several people have already been murdered. Does he think no one will come after him? Then he compounds his idiocy by returning to the scene of the crime. Why should we care what happens to him after this beginning? He has what appears to be a very nice, likable girlfriend, whose life (along with his own) he endangers -- for what? Some blood/drug money that if the drug dealers don\'t kill him for taking, the cops will bust him for spending. Stupid. Besides which, the character has no backstory, no interesting qualities. He is a cipher.\n\nThe character of "Chigurh," over which all the critics are having such orgasms, might as well be an extraterrestrial, he bears so little relationship to actual human life. He appears to be in his late thirties -- killing people at a rate of two or three a day, as he does in this film, he must have murdered close to 10,000 in his adult life, without ever being apprehended. This man is almost on a par with Stalin, Hitler, Mao, and Pol Pot, except instead of killing people en masse as they did (using subordinates, secret police, and soldiers to do the dirty work), he appears to do every killing himself, many of them with some kind of oxygen tank (how clever, and how convenient it must be to lug around an oxygen tank to kill people with instead of, say, a handgun). And there is no FBI team on his tail, no worldwide manhunt to catch the biggest serial killer of all time. It\'s funny how many "professional assassins" there are in movies like this (and "Pulp Fiction" and "Collateral") and how few there seem to be in real life.\n\nThe plot of this movie is so unbelievably trite, clich\xe9d, and hackneyed that it is simply boring. Of course, a trite story can still make a great movie if it is well done. But the Coen brothers are far above actually putting in the effort to make their story work effectively on a nuts and bolts level. For instance, why bother to show the ultimate confrontation between the hero and villain? Why would the audience care about that? On some level, the Coen brothers must be laughing at all the sycophantic critics falling all over themselves to heap orgasmic praise on this joke of a movie. This film, and its ecstatic critical reception, represents the ultimate elevation of style over substance -- the appearance of meaning over actual meaning, quirkiness and moodiness for its own sake rather than in the service of a genuinely engaging story and characters.', u'-0.429593', u'No Country for Old Men is as exceptional a mix of two creative talents- the Coen brothers, Joel and Ethan Coen, and author Cormac McCarthy (recent winner of the Pulitzer for The Road, his own masterpiece) as one could imagine, as they converge on a story that in lessor hands would be just a B movie. The story concerns an average Joe out hunting one day in Texas who comes across a bunch of dead bodies, heroin, and a satchel with 2 million in cash. He takes it, but without knowing that a true embodiment of a psychopath (Javier Bardem) is on his trail, and as he evades him it becomes more and more clear the fatalism that lies in store, as a weathered sheriff (Tommy Lee Jones) is also on the trail with perpetulally sad eyes looking on from his stolid demeanor. \n\nMore than this, it\'s also about as good a morality play as one could ask for, because it plays and tools and makes very serious questions about what is moral, or what isn\'t, or what is so ambiguous that it\'s all up to the toss of a coin or a chance ride out of town. There are a few interpretations to Bardem\'s character Anton that could be taken, but one thing is certain- he\'s less a symbol than a real presence, a "ghost" as Jones\'s sheriff calls him that can come around at the drop of a pin, usually in the dark, and strike the utmost fear (or confusion if you\'re a clerk) in the hearts of men and women. You\'ll never look at a coin toss the same way again. Or an air-gun. Or fixing a bullet wound in a leg. Or a hunt at a motel. Or even the aftermath of a car crash.\n\nBut at the same time it\'s the purest time of cinema, recalling Hitchcock and Leone and Welles\'s Touch of Evil and the best of noir and westerns. There are so many exceptional shots and lighting, so much depth to the perception of the characters through the mis-en-scene, so much tension, that through this it\'s all up to the actors to make or break the near-perfection that is the McCarthy source. Bardem embodies Anton like no other could- you can\'t look at his eyes, often steel-cold and horrifically professional (to what professional who can say), which occasional tear- and it\'s obviously worthy of an Oscar. And Josh Brolin and Tommy Lee Jones are also fantastic; we see Brolin often in the midst of an action scene, a moment of \'save-your-life\' going on, and one can finally see an actor of his caliber completely breaking out in a role that doesn\'t require him to ever totally "emote". Jones, on the other hand, gives a compassionate turn in a film that\'s about the struggles of desperate men in a land without law and order. He\'s gone through so much that it comes out completely in his voice and eyes, sorrowful but holding back, and he reaches a level of connection with the character that makes the Fugitive look like simpleton TV. Kelly McDonald, who plays Lleland\'s wife, is also excellent when called upon, especially in a crucial scene later in the film.\n\nIt\'s gut-wrenching, bleak, violent, super-tense (I clenched many a knuckle during some scenes), surprisingly funny in a darkly comic manner not seen by the Coens in many years, and artistically fashioned to a beat that is meditative (watch the opening moments with Jones\'s voice-over), simple, and doomed. It\'s beautiful and terribly tragic, for McCarthy fans it finally strikes at what is truest to his material- even if you haven\'t read the book itself the Road will give an indication of the mood and atmosphere at hand- and at the moment I can\'t think of any other film that would be the best pick of the year- maybe one of the best films I\'ve ever seen.', u'0.176715', u'Well, I say spoilers but with no plot, a loose story line, random characters, no resolution to story line, saying this review contains spoilers is a compliment I don\'t want to give this movie. \n\nWhen I went to see this movie I did not know, believe it or not, it was a Coen Brothers film. However after the first scene and the visual of the boot marks all over the floor and I guessed that it was. It left me with the same feeling of the blood stains from the wood chipper in the snow from Fargo.\n\nNot the same imagery, mind you, but the same sense of feeling. A sense of something violent and chaotic happened looked at from an obtuse albeit familiar image with contrasting colors of something that shouldn\'t be there.\n\nNext the dialog came about and I knew for sure. \n\nThis movie is just plain misguided. When directors start to be identified by their techniques they are losing the plot and forgetting what film making is all about. To tell a story and to express ideas, not to showcase their quirks and be identified by them. \n\nThey should be in the background and not center stage.\n\nThe Coens, granted in my opinion only, took a step towards the over indulgent David Lynch and a giant leap away from becoming great directors based on their earlier works. The genius of Raising Arizona or Joel\'s The Hudsucker Proxy is a distant rock of film work casting a giant shadow on this current piece.\n\nSo many are saying that Javier Bardem\'s morbid and "deep" character is the real gem of the movie and brings originality to a type of role never seen before. Hell, take a look at another Tommy lee film, Batman where he played Two Face. The quirky and annoying Anton Chigurh is simply Two Face in an adult movie and like any bad guy, should not have gotten away.\n\nThen there are the random characters being introduced in the movie for no apparent reason. I mean, just what was Woody Harrelson\'s character in the movie for? Seriously, without dipping into film school hogwash about stereotypes and archetypes of moral choices and bit characters to drive a moral choice. Or the old guy in the wheel chair towards the end? \n\nBy that time I was just rolling my eyes and getting more confused and upset that I was actually trying to make sense of this non-sequitur story line.\n\nThen it hit me. \n\nThere was no point. There was no reason for this movie at all. It is just one long Coen self back patting cinematic journey and a movie to praise their own, self recognized, film making skills. What Blazing Saddles was to westerns this movie is to their previous works. It is quite ironic, and knowing the Coens deliberate, that it ends with Tommy Lee speaking of dreams. You know that feeling, the sense when you first wake up from a weird dream but in your half asleep mind set the fact that a pink dog was playing Tchaikovsky on the piano while sipping a martini and explaining why hot dogs come in 10 packs while buns come in 8 somehow can relate to your entire life plan and future goals. \n\nAs you regain your senses and become fully awake you realize that it was only a dream and sometimes a cake is just a cake.\n\nDirectors should not take center stage and simply let their films speak for them. This movie only speaks about the directors. Those that say this film is genius are still half asleep. When they wake up they also will admit they were stupefied by the Coens and didn\'t dare to question their "talent". \n\nWell, I am begging you to indeed question it and see this movie for what it really is: Self indulgent nonsense.\n\nBottom line is that No country for Old Men (even the title is ridiculous and misleading) is a film one can easily skip. When someone comes out and tells you about this film and how great it is, watch them start talking about the Coens and their amazing talent. For if any other director made this heap of trash you would be renting this directly off the shelves as it would never have made the big screen.', u'-0.219555', u"Days after seeing it, I am still haunted by No Country for Old Men. There is just something so effectual and uncompromising about it, that mere words will only begin to skim the surface of the cinematic excellence on display.\n\nAt its most simplistic, the film is a game of cat and mouse. The mouse here is Llewelyn Moss (Josh Brolin), a hunter who stumbles upon two million in cash after a drug deal gone wrong, and takes it thinking nothing of it. He tries to cover his tracks, but ends up letting the group looking for the money, figure out his identity. The cat is Anton Chigurh (Javier Bardem), a hit-man hired to find Moss and the money. But Chigurh is unconventional at best; he also happens to be bordering on mentally insane. And another man, a law man this time, Sheriff Bell (Tommy Lee Jones), is on the trail of both men as they criss-cross around Texas.\n\nRight up until its d\xe9nouement, the film is simply brilliant. Taut and thrilling, it blows right through the majority of its two hour runtime with ease. Even during moments of slowing down, the film stays right on track and never feels like it has run its course. It engages even when it appears that nothing is happening. The Coen Brothers truly crafted what appears at first glance to be a masterpiece, even if it is their first real shot at something that is not indelibly and inarguably their own. Even without reading Cormac McCarthy's novel, I know that the Coens have done it justice, even with their bitterly twisted and dark sense of humour scattered throughout the film.\n\nBut all of that comes to a standstill as the film concludes. The last twenty or so minutes feel like hours as the film wraps itself up, and it almost feels like these scenes belong to another movie entirely (one that borders on being pretentious and monotonous). I realize now that McCarthy's novel probably ends the same way, but it does not help provide closure to the fact that the movie is so break-neck paced right up until this happens. Its brilliance is shattered by what looks to be a series of tattered events thrown together to provide closure for all of the characters, alive or dead, and for its audience. It speaks volumes to the film's title, but it just does not feel satisfying compared to the rest of what we saw. Even with its enigmatic devices at play, I still cannot come to terms with how the film closes. It does haunt, and in a way, it may prove to be a significantly stronger ending as time rolls on. But as it stands now, it just feels weak.\n\nWhat is also a bit of a surprise, and only seems to appear as the film concludes, is the music. It is not so obvious at first, but the majority of the film is audibly shown with just the sounds the characters make and no background music to speak of. This element is brilliantly used, as it helps intensify every situation and makes the film downright terrifying in some cases. It just helps truly make the film come together, and only helps establish the quick pacing even more so. It was definitely a surprise, and one that will probably help the lasting impact of the film become even stronger.\n\nThe lush and bloodsoaked visuals also help to define the film. Despite the film taking place mainly in deserted areas, or the desert itself, the camera manages to capture just the right essence of what the writing and acting is conveying. The isolation and the terror almost become characters themselves through these visuals, and are sure to be recognized as the award season rolls in.\n\nThe film's acting is also very well done. Brolin anchors the film and even when it is just the audience reacting to his attempts at saving his life, he manages to deliver the best performance of his career. He breathes life into Moss, and truly brings a sense of pathos to the character. We feel for him and his greedy mistake, and as he develops into a man unwilling to go down without a fight, he only manages to up the ante for himself countlessly. Jones, as the law man stuck on the fringe of every event, also does very well for himself. Most of his work is simply delivering dialogue, but it is delivered in such a fashionable sense that you feel like he is speaking to the bigger picture of things, and not just himself. I would have liked a bit more development in his character, but what little there is helps his performance greatly.\n\nSupporting turns from Woody Harrelson and Kelly Macdonald are also done well, but are overshadowed by the main cast by both Brolin and Jones.\n\nAnd even more of an overcast is Bardem as the ruthless Chigurh. He absolutely nails this character down to his very bones. If anyone is merely toying with the idea of seeing the film, it should be specifically for Bardem. His performance is calculating and plagued with petrifying silence. When he chooses to talk, his words sound like they are being given by the essence of evil. This is a man with a plan, but it is one that only belongs to him. His enigmatic presence is developed throughout the film, and never once does it feel particularly appropriate to understand where this menace comes from. Watching him on screen is a jolt to the heart, and will go down as one of the best performances of the decade. His terrible hair only helps to make his character that more scary and formidable.\n\nNo Country for Old Men is one of the best pictures of the year, even if it is flawed. Its brilliance and lasting impact with leave you haunted.\n\n8.5/10.", u'0.0639522', u'There\'s very little "good" in No Country for Old Men beyond the mesmerizing acting and viciously dark screenplay. Instead, the unholy trinity of temptation, cynicism and pure, dark, evil take center stage in this modern western directed by brothers Joel and Ethan Coen.\n\nBased on the 2003 novel by Cormac McCarthy, the movie unfolds in the dusty Texas borderlands as hunter Llewelyn Moss (Josh Brolin) stumbles upon the remnants of a desert drug deal gone bad, complete with a case containing two million dollars. Succumbing to temptation, Moss makes off with the money setting in motion a chain of events that leaves a trail of blood spattered carnage across the State as he is pursued by the ruthless, coin tossing hit man Anton Chigurh (Javier Bardem) among whose killing weapons of choice is a pneumatic air gun.\n\nBearing little in common with pretty much any previous Coen film with the possible exception of Blood Simple, No Country for Old Men is a dark, bleak, ode to the baser elements of the human soul, and a spit in the eye to the noble ones as well.\n\nWith a structural trademark hinging upon breaking the conventional norms of predictability, No Country is a movie that will unsettle you at successive turns - in the way deaths are dealt out; by its palpable tension that can almost be cut with a knife, and its periodic deviations from the narrative norm \x96 the latter likely the only Coen brothers "quirk" for which their movies are renown.\n\nSwitching back and forth between the game of cat and mouse being played out by Moss and Chigurh and the investigation of unfolding events by cynical aging Texas Sheriff Ed Bell (Tommy Lee Jones), the Coens weave a web of dangled threads that one can\'t help but expect will be neatly tied together at story\'s end, only to tie them up in ways that buck the storytelling norm and manage to be both unsatisfying and true to their nature at the same time.\n\nUnforgettable among this tableau is Bardem\'s Chigurh. The Spanish actor who has also appeared in Love in the Time of Cholera and Goya\'s Ghosts evokes the most amazing presence of a ruthless killer with his own twisted adherence to a bizarre code of ethics that nothing short of witnessing his performance can do it justice.\n\nSadly, however, justice is one of the few items in abundance in this movie. And yet, as unhappy as I am that the Coen\'s screenplay defiantly refuses to cater to the audience\'s inherent desire for satisfaction, I grudgingly have to admire them for opting for the unpredictable.\n\nConsider the movie akin to one big coin toss \x96 will it be heads or tales? Call it - you\'ve been calling it your entire life.', u'-0.160329', u"If you like films that literally take your breath away, then this goes to the top of the list.\n\nAs stated elsewhere, Javier Bardem is so spectacularly evil and menacing that, if I were Mrs Bardem, I'd be worried about him coming home at night. The man exuded controlled evil, and I found myself not breathing when he came onto screen, yet couldn't take my eyes from him - a truly mesmerising presence.\n\nTommy Lee Jones turns in a belter of a performance, and mention should also be made of Kelly MacDonald who nails a faultless Texan accent alongside a multi-layered performance (despite the paucity of her screen time).\n\nBeautifully shot, as you would expect, and with some (welcome) moments of humour amongst the gore, this is a very very fine film. Miss it at your peril, because when those little golden men are being handed out next year in LA, I predict a lot of them will be going to this film. A belter.", u'0.307122', u'My vote of awful may be a little exaggerated, but I can tell you when this film ended, the audience literally groaned. The story is about some guy who we don\'t know happening upon a drug deal that went horribly wrong then finding $2 million in cash and taking it.\n\nThis guy who we find out is called Lewellen (I don\'t know how to spell it sorry), suddenly grows a conscience and decide to help a dying drug dealer by bringing back water, almost getting himself killed in the process. I honestly as I watched, did not understand why he went back, it was only after we left that my wife explained that he went to take that water to that poor drug dealer.\n\nNext we meet our bad guy, a man who has been arrested, escapes and can continue to kill literally dozens of people, even having shoot outs in hotels and main streets, without anyone either caring or phoning the police. This sort of thing must be perfectly normal in Texas, because at one point you have one guy firing a shotgun on the street and no one could care less, let alone phone the police.\n\nThere\'s the Sheriff, who\'s "trying" to help the "good guy", but couldn\'t really care. I mean wtf was he doing all day apart from lazing about reading the paper. Apart from anything else he\'s got a psycho running lose and like 10 dead Mexicans as well as two dead police officers. You\'d think he\'d be quite busy, but he\'s really not.\n\nAnyway our bad guy is hunting the thief for the money, and then in steps Woody Harrelson who you assume is going to save the day, but gets shot within five minutes. Honestly even after he was shot I thought he was faking it and would come back and help our "hero", I honestly couldn\'t believe it. Then they have both hero and wife murdered off camera, and again you honestly cannot believe that it happened.\n\nThe worst thing of all though is the ending, you keep thinking that the bad guy will get caught, but no he gets away, after killing like 1 million people, and the film closes with our Sheriff who\'s done jack anyway talking about some dreams he had. I was literally astounded by this film, it started off well, but just when you were waiting for something to happen, like a showdown between psycho and thief, nothing happened. If you want to waste your money go watch this, otherwise pick something else.', u'-0.570864', u'Beneath the eye-catching photography and violence, and the good acting, there lies an empty plot\n\nTo call this "film of the year" is to ignore that the world is a big place, and full of films that are a lot better. \n\nThis film simply didn\'t live up to the critical acclaim it garnered prior to release. Yes, Tommy Lee Jones does a good turn, as does Josh Brolin and Javier Bardem is somewhat unusual. The bleak countryside is well filmed and one of the reasons I cannot forswear multiplexes, and the violence also grabs the viewer\'s attention, but even that artifice wears off as the violence simply becomes monotonous.\n\nThe critics have uncovered nuances that separate this film from the classic Hollywood blood-and-guts formula, the most notable of which is that the lawman doesn\'t get the bad guy in the end. The trouble is that beyond critics counting angels on heads of pins, the Coens have retained hackneyed Hollywood clich\xe9s aplenty, the most egregious of which is the psycho who comes from nowhere, a plot device that dates back to the devil featuring in mediaeval morality plays and was debunked by the time Shakespeare was a lad. Hitchcock famously explained why Norman Bates became a psycho, and his suspense was all the more masterful as Anthony Perkins didn\'t look like a killer, just the Mummy\'s boy he really was.\n\nWith Hitchcock, you know something very bad is going to happen; but the suspense lies in not knowing what, by whom or when. After the first few minutes with Bardem\'s character, however, you know he will do the killing, you know how and you know it will be sooner rather than later. The only time the evil Chigurgh acquires more than one dimension is when people tell him he has a screw loose, but he just doesn\'t get it. Otherwise, he\'s as predictable as Terminator. We also have no idea where he learned his Rambo or Jason Bourne tricks, or how he gets to be better informed than the cops, and that is just one of many plot holes. \n\nBardem has acted much better before, as when he diversified from tongue-in-cheek macho roles years ago in films like "Carne Tr\xe9mula" or "Segunda Piel". He successfully masks his native accent, but ends up sounding a bit too machine-like.\n\nWe can see Chigurh is after a pot of drug money, but just who the hell is he? Who are the "managerial" guys who put him in the picture? We are left to guess that Woody Harrelson is a hired man, but told nothing about his background, who does the hiring, or why. And why is Woody\'s character stunningly efficient one minute, in tracking down Moss, while allowing Chigurh to sneak up on him the next? \n\nWe are also meant to believe that a full-blown drug war can break out with just a lone sheriff on the case, without the feds getting involved. Yes, there is a lot of disbelief to be suspended in seeing this picture.\n\nAnd then there is the foray across the border, which is corny and stereotypical to any one who has ever lived for a while in Mexico. Since when do norte\xf1o bands dress like mariachis? Since when do they serenade blood-stained gringo vagrants, for nothing, and in the morning? Since when do foreigners with bullet wounds get admitted to hospital, no questions asked? This has as much to do with the real Mexico as nachos and chile con carne. Could the Coens find not one Mexican adviser?\n\nOK, so maybe this is beside the point, that the film is really all about a man getting too old for his job, as the very title suggests, but even here the plot is full of holes. It is all very well for the sheriff\'s uncle to wistfully say that a lot of nasty stuff has always happened on the border, but that ignores the fact that drug trafficking entails a dangerous mix of grinding poverty and instant fortunes which has made things nastier, all along the supply and distribution routes; Mexican towns once known for little more than growing avocadoes now have severed heads rolled across dance floors, and the country\'s equivalent of David Letterman was wasted in broad daylight.\n\nEven that hollow and superficial take on drugs violence fails to grasp the nettle of centuries of brutality, of slavery and killing Indians, in making the U.S. what it is. And yes, it is possible to cover all these bases in a two-hour film. I will certainly look for them, and for answers to all the plot holes, should I ever read Cormac McCarthy\'s original novel.\n\nFor a sense of just how disturbingly omnipresent drug-fuelled violence is, and how it ends up breeding more violence, "La V\xedrgen de los Sicarios" did the job far better, but with Spanish dialogue and being made in Colombia, it never came to the attention of the critics who heap undeserving praise on the Coen brothers.', u'-0.323158', u'You can believe all the negative things being said about this movie. What\'s remarkable is that it\'s such a bad experience that it turns out to be the ultimate pallet cleanser. What I mean, all other movies you see after having to endure this awful film will seem less bad by comparison. I realized this while walking out of the "Aliens Vs Predator: Requiem" showing. It\'s a terrible movie in its own right but I found myself saying, "At least it wasn\'t as awful as NCFOM." That\'s not a joke or an over-exaggeration in any way. Walking out of NCFOM, you feel cheated, disappointed and even a bit angry. How is any film going to make you feel worse then that? I wasn\'t expecting anything coherent from AVP and that\'s what I got. Judging by the ratings here and a few critics that I read, I was expecting at least a decent film from NCFOM. For those that think this movie offers a deep theme or a hidden, complex agenda, you need to grow up.\n\nThe movie offers poor dialogue from the first scene on out. It\'s clich\xe9d, needlessly cruel and the story itself is a trite disaster. The film exists only to jar the viewer and to attempt to be edgy and different. It offers nothing substantial, even in it\'s veiled attempts at allegory and a thematic message. It agitates the viewer at every level by callously killing any character they even half develop. What was the point of Woody\'s character? Why have the killer survive with no ramifications? Killing a main character (and his innocent wife) away from the camera is as poor as it gets. Let\'s not even discuss the ending, there are enough people that have mentioned that irritating lack of conclusion. I could go on but why bother? I\'m not even going to remember the specifics of this film for very long. All I\'ll remember is the general unpleasant flavor it left and I\'ll remember that not many movies will leave such a poor taste. I\'m not bitter. I\'m grateful that going to the movies now has a bottom to the barrel in which to judge future films.\n\nI want to thank the creators of this film. It single handedly sets up better experiences for the rest of the year because nothing could possibly be worse then this movie.', u'-0.508544', u"First the good news, I did actually have to use a bit of brainpower while watching this, paying attention to each line and connecting the dots along the way. This was refreshingly non-Hollywood.\n\nThe actors did a decent job of making the cartoon characters into real people with lots of good line delivery, subtle expressions and feeling of realness. The style of the film was also a nice change from the norm, I liked the silences.\n\nNow the bad news, it was still predictable (I knew that the movie would end after Tommy Lee Jones last monologue- don't ask me how, I just knew it).\n\nAbout halfway through the film I realized that evil would win out since it played like a Steven Seagal movie in reverse (with an infallible anti-hero). Not impressive in the least.\n\nWho was Woody Harrelson supposed to be? The Greek Chorus? His character was a waste of time.\n\nClich\xe9 after clich\xe9 characters (writers fault). Drug dealing Mexicans, bumbling deputies, smart sheriffs, clueless wives, nasty mother-in-laws. Yawn, when have I not seen all this before.\n\nDid I just flat out disagree with the concepts behind it. Sure I did, cause I'm not addicted to TV news the way some folks are. In my experience the law enforcement actually works together and a person like the anti-hero would be called a mass murderer and hunted down. Suspension of disbelief only goes so far. It all points to bad writing. I'm sorry that someone was grappling so hard with the whole good vs. evil issue that they took the time to make something that is really a horror film into something it isn't.\n\nIs it art? No way. Does it contribute anything lasting to society or it's genre? Not really, perhaps some technical movie-making stuff but generally no.\n\nDon't waste your time on this one.", u'-0.322453', u'The Coen Brothers have succeeded in making what is possibly the most nihilistic film in the history of cinema, and in doing so they have divided the audience like Moses parting the Red Sea. A lot of people love this film and feel it is one of the greatest ever made, while I\'m on the opposite side, thinking the film is too frustrating to be enjoyed.\n\nThe story, as you may know, revolves around Lleweleyn Moss (Josh Brolin) and, upon his discovery of a crime scene (a drug sale gone horribly wrong), the theft of two million dollars. From the moment he steals the money, Moss is followed by Anton Chigurh (Javier Bardem), a menacing figure who kills anyone who gets in his way. Along the way, we meet Sheriff Ed Thom Bell (Tommy Lee Jones), who really does nothing to advance the story any, since his character does little to stop the events which unload on screen. In his soliloquies, we learn that he has seen better times than the horror unraveling around him, and that this is no country for old men (thus the title).\n\nAnd that\'s basically the story in a nutshell. There is virtually no development of characters, no backdrop to show us why Chigurh is involved and so evil, and no involvement of Bell\'s character. There is a brief appearance of Carson Wells (Woody Harrelson), who is hired to track down Moss and Chigurh by someone who obviously was behind the whole drug deal, yet we know nothing about who hired him (even the credits list the character as "Man who hires Wells"). After Wells fails, the "Man who hires Wells" then involves a band of Mexicans to track down Moss, and the story goes off the rails from there.\n\nWhat is even more frustrating is the final quarter of the film, where not only do we not get any further development of character, we get the lead character killed off camera, a scene involving Chigurh and Moss\' wife that is not fully realized, an out-of-the-blue car accident which doesn\'t do anything of any importance, and, yet, another meaningless soliloquy from Jones.\n\nI truly do not understand the hype and love surrounding this film. When I saw the film, several people walked out, and there was a groan at the end of the movie and multiple apologies to loved ones from people had brought them to see what was to be the "movie of the year." Sure, the movie had great cinematography, great sound, and decent acting (it\'s a Coen Brother\'s film, would you expect less?) - the problem lies in the script and the lack of character development. There were some great scenes of tension, especially one involving Chigurh and a gas station owner and the toss of a coin, scenes which truly deserved to be in a better movie.\n\nIf you\'re looking for entertainment, the best advice here is to stay far away from this film.', u'-0.167089', u"No Country for Old Men had a great storyline, character development, acting, and cinematography, and still managed to disappoint me greatly with its crappy anticlimactic ending.\n\nWhat is the purpose of suspense? I couldn't wait to see how the three main characters would interact when they inevitably met. But the Coens yank the rug out from under the audience by suddenly wiping out the protagonist 75% of the way through the movie. Why waste so much time building Llewelyn Moss'(Brolin's) character and emphasizing his resourcefulness if you're going to kill him off so abruptly with no explanation? There's easily an entire scene missing. Fine, I get it: the Mexicans found him. I don't need a rosy ending, but at least reveal how his demise went down. I'm not even asking for a gory shootout sequence; just elaborate on what led up to it. Yes, there is an underlying commentary on fate and humanity, but this movie is also an action/crime thriller where multiple peripheral characters are strangled or blown away by a sociopathic killer. It seems disingenuous to skim over the main character's death. Moss never had a chance, and neither does the viewer.", u'-0.521371']}